WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you keep on doing it. 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
[OpK] Sagittarius -back 17.07.15;-;The Elder Scrolls V - Skyrim is with no doubt one of the best games recently released. An open-world RPG with an infinite amount of quests and modding support ? Count me in. The replayability is also almost endless, because you can make a totally new character with other skills and so have a new experience. Installing mods can also help you fighting the boredom when you've reached 300+ hours ingame.
Zetsuji;-;I only played for a bit but it seems alright.
Darkin20;-;How can you not reccomend this game. The scope is huge, the quests are plentiful, the gameplay and graphics are still amazing. You will lose many hours of your life with this game happily.
Sui;-;Robbed house, girl caught me, she ran outside to find guards and everybody attacked her. 10/10 IGN
Signum;-;If you're going to buy one game on Steam. This is it. Get mods, and you get an infinite game.
WolfJob;-;Killed a chicken and became #1 Enemy of state. 10/10
Sawworm Iwata;-;Who needs Grand Theft Auto when you can steal a horse. 10/10
ShakerBubble5;-;Their was a time when I left my house I was just like a normals teenager. I exercised, I conversed with other human beings, Their was a time when natural light didn't hurt my eyes and burn my skin. This game has ruined my life. 11/10- IGN
HispanicAtTheDisco;-;Its freaking skyrim just buy it.
|H2o|ArkreactorInHD;-;If I had to choose between this game, and my girlfriend. I'd pick this game. EDIT: I'm single now ON A MORE SERIOUS NOTE: This game is the best in its genre. In previous Bethesda games they made a sad balance in between Questing, and Exploration. Some having more quests and less places to go, and others having very few quests and more places to explore. But in Skyrim, there is no shortage of quests, and if you are like myself and just wander around aimlessly, you will stumble into places that just blow your mind. Every time I have replayed this game, I stumbled into something new. For more info i'd very much recommend mods, with mods such as texture packs, difficulty, quests, armor, and weapons, this games replay value is endless. Go through the game once with plain skyrim, then mod the hell out of it. Overall I'd rate this game an EASY 10/10. If you haven't already. Please buy it, give it a little, and I swear you will be hooked.
typ0gr4ph1c4l_3rr0r;-;Mod it until it crashes.
[DFS] Ronald Mcheartattack;-;My parents are divorced, my mother is a hooker, my dad beats my brother on a daily basis, my brothers takes drugs, my pets have been kidnapped, and my life outside is dangerous and depressing. And what do I do to deal with all of this? I put a pot on a mans head and steal all his belongings. 11/10
Konar;-;I bought skyrim for $19.99 and not even a full 2 days later it goes on sale for $4.99. Ohhh Lord Gaben why have you forsaken me!?
Gevell;-;To read this review you need to gift me 100,-- in wallet founds
Rhett Butler;-;A guy in Solitude told me "You should see me when you get bored stranger". after 450++ hours in, Still haven't seen him.
Hudduh;-;THIS GAME IS: 10% luck 20% SKILL 15% CONCENTRATED POWER OF WILL 5% PLEASURE 50% PAIN AND 100% REASON TO PURCHASE THE GAME.
Sir DrunkenWookie;-;So I was walking around near Rorikstead and I went up and said hi to a guard and he said "Gotta keep my eyes open. Damn dragons could swoop down at any time" then at that exact moment a legendary dragon flew down and picked him up with his mouth and threw him in the air killing him instantly. 11/10 best game I've ever played
DKM211;-;It doesn't matter: how many characters you create, how many saves you load, how many mods you have, how many times you escape Helgen, how many Ralofs you meet, how many times you become thane of Whiterun, how many Dragons you slay, how many journies to High Hrothgar you take, how many shouts you learn, how many people you kill, how many pouches of gold you steal, how many contracts you fulfill, how many quests you complete, how many times you kill Alduin , how many different sets of armor you craft, how many different types of weapons you craft, how many horses you purchase how many people you marry, how many children you adopt, how many homes you buy, how many sweet rolls you eat, how many pouches of gold you acquire, how many times you become the Dovahkiin, ...you can never prevent a guard from taking an arrow to the knee... 10 kneecaps /10 kneecaps
Nahkuri;-;As it happens, I spend a considerable amount of time in the Cloud District, you sack of .
Bacun;-;I shouted at a goat and killed it. 10/10
VCB;-;I don't have a girlfriend, but now I don't even need one.
[Lemons] loopuleasa;-;------------------------ Updated review: ------------------------ Best ing single-player RPG series in existence. This world. This world really sucks you in. One of those "must experience in a lifetime" things. The previous games are up to their name, too, and this continuation is just jaw-dropping. ------------------------ Pros: ------------------------ - open world, a beautiful one in that regard - incredibly moddable, just don't use steam workshop, use Skyrim Nexus if you really want the best - the best damn sense of adventure and exploration you'll ever find in a game; if you're a curious  you'll love this to bits - immersive as hell, you'll really feel like you're under your character's skin - astonishing role-playing element and all you need to do is take it slow and explore, interact with the world as though you were your character - good game mechanics and skill-trees, great game mechanics if you include mods - graphics are just superb if you can run and mod them in - the atmosphere and audio just leaves me speechless! BY THE NINE JUST LISTEN TO THIS http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BrRxgV7nVr0 AND ALSO WATCH IN AWE http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EJx-iBco9Ms ------------------------ Cons: ------------------------ - you need a decent PC to unleash its full potential, but a light gaming rig works too - pretty costly, but it's worth its weight in gold in the long run - takes up your time and you'll notice a house fire an hour after it's too late, so buy a fire alarm just in case - modding the game might take even more time than playing it (Blunt, I love you for the game) (Massive love to all modders that made this game truly legendary)
Joshus;-;It's like Skyrim with guns without guns.
Stormy;-;No time for missions, still moding my character's bewbs
Unholy Symbiosis;-;For the record I have to say R.I.P to my 360, it died one fateful night while playing this game. I had around 700 hours on it at that point with Skyrim :'( lost but never forgotten. Oh Skyrim how I have loved you, part of me thinks of you fondly when I am outside and wonder if a dragur will appear from behind a random tree. Or a hole in the earth that the city excavates to fix the sewage system, is it time for the dragonborn? Never has a game had this much impact on my outward life like Skyrim has. It joins the ranks of Grand Theft Auto in my possibly going insane I need to stop playing phases. But it isn't your fault Skyrim, you are just what the doctor ordered for me. From the smooth visuals to the peaceful mountain tops or soaring on a dragon that minutes ago tried to eat me and killed my thousand dollar throw away horse. If you need help deciding on this game then I have to say that there is no amount of words placed together that could convey what Skyrim is. Sure the main story is linear, it does not feel as epic as past Elder Scrolls games. But the sheer amount of fun and imagination that you can have in this game is leaps and bounds past any sandbox game I have ever played. But if you must hear my words and need reassurance then I will try my best. For Skyrim deserves a two part review. Vanilla: I hate vanilla, not skyrim vanilla, but the flavor vanilla. Yeah that is off topic but I always assumed that people call base unmodded games vanilla because they share the hatred of the flavor with me. Unmodded Skyrim is beautiful and has depth and a heart that is unmatched, you can do anything, be anyone, but at the end of the day you either go home to your wife and children or battle legions of dragur in some cave for hours. Where is daddy? That deadbeat is picking pockets and forging daggers so he can pay for that glass case he wants to put in the armory to show off his junk. Or maybe daddy has a secret.....maybe daddy is a vampire who lives off the blood of others in the darkness of the vale. Or as youtube has shown me.....daddy likes elaborate hidden basements where he stores the bodies of his dead O_O Skyrim vanilla has it all and more, it is a work of art that deserves your time. Modded: Now in a more serious tone I must say that this is now a different game. You can be anyone, do anything, create anything, and never run out of custom quests. You can upgrade the visuals to a stunning degree and bask in the hd glory. If you want skyrim you need to mod, you have to mod, it will call to you and you will answer and the sickness will set in and you will never be the same. But you will love it and you will never turn back. I can not go into further detail because I just can't, there are too many mods to even begin a proper review of modded skyrim. Maybe you want to weild a  sword while dressed as Finn from adventuretime while pikachu follows behind you. The possibilities are endless and I implore you to mod your skyrim, just do it and you will never look back. Just buy it already and join the millions who already have found one of the greatest games of all time.
Gopher;-;An epic game made all the more epic by the fact that it is so easy to mod and so well supported by the modding community. The Elder Scrolls series has a large following and often you will hear people argue over each new TES game comparing it to the last, but for me each TES game stands on its own merits, and Skyrim is no exception. The story is pretty good and there are plenty of side quests, but what makes Skyrim so great even when not modded is its large and open nature. This is a land you can just pick a direction and with no quest in mind and just explore. You will find danger and excitement on your journey ... and loot. Lots and lots of loot. But once you start modding this game, that is when you unlock the true value that is Skyrim. Potentially thousands more hours content (for free) in a game that can be improved ten thousand different ways from graphics, textures and sounds all the way to game mechanics and user interface changes. You can make the game exactly what you need it to be, and play it for so long you may still be playing when the next game in this series comes out.... and sometimes longer than even that. If you are interested in modding the PC version of the game, be sure to check out my guide for beginners: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RxQ1JN_X-_Y&index=1&list=PLE7DlYarj-DdhDG41roBVJfNCqvO5MmKP
Falem;-;Intro Skyrim is a excellent RPG if your looking for quantity over quality. The game does not shine with impacting story as much as other more focused RPG's because of the freedom it offers. That doesn't stop it from being a great experience to most and memorable at that. The main quest takes a couple of hours but there is 300 hours of side content to go through beside it. Which is the greatest amount of content any game I have seen has to offer. The mods only add more content on top of that and give it insane amount of longevity. Advantages and Disadvantages + 300 Hours of Content + Perk system that is well thought out + Mod Philosophy that allows people to add more value to the game as a community + Replayability is extremely high due to mods and classes + Environments are done well for most part with minor blemishes + Many interactions with NPC's (thanks to companion mods) - NPC's are not very animated/expressful as other smaller more focused RPG's - Due to the freedom of the game the experience is not as consistently exciting - Default UI is bad (Mod UI cures this) - Level scaling should be bound to equipment for more consistent scaling. Community The Skyrim community has put alot of dedication and work into adding tons of value to this game. The steam workshop is also a nice simple addition to make mod installation easy and quick for people. This said, I would like to see more quality in game combat, although the perk system makes up for this. Mods Enchance Mods can provide you with a fresh experience and expand the longevity of the game. It improves the quality of the game with better graphics, environments, lore, quests, companions and other community crafted content. Warning: Mods can conflict, try to figure out what's conflicting, some require DLC.
nubbedindaribs;-;Lost my girlfriend, scholarships, and friends. 10/10 would reccomend.
The Mighty I;-;Killed an old woman. Stole a plate. Got arrested. (Because of the plate). Fought a dragon. Stole a crown. Got drunk. Became a werewolf. Killed bees with fire. Followed a talking dog. Visited the old dwarven cities. Killed robots. Became an assassin. Killed the emperor. Got beaten to death by a whole town for stealing a cabbage. Became a respected general. Fought bandits. Poisoned mead. Stole cabbage again. 10/10 would Skyrim again.
DeathByDay;-;Watched free porn. Got a virus. Bought Skyrim for the nudity mod. Didn't get a virus. 11/10, would fap again.
Obed Marsh;-;This game is mostly about harvesting mushrooms. If you're a true mushroom connoisseur, you'll want this.
The_Heathanator;-;if this game was a potato....it would be a good potato potato/potato would potato again
Dark Shockwave;-;Stole a plate and became the #1 most wanted man in the world. 10/10
=(yIFF)= guacamole fiend;-;You can pause in the middle of a battle and consume an ungodly amount of cheese wheels, making this game one of the best games ever to exist simply because of how many cheese wheels you can consume in the middle of a battle. Can you imagine somebody just carrying all these  cheese wheels into battle? Bewilder friends and foe alike with your unholy cheese wheel obsession, you daring thing, you. 10/10, would play again for some more cheese wheels. Also there are dragons and swords and magic and stuff whatever no big deal. P.S. can someone make it so that a single cheese wheel only takes up 0.1 carrying capacity? no reason just that it would be super useful im asking for a friend ok thanks mate
[DC][TR-16]prop11;-;If this game was a spoon, it would be a good spoon.
Hot Biscuits;-;Removed someone's head with a wooden sword. 10/10
Radical Boy;-;It's like Skyrim without guns.
residentcarry;-;One of the best RPG games I've played , just brilliant, this game never ends, a lot of modding, adventure's , characters , different areas quests etc. Must PLAY!
[GTFO]akinatator;-;I used to have friends, then I bought skyrim.
the buffalo smurf;-;A game where trying to interact with giants holding clubs turns into the funding of NASA's space program.
Naachen;-;My skyrim character is getting more laid than me...
TheeYoloSwagMaster;-;"I walked around in this game for 98 hours having a blast and feeling epic before I found out how to sprint 10/10 would walk around for 98 hours again, funny thing is I really didn't even mind that I couldn't sprint lol" What can I say about Skyrim that hasn't been said already. If you don't own this game you are missing out on an experience of a life time. This game offers +100 of hours of content in an immersive world and on top of that there are over +20,000 mods to customize your Skyrim to the experience you want. Go and get this game.
Beautiful Banjo;-;I killed a chicken, and the entire town banded together to kill me. 10/10
spapro;-;One of the best open world cooking games of the year. There are so many ingredients to find such as herbs and spices to use in order to create masterful dishes. The game borrows cooking gameplay heavily from 'cooking mama' which is easy to spot for a michelin star cook. One of the best games of the year - 10/10 would cook again.
Pistal;-;Can play as cat people - 10/10
Lackus(R.I.P. Mr. Iwata-San);-;WARNING: You WILL lose your social life after getting this game.......10/10
Venysri;-;I can shout at cabbages not only IRL, but virtually too. 10/10
BS|Couchfighter;-;Updated 28/04/15: Paid mods are gone (until next time, at least), and all is well in the world! https://steamcommunity.com/games/SteamWorkshop/announcements/detail/208632365253244218 Thank you all so much, everyone who spoke up against Valve's implementation of paid mods! Paid Steam Workshop protest review below, Never forget! (This review got 11208 positive reviews out of 12000 over the course of three days, before Valve changed their minds): Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. People can and should support mod creators via donations, and a 'Buy me a coffee!' button on the workshop page would be good, but putting them behind a pay wall is god damn atrocious.
Pwnycakes;-;Do you want to have no life? Because that's how you get no life. 10/10
Spythal;-;I have no time to write a review! I'm too busy playing this game!
Nik;-;After I walked out of the first cave an Orc attacked me, so I killed him and took all his clothes. 10/10
Fancy Fish;-;THE ELDER SCOLLS V: SKYRIM - An open world RPG of epic proportions, a true masterpiece || 9.5 || Score Comment Graphics 9 Skyrim has a free High Resolution Texture pack available as DLC (and if you can run it I would highly recommend it), but even without the graphics are clean with nice details and textures. Ambient lighting and effects are excellent and the designers have succeeded in creating a diverse and atmospheric landscape. Character creation is good with a lot of customisation possible. All this, however, is completely and utterly eclipsed by what is possible with Mods. With Mods (readily available from the steam workshop) gamers are able to create breathtakingly stunning vistas, highly realistic characters, followers and NPC's. With over 24 thousand mods (at the time of this review) you can change the appearance of or add in pretty much anything you can imagine (the sky really is the limit). There is of course a performance trade-off when applying the ultra high definition textures and graphical mods so I recommend following one of the excellent guides available to find the right balance for you. Audio 9 Music is grand and epic, very fitting to the feel of the game. Sound effects and voice acting are both excellent throughout and considering how many characters and quests there are in the world of skyrim this is quite a feat. Personal favourites for voice acting include the aptly named khajiit: M'Aiq the liar and the deranged murderous jester: Cicero. Gameplay 9 Skyrim is a joy to play, its not perfect but its pretty close. Controls are intuitive, responsive and work well with either mouse/keyboard or controller. There are many choices to be made throughout the game with real consequences, factions will favour you or attack you depending on your actions and alignment with other factions. There are many different playstyles and strategies to Skyrim, finding what works best for you is all part of the fun. Skills and abilities progress as you use them so you aren't completely restricted to a class such as mage or ranger, want to use a little bit of magic but also kill with a bow - no problem. Skyrim is often compared to its predecessors (Oblivion and Morrowind) to highlight some of flaws in the game, and while its true to say some of the missions and areas feel overused (oh? another cave filled with draugr you say?) and there are other occasional glitches, considering the massive scope and scale of the game these seem fairly minor. Skryim in certain ways surpasses its predecessors and is at very least well deserving of its place in this legendary series. Story 10 So much detail, so much depth, the lore and background to the Elder Scrolls series is second to none. In Skyrim there are huge libraries packed with books containing everything from children's stories to hidden tomes of magic to the history of the lands. Talking to the people you meet tells of their individual struggles and also adds to the overarching story of a land rife with conflict and caught in far reaching changes of which you find your character the center. Skyrim is rich with background and story, as you explore and interact with the characters around you its very easy to feel part of the world. Quests are (with a few minor exceptions) interesting, challenging and varied with each of them building your understanding of the world and your place in it. Replayability 10 You only need to look at the number of hours people put into this game to realise how much Skyrim has to offer. Personally I had already completed this game many times before I got it on steam and was still able to get many more hours of enjoyment than the average rpg, I'm sure it wont be the last time I play Skyrim either. Modding here also helps immensely with the community creating a huge collection of different locations, characters and quests. Overall 9.5 An outstanding game, if you haven't tried it then your missing out on a truly amazing gaming experience. The DLC's available (Dragonborn and Dawnguard) are worthwhile playing and some mods will require them (so pick up the GOTY if you can). More reviews by Fancy Fish Agree / Disagree? Please leave me a comment
Unseen Cube;-;-Be me Jarl of Whiterun -Naked man walks in -Devours 25 cheese rolls infront of me -guard walks up to him -says the arrow to the knee line -Naked man stand behind him -Disappears -Guard is now naked -Naked man becomes guard -comes to me and says somthing about dragons - pants -Sent him to dangerous dungon -Feel Relieved -Comes back with stone - intensifies -send him to kill dragon -By talos i hope he dies -Comes back with dragon bones - you talos -Send him to High Hrothgar -hopefully thats the last time i see him -1 month later -comes back with stormcloaks to take over -me.jpg
eeJayFerno;-;Probably the best game made by Bethesda, it's enjoyable you can have endless fun IF you mod it, modding it brings a whole new experience for this game, I recommend it if you're into these types of games!
_;-;Skyrim is, without a doubt, one of the most epic games ever made. Whether you're a fan of role-playing games or not this title will appeal to you regardless. Yes...it's that good! Unless you have the time to play twelve hours a day seven days a week then the basic game will keep you occupied for many many months on end. Add to that the content from the ever growing mod community and this is a game that you could potentially play FOREVER! Ultra recommended!!!
Demadizzle;-;The only crime was having this sit in my library for so long. Love it
Scaramanga;-;Epic game , every one knows this you would have to live on Mars not to know this . But like many other reviews on steam the company practice is also a part of the game experiance. And people are quite happy to down vote games because of there buisness practice and this is no different . Bethesda and Valve made a shameless attempt to make a cash grab on mods . They failed only because people stood up to them other wise we would be paying for mods now in most games. What makes it worse is both companys own a large part of there rise and success down to free mods. Suggesting a donation box for the actual developers of the mods who put time into making it and not a requirement to get the mod just a donation option People telling me to change the review are the same people who where trying to tell us all why paid mods is a good thing. White Knights of Valve and Skyrim please insert your tears and buthurt in the comments section below i only charge $1 per comment
Crazykev;-;So Valve and Bethesda have taken away paid mods. Cool and all the power to them but I belive Valve should still make it easier to donate to mod creators, especially on a game that's so heavily dependant on mods from the community. The base game is so open and full of promise, but it's also empty and borning. It's as if they made the game expecting mods to make it better. Original Review: Was a great game and still is but I'm just gunna give it a thumbs down for the forced payment of mods now. I figure if we the community can shove this games rating down far enough then maybe valve will reconsider the forced payment option and maybe let devs have a donate option instead.
DarkRevenant;-;10/10 without mods, 69/69 with mods
carpool;-;skyrim is like an adult movie. it's addicting, keeps your hands busy, and keeps you staring at your monitor. 10/10
Quanaril;-;Worth every pence! Must play!
Wiike;-;Best hentai game of the decade.
Aperture;-;10/10 like skyrim but with skyrim
Musa-The-Joker;-;I stole a spoon and i got a bounty on me, best game ever.
ownosourus;-;The province of Skyrim might be frigid, but the role-playing game that takes place within it burns with a fire few games possess. Yes, Skyrim is another enormous fantasy RPG from a developer that specializes in them, and it could suck up hundreds of hours of your time as you inspect each nook and crevasse for the secrets to be found within. The game returns you to the continent of Tamriel, where you explore the northern realm called Skyrim, home to the Nord race. In these northern regions, snow flurries cloud your view, and platforms of ice float on the chilled waters. Nighttime often brings Tamriel's version of the aurora borealis, with its gorgeous blue and green ribbons stretching across the heavens. Skyrim's predecessor, Oblivion, featured prototypical fantasy environments-pretty but not quite evocative of the lore's darker undercurrents. Skyrim embraces its darker elements. You might feel an eerie chill as you glimpse a half-sunken ship through the mist, or watch as a dragon comes to life before your very eyes under the swirling firmament. Closer inspection reveals hard edges, plain painted-on textures, and other visual flaws that are conspicuous should you seek them out. But like many enormous games, Skyrim makes a fantastic impression not because its individual elements are sharply honed, but because they contribute to a grander whole. There's so much to do that your quest log becomes an embarrassment of pleasures, offering dozens of choices at any given time, each one as enticing as the next.It's impressive enough that there's so much to do; it's even more impressive that most of it is wonderful. Not every dungeon is a joy to explore. Stone-turning puzzles occasionally bring the fun to a halt, and a few repeated cave designs could dampen your spirits. But overall, every task has an excellent sense of context, and surprises lurk around many a turn. Skyrim also uses scattered books and references to enthrall you. You may not be a big fan of reading books in role-playing games, but even so, you should make an effort here.The combat in Skyrim is the tightest Elder Scrolls combat yet, the visual and audio cues normally providing proper feedback with your blows and zaps.Some death blows result in Fallout 3-style slow-motion kills, which retain their power because they're not overly frequent. Movement, too, has seen improvement: you can now play from a third-person view and feel like you're moving across the land instead of floating above it. All in all, Skyrim has some minor issues but as a whole is a brilliant RPG.
Good Job Fat Dracula;-;This is a game.
808jokimchi;-;if this game was a chair it would be a good chair
[G] Zeroni;-;Okay, where do I start? General: This game is able to shock you and make you laugh time and time again, even when playing it for the 3'rd time. It takes about 130 - 200 hours of playtime to finish all of the quests, and I guarantee that in the time you will not discover everything there is to discover. If you do not feel like questing, take some time mining, scaring people with magic and shouts, undressing them, stealing, stealthing, killing dragons or giants, throwing cabbages around or simply reading 1 of about 250 integrated ingame books and stories. Graphics: This game has pulled off something I have thought to be impossible and pushed the whole gaming industry to the new levels. It has successfully integrated superb graphics into a lot of content. World is beautiful, vast and full of variety and although a bit dark by default this can very easily be changed by just picking one mod from the workshop. Workshop: Why does this deserve a special tab? Because thanks to workshop, earlier mentioned 200 hours of gameplay easily turn into thousands of hours of gameplay. Don't like any part of the game? Change it! Modify it! Add to it! A huge amount of mods are being made every day, and whether they spawn an extra cupcake in your house or add new cities with their own storylines they will all change your experience and prolong the fun. Name what you want to do, it exists. ALL OF IT. Cons: - Few possible glitches, but all have their fix, just need to be googled out. - A bit too confusing and overwhelming at the start. A lot of unanswered questions may put you off the game. This happened to me on the first two attempts to play the game. I ended up going to the first town, becoming a woodcutter, killing a chicken and getting chased by the guards. But once you push on, you will be nothing but glad you did. Who am I even writing this for? Is there any poor soul out there who has not yet played this game? BUY IT. NOW. Please?
Kaneki Ken;-;For those who dreamed of a game that allowed to cross the woods, discover secrets and explore a world full of dangers and full of opportunities, the release of The Elders Scrolls V: Skyrim is a dream come true. Bethesda improves what has been done with Oblivion, putting a cure realization and amount of content that we never expected. After about forty hours of play, apart from the main quest, we did not come at the head of almost anything, many are content, things to do and those that perhaps we will never make. There is some venial sins and approach the statistics to which we must get used to, but the fact remains that Skyrim is a masterpiece, the kind that has a duty to live if you love RPGs and those video games that only some software companies are still able to do.
...;-;Skyrim is the latest installment in Bugthesda's legendary Elder scrolls franchise,games which have always been touted as "genre defining" & it pleases me to say that skyrim is no exception. With it's barren vast open world landscape & it's cast of interesting characters skyrim is the definitive RPG experience that you will ever get to play. In order to elaborate on this, I am now going to give you the reasons as to why you should get The Elder scrolls V Skyrim. Pros Flying mammoths Gorgeous game world with 512 x 512 & 256 x 256 textures ( 1024 x 1024 with the HD texture pack ) Excellent companion AI that hinder quests by stepping on to traps as well as triggering them for you in order to make you feel more immersed in the game as well as blocking doorways & always being spotted by the enemy especially if you want to roleplay as a sneaky character. This is another feature that makes you feel more immersed. No dependence on mods. Unlike the other games in the franchise Skyrim is not dependent on mods to keep it interesting even after 300+ hours of gameplay cause who doesn't love replaying the same opening sequence for the 6th time. Easy & glitchy dragon fights. Who needs challenging boss battles when we can just kill dragons & feel like gods. Screw timing & skill required in your average game boss fights. Skyrim did it right so much so that you don't even have to lift a finger in most fights. You can just let the other Npcs handle it for you. It's not like the game says that you are the only one who can kill the dragons. Broken quests. This is the most important feature of the game as it encourages the player to keep playing the game again & again in order to complete that quest. And at times it also forces the player to delete saves & hence reducing progress you have made so far in the game.This further increases your game time. Bugthesda are one of the true pioneers of this feature & other games have also started adopting this. Paid mods is the latest innovation that bugthesda in collaboration with valve have brought to the table for skyrim. Although Skyrim is not dependent on mods but it is still a good option for the players cause who doesn't want to pay for something that may or may not work & could possibly harm your saved game. To be honest i can't think of a single con for this game cause it's just so perfect and i think i have made that very clear with the features mentioned above. I think my only gripe would be that the soundtrack is just so meh in my humble opinion. Final verdict : 11/10 Skyrim is a game that definitely deserved the critical acclaim that it got back in 2011 although it was released in the same year that saw games like i don't know Deus Ex Human Revolution, Batman Arkham City, Dark Souls, Uncharted 3, Witcher 2 but hey those games don't stand a chance against skyrim & all of it's innovative feautures. A clear GOTY winner
Dinoqwerty;-;I dont know why people wear horned helmets. They look like angry cows.
Sonic;-;I killed a chicken. Whole town attacked me. 10/10 would kill again.
Ben the Cait;-;Fornicate with wenches, acquire gold.
First Day Reviews;-;-First Day Reviews- ======= Highlights ======= - Exceptional Graphics - Immersive Storyline - Best Open World RPG - Do anything, Be Anything You Want - Fighting Dragons With Your Voice! ============= Journal Experience ============= Journal Entry 1 After a harsh struggle with morals and general common sense I have decided to take on the life of a Serial Killer. This was a difficult decision, but none the less my career will be full of adventure and creativity im sure. Journal Entry 2 I stumble upon a small village in the middle of a lush green valley. The town is very cute and has lots of character, The trees lay down gently caressing the mossy roofs of the residents old homes. There is a quiet calm stream the flows through the center of town. yes.... this is my ideal place to begin my career. Journal Entry 3 I start by scanning out the town guard's positions, from what I can tell there are only 3 of them. With such a small town who would ever think to need more guards?.... perfect... Now we just need to carefully pick our victim. I scan around, I see a few older ladies, a few older men, A boy walking with his dog.... But who do I choose? ... so many choices Journal Entry 4 While scanning the small crowd of residents I hear a women's voice from behind me say some type of vulgar insult about my clothing. I turn around to see a ugly women with a sneer on her face. She sticks her nose in the air and shoves passed me. I can hear her mumbling something else as she walks away but can't quite make it out. I think we found our first victim :) Journal Entry 5 I decided to quietly follow her, she goes to the market and picks out fruits and meats, she wanders over to the stream and glances at it for awhile, she makes small chit chat with another women. Finally she starts walking out of town down the road for a ways. I quietly take cover in the forest and sneak along. She leads me to what appears to be a small mill on the edge of town. She walks into the older looking home next to the mill. Its still daylight and I don't want to risk an attack that she can escape from... better wait till night. Journal Entry 6 I wait until about 1am, its pitch black out and all seems quiet.... time to get a closer look at her home. I lockpick the door and sneak inside. The walls are decorated with all manner of animal heads, swords and shields. She has the fire lit and the light from it bounces off all the corners of the room. I find her quietly sleeping on a bed in the corner, I pull my dagger from my cloak and raise it. With one mighty stab she gives out her last breath and sprawls out silently on the bed. Now to leave my mark, earlier on I purchased a small quantity of blue flowers from a market, this will indeed be my insignia. I position her arms so that they are across her stomach, I then gently place the blue flower in her chest. A respectful position and a perfect mark for my career. Journal entry 7 I have cleared out most of the valuable items in the house....*Door slams*.... "OH NO" I hear shout from behind me! Its the husband! I should have done my research better, I should have noticed the large pair of boots next to her bed, they were far to big for her... How could I be so stupid. The man turns and runs out the door... I'm going to have to catch him or else im done for. I give chase, as I burst out of the door I can see that he will get to town far before I can catch him with my dagger. I pull my bow out, im only going to get one shot, if I miss im going to have to make a run for it. I take a deep breath and steady my aim, I carefully pitch my bow up and down... trying to gauge his distance as he runs. I release my arrow, it sails gracefully through the air... then I lose sight of it....Did I miss??.. I wait...Horrfied... hoping... begging.... I see his body fall face first to the ground, a perfect shot, a perfect kill. Journal Entry 8 I quickly run over to the mans body, we are now only about 20 feet from town but luckily there are no guards walking by yet. I grab hold of the body and drag it into the woods. I decide that maybe its time that the guards know they are not in control anymore. I drag the body to the mouth of the stream that flows into the town. I pull him into the water and let go, the stream's current is weak but its enough to float him into the town. I proudly strut into town to await his body's arrival, the guards are all gathered around the center of town with lit torches talking. I wait patiently beside the market.... then I hear one of the guards yell "A Body!" The guards and 2 other residents run over to investigate, gasps and mumbling begin to develop around the group. I turn away and start heading out of the town.... My work is done here... Many more towns to visit in skyrim :) ========== Video Reviews ========== Oculus Playthrough http://youtu.be/Xqbozfvp4Os Playthrough http://youtu.be/zfdaAJMduTY ================ First Day Reviews Links ================ Youtube https://www.youtube.com/fdreviews Facebook https://www.facebook.com/fdreviews Twitter https://twitter.com/FirstDayReviews Steam Group http://steamcommunity.com/groups/firstdayreviews Twitch http://www.twitch.tv/firstdayreviews
Martijn;-;Despite what you may have heard, this game is not actually about dragons all that much. The story centers around Vietnam vet John Wayne, a devoted husband and loving father troubled by his past. When Jarl Snowden summons John to his court in Bethlehem the player is given the first key game mechanic, the "look at stuff" feature. This feature is innovative and fresh, giving the player a new way to interact with the game. Using the mouse, the player can move John's head and experience what stuff looks like through his eyes. Or, if you're a pro like me, you'll want to toggle to third person so you can see John's back aswell! This new feature has never been seen before in any game, and renders the genre fresh again. After Jarl Snowden talks to John about some N.S.A. leak scandal, you must take on the role of John's alter ego, Rage Cage, and spend the next day and half walking to Hyrule. Once there, King Hugh Jayniss informs you that you could of just fast travelled here instead of walking. Upon which, I put down the game to write this review.
G20;-;Providing me with seemingly endless fun :)
Korny Loves Corn;-;= Poor  = Fair  = Good  = Nice  = Awesome  This game isn't boring even when you play it slowly, just look around, enjoy the beautiful scenery and explore the world of Skyrim. Whether you are killing bad guys or exploring the unknown, you need a trusty follower by your side! Mods, there are tons of mods out there that can make your game as realistic as possible and as beautiful as possible. Tons of quest too, that also include custom quests made by fans. Wide range of class like; Warriror, Archer, Mage, Battle Mage, Spellsword, Rogue, Nightblade, Ranger, Necromancer, Ilusionist, Cleric, Thief and many more, it all depend on your playstyle. Of course you don't have to go around killing people, you can always enjoy hunting animals if you like, or exploring the whole Skyrim.
Asteo600;-;After 600 hours put into this masterpiece (and after I hopefully started to understand most of the lore behind the Elder Scrolls universe), I think I am ready to write a review for Skyrim. Personally, the best feeling I had while playing this game was getting back to my home, after 3 days of fighting dragons, exploring dungeons and talking with NPCs. My kids were eager to see what I got them, so I gave them a lot of toys I have found in the huge landscape. They also had surprises waiting for me, plenty alchemical ingredients, and even coins. There are many races to choose from, my favorite one being the Khajit, a cat-human appearance specialised in Sneaking and Thieving. Players who don't like this playing style, but generally want to play as a Khajit (or any other race) will be happy to see that Skyrim lets them make the character THEY want. If you want, for example, a Mage Argonian, it will be, of course, harder work than for a High Elf, but as much rewarding, because you will notice how your character truly evolves during the adventure. You have tons of options, tons of playing styles (which you can mix or even change at any point in the game if you feel like it). But enough with characters. Other aspect which really felt unique and incredible was the size of the land. Not only Skyrim itself is huge, considerably one of the biggest maps seen in a video game, but it's also fullfilled with things to do. I never went from one hold to another without finding plenty of puzzles, chests, dungeons into my way. And, if you're like me, you don't want to rush through the main story and prefer instead to explore more or do miscellaneous quests, you'll be glad to take the side roads whenever you see them. They will take you to caves, mines, villages, farms, dungeons, and even dragon lairs. The exploration never had an end for me, not even after so many hours spent into the game. You are probably curious about the combat system. While technically not one of the best I have seen in a RPG, I must admit that it had massively been improved since Morrowind and Oblivion. The ''Luck'' factor is not present any more, so you can't miss a shot when you clearly were very close to the enemy. The third person combat camera is now immersive, with tons of new animations and a new feature which I like a lot: the killcam. One final aspect I'd like to talk about is the length of the game. While the main storyline is relatively short (took me around 10 hours on hardest difficulty), the side quests and guild quests make this game incredibly long. If you get Skyrim and plan on beating every single quest, clearing every dungeon, finding every landmark, you'd better get prepared for a very, VERY long journey. I myself haven't completed a quarter of the entire game yet (checked progress with a mod). This game is by far my favorite RPG at the time being, its biggest rival in my opinion being Dragon Age: Inquisition. Pros: + incredibly large landscape, mixing bioms from tundra to winter, from pine forest to stone holds; + a lot of locations, free for player to explore; hundreds of dungeons, caves, which at their turn are themselves long and filled with enemies, puzzles, traps which will reward handsomely the player at the end; + plenty of quests, most of which don't require the player to have completed the main questline; + the introduction of dragons as enemies, for the first time in the Elder Scrolls games; + residents of cities and villages all have their own lives and families. In the morning, they will leave their home and go to their job, in the afternoon they will take a break for eating, and in the evening they will close their shop and go back to their home or at the inn for some mead, where after a few hours will go to sleep; + random encounters will let the player find more about the game; fugitives will tell you to keep their stolen item for a short while, followed by a scene where the owner finds you and asks you whether you have seen the thief (at this point, you can lie, you can tell him where the thief went, or you can be most honest and give him his item); couriers will once in a while give the corespondence to you, which can lead to impressive new quests or will update your map with new locations; you can find farmers giving their cows as sacrifice for the giants, and many, many more other events, all unpredicatble; + the leveling system has been improved since Oblivion: after you have a high level, you will no longer see ALL enemies wearing the Daedric armor, instead you will continue to find packs of bandits, some of them having leather armor and others having more powerful armor and items; + player can buy home in 5 holds, where he can place his loot, take his wife and kids and take a rest; this, personally, felt like a huge immersive feature in the game world; + new powers added to the game world, called Shouts; will let you find out more about it x); + you feel that your character truly evolves as you progress; more over, you can make what you want of your character: a good warrior, archer, thief, mage etc., by using perks; Cons: - interface is worse than at previous games; you can't sort items by criterias (feature that had been available in Oblivion), you can't search for a specific item when you have plenty of loot in your backpack, and the aspect is generally bad; thus i recommend using a mod that changes inventory; - while reasonable, the game is filled with bugs, some of which can even break a quest; again, i recommend using the Unofficial Patches; - some textures and meshes haven't been vigurously worked by developers and they look bad for 2011; Personal rating: 95/100
Bryon Jones (In the void);-;Note: to see this review in its true form go to:http://wildwoodgeek2.blogspot.com/2014/04/gameskyrim.html Ah, Skyrim, the King of RPG games and the game that led to a flood of crappy "arrow to the knee" jokes that swarmed the internet for months. I doubt there is anyone who doesn't know of skyrim by now but i'll give you my two-cents. Skyrim is a action-RPG that plays out in a masvie open-world with thousands of side quests,things to plant/gather, and to fight. Skyrim is in a bloody Civil war between the Storm Cloaks and the Imperial army. But under the surface even more factions are fighting for turf, The Thieves guild, its glory long gone, strives to reclaim their title as masters of darkness. The Dark Brotherhood, crumbling and in despair seeks out new opportunities to return to the day when people feared them and respected them. The College of Winterhold, a old school for Mages, that fell into hard times after half of Winterhold fell into the ocean, uncovers a powerful relic that could allow Infinite wisdom or Infinite Destruction. That is just a sample of the deep story and background of skyrim. the world of skyrim IS alive and many a writer spent long hours making a amazing and life-like world. The Best part about skyrim is there is so much to do! want to be a Vampire? you can do that! want to be a werewolf and murder people? you can do that! want to kill people and eat them for dinner? guess what? you can do that! (<-- You know that is a slight bit creepy.) but really, skyrim is an open-world dream. the main storyline is fun and engaging the side quest sometimes turn into their own winding paths that take hours to complete. this makes skyrim a HUGE source of fun and gameplay. there are a few problems with Skyrim however. The game crashes often on some PCs. but some mods on the Nexus mod site will help with that. and of course with some a HUGE world there are also bugs a-glore. and with Bethseda gone off to The Elder Scrolls Online, chances are that they wont get fixed. But! the mod community has dealt with these bugs and most can be fixed by downloading the Unofficial Patch. the Steam Workshop and Nexus Mods provide an endless source of game-changing content, from new armor to flying houses to brand new branching quests. and that there is the BEST part of Skyrim on PC, The mods available explode your game-content. you play as a king of skyrim, you can marry (and kill) multiple wifes. you can get thousands of new weapons, even lightsabers! Gamers with epic gaming PCs can download the free ULTRA HD texture pack from Bethsdea themselves, and if you want to take it a step forward you can download Ultra ENBs. Skyrim Really is a different game with MODS. . some players may feel that the game is too easy. there's a mod for that. some players may feel that the cities are too empty, there's a mod for that. some players may feel like there should be more NPCs. there's a mod for that. my point is that with the MODS available on PC you really can custom your Skyrim experience to what you want,so even if you already own Skyrim on PS3 or Xbox 360, you should still pickup The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim on the Steam store.
RIP;-;They removed the paid mods, so it's an instant 11/10 again. It's okay
Lowd70;-;Here are some things to know about this game: Kill the Emperor, no one will give a . Accidently kill a chicken and the whole world will try to murder you. Kill a dragon to save a city, no one will give a . Accidently "steal" 1 coin when no one is around, the most peaceful civilians around you will pull out knives to carve a smile on your soul. Silently and perfectly kill 3 villagers and no one will notice if no one is around. Whole town is still informed about your crime(s) if a chicken saw what you've done. You're fighting and about to die. Freeze time and space to eat 243 potatoes to heal yourself. Also, if you think you've ruined your own life because you've played this game, please don't say that, you're not one of those people who read every single book they find in the game. 11/10 Would uninstall again - IGN
Hirokishi;-;Best RPG I've ever played. It has a really beautiful the graphics, interesting missions and visiting different locations. Game can be enlivened by various mods which is more interesting. In my opinion this is a game in which every player should play. My rating is 10/10.
StealthMomo;-;A beautifully crafted never ending epic high fantasy game. Once you finished the game, come back and you'll discover new things you haven't encountered in your first game. Tread lightly and watch the sky.
Wheel;-;Able to kill a dragon by shouting. Not able to fight in water.
-=][ UZ!J0e ][=-;-;U can have A beard & U can kill by shouting
hell543;-;Amazing, worth every penny! Worthwhile and fun especially with all dlc. Not to mention unlimited modding capabilities that will make the game more insanely beautiful than it already is.
Sir Alonne;-;Ruined my life 10/10
Narukoopa *BDAY TOMMORROW!*;-;Killed the emperor, got fined 9000 gold. Stole a cabbage, got sent to prison, and wanted all over Skyrim. 10/10, would steal a cabbage again.
The_MadGeniuz;-;I have been playing games almost my whole life (15+ years). I can honestly say this is one of the best games I have ever played and I will tell you why. I have had around 500 hours invested into this game across multiple platforms and playthroughs. (PC is the best version) First is the graphics, I've added mods but just the standard game is one of the best I've ever seen. The trees, grass, animals and the level of detail that the game includes is amazing! I literally spent about 4 hours the first day of its release back in 2011 just wandering through the world examining the different things in amazement at how detailed and beautiful it was. The second thing that makes this great is the commentary, it's all voiced and basically everyone can be spoken to in the game and everyone plays a part. (More on that later) Next is the content 100+ dungeons around 10 major cities and a few extra small towns there is much to see and explore I can honestly say through about 500 hours of gameplay I still can find new places or things I've somehow missed over the hours. Quests and random events are all throughout these places you will not run out of things to do (and if by some chance you do there are mods! haha). Now that being said most everyone in the game is "killable" and if you kill them it may stop a certain small side quest from being available. So you really have to make decisions wisely. Choices matter and if you don't watch yourself you can miss out. Which can hook you into another playthrough like I was. You can play mostly as a mage, as a sworded warrior, an archer or create something of your own it's all up to you! Now before I'm done I will add that the 3 DLC packs (Dawnguard, Hearthfire and Dragonborn) are all great additions. If you have the money buy the Lengendary Edition of the game it's worth it. Dawnguard adds some extra gameplay and features, Hearthfire add the ability to build your own home and adopt children (actually really cool additions) then Dragonborn adds a whole new questline and location to play on. They are all worth the money and you will not go wrong buying this game. Only minor things not even worth mentioning are problems in this game and I would not hesitate to give it a 99/100 easy. But as one final warning it is possible to lose yourself in this game. I've spent roughly 500 hours playing this one game and still far from laying it down. It can take your life and give you a virtual one (think with Hearthfire; home, wife, kids... A whole life!). It's an amazing game and I highly recommend you buy it.
WiiSmash;-;Quit Button is useless for this game
Sensei Slouch;-;kill zambis get munny bild hous rid hors of muntan kil dragin w/ wurds becum lissard ninja meny things ken do in eder scoss v skiram is fun gaim. mabe favurit gaim uf al taim. but wen i play eder scoss v skiram i no can stop vary adiktin ruin slepp pattirns eets all my spar taim pls halp no can stop play eder scoss v skiram is in kontroll my laif.
Lieutennant Fluffy Ears;-;With great graphics, Great gameplay, and a captivating sandbox-like atmosphere, this game is a must-have for your library! Load it with mods, and you have unlimited entertainment. 123593245904356/10
<AKA>Volunteer;-;The Elder Scrolls V is my first classic RPG, and have found it to be as an enthralling a gaming experience as the world of Skyrim itself is magnificent. This game is a masterpiece in its scope, variety and beautiful vistas. Skyrim is what a player wants to make of it and I for one have discovered a new passion in pc gaming. I highly recommend Skyrim to you as well worth trying.
Wild Hunt 1.06;-;10/10 The EPIC , super LEGENDARY , most AWESOMENESS OF AWESOME GAME I HAVE EVER PLAYED!. I spent hours (Don't be fooled by my steam given hours), days, weeks, and years playing this game and it still doesn't get old, you know why? I'll tell you later. When I first played Skyrim, I spent a day just doing one mission because of looting every single thing and exploring every single corner of the god forsaken dungeon I was in. Moving on later in the game, I discovered some exploits and some other things to make things easier, finishing the main story and moving on to the side quests. After all that, I discovered, (I'LL TELL YOU WHY IT NEVER GETS OLD) MODS!!! THAT'S RIGHT, MODS! It took me a month in total to get all the mods I've wanted, still new mods are released to make other mods look like crap and once again, modding the game. This game ruined my life (not really but in a good way). I would want to tell you the story and some mechanics on why this game is good but I am not a serious reviewer. I just want to tell you guys this is the bomb right here. This game is just plain awesome. P.S. FUS-RO-DAH!!!
Deadpool;-;Definitely a must buy! An excellent RPG game,with an interesting story,great graphics,and huge world.
Captain America;-;In the campaign my horse killed the dragon, so the people started worshiping my horse and called him "DragonBorn" He was then called to the elders in the mountains, I watched as people cheered my horses name. Now I am just an NPC who sits under the tree in Whiterun and cries. 11/10
Der Munger;-;Let me take you back to mid-2011. When I first heard of Skyrim coming out later that year, I wasn't thrilled at all. Having played Oblivion briefly in the past, and not being convinced at all, Skyrim became the most over-hyped game I could think of. When it eventually went on the shelves and I had a few glances at the Let's Plays that popped up all over YouTube, I looked at it in sheer disbelief. It looked awful, very awkwardly wet textures, that was one of my main issues (honestly!). I decided, however, and that was after the initial euphoria with the gaming community had died down a bit during the frosty nights of early January of 2012, I might give it a go, once a legit price drop had occurred and the big hype had completely dispersed. So then, in April of 2012 I finally ordered a retail copy from the UK. I had ordered it together with a dear friend of mine, that regularly orders games from the UK (on account that they are much cheaper there than in Germany), and he encouraged me to boot it up. I had a good time with it, but it was, well, just good. I had tried a few mods from the Steam Workshop for my first time playing, mainly the HD Texture Pack and a few other minor tweaks. I continued to play the game and eventually I became aware of the much larger modding community of the Nexus Pages. And this is where my interest in the game finally sparked immensely. Modding became more of a challenge and I needed help. This help came in the form of Gopher's modding guides. Gopher offered a variety of concise and easy to follow guides to modding games on his Youtube Channel, as well as, and that was the gist of it all a very entertaining series of Let's Plays of Skyrim. His play style is somewhat different to what I had had in the past, but it so verily applied to how I feel about games in general. Games are the perfect medium of literary immersion. A game can engage you on so many more levels than a book or a film can ever dare to. And that is exactly why Skyrim eventually became such a dear game to me. Skyrim is a game that rewards engagement in its lore. It can become so lively, so intricately designed, but only if the player is willing to go further than bluntly playing the game. It is a living, breathing world with a back story so rich, that one can not ever learn all of it. I myself regularly lose myself reading through the articles on the Elder Scrolls Wiki Pages, stepping from one topic into the next. The Story of Skyrim is very iconic in the way that it is written. Joseph Campbell's "monomyth" or "The Hero's Journey" in which the Protagonist is called from his normal life to adventure, on a quest to save the world. There are obstacles along the way, wise teachers and climactic action. The Monomyth is a pattern that works well and it does so in Skyrim too. The internal development of the Dragonborn hero however, is up to the imagination of the player, and this is where immersion comes into play again. If you are not willing to immerse yourself in the game and identify with the Dragonborn, the game will have no lasting value to you. The gameplay also intrigued me. Having slight prior experience with RPGs I have touched the basics of typical RPG game play. Skyrim however stands out from the crowd by making levelling an organic process. You swing a sword at an enemy - you get better at sword fighting; you get hit - your experience with armour increases; you mix ingredients together - you learn their effects and become better at creating potions. This process, this "learning-by-doing" feels very natural, very logical. Much more so than the typical RPG practice of gaining experience through completing quests or fights and then choosing yourself what you want to become better at. Another great implication of this levelling model is that it essentially resolves the issue of class-restrictions. You can be whoever you want to be: you can be a heavily armoured mage, you can be a lightly armoured, two-handed weapon wielding killing machine, you can combine magic and one-handed weaponry, and, most importantly, you are allowed to do all of them at once if you choose to. The Combat itself runs in real time, like its predecessors, and there is no automatic hit-and-miss calculation involved like it was the case in Morrowind for example, ergo, you hit - you hit, you miss - you miss; an action-style combat system. However, and this is a big however, there is no locational hit detection, so that head shots or blows to specific body parts on enemies generally have no different effect from hitting any other body part. This is made up by the fact that certain perks add chances of critical damage to their respective weapon types. The world design of Skyrim at times is stunningly beautiful, awe-inspiring vistas, gloomy caves and warm, inviting inns. And then there are times, when everything looks a bit dull. This is owed to the fact that Skyrim is such a resource heavy game, that in the development Bethesda had to work with a lot of ambient lighting which is not always practical and doesn't look very good. Vanilla (modder's jargon for "the unmodded game") Skyrim, therefore suffers a few drawbacks in regards to its looks. And so, we come to my final argument. This argument may be the strongest of all, because it might eliminate all of the issues that I have with the game. It is the moddabilty. Through the use of mods, that can also be created by the player itself using the free Creation Kit that came with the copies of the game, every mistake, every bug, every minute inadequacy can be remedied. If you don't like the look of something, you can mod it. If you don't like the way something works, you can mod it. If you feel something is missing from the game or something it is need of, you can mod it in. If something is broken, you can fix it with mods. Modding can add to the game in such a grand way, it can change your experience entirely, or it can just enhance it. And it can make Skyrim play the way you want. This is what "The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim" is all about: player choice. If you will, you can play it for a couple of hours and then never touch it again. But if you are willing to engage yourself further, there is so much more you can do with it. It can become your very own epic poem.
rking11;-;This game, with mods, will create a strange sort of paradoxical space/time field around you that will make years and aeons fly by as you slowly whither away into a slightly decrepid, old, wrinkly and beardy version of your former self. You will cuddle up in blankets as you build tents with Frostfall to avoid the bitter cold of Skyrim, emerging from your cave beneath the fortress of Helgen only to enter that place that the mere mortals call "outside" just to get food, water and caffeine. Your social life will slowly collapse like a flan in a cupboard, and all contact with this "outside" they speak of will eventually cease. Five stars
Lad;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave. The game has one of the largest active modding communities of any game. This helps to spice up gameplay and graphics. With new residents, new weapons and armor, incredible house mods adding giant castles, and visual mods. You can spend hours upon hours finding mods that suit your needs in the nordic lands of Skyrim. It is worth to note that you should know the game to an extent before modding, as it can corrupt save files if not done properly. If I'd have to rate it, it would be a 10/10.
Fherrera #afk for while;-;its like skyrim with dragons
Ladioz;-;Best RPG ever, hands down.
CarloV3r;-;What is there to say about 'The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim'? First off, this piece of art is one of those games that really sucks you up. It can be 23:00 when you start playing and after what feels like 10 minutes it's actually 1:00. The grassy planes around Whiterun, the mountains in the Reach, the swamps in the Rift and the snowy tundras of Winterhold will make you want to quit real life and just live in Skyrim for the rest of your mortal life. But beware adventurer! The province of Skyrim isn't all fun and games. It may appear to be a peaceful place, but once you enter the deep caves or get lost in one of the treacherous swamps you will see it's true face. For Skyrim isn't just the home of the Nords, but also that of many dangerous predators. There are the Draugrs, who live in the many tombs under the face of the earth and will attempt to kill you if you enter their final resting place. Or the frostbite spiders, who will attack you with their poisonous webs once you're close enough. The most famous predator in Skyrim would perhaps be the dragons, who are returning to Skyrim. It is your goal as the 'dragonborn' to put an end to this. Though you speak their language, which offers many advantages, they will not think twice about attacking you. Skyrim offers many options, like talking and helping out the townspeople, other adventurers or complete strangers as sidequests. When you're not busy with the main storyline or these sidequests you'll find out the province of Skyrim has alot more to offer. Roaming around Skyrim will make you realize how big it actually is. However, make sure you are prepared before entering the wilderness because as I said before, many predators will attempt to put an end to your life. The $19,99 you pay for this game is a very fair deal when you consider how much time alot people put in it. I hope this review convinced you to buy this masterpiece.
Zallazar;-;It's like Oblivion with nords. 9.4/10
:;-;Your one way ticket to being able to kill the children. Story 10/10 Graphics 10/10 Sounds 9/10 ... Mods 1000000000000000 OUTTA MOTHER ING 10
Lil' Spooper;-;I Fus-Ro-Dahed a goat off a mountian, then a dragon came and Fus-Ro-Dahed me off the mountian. 11/10! Great game and not easy to get bored of. Entertaining in every way, and I highly recommend getting the DLC's, aswell. They really complete the game.
Azeh;-;Tried to pickpocket a trader. Failed to pickpocket the trader. Trader tried to kill me. Ran into an inn. Trader followed me into the inn. The people at the inn killed the trader. 10/10
(Watching anime);-;400hrs played. 100hrs playing vanilla Skyrim. 300hrs playing Skyrim with mods. 75% of the amount of time I played Skyrim was because of the amazing mod community. Would buy this game with all its DLC over and over again til im bankrupt and can't play it no more. SO BUY IT !
Jared Fogle;-;Getting really high and flying a dragon through the skies; Getting smashed and kicking everyone's ; Lighting some dream crystal, and uhh.. collecting crystals.. Snorting a line and committing various crimes; Whatever state of mind you go in, you'll certainly be entertained. But, the additives definitely ensure the game's not lame So far I have collected thousands of minerals and countless bottles of skooma.. In hopes that my Breton dealer can amass a king's fortune Then I'll build myself a badass mansion where I'll have high elf babes everywhere and I can pork their brains out and pass on my half-blood seed.
Ashara;-;Great game. I've been playing it for more than two years and I have enjoyed every minute.
Lord Banana;-;Let's make short and simple: If you are on steam, and you don't own this game, then you're doing it wrong. WRONG. The game is immensley vast, atmosphere is so.. cool. The game will just suck you in. It has LOADS of contents that will keep you busy for 100+ hours for sure. And mods are just icing on the cake; if you're a graphics-hungry person, mods can make this game look better than most "next-gen" games out there, if modded correctly. And the sceneries, oh the sceneries, I just feel like sitting on my chair and just keep staring at those vast fields of beautiufl grasslands. Totally recommend this game. 15/10. BUT, but, one and only con that I found is of the fighting mechanics; it is just so bland. Nothing else I dislike about this game.
Rand Paul 2016;-;It's my favorite game of all time.
Silvio Santos | Dollar Bill;-;i'm here fighting dragons and what my cousin's gains? Guard duty 10/10 my cousin sucks!!!!
Lolisher;-;"Horses can 1v1 mountains anytime" -IGN 15/10
/MARZ\ Scm1224;-;i had Ebola and this game cured it
N7_BLADE;-;Exellent game 10 out of 10 and the mods just keeps it new and exiting
AnthonyR224;-;if you're a fan of the Elder Scrolls series, or just interested in checking it out, i recommend Skyrim. While Morrowind will always be my favorite TES game, Skyrim is probably the most accessible of the series, not too mention my 2nd favorite. though Oblivion had a slightly better Quest Log, Skyrim is the superior game overall of the two.
(") (;,,,;) (") kingodavid;-;Mod it till it crashes! :D
gupp/Ledsen;-;A game that is complicated to critique. For the first 30-50 hours, you will be completely absorbed in the beautiful and vast world, with seemingly endless opportunities for exploration and questing. As you continue to play, the cracks start to show. The gameplay systems are incredibly shallow, the characters wooden, the world still beautiful but the dungeons copy/pasted 120 times over with the same enemies, the same meaningless loot. The complication arises when you realize that while you are slowly starting to loathe the game, you've had 30+ hours of fun before hitting that point. So the question is, was it worth it?
stronk_pancake;-;Pro Tip: 1. If a group of terrorists wants to execute you, just ask them if you could have a last wish. If they say yes, tell them this: 2. "Please just let me finish that game that I'm currently playing (Skyrim) completely!" 3. Enjoy living forever!
Lynxza7;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim + Huge arsenal of weapons (Melee Weapons, Spells, Staffs) + Hundreds of Quests (Main quests, Side quests, Miscellaneous quests) + Hundreds of enemy types + Huge open world to explore + Decisions to make (Stormcloaks of Imperials) - World can be buggy
Trainwiz;-;Imagine a game with incredible depth, unprecedented writing and an engrossing world. This is not that game. However you can shout at dragons and marry lizards, so get it anyways.
DerpyNoobey;-;I stripped everyone naked in Whiterun except the Jarl. Used my Daedric Gloves and fisted everyone's Arses GOTY 10/10
Tesla;-;Khajiit has mods, if you have coin.
Max Rockatansky;-;I killed a hen. Whole town attacked me. Best game ever.
Lance Hardwood;-;Greatest game I've ever played! Skyrim changed my perspective on gaming as a whole, it's a work of art! From the second you create your character, you won't ever be bored again while playing. There's always something to do in Skyrim, always new quests, new locations, or dragons to slay, and the graphics are amazing! Everything is great, and even though I feel that the NPC's could've been programmed a little bit better, it's nothing that doesn't make the game experience amazing. Best 60$ i've ever spent, and I would gladly have paid more. Buy it! :3
Jedo;-;Skyrim is undoubtedly the best purchase I have made in the past year. It's worth every $ that it's listed at especially when considering the insane amount of content you are given. I have only spent about 100 hours in the game (this is short in comparison to a lot of people on my friends list) but I can assure you that those hours were all packed with immersive content. Here are some key features that hooked me into the game.. 1. Dungeon Complexity - When I say complexity, I mean that the design for the game's dungeons vary greatly from simple to complex. You just have to keep exploring and you'll eventually run into the intricately designed areas that get you to pause for a moment and think before being able to progress. At times.. I ALMOST felt as if I were playing the latest Tomb Raider once again. I also found it quite neat that you could use your shouts to bypass/solve a few of the puzzles. 2. Playstyle Freedom - I'm sure tht a lot of people take similar routes but the game does offer a great deal of freedom with its perk system. It's definitely a step up compared to games like Kingdoms of Amalur. Do you enjoy melee combat? How about magic? How about a balance of both? There's a lot of possibilities. 3. Expansive Lore - As I've mentioned, the game has a ton of content. Playing through everything (especially if you are aiming for complete achievements), gives you perspective on the whole story and it really is interesting when some quest's lore ties into another - maybe even forming a bigger picture. Skyrim definitely has a lot more charming qualities but these are the features that I really wanted to highlight. They stood out for me and it was for these reasons that I ended up buying the game last year (only to play it now - 2014) during the summer sale. With that said, I paid $30 for the legendary edition. Wouldn't you agree that for all this content, it was pretty much a steal? How many games can you list down that provide hundreds, nearly thousands of hours worth of content (especially if you count the mods) for that kind of price. Just remember, multiplayer games don't count! 10/10. Buy it when it goes on sale during this upcoming summer sale event.
F r 0 s T;-;Skyrim is one of my favorite games of all time, this game is pure art, the role play is great if you are a nerd like me, however if you don't plan on role playing and you just want to play an amazing game then you can unlike other titles like fallout this game does not punish you and it is not a very hard game, i played it in master for most of my stay in the land of skyrim. This game is the kind of type game where it is not about the end its all about the journey. I have played a lot of rpgs in my day, and in most the quests have been bland and the main idea was to explore however this game can be both the quests are great, the story is great the map is amazing, Yeah there may not be as many random encounters like fallout, however when exploring you will allways find something new, and as we are pc master race we also get the privlage of mods that add alot more to the game which is amazing, i mainly enjoyed some of the modded quests, and horror quests. If you dont have this game by now f*cking buy it jez 10/10
han.;-;i killed a chicken once and the entire town want to kll me.
Yoda;-;Why are u reading my review when u could be playing skyrim?
Ryan;-;This game truly deserves the title of "near perfection", being one of those rare milestones that comes every so often in years of gaming. Skyrim itself, is probably the best release from Bethesda's Elder Scrolls series. Story wise, this is one of the most developed storyline from the series, giving much enjoyment overall. In all honesty, we can say that the community is one of the most desirable aspect of Skyrim, due to their dedication in further releases of modifications - improving much of the overall gameplay (it never hurts to crank up those graphics). It would be a pity to not try Skyrim in the course of your lifetime, so it's advisable to go ahead and try it!
_'S_;-;Best Reality Simulator Ever: Reasons~ ~Strip down naked and run around a bar full of weird creatures ~Get married SINCE your that desperate ~Fall of a cliff and witness your horse die :( (Never Again, just never again) ~Get a bunch of mods which make you question your sanity BUY THIS GAME
Mister Captain;-;You need to buy this. You don't need to follow the quests. You can join groups and become a hitman (Dark Brotherhood) or a master thief.(Thieves' Guild) Much more groups. You can hunt animals and admire the graphics. Very real. A game for 2010 is better than some games that just came out. I'll see you playing it! I'll rate this 1000/10 dragons. Oh yeah, that right. There is a workshop of this. If you get bored of this game once you complete you can download mods.
Blue Steel Yellow Sun;-;DO NOT KILL CHICKENS!!
Nerd House;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is built solely on the idea of discovery. In the very beginning you have no idea who you are, where you are, or why youre aboard a carriage filled with condemned prisoners. All you know is youre an outsider, and once youve reached your destination, your execution awaits. The caravan arrives in the small forted village of Helgan, where youre pulled from the carriage. Your captors fail to recognize you; theyre just as puzzled by your appearance as anyone else. Are you a man or woman, an Argonian or Breton? This is your first opportunity to ask yourself who you are and who you want to be in Skyrim; it wont be the last time you ask yourself this. Lucky for you, the execution fails, granting you an opportunity to escape Helgan. This is where Skyrim commences and where your story within Bethesdas world begins. Youve been told to visit a town not far north of your escape, but nothing other than the word of your new friend is there to compel you to visit it. The entire province is at your fingertips. Skyrim is structured in a loose manner, allowing the player to discover its world and various narrative strands at the pace that they desire. Characters will tell you where you should go, but there is never any real urgency to do any of it. The world is cluttered with distractions and what makes this experience unique is the distractions form the very heart of Skyrim. The core narrative, as it is, is a mean to an end, an excuse to pilot you from one corner of the world to the other. Its hard to imagine anyone following a single narrative strand when its impossible to travel from one quest point to the next without stumbling upon some sort of ruin, cave, encampment or fort. The narrative has its high points, but its always made secondary by the next undiscovered location on your compass; and thats because Bethesda wants you to pave your own story. Undiscovered locations dot the entire province of Skyrim, leaving the map a venerable piece of swiss cheese after a few dozen hours. Discoveries are the actual loot and tracking every single one of them down is the addiction that thrusts players headfirst into Bethesdas fiction. Every location, small or large, is populated with its own personal story, which makes every journey feel special and rewarding. Theres an understanding that this world, this place, existed before you fell upon it; theres also an unshakable feeling that its all been staged for you. Skyrim would have you believe its a dynamic world thats constantly in flux, when in reality its more like a car stuck in neutral, waiting to be put into gear. Characters go about their daily routines but they merely exist to bestow quests or impart dense records of lore; no-one is truly alive when youre not engaged with them. One of the principal quest lines revolves around the Imperials and the Stormcloaks, two factions waging a purportedly bloody, savage civil war that has split the region in two. In each and every town across the land nearly every single person is happy to share an opinion on the war, telling you how dire the situation has become. But there is no war, no conflict, not unless you decide to take part in it yourself; you may see hundreds of random encounters in this Nordic land, but youll never see the War for Skyrim unfolding. Fiction aside, Skyrim is a vast, majestic world to discover. Bethesda is unparalleled when it comes to world building and when youre wading through brooks, scaling mountains or eviscerating another cave full of bandits its an absolute joy. Its a remarkable, liberating feeling that this province was crafted specifically for you; a huge playground with apparently no rules or boundaries. That isnt the case. Skyrim has its rules; theyre specific and they have a nasty way of reminding you this fiction was written in binary. Every city subscribes to a simple bounty system: commit a crime and youll be struck down, pay a fine, or spend the night in jail. There is a clear consequence to crime, but its merely an illusion. On my first evening in the town of Morthal I snuck into the Jarls house and then into the private quarters of her daughter, where I then attempted to pickpocket the young sleeping woman. Without the deftest of hands, the girl arose, alerting the guards of my treachery. Not wanting a fight or untimely death, I submitted, volunteering to pay my bounty and spend the evening locked up. The following morning, strolling from my cell, I bumped into the sleeping girl once more: she asked me to deliver a letter of utmost importance for her; she trusted me. The bounty system is a dirty way to gloss over any real consequence for your actions. There is no gray area; everyone is either a friend or foe. When an enemy is nearly defeated they may beg for mercy, pleading with you to spare them. You can sheath your weapon but they will never flee, every single one will get up and rush you. Once, a villager followed me into a vampires hideout, hoping to avenge the death of his wife. Madness erupted and amid the scuffle I inadvertently grazed him with a fire spell, turning him immediately against me (note: the vampires who killed his wife were still very much alive). Afterward, instead of arriving to a town full of indebted villagers, I returned to an armed welcome and an outstanding bounty. There was no way to explain how the town learned of my accidental deed and no way to silence the vengeful widower  I tried killing him several times. Once youve found the parameters that Skyrim works with, its not difficult to play by its rules, and even enjoy it. There is a huge, jaw dropping world to discover at whatever pace you desire. Along the way youre free to author your own story, defining your unique character and experience through whatever style of play you prefer. When youre lost in its rich landscape and enthralled within its fiction, Skyrim thrives, and is truly unparalleled; its when you take a closer look, you cant help but discover the seams holding this tapestry together. A Must Play Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Purple Dinosaur Fluff;-;I have played too much to turn back now.
August  I ProZaCC.com;-;Everyone must be a dragonborn :)
DeliciousHotSchmoes;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim Review by: DeliciousHotSchmoes -Release date: November 11, 2011 -Genre: Action, role-playing -Developers: Bathesda Game Studios -Platforms: PC, PS3, Xbox 360 The Review It probably already goes without saying, that if you don't own or even heard of Skyrim, (which you will give me a heart attack, if you haven't.) you're really missing out on a fantastic game. Borrowing many elements from this game's own prequels, everything from the leveling up system, to the wide arsenal of magic to be learned or discovered, the untamed, fearful dragons and monsters that lurk around every corner of the game's world, The carefree and quirky races that inhabit the beautiful lands, villages and meadows, and the many different hobbies with skills involved, such as cooking, weapon smithing, magic crafting, item synthesizing and studios book reading, This game is what I call 'fantasy ectasy' and is a king amongst most action, role-playing games. Each unique race has a special ability, that again is unique only to them and solely based on the player's personal preference. Such as the Argonian race, being immune to poison and the gills with skills to breathe underwater. Or maybe the wood elf, being the deadeye master of the bow and arrow. As you can tell, there are many races and strategies that would help out either sooner or later in the game, depending on the race of character you have chosen. What's best about this is the vast ways you can customize the physical appearances of these races, ranging from nose types, eye types, ear types, hair types, body types, etc. Even I'm guilty to say I've spent countless hours trying and failing, to create a Nord, reminiscent of my appearance. And if you ever need a helping hand with extras, look no forward to the mod community. They of course definitely help out not only with your character's physical appearance, but also along with everything else. The world of Skyrim is diverse, solid, beautiful, secluded, peaceful, amazing, creative, magical and the list goes on. You could explore for hours upon end of this game's landscape and not be surprised on how much detail and development has been put into it. From the untouched wilderness to the ancient mythical buildings that dot Skyrim's land, it's definitely no surprise on how this game keeps you occupied and truly captures the imagination of magic and mystery in the process. It's as if a lucid dream came to the unconscious mind of a sleeping, video game geek, who is subsequently pitching a tent. There's the main story with the long-whinded yet slightly repetitive missions, where you play as your main character and eventually learn that you are the legendary 'Dragon-born' and depart for one hell of an adventure, to save the beautiful land of Skyrim while causing a ruckus for bandits, wizards, giant spiders, the undead, the royal knights and all around powerful dragons at the same time. But, what this game truly dishes is out is simply a marvel to behold. And when I say this, I mean that this game is offering an immense load in the side-quest and mini-game section, along with the many uncharted locations and hidden caves that are just waiting for your epic hero/heroine to discover. With rewards and many different possibilities and alternate outcomes to unlock in this wonderful game. If you go out and mind your own business by robbing the local residents, just make sure to blatantly put a vase on top of their heads so they don't suspect you of theft and go into a killing frenzy. Just a tip for you all. If you're into huge epic tales set in a fantasy and mythical environment, or just blatantly love a great storyline and narrative, with a huge variety of memorable characters, creatures, dungeons and dragons, this massive game of amazing preportions is definitely for you.
ShadowLaevatein;-;I saw a man with a ragged cap I fell in love with the ragged cap I kill the man for his ragged cap A guard killed me for the ragged cap 10/10 would kill to get hat next time
xCreature;-;20/11 would recommend. Beware as you can have your sweetrolls stolen and your virginity pickpocketed.
[LAN]E@ldorado;-;Skyrim is much more than only game. This is true second life into fantasy world.
Val;-;Longest single player game I've done my entire life- the hours just keep on rollin'. Recommend modding after vanilla =3
Frodo;-;I used to be a modder like you. Then I took a buyout in the knee
sitebender;-;On the surface, Skyrim is an open world first person role playing game or third person with the press of a button. A FPS RPG so to speak. Skyrim and the Elder Scrolls as a series are games that let you do what you want, play how you want. If you want to be a big axed barbarian, a thief, an archer, a mage, a healer or any mixture of them, you can do it. If you just want to mess around and shout goats off of cliffs, go for it. You'll be able to select a race, each with its own look and perks. You can even be a lizard Argonian or a cat Khajit. Whatever floats your boat. You'll even be able to turn into a vampire and werewolf. The NPCs are a lot more diverse with facial hair, body sizes and so on, its a good step forward to bring Elder Scrolls to what other games have had for a decade. The game offers nice diverse gameplay for any style, you can stealth around, avoid combat completely or just run in swords blazing! The game has excellent killing animations that are new to Skyrim. You can sink hours, days, months into this game and even if you were to run out of things to do, mods would still provide a lot more content. So what's the story? Dragons are back and only you can save Skyrim after one of them levels a town. The story is unimportant. Its basically the same story from Oblivion.... portals pop up and destroy a town. You are Dovakin and gain the ability to shout. What is shouting? Its like magic with a button of its own. Its really nice having a quick magic button. Much better than the former way of having to call upon a spell. Now in Skyrim the game, you can equip each hand with weapons, shields or spells. So dual weilding magic or weapons if you want or a big weapon in both hands. It makes for something fresh and new healing in one hand, fire spelling in the other all while shouting to stun your enemies. The combat feels a lot better and less generic than before. The spells are a lot more fun to use with good visual effects. The dragons are notably awesome. They fly around burning down villages, mercilessly killing everything and they'll follow you. You'll see them burn down towns, not because its scripted, but because that's what the AI is programmed to do. You'll see villagers pull out daggers, clear out of houses all to fight these dragons. Once a NPC is dead, they're dead. So if it was your favorite shopkeeper, they're gone. Sure there are spells to make them return as a zombie and fight for you, but the game is forever or at least until you console hack. You'll be able to fail quests if NPCs die and you don't get that quest back. The AI and its interaction has always been interesting in the Elder Scrolls series. You'll see guards defend towns against attacks. You'll see bandits attacking people. Now in Skyrim you'll see wolves hunting lesser animals like goats, chickens and foxes. It makes the game feel alive and you can use that AI to your advantage. Since nothing is scripted, its all your experience. You can talk about how you were saved by a ranger on a horse or how you baited a strong bear to a group of hunters that killed it. The game has an abundance of dungeons and each one feels like a healthy chunk of gameplay, especially for explorers. The Elder Scrolls series has come a long way since Morrowind. The prefab dungeons that all look alike are gone. Every location looks beautiful, dungeons, exteriors, vistas, and they somehow even made the sewers diverse, gorgeous and rich with color, style and interest. There are plenty of monsters and seeing giant spiders is just nightmarish. Even playing all of the horror games I do, no other game has made me as squeamish. Enemies have random levels, random loot, weapons and armor so you're never really fighting the same enemy twice. The cave entrances are a lot more realistic and actual caves rather than doors. While that's not exactly important, the game is really all about the look. That seems to be the big takeaway that I get from this game. For those that don't like deep dungeon delving, other than the first dungeon, you don't ever have to enter another dungeon. You can hang out in cities, exploring the wilderness, hunting, thieving from people, murdering everyone, running from guards, mixing potions from ingredients, doing quests, making spells and a beautiful new system to make armors and improve weapons. It feels much better and realistic than the old method of using hammers generically. Now you need to find a blacksmith, use his forge and grindstone. Enchanting and alchemy are similar processes, you can't just do them on the go, you need to find an alchemist and enchanting table. It makes sense and it doesn't seem like a step back from what it was, it just feels more realistic. You'll also be able to mine for ore and chop wood for gold. The game has a healthy length, more than most games and that's even when you use the game's fast travel system. Exploring is a lot of the fun though and you can't just fast travel to a new location, you need to find it and there is something around every corner. On your way to ancient ruins, you can climb a mountain, find a bandit hideout and do everything but actually reach those ancient ruins. Skyrim is a cold wintery place inhabited by mostly nords. It is very reminiscent of viking culture and that's a good thing. It makes the game feel far different than Oblivion and Morrowind. New to the series is a breakaway from typical direct face to face dialog. Instead you'll be able to talk to people as the world around you still lives. There is a new minimalistic menu instead of a giant text box at the bottom of the screen. It is all designed to look like a photograph and not break immersion. Everything is fully voiced and masterfully voiced, but the only catch is there are only a few voice actors for thousands of lines of dialog. Speaking with someone is a typical dialog tree, and this game, more than the previous games make me feel like this game matters with the things you say to people when given a choice. Like all open world games and previous games in the series, there are bugs and flaws. NPCs have a daily cycle and you'll see them disappear in front of doors as they enter. The animation is pretty awful and stiff fro the NPCs, watching them run, turn, then run some more is painful to watch. You can easily knock clutter around, but not nearly as easily as Dead Space. None of this is a game breaker. These are small prices to pay for a game so good and it never really breaks the immersion as much as I make it sound. Since the game has been out so long, its been on Steam sale several times, along with the Legendary Edition that comes with all of the official DLC. The game also makes full use of Steam's workshop to easily add mods and keep them updated. This is an amazing game, if not the best of its console generation.
maestro_;-;This is one of the best games I have played in my lifetime. And no, I'm not 11 years old... :p Add 40 years to that. Yes, 51. My life is extremely busy and video games have always been my number one activity to leave the standard world. The Elder Scrolls series of games has been one of the best sources of fun I have found and Skyrim is simply the best one of the series by far! Do download the DLC (Downloadable contents) right away as the latest DLC (Dragonborn) includes very potent aspects to the game as the ability to receive TWO perk points when reading ability books! BUT! Yes, there's a but. The game is so vast that there are some bugs... You need to play this with the Elder Scrolls Wiki (http://elderscrolls.wikia.com/wiki/Quests_(Skyrim)) opened in a browser (ideally in a separate monitor) when playing to see the various issues with each quests or dungeons (like how not to completely mess up the "Blood on the Ice" quest so you can get to finally buy the somptuous Hjerim house in Windhelm). BUT number 2. Yes, there is another issue. You may SERIOUSLY consider adding a few "mods" to your game since they may fix some of the "bugs" mentioned. For exemple : adding the Dawnguard DLC will make Vampires appear and KILL potentially VITAL characters depending on the sort of build your are trying to achieve for your character! Geeez. You would think they would have thought of a way to hold these attacks until you start the quest? NO they didn't! But.... There's a "mod" that actually does this for you : preventing ALL vampire attacks (which may KILL city vendors and other characters) until you actually start the quest! Yep, this means, sorry lad, but you REALLY should take a stroll around the modding area, easily accessible in Steam by clicking the Workshop button under your PLAY button in the Games Library (once you've selected Skyrim). There are a few really cool mods I like apart from this one. One is called Run for your lives! And also makes all villagers run inside when there's a DRAGON attack. Again, preventing important characters from simply being wiped out before you get a chance to kill them yourself! :p Apart from that, the game is just insanely good... I have played it from beginning to end many times and still discover new things. :)
Andrea G;-;Grabbed this game by chance, not sure if i would have lked it, it become my main reason for living.
WolframUranium;-;I can't support modding costing money.
MXY;-;Look this amazing mods!
Phillip Pharr;-;paid mods ruin the feel of the game.
SamcoSVK;-;Paying for mods... nuff said I know that this review is out of date, I know that the problem was resolved, but I still plan to leave this review here. Reason behind that is, that I want to keep this review as a memento for any future attempt to destroy what we love about PC gaming. It may sound clich, but only because we wrote these reviews, only because we rated these reviews and only because we spammed forums and workshop we were able to make them to remove that monstorsity. I want to thank you, all of you who either wrote these negative reviews or did anything at all to stop this. Cmon guys, this review was so generic and boring and it still got more than 400 thumbs up in a few days, thank you.
TheSaurus;-;I cannot in good faith tell you to buy this game, not with the new introduction of paid workshop/mod content. This is the most ridiculous thing I have ever seen. People will say "well just dont buy it" and i say to them F*ck you this shoudlnt have even been an idea EVER. This type of mindset will only bring about more nonsensical ways to get into your pocket. We as gamer's need to stop this and stop it now. Edit: On April 27 2015, Valve finally surrendered thus ending the war. I leave the original review here for historical reference.
Ylang - Ylang;-;Could Valve sink any lower? I dont think so. They already take a % for themselves from pretty much everything on Steam, but it doesnt seem to be enought for them, it never is. Charging for mods is something I would never think of, never. It is obviously always about money, how else to explain the fact that modders get only 25% from the mod price? Paying for mods is not an option, but donating should be considered instead. I do not recommend.
Tharsonius;-;Steam is capitalizing on its effective monopoly to monetize artistic creativity of the modding community by incentivizing paid mods. Truly a sad day for PC gaming...
Havoc;-;Pay for mods.
Flashburn;-;Paid mods are my limit. I will not accept this. Modding is about the passion of the hobby, it is NOT a business venture.
WonderWombat;-;Paying for mods is a joke, do not buy.
Cyanidekoolaid;-;Paid mods where "modders" moderate their own feedback and have no public relation skills. Paid mods where origin of the mod is never confirmed by valve before putting it up for sale. Paid mods that violate other companies/persons copyrights. Paid mods are just a mess. Game is okay, not the best in the line and scumbag moves like this just prove how hard they're grabbing for money. The mass of DLC was proof enough, but now it's just getting funny.
Woskis;-;You have to pay cash for mods.
dakotahaylee;-;Well Valve you ED it up thanks!
Eric;-;Paid mods, not even once.
+ULFBERH+T;-;If you don't have this game, you're a dickless man.
ShroomBot;-;Did you seriously think people would think paying for mods would be a good idea? I mean.. One of the best things about PC gaming and you found a way to ruin it. gg Other than that, Skyrim is a good game.
Arcad!a;-;Now with mods behind paywall and even early access mods!
Robert;-;If you are buying this game with the intention of modding it; please DON'T. With the new system of where Modders get paid for their works, it will lead to terrible mods being created for some quick cash. Not only that, but Valve takes 75% of the earnings and only gives the creators 25%. THEY ARE TAKING ADVANTAGE OF THE SKYRIM MODDING COMMUNITY. You probably have seen the thousands of early access games here on Steam. Now, we have Early Access MODS. Please do NOT support this practice! Modding is a hobby, not a job! And for any Mod Creators reading this; NO ONE is going to buy your . Especially if you charge 10$ for a set of armor. This system will only cause you to lose reputation and put you as greedy; causing you to lose thousands of people who would otherwise donate to you if they like your works. Please do not purchase mods!
Treebiter;-;Skyrim is an excellent game, it really is, and made all the better by an amazing modding community... ...Hence this negative review. Valve's decision to introduced paid-for mods threatens to decimate this community. Now, first and foremost: Do modders deserve money for their hard work? In many cases, yes , a thousand times yes. However, is this the right way of providing such a monitary incentive? No, a million times no. All this current system does is create a paywall that looks set to divide the community. Instead, Valve should have added a donate button. This way we could still reward those modders that we feel deserve a little something for their work, without creating this massive schism. I would urge anyone reading this to not support such a practice. Vote with your wallets and make this another 'Horse Armour' scandal. If there's a mod author whose work you really admire, instead of subscribing here, head over to the Nexus and contact the author about making a donation. And if the mod you like isn't on the Nexus any longer, find another mod. If you're a mod maker, please think twice about making a Steam-only release. The Steam Workshop is not a good mod manager for Skyrim. Anyone serious about Skyrim modding will need to use tools such as NMM or Mod Organizer, alongside other programs such as LOOT if they have any desire to have a stable experience. The Workshop only makes this process more difficult. It's as simple as that. This is an awful, and ill-advised move by Valve. I can only hope that this isn't the shape of things to come. Oh, and: https://youtu.be/eDyXIXyAZq0
Lucius;-;I don't support a game where mods are paid content without the usual guarantees paid content provides. Not only that, 75% of the money goes to valve and bethesda, with a paltry 25% going to the modder IF his mod makes more than a total of $400. Valve is basically making free money with the work of gullible people that thought they could make a quick cash grab. Oh and, valve is also removing links to donation sites on free mods.
LupisVolk;-;Remember, remember the 23'rd of April FOr it was the dark day when payed mods came. Now since they are gone i'd say GET THIS GAME. But'll it'll be still a negitive review as a reminder.
Cynical Cheese Cake;-;After Valve and Behesda introduced payware mods which opened a can of worms, I can no longer recommend this game. Paywalling mods is not the way to go as it introduces too many complex issues into the modding community that brings no benefits to anyone other than the Valve and Bethesda's pocket filled with money. I support the idea of getting the modders paid for their hard work in enriching the games but putting a paywall is not the right way. I support donations for modders as it is fairer as everyone has different level of perceived value for something. The only scenario I support paid mods is when a mod had done exceptional work where it can be essentially a full game or an official expansion with fair amount of new content and reasonable price tag, such as Age of Empires 2's Forgotten Empires mod that became an offical expansion. I would gladly pay for exceptional mods such as C&C Generals Rise of the Reds, Dawn of War's Ultimate Apocalypse or Homeworld 2's Complex mod as these teams had outdone what the developers had done with the original game and also provided a fresh and vastly expanded experience to the game. A sword or a handful of quests in Skyrim does not provide the fresh experience like those mods mentioned above. Not to mention the absurd price that they are selling mods for which costs as much as the game itself. Valve and Bethesda, you ducked it all up. Valve really needs to get their crap together with progressively worse server connection, Greenlight flooding the market with garbage, Steam Store that acts like an annoying sales man shoving garbage at you everyday, client stability that is getting worse and non existent customer server. At the same time, Valve is becoming increasingly more and more greedy to the point they even outdo EA, Ubisoft, 2K and the lot of greedy publisher. "You either die a hero, or you live long enough to see yourself become the villain." Harvey Dent, The Dark Knight
Orpheus1772;-;Mediocre game, nice for freeplay after modding - except now you have to pay for mods to make the game enjoyable. Donations to mod creators are fine, forcing someone to pay for something your made in your freetime (hobby) is disgusting, especially since mods can get outdated rather quickly due to game updates and you have no guarantee the author will update the mod you paid for.
Flintlocke;-;Paying for mods? Go find another game for this one is now cancer ridden. Play the older ones if you want to roam around and whatnot.
Sparkly Sparkly Pokon;-;If I were to write a full review of this game, it would be nearly novel length. I would discuss all of the faults and failings of Skyrim, of how Bethesda took the generic route for more profit while selling out essentially everything that made Elder Scrolls worth playing, all while butchering the lore to cover their changes. Classes, a starting birth sign, the total nerf of all things magic, things like hand to hand being rolled into perks, the removal of stats, a whole class of armor being removed, reduction of armor pieces, the lies about spears, the broken marriage system, the dull civil war, the normalizing, and thus dulling effect on battling dragons, lore and plot hiccups and so much more could be covered. But instead, I can summarize it all with one message; I only bought this game because it could be modded. Really, the only reason why I even have well over 1000 hours in Skyrim is because of mods. On its own, even without ripping into every flaw, mistake, horrible design choice, the mountain of bugs and the aging engine that they still haven't bothered to work out flaws like the stuttering, Skyrim is not worth playing for more than a few hours. It holds no merit on its own, other than being open to modding. People can disagree, of course. There are a lot of people who still play it to this day on consoles, without the ability to mod. To them, I do not ask why, because it would solve nothing. I would still disagree with them. To me, this game is a flawed mockery of Elder Scrolls and the only thing that saved it is the modding community. I hold no hope for the future of Elder Scrolls, not after this game, and not after the way Bethesda so causally almost destroyed the community with their greed.
chickentoast.ang;-;How to screw PC gaming. EA is proud of you.
Venom462;-;Well, everyone else is making these ing negative reviews about the paid mods, so here is mine.......this is
3vgeni;-;Game - 10/10. Paid mods - 0/10. This can't be tolerated. Not only the whole concept of paid mods is wrong, but Valve is twisting it even more by giving the modders only 25% of the revenue the mod is generating.
Genji;-;This game is 10/10, because if giant troll bash you into right spot of your body, you can actually rocket yourself into space. No other words needed.
Alc;-;pay only 99.99 for the mod that makes the game fun, goyim :)
FilthyCasual;-;Two words. Paid. Mods. Wha???? I like the game. but paid mods? Still trying to wrap my head around that I am a modder. I helped contribute to Mass Effect mods (MEHEM, CEM, and Harby Module, specifically). Now, I have not contributed to Skyrim mods, but I feel that I have enough experience on modding itself that I can at least have a justified opinion on the subject of Valve charging for mods. Basically, it is a terrible idea. "Why is that? Don't good modders deserve support?" some may ask. Absolutely. Black Mesa, for instance, is a good example of a mod that might deserve monetary compensation. Counter Strike started as a mod too. As a modder and a human, I like money. But this isn't the way to go about it. This situation Valve started is terrible, because it has resulted in, or will result in, the following: First, Valve, you have now made "modder" a dirty word here on the steam forums almost overnight. Thanks a bunch. You have now divided PC consumers and modders, when we used to be a pretty tight bunch. Second, I now see mods going up that are little tiny swords and whatnot going up for sale. Bundles already that cost more than the game itself. In other words, I am concerned about a complete influx of mods that are completely useless and tiny and unsupported and updated, just because of money-grabbers who want a piece of the pie. Third, this leads to microtransaction hell. Hell for consumers, and a deluge of stuff to compete against for us modders. This isn't healthy competition. It is gonna be cutthroat. Thanks again for taking the fun out of it. Fourth, there will be inevitable stealing of other's people's content and then selling it as their own. Some may claim that because they modified another mod's content, they now have created their own mod and are free to sell. I disagree. They are making money at the expense of others. Fifth, you have a "return policy," if it is even worth of the name, that is full of holes. First, 24hrs isn't much time to test if a mod will glitch out or not. Ever heard of a standard 14 or 30 day return policy? Let's say a consumer buys a mod, then one week later the modder releases an update. This update has a bug, and the game crashes or glitches out. Then let's say, for whatever reason (even a good one. Like real life got in the way) the modder doesn't release an update to fix the bug. Before today, big deal. You could either uninstall the mod or revert to a previous version. Given it was free, most people wouldn't complain too much. But NOW, a consumer will likely be stuck with a useless piece of software they paid good money for. Software that now is worth zilch. They will be, understandably, really upset, with no way to get their money back. Lastly, you, Valve, are likely hurting good, legal sites like Nexus Mods as some greedy people take their mods, or the "premium versions" off the site in favor of posting to the Steam Workshop. These sites rely on advertising revenue to run, and you will very likely hurt this revenue. Why do that? You used to have a reputiation of siding with the underdog. It is not like you are in competition with people like Nexus. It is not like they are EA, taking a corner of the market. And it isn't even like you really need the money Valve. This just feels to me like a cash cow. A move EA would be proud of, sadly. As a modder, I disapprove of this move Steam. This may have far reaching consequences, for everyone involved. As for the rest of you, if you are still reading (thanks by the way) please support the effort against this initiative by Valve. Sign the petition here https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop More importantly, speak with your wallets. The best way to change this policy is to not spend One. Single. Cent. on mods. No matter what. Keep mods free! Ad Astra per Aspera PS there is a protest group you can join here: http://steamcommunity.com/groups/BoycottSteamWorkshop
Tobalaz;-;This game is vanilla and hopelessly broken without the modder patches not found in the workshop. I'm not against modders being paid for the work, but for the modders to only get 25% is a travesty and nothing short of greed on behalf of Bethesda and Valve. Its total BS. Any claims that modders are getting their dues or fairly paid for their work is nothing short of a lie that kills my faith in Valve. If you're willing to take the time to go "elsewhere" then it can become a fun game.
[TS] Espeon;-;Say goodbye to your social life.
FrozenWaffles;-;This game and community was amazing until this paying for mods fiasco started. I do not recommend this game until steam's pay for mods workshop ends.
Rymania;-;Used to love this game, paying for mods. No way!
GABUCIFER;-;Edit: So the paid mods crisis is over, but I won't change my review. I highly enjoy the game, but in retrospect, it has no life in it. Skyrim is an ocean, with the depth of a puddle. While the game is fantastic and will give you a lot of fun, you will need mods to enhanced the experience. And that's why you SHOULD NOT buy it here. You should NEVER pay for mods. NEVER EVER. #paidmods #microtransactions
theragingsky;-;Until the mod store goes away, I will not recommend this game.
Slacksmaster;-;Bethesda releases a partially-finished game, and relies upon modders to release free mods which fix bugs and improve the game's graphics. If Bethesda wants to charge for mods, then they should make a game that is actually worth its cost in the first place.
Marlin;-;Valve's introduction of paid mods have ruined this game. The game is very clunky as is, and (formerly) free mods are used to fix problems the developer overlooked. Unfortunately, Valve has forced the consumer to pay for mods to the game now. Value and Bethesda will not be receiving another dollar from me.
Nephutis;-;paying for mods? good joke. don't buy this trash.
notsun;-;Do you really think that payed mods is a smart idea? Mods have been the backbone of creativity with games, and it has always been known to be community based NOT CURRENCY BASED I feel its almost a Taboo to make people pay for mods. I don't blame Bethesda, even though they may have been the people to go to valve and propose this idea, but I give the FULL blame to Valve, and Steam. They are the ones with the ending decision to pull this kinda of . They have always been money grubbing and have practically created a PC gaming Hub Monopoly. Origin, Uplay, and the likes will never be what Steam is, and Valve knows this. That is why they are able to pull stupid  like this. Ive spent thounsands of dollars on steam, so have the hundreds of thousands of people that would frown at this have, and we only are here becauase steam honestly is kind of a last stronghold for PC gaming. That is the ONLY reason why. Not because you are good, not because you are doing your job well, but ONLY because you are the only PC gaming hub worth anyones time. Fix your  Vavle. Really. All you have been doing these past two years is do some of the most self centered things, and its only possible because Steam is a monopoly. Soon steam will fail, and it will especially if you keep pulling stupid  like this.
[63e] Partizan;-;C'mon, it's a Elder Scrolls Game. Of course you should buy it.
Jefe;-;A great RPG. The Elder Scrolls V is, first of all, a huge open world, where you can find everything from robbers of all stripes to the dragons. Secondly, an interesting storyline and a lot of additional missions. Thirdly, this is a good graphics, and great soundtrack. My opinion 10/10.
Jyi;-;Paying 20 euros for a sword sucks, while the rest of the game is ok!
jackcos;-;Greedy, greedy, greedy. Way to kill off the modding community for your broken game, Bethesda. ~~EDIT AFTER PAID MODS WERE CANNED~~ Way to almost kill off the modding community for your broken game, Bethesda.
TheLeftNut;-;From the company that brought you horse armor comes paid mods.
Tom_Flip;-;Paying for what was recently free = best business practice. Do not buy this game until this is removed.
Warboy Hudson;-;Now that mods are becoming a paywall exclusive item, I cannot and will not support this game. This one item has driven all love from my heart in regards to the series and all goodwill for Bethesda has evaporated. I can only shudder at what this will mean for Fallout 4.
Everdark;-;Modders who make mods as a hobby and share them in good will are forced to put a price tag on their formerly free mods just so other people won't steal the mod and sell it under their own name. This is where it all began and we can only hope that this is where it also ends. 1/10. Decent game, horrible business practice that is hurting consumers and modders and has the potential to deal great damage to one of the biggest assets in PC gaming.
FruitJuice;-;Valve stealing creators money and pretending it's okay when it's not even their work.
Tofuman;-;Paid mods mark the end of PC gaming
SirSuba @ MassiveLan;-;I used to play this game all the time. Now by not supporting modders, I'll never play this game again.
Texbyteal;-;I loved this game and loved the DLC, but I can't in good conscious recommend Skyrim. Bethesda, putting mods behind a pay wall is ridiculous. I hope you realize this, seeing as our community's immensely negative reaction has taken Skyrim's user rating down 12%. I truly hope you aren't planning to do this with the next Fallout game. I absolutely love Fallout and have always said I would purchase Fallout 4 no matter what, but if you decide to include payed mods in future games you will have lost my business.
FireWARKS;-;Without mods this game has some serious issues. Trying to charge for mods, especially without quality gurantees or fair compensation for authors, is unacceptable and frankly really gross. I fear for what you're going to do with FO4 and TES6 ;(
Chaos Control;-;Since valve decided to make pay for mods along with Bethesda, I will never buy a Bethesda game again. They are taking 75% of the profits for themselves while the modder gets 25%. What if the modder decides to take his content down. then who wins?! This is a joke, Bethesda you never created it in the first place so its not yours to profit off of!!! Screw this game. Down with tyranny and down with valve!
Ckit;-;Payed mods? No thanks.
Aaaaaaack;-;Sorry, but I'm out. Just no interest in supporting a game that uses paid mods.
Temeritas;-;Was a great game, mostly because of all the free Mods. But then came greed.
pacman -Syu;-;It was a great game until Valve and Bethesda decided that now we have to paid mods.
Jesus Is From The South;-;Paying for mods is dumb.
Silver;-;The introduction of paid mods for skyrim is one of the most egregious crimes against PC gaming ever committed. Do not support Bethesda in doing this.
Pink Duck;-;It would be better with mods but you have to pay for them. And I'm not paying for something that was free. Something like that,  this game, do not recommend.
viktorlim;-;Skyrim is all about mods. Mods helped to fix all the bugs left by Beths and make the game more fun. And now Beths and Valve decides to take advantage of this and make the mods = DLC. Good job ruining what made this game great.
Mjp11;-;Birth of dlc 2.0. Originally bought the game for free modding.
Redon;-;- Paid mods - Doesn't run at 120 Hz because Bethesda can't into programming - Awful combat and movement, I sure love strafing in mid-air
Wielant;-;Paid mods, sounds scary I know. Supporting the people who made the mods that make skyrim an actually playable game, undoubtedly a good thing. Now here is the problem, the modders could have at anytime made their own sites, or a single collective site, where they get all the money people pay for their mods. They didn't need valve to do this. Until paid mods, at least via steam, are gone. Please do not buy this game, do not download this game on free weekend. Instead sign the online petition. This may be the first time some of you have noticed this, but gaming news sources, are liars. If the modders want money, they can do it themselves. Some mods I would pay for. But All of that money would be for the people who spent their time and effort making those mods. LOOK AT NUMBER OF HOURS PLAYED BY THE USERS TELLING YOU THEY WILL NOT RECOMEND THIS GAME, DUE TO PAID MODS.
The Chosen Won;-;Had to play this game with over 50 mods just to enjoy it. Now it looks like I might have to pay additional fees in the future? No thanks.
TheDdead;-;say good bye to friends and family if you buy this game. honestly, even with its bugs, it is the best game I ever played.!
Jacob6875;-;Now that you have to pay for Mods I would not reccomend anymore. Unless you don't have a problem spending $100-200 beyond the purchase price.
Porkchop Sandwiches;-;Nice work screwing up your game bethesda, My favourite ES game is now Daggerfall as you've told us that modding is a service to you, and not to the ones liking the game. P.S Please don't kill off DaggerXL
zerato5;-;The fact that VALVE and Bethesda have added paid mods has lowered my opinion of this game. I cannot reccomend a game, or game company that exploits its players.
RidenCT;-;Once this game is supporting paid Mods, I highly recommend to NOT buy this game and/or any correlated Mod Alternatively, I support modders with donations
Danvir47;-;Deciding to charge for mods has ruined everything. Use the mod Nexus to find free mods.
TRDPatrick;-;Paid mods = FAIL
Gnomerik Galaxy;-;Introducing New Ways to Support Reviewers Steam Customer Reviews has always been a great place for sharing opinions, game recommendations, and all kinds of unoriginal jokes that you've not created. Now it's also a great place for selling those. Buying From Steam Customer Reviewers If you've been using Steam Customer Reviews, you already know how many incredible reviews are available for many of your favorite games. By paying for reviews and supporting the people writing them, you enable those artists and creators to continue working in their reviews and inspire new reviewers to try their hand in creating new, high quality reviews and experiences. Buy a recommendation today. Pay what you want, $5 minimum.
tomvdalen20;-;Paid Mods. this should be enough information. Pirate the game and get the mods from nexus or other people who are hording them on disks
Puffle;-;I've always loved this game, and of course the mods. Now we will have to pay for mods that will quickly go unsupported due to the nature of the modding system. Why pay for something that won't continue to have support and might cause other mods to crash or corrupt my saves over time? I understand the argument for paid mods, but this particular implementation of that practice has me completely against the idea. Make the mod creators accountable for their product before you start charging.
Hopsin;-;Don't buy this game. You have to pay for workshop items just because the big V is as greedy as uncle scrooge.
Quincy M.E.;-;Please pay to read the full review
Dee;-;Pay for mods. Valve has betrayed us.
FLYNN82;-;Until Steam completely changes the mod monetization to be a donation basis or removed altogether do NOT buy this game. Support the modding community and tell Valve to shove their greed up their sweetroles.
SuPa;-;Think about the message you're sending as a leader in digital rights managament and gaming platform before you decide to set a precedent as damaging as allowing users to sell their broken content through your service. Unfortunatley Bethesda was not only all for this, but wanted to then tax the creators 75% of their profit to add to the pile of cash they've accrued from their best-selling, industry-leading, formerly "Overwhelming positive" reviewed game. TL;DR: C'mon, man. If I wanted to buy broken content at a premium I'd just use origin.
Felshade;-;Paid mods? That's the end of this classic.
Doots;-;Great game, great community. Ruined by Valve's choice to facilitate paying for mods.
Toki Wartooth;-;damn fine game. Damn horrid buisness practices!
Arazo;-;Valve introducing paid mods is a disaster and a paywall to a game that has already been produced and profited off of. While some may say specific elements are not fully representative of the finished product, the actions taken by all members through monetization and greed create a framework for failure.
gzlism;-;Mods made this game still interesting...
Velsu;-;Introducing paid workshop mods for Skyrim made this game not worth the hassle anymore. You should not charge people for other people's work and cut 75% off the original creator.
Vivetti;-;Don't get me wrong, Skyrim is an awesome game. But paying for mods? That's too much. As much I love Valve and Bethesda, this is too much. We must do something for this. LIKE. NOW.
Joshrl;-;I don't really like the paid mods thing.
catnip513;-;Bringing paid mods is wrong and should not be supported at all.
trok;-;It's unfortunate that Steam has begun adopting the practices of the industry from which it previously set itself apart.
kasier1313;-;As a Skyrim modder who's spend easily 250+ hours creating a massive level that spans 1/3 the length of the Skyrim map, I find it unbelievable that Valve and Bethesda want 75% of the profit if I ever chose to add a donation button. Personally I would never charge for a mod I've done, I'm giving back to the community that's given me so much enjoyment. But a donation button seems reasonable for people who might like to say thanks with their wallet for all the hard work modders have done. The Skyrim modding community is an incredible and unique and for Vale and Bethesda to attempt monetize it has left me questioning my relationship with these two companies. It's pretty disingenuous to release the Creation Kit for free, then YEARS later say we want $$$! I have a feeling that some lawyers at Bethesda realized, after four years, that mods are an untapped revenue stream for their shareholders and decided to capitalize on it, without having any idea how that would effect the community or their company's image. With Fallout 4 and TES VI on the horizon, this looks like a cash grab by Bethesda, an attempt to solidify a money-making scheme for future releases. This nickle-and-dimming people to death has no place in PC Gaming. Find a better way to do it because you're turning your fan base against you. TL:DR 11/10 before, -1/10 after the decision to take a 75% cut of revenue from modders.
Funky_Chicken;-;Are u serious? I now have to pay for player created mods? Are u F@#cking for real Valve? So basically 180hrs of character and story creation down the gurgler because some greedy exec sold the idea of pay for mod? unistalling a brilliant game, actually unistalling all Valve games. I'm done with these moneymongers.... Bathesa Software, you've been donked....and Valve didn't even buy u dinner....
Gandalf -Big Chillin-;-;They screwed it all up. Pointless monetization of a game four years old.
ZakSackSock;-;This game is good. It is made great by community made mods, however that community is now broken up into different sides due to this paid mods bussiness and the game and its players suffer for it. Sad.
ButtersTheNinja;-;The base game is rather disappointing, littered with bugs, mediocre gameplay, and a rather uninteresting story. The one redeeming factor it has are the array of mods avaliable, and with the state of Steam Workshop, and the push for paid mods, buy this game with extreme caution.
Early;-;I've put more time into Skyrim than probably any other game, and for one reason: mods. Free ing mods. I've followed and supported the mod creators whose work became essential to my Skyrim experience, and to now see the lifeblood of this game locked up behind a paywall is disgusting. Mod creators should be rewarded, but not with a 25% payout on a purchase made by people who haven't even gotten the chance to use the mods yet. Let's hope everyone comes to their senses by the time TES 6 comes out. Then again, I thought Bethesda had done so after horse armor...
Dun Dorr;-;I am no longer recommending this game or Steam's service as of April 26th 2015. In light of recent events, it has occurred to me that Valve and Zenimax no longer care about the customer or communities. It is a disappointing turn of events, and I wish the right thing would be done. Unfortunately, I see little chance in that happening; the damage is done. REASONS FOR NOT SUPPORTING PAID MODS It opens up opportunities for theft. Gabe Newell stated that it is "impossible" between the community and Valve at this happening. Yet it's already happened, several times in fact, with the first bundle of mods released. What's worse, if modders want to see if their work is being stolen, they must go through the arbitrary paywall. It dissolves the intertwining of mods. It's not just entire mods being stolen, it's also assets. What Zenimax and Gabe Newell do not understand is Skyrim has mods that are related to other mods, mostly through the use of the same resources. Modders release resources(for FREE) online to share FREELY with other modders. So what happens when a modder makes something with their hard work, and asks money for it? How will those other modders who shared their resources get paid, or even be aware their work is being used like this? Not even mentioning the fact that many modders who create things in software like Blender or Photoshop don't even have licenses to monetize on them. This is why it's a terrible idea, the mods depend too much on each other to have some of them put behind a paywall. It splits the community. Partly for the reasons above and for many other reasons, the community is damaged through this action. Gabe Newell said that money is what drives a community, perhaps for communities that are money-driven. But he doesn't realize that the modding community has worked for well over a decade with little issue. And here Valve and Zenimax enter, destroying that sense of community in just a few days. Great job. The modders get shafted. I'm not saying modders don't deserve money for their hard work, or that I'm unwilling to pay. If you take a look at my Steam library you'd know I pay for my products. My problem with the current system is that it is a very insulting way of going about it. When the modders do all the hard work, they get 25%. In what way is this a fair deal to them? That insinuates that Valve is getting 30% and Zenimax is getting 45%. Why do either of you deserve that cut? What have you done except provide the tools and service to distribute these mods? Does a car mechanic give the majority of his cash to the car manufacturer and tool makers? The deal is a raw one, and frankly it is an insulting one. If people want to support these modders, it is best done through donations where they get all the money they deserve. For the reasons stated above, I request that you cease and desist this morally, legally, and creatively stunted attempt at making an extra buck. Save your reputation before it's too late.
Spoderman;-;10/10 game, but paid mods? Yeah sure, let's pay bethesda for doing nothing. Rating this game down after what Valve has done
bryce_joanis;-;mods are now dlc.
Joeman4;-;Paid Mods are the bane of gaming..
Kafka87;-;I loved this game. But I can't stomach paid mods. Donate button yes. Paywall no.
Doumy;-;Paid mods... no need to say anything else
mechajinkun;-;Its a fantastic game, with mods on. But I guess you gotta pay extra to get that fantastic experience otherwise you're in for a slog.
Koifish;-;I am really not cool with the recent "additions". A donation button that leads directly to the modders would be highly preferable.
XCaL;-;Skyrim is a game that is quite frankly not worth your time, and I'll tell you why. Pros: The world is beautifull Cons: The combat is extremely dull and very repetetive The combat is easy The game is far from balanced in any way The world does not feel immersive what so ever. You can fullfill any role, like being the Emperor and the Leader of the "bad guys" at the same time There is no charma system The only thing that could make this game any good is if you decided to mod the hell out of it. Now You cannot do that anymore, since it's all behind paywalls. Valve takes a greedy 75% of the money, so the developers of the mod gains very little. If you want to support mods (as you should), donate to the mod authors directly if you can. In it's current state this is quite frankly not worth your time "Skyrim is as wide as an ocean, but deep as a puddle"
Thinking Potato;-;Steams decision to add paid mods for Skyrim? I guess the game took an arrow in the knee.
Kaukamieli;-;Play with 200 mods? Pay 1000 extra!
Fortune lft spy, 1st, 2nd;-;Adding a paywall for mods is just stupid. One of the worst deciscions ever made.
Souzooka;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim development team (Bethesda) and Valve have recently reached a deal where mods can be sold on its Steam Workshop. While already a dubious concept, it has been executed horribly. For example: *Valve receives a 30% cut on mods. The publisher determines their cut, in this case 45% goes to Bethesda, leaving modders with 25%. Money IS paid not in store credit but instead in real cash, but only after the modder accumulates a $100 cut, which will not happen for most mods. *Due to a lack of copyright on mods, there are mods which are being stolen and being resold as a paid mod. There is also no protection against any mod being stolen, in a legal or DRM sense. *There is no quality control on mods in the Steam Workshop, and modders have no obligation to provide a working product or to update their mods, which will lead to refund concerns. *Due to many free mods' dependencies on what was other free mods that are now becoming paid mods, end users will have to pay for those mods in other to use other mods which depend on them. This will be happening with the SkyUI mod. *Mods such as "Midas Magic" are having their free versions removed by the modder after he attempted to integrate pesterware for the paid version into them. *P2W and cosmetic mods will likely dominate the market over expansions, as less work needs to go into those and that is where "the money" is. The entire thing reeks of bad business practice, and is a mess. A better way to execute donating to modders is to set up a tip jar system, where users can pick up and thoroughly test and play with a mod and then go back to the modders' workshop page where they can give modders a tip out of their Steam Wallet. This system as it stands shafts users, and it shafts modders as modders have to sell $400 out of a single mod to see any sort of money. I cannot endorse a company which is endorsing this practice.
palebludot;-;I love this game but paid mods is going too far.
Adrammelech;-;This whole paid mod stuff is disgusting.
ekscelle.dll;-;I used to enjoy this game. But considering the only way to make it enjoyable is by heavily modding it, It seems like Valve doesn't want me to any more. The trouble with loyalty to a cause, is that the cause will always betray you.
DOCTOR PHIL PORN;-;used to be 10/10 now its 0/10  paid mods and  steam EDIT: no more paid mods but still 0/10 because it happened and it seems like they'll try something y again
kof91;-;11/10 will pay for mods to support Beth/Valve and their peasants paid modders Paid mods FTW! I eagerly awaits this model to be adopted across all workshop games! Well done Valve
HungryWalrus;-;Paying for mods leads to a seperation between consumer and modder and will be the death of modding. Don't let this happen. Boycott Valve. Money is the only way to get their greedy attention.
Galopa;-;Yeah Valve, some content creator deserve to be paid. No, you and Bethesda don't deserve 75% of this money. You should be ashamed Bethesda to kick in the nuts the community that made your game what it is today.
qwertyjuice;-;This game can no longer be recommended in my book, bethesda and valve are charging for mods, one of the largest things that sets this game apart, do not buy.
Rose;-;After Oblivion, Bethesda strikes again with a half-cooked open world RPG. The real strength of Skyrim and the such always remained about fans and modders who were able to polish the base game, fix bugs, doing most of the time a better job than people paid to build the game. Now, with paid mods, and Bethesda getting a cut on sale (and a heavy one), they can simply do even less, release a poor game that will be fixed by players. For free. Cherry on top? Bethesda will be paid for others to fix their crap. You lost yourself a customer, and a long time supporter, idiots! You're the very basic definition of what's wrong in this industry. You make me puke.
Kiserai;-;I feel like this game is very overrated. There's a ton of content for sure, and that gives me a lot of stuff to do, but what fun is it if I find the combat so damn boring? Few of the attacks seem to carry any real weight, and magic feels underpowered to me. My favorite part of this game was the modding community, and how you could take a mediocre game like this and make it something different and beautiful. Recently, however, Bethesda and Valve have gotten greedy and now the mod scene for this game is crumbing in on itself. For its current sale price it's a pretty good deal, and I would say everybody should probably play it at one point or another because it's generally considered a classic, but please don't buy any mods. Buying mods tells these companies that we're okay with them making money off of every single aspect of gaming, even work they never did. They shouldn't be making a dime off of these mods, and in fact they should be paying these modders for driving more people to their game.
Sarda;-;Enjoy needing paid for mods to fix the broken game they sell by default.
Malefactrix DBug;-;New Review: While the practice of paid modding has been suspended (for now), my gripes with the many problems in this vanilla version of thing game as well as the overall lack of content remain a big factor. The game grows dull, boring, and redudant quick. Most of the game involves going from point A to point B to something and then fast travel back to Point A to go to Point C. If you want to know why I was crafting Dragonbone armor before completing my Fus Ro Dah shout, there you go. I find it very hard to pick back up after I stop playing, and that's a shame. Old Review: While this supports paid mods and as a modder I strongly do not, it is a disgusting practice making its way onto the gaming scene that should remain on the mobile market and elsewhere. Until the practice stops, I cannot recommend this game for purchase at all. Hell, not even Oblivion or Morrowind. Spend your money elsewhere and for games that encourage free modding, the same goes for dropping support for any mod authors who has the gall to put their mod up on the Workshop and/or those removing/hiding their Nexus mods. Do not support mod authors who support monetizing something that is free, do not support Bethesda either. Aside from that, the game is plagued with bugs, game-breaking glitches, etc. Mods helped make all these problems go away, and now they intend to be gated behind a paywall.
Quintus Sertorius;-;The mods fixed the game, now that they are paid I strongly recommend to steer clear of this game until the issue has been fixed.
Coe;-;I used to be an adventurer like you.. But then greed took over the mod section for a game that's run by them and thus, I hauled my ss out of that profession quicker than a cougar on cocaine.
Sir Robin the Brave;-;Valve/Bethesda will be remembered by how they single handedly tore apart the modding community, a community that created modifications out of passion for their beloved games and extened a games life for countless years to come. Now we have a modding community split in half with those who believe in the old ways of modding and those who would rather "sell-out" in favour of a quick buck all thanks to the introduction modding monitisation. I fear for the future of modding, or should it be known as 3rd party DLC? I can't support these greedy money grabbing tactics and thus I cannot recommend a game that supports such tactics.
hubcaps;-;As much time as I've sunk into the various versions of this game through console and PC, and it's previous iterations, I cannot and will not support a publisher and platform that thinks they can swoop in and skim a massive profit off the top of others hard work. Your success is due to us, the longevity of each game in your franchises is due to us. To blatantly screw with the foundations of what has built your success is arrogant and greedy.
Timoth;-;Just reviewing to voice my concern regarding paid mods.
Marbles;-;Awful after the implemention of the paid mods.
skeltor57;-;Paid mods have had a negative impact on my skyrim experience.
Retard;-;Paid mods really valve
Corporal Obvious;-;paid mods have ruined what made this game great
WalrusPug;-;Paid mods? How bout my free review*. * The postive review is available for only 3,69.
SpewKs;-;Dont buy Volvo introduced paid mods. 0/10 Wouldnt pay for mods ever.
tomme25;-;366 hours, but a negative review. What gives? Paid mods.
Arcanine;-;Skyrim is a great game, but only when you can mod it. Mod the game to make it look amazing. Mod the game to have entire new areas to explore, areas never before seen, areas with beautiful areas and amzing NPCs and quest. Mod the game to fix the bugs that Bethesda refuses to fix. Now modding is at risk thanks to the greed of Valve and Bethesda. Essential mods going behind paywalls, awful mods with no quality control charging money to dupe gamers out of more money. Until this is fixed, I cannot give this a positive review, not anymore. Edit: Paid mods have been removed, rejoice! However, this review shall stay up as a reminder of what Valve/Bethesda tried to do.
J_Dawg;-;Want to play a vanilla game with a ton of bugs? GREAT! Get Skyrim. Want to be able to download free mods and patches to extend gameplay? Well Valve says  you.
Faiter;-;The main reason I got this game on launch was the promise of mods that would supply the game with content for years to come; now Valve has monetized the main insentive to PC gaming and have driven many of their fans away, including me. Dont buy mods, use Nexusmods for free mods, and start diversifying your game-distribution clients away from Steam. Go use Origin, GOG, Humblebundle and Desura instead; we can not let Valve take monopoly of the market, as they WILL use it to sieze the market and harm PC gaming.
[SAE]Grim;-;Paid workshop for mods, nuff said. Piece of shoite
Worm;-;Been playing these games since Daggerfall and it's sad to be done with them, but oh well.
Jungle_Jon;-;This game is the start in the next wave of increasing revenue by Valve, avoid this game until paid mods is removed. The base game is a broken buggy mess until mods fix it, Valve is now trying to charge for the mods.
lightmartyr;-;Valve and Bethesda make a play to exploit the modding community. It's simple, they want the modders to make almost all the content and bug fixes, while they take the lion's share of the money earned.
The Incredible Mr. Satan;-;Skyrim is a decent game, made great by mods. Now that Bethesda (the publisher) starts having people pay for mods the vanilla game itself - without mods - is nothing i would recommend people to play.
Animal Mother;-;Paid Mods?! LOL WTF.
Bookshelf;-;The game is great but not its new policy for paying for mods especially when the modder only gets 1/4 of the cut.
notWhole-Protein;-;it's apparently cool now to hate on skyrim
Fylas;-;I don't endorse the new nonsense about paid mods where the modder gets 25% and the companies the rest what the hell is wrong with people and half the mods use stolen assets <-<
SanityKeeper;-;To hell with paid mods .
Achmed the mountain dewd;-;Valve and Bethesda should start selling bugfixes next time. You know that exploit when you can jump from whiterun to skyrim without a loading screen,fall from a hole to under whiterun and access the merchants chests? you can be a fully legit whiterun citizen just for 1.99$
Yondashi;-;Doesn't even let me get pass the first screen when starting a new game, useless, do not buy, waste of money.
Tabless;-;Paid Mods take an otherwise great game and turn it into something I don't want to support anymore. Based on that alone I can no longer recommend this game. This is damaging to the PC gaming and modding community.
Tlim;-;The Elder $crolls 5: Paywall
Knock;-;Completely ruined by the paid mods The replayability and (atleast for me) the fun of Skyrim relies on the ability to download all the mods you want. But nowadays those mods are behind a stupid paywall. So the essence of Skyrim is now behind microtransactions (that aren't always very micro ). So if you want to have actual fun in this game, you have to actually pay for unreliable downloadable contant that has no guarantee of updates, patches or support. Of course, you have 24 hours to get a refund. But here's a scenario: You download a mod, pay for it and it works fine. But after 24 hours, the author releases a patch that breaks the mod. Now, you have no way to get your money back! Good luck. TL;DR Don't do it: Not fun without throwing big amounts of money to potential scams
FredtheFailLord;-;Paid Mods: ruining the PC gaming community. Aside from the issue of there being no verification that the uploader actually owns the mod, are modders allowed to charge for a derivative or addon work? If so, do we want them to? If so, do we want Steam to be the portal for that, rather than a dedicated website which wouldn't take a cut of the profits? No. It's Skyrim, you should already know the game by now. Mostly good (and vastly improvable through free mods) visuals, mostly good (and improvable through free mods) gameplay, and the well-known Radiant AI system that allows certain quest arks and mission types to be infinite. This will get repetitive, but is a nice way to ensure the game doesn't get boring.
Theo Hardmeier;-;You kill things...I mean that makes a game good right? Who would play a game that forces the player to make world peace....idiots... You see they give ya and sword and tell ya to make your own destiny...which involves killing...which is fun...then they stick dragons that move alot to kill...who would put a fast moving object into an epic killing game anyway? Least they gave us the courtesy to make them stay still once in a while...
VikingDream - OuchThatHurt;-;Paid mods are gone yes I know but my headline still stands. Sadly this game has now become a "horse armour collecting game" with the new paid DLCs i mean mods. Base game: 3/10 The base game is fundimentaly boring and buggy you first need to install the Unoffical patches for the game to make it stable before being able to play without quest lines breaking and CTDs happeing. This is because Bethesda haven;t lifteda finger to patch the game since 2013... they don't care they let modders fix there  while they raked in the sales. If you get the chance to buy this game in a sale do so it's worth it but only if you use mods to make it tabel and more fun. Base game modded: 11/10
Sentry Gun (m0ngh);-;Great game, but this is a step in the wrong direction for the modding community. Valve forgot to not be evil.
Winde;-;I disagree with putting mods behind a paywall, due to concerns on mods breaking down and the split of profits between distributor and modder.
Shiny Dentist;-;Positive review costs 4,99. Free the mods!
psychotrip;-;[THIS IS AN EXTREMELY LONG ANALYSIS OF SKYRIM SEVERAL YEARS AFTER IT'S BEEN RELEASED. FEEL FREE TO SKIP TO THE BOTTOM IF YOU CAN'T / DON'T WANT TO READ IT ALL. LONG STORY SHORT, MODS MAKE THIS GAME WORTH PLAYING. PAID MODS MAKE IT DIFFICULT TO RECOMMEND] So, I've been a fan of the elder scrolls since I was very little, starting with Oblivion, moving on to skyrim, and ironically falling in love with Morrowind and playing the modded version more than any other non-mmo I've ever played. I love the incredibly rich, metaphysical, surreal backstory, as well as the roleplaying / simulator aspects in Morrowind. I just uninstalled skyrim today after realizing it just wasn't worth it anymore to keep trying to make it work. It's a buggy mess, and when I try to pad the game with mods that make it less shallow and more fun I just have to deal with all the bugs and issues involved with the mods as well. It's just not worth it anymore. For me, the novelty of skyrim wore off very quickly. As many people say, it's an ocean wide and a puddle deep. It leads you to believe there's more to it than there is. Unlike previous games, every character I made felt pretty much the same: an oafish, clumsy nord. This was in part due to design decisions, and also due to developer overlooks. The removal of athletics and acrobatics removed an entire playstyle that allowed your character to be agile, jumpy, and nimble, which killed bosmer / khajiit for me. The fact that I couldn't do a sprinting jump, and instead have to sprint, wait a full second (And bump into the object I'm trying to avoid) THEN jump, left me feeling like a clumsy stupid nord every playthrough. The fact that staves dissapear when you sheathe them, everyone is the same height in first person, and your off-hand weapon just randomly appears in your hand makes the game seem lazy and breaks my immersion. Unlike in morrowind, guilds are less about simulating a role / job for your character, and more about following a preset storyline. That would be fine if the storylines were actually GOOD. My god the narrative mess that is the College of Winterhold still haunts me to this day. And don't get me started on the Bard's College. The thing that really irks me about these questlines is that they all just devolve into random dungeon crawls. I counted: you only need to use magic thrice in the mages guild. Advancing through the guild has nothing to do with actually using magic or being skilled. You're just watching a poorly developed story unfold, not rising through the ranks of an esteemed guild of scholars. There's no way to distinguish your character or give him a personality through dialogue or your race / class. This was a stark difference from fallout 3 and New Vegas, where your perks gave you extra dialogue options and could change entire questlines, and you could choose dialogue options that really gave your character an interesting personality. Skyrim game seems afraid to give you any consequences. Argonians aren't allowed in Windhelm? Except for you! Khajiit aren't typically trusted in the cities? Funny, no one even seems to realize I'm a khajiit in the first place. Not even a unique quest for argonian players to gain entrance into the city. You may say "This would've been too hard for the devs to implement" but it makes me wonder why they present these plot-points into the game if they're not willing to actually follow through with them. There's not even a single mention of your race throughout the entire game other than the occassional quip from a bandit. My altmer was walking by some dominion soldiers, and I was surprised they didn't even have any unique dialogue. They just treated me like I was a nord and shooed me off, not even scolding me for being a "traitor" to my kind. Entire quests could have been more unique by acknowledging the unique aspects of my player instead of pretending they don't exist. The quests give you the illusion that you'll be able to influence the world or change things, then snatch away the opportunity at the last minute. The Civil War for example: no matter who you side with, no high king will ever be crowned, and no one in the world will ever acknowledge the war is over. In the Markarth quest you can side with the forsworn but there are no consequences. The forsworn will still be hostile to you and nothing ever comes of your allegiance. You can come up with any excuse you want to explain these things, but the fact remains that Bethesda CHOSE not to take these choices further. So what you're left with is a shallow dungeon crawler with a lackluster combat system, removal of many rp aspects, a weak narrative, and....well that's it. I know the other games had issues too, but I expect a developer's work to improve over time. Not to mention the massive amount of game-breaking bugs that exist. Am I the only one that thinks it's ridiculous that MODDERS ar ethe ones that have to make "unofficial" patches to fix the bugs in this game? Isn't that embarrassing? If this was any other game company that would be unacceptable. How much longer can bethesda get away with these oversights and bugs until fans get sick of it? I know we like to explain it away by saying "They made an ambitious open world game! It's hard to get rid of the bugs!" Well if you're going to be ambitious, don't you think your work and polish should reflect that? Ambition is worthless without execution. I guess the main thing that I personally didn't like about skyrim was that it never felt like a roleplaying game or at least not the type of rpg I like. Morrowind felt like a roleplaying simulator, where you were dorpped off in a world and left to your own devices, free to simulate any role you wanted to. In the mages guild you actually did research and find magic artifacts and learned about history, in the imperial legion you actually felt like a gallant knight who used his brawn and his wit to keep the people of vvardenfell under control. Morrowind had a LOT of issues, and is incredibly outdated, but for what it was I think that it did a better job of this than Skyrim. In Skyrim, I just feel like I'm on soft-rails in an open world, watching the pretty killcams and interacting with the world, but I never felt like a living person in a living world. TL;DR The only saving grace for Skyrim are the mods, but they often become too much of a hassle to make it worth it. With steam's new introduction of PAID MODS, Skyrim has officially crossed the line into "not worth it" territory. Unless you want to pay for a full game AND the dozens of mods you need to make it a great game, then just go back to Oblivion or Morrowind, or hell, download Morroblivion, the mod that combines oblivion amd Morrowind into one game. It's great.
Daan;-;Once upon a time there were free mods. But then the evil lord Gaben destroyed al our sweet dreams RIP in pieces Skyrim #crievrytime #Gaben2spooky4me
blehwuheva;-;As a lifelong gamer I feel it's my solemn duty to my hobby to have a brain aneurysm and flip the  out about a minor inconvenience like having to download mods for an old game I don't really play any more on a third party site like Nexus and install them manually to avoid farting out a couple of nickels for the greedy Jews at Valve in order to be able to just press a button on Steam that installs and updates everything automatically for me. This is LITERALLY on par with the Holocaust, and because I consider myself someone who cares very deeply about ethics in gaming, when I take a stand and scream through my keyboard understand that this is not just about being against paying money for mods - this is about the Holocaust. You don't support the Holocaust, do you? ...so without further ado... *eye twitch* WHAT THE  VALVE HOW DARE YOU I HATE YOU SO MUCH WHY GABE WHYYYYYYYY ASHDJAHDKJHAKJSDHASNJDKJAEIUWEILJALSDAKJSDAUIWHUAJW!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Johnny;-;The stand alone game is amazing but I can't recommend it due to Valve's and Bethesda's decision to start charging for mods. This is toxic to the community and I'm shocked Valve would even consider something like this.
ezwip;-;This was a great game but then they started the pay for mods.
ironborn;-;Whoever supports mods behind a paywall is a degenerate. (Optional donations are good and I donated myself, but to lock people out of your mod, simply because they CAN'T fukken pay you, is a nogo.)
Advent;-;Why get this game if you can even mod it without paying for the game all over again? PC gaming biggest advantage was the ability to mod with basically difficulty for free! Valve is trying to take that advantage away with paid mods. I wouldn't be surprised if Valve scrapped this whole paid mod thing but it will forever stain the name of Valve and Steam.
Revan1er;-;Paid mod!!!! Shame on you Valve\Bathesda and greedy modder.
MarcraM;-;Boycotting the Paid Mods!
Jacy Kururugi;-;You know I used to like this game. I used to have a postive review on this game and was planning to get back into this game. But Bethesda and Valve decided to do something that not even EA would do and that is force paying for user created Mods. Yes I understand that no work should be done for free and yes I do agree hat modders should get rewarded for their work and dedication. BUT i don't agree that I should be forced to pay for Mods, that is why donations exist. Since the dawn of PC gaming Mods has always been free and this should never change. The reason Mods exist is because gamers want to show their passion for a game they love and extend the life of the game and share their dedication to other people. As a result people would donate to show their appreciation to the modders dedication. But now that time is gone apparently because now apparently people are as greedy as ever. What happens to the people like myself who already donated money to modders but now have this pay wall to force pay a particular mod? This is shady business practice and if this doesn't change soon then pirating will become a bigger issue and everyone will lose. Till then I don't recomend the steam version and the pirated version seems the better choice to show that this new business practice is huge mistake.
Byzantinae [ESP];-;I will not pay for mods that should be free. Let Bethesda and Valve pay for their boldness. Initiatives such shameful should be punishable by prison sentences for going against the common good.
Increasing;-;VALVE HAS BETRAYED US. YOU NOW PAY FOR MODS. BUT THE PC MASTER RACE AIN'T DEAD YET. JOIN US AT gog.com!
:3;-;This was a notable game, now all my weapons, houses and waifus are dead and my save is corrupted because I have to pay for the mods that I was using. Gabe, you were the chosen one. It was said you'd save the industry not join them.
TheSmartChicken;-;paid mods are not the way it valve
Vegetagoogle;-;Rather mediocre game without mods. User interface designed for low res televisions at large viewing distance. Magic becomes underpowered in late game. Many bugs require unofficial patch mods. Nearly every dungeon has the same basic layout. The story and atmosphere are pretty good though.
blaKe #;-;Now have to pay for mods? HELL NOOOO, NOBODY GOT TIME FOR DAT!!!!
[FUKR] PeanutBudder69;-;This is the BEST GAME IVE EVER PLAYED IN MY LIFE
Kiska;-;Paid community workshop addons isn't the way to go. Why the  do we have to monetize everything.
Mouldzy;-;Paying for mods... No Thanks...
Feign;-;Donation button > paywall
Lubi;-;Valve stole my sweetroll.
scrumpf;-;Sets a  precedent for gaming. Please, do not support pay-to-use mods.
LukeSpoon;-;Great game, but the paywall for mods is just stupid. ADD A DONATE BUTTON!
Dark;-;This game has it all. Once you start you'll never leave the land of Skyrim.
ivanp3000;-;Is this the future of gaming? paying for the game, dlc and now mods?
Minty_Wolf;-;i used to be an adventurer, but took a payed mod to the knee
Leet_KFC;-;I heard you like DLC. So I put DLC, in your DLC!
Rekyua;-;UPDATE: Paid Mods have been removed, but the damage is already done. Unlike others who have changed their reviews back to 'recommended' this will stay as 'not recommended'.. "Those who cannot learn from history are doomed to repeat it." This was my favorite game, once. I put over a thousand hours in and I've never finished the main story. Why? Because of mods. I would play through mod after mod that added quests or new companions or changed enemies and combat. I put even more time into Morrowind. Elder Scrolls has always been more about what the community can do for the game than the game itself. But now, the mods I loved to play this game with have disappeared. They're no longer available out of fear that their work will be stolen and sold. So thanks for that, because now I have no reason to ever finish this game properly because all the little touches the community added to this game that kept me coming back to it are gone.
[CUM] The Shogun _;-;Good job on completely destroying the mod community
Disparu;-;The game was always average to begin with. If you want to play an RPG go out and buy morrowind instead. There you wont have to pay for mods to fix all of the terrible decisions bethesda made this with one. It's terrible to play without tonnes of mods and you should NEVER be forced to pay for a mod, especially one solely designed to fix the awful game design which the people who made that awful game design then get 45% of the cut from. Ya, no, gtfo.
#YOLOSWAGATTACK420BLAZEIT;-;bethesda sold out on the mods
Zer0icee;-;Used to be one of the best games out there. Now it's a just another marketplace. Get rid of the market for mods that's not what the community is about.
VIDEO GAMES;-;Paid Mods? Really? Just stop. Please sign this change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop And email these guys about how bad paid mods are: http://www.valvesoftware.com/email.php?recipient=Gabe+Newell http://www.valvesoftware.com/email.php?recipient=Doug+Lombardi Write negative reviews, too.
Esky;-;Now supports PMC, paid mod content. If you buy this game at some time in the future, know that a mod that is essential for the game to run in a working manner (unoffical skyrim patches) might have chosen to go Pay2Play; then the game will work but not to its fullest. The series of The Elder Scrolls is famous for its mod authors and on the day of this review that has been changed. I do not at this time recommend you buy this game until PMC is either finalized and is here to stay or abolished. Just be warned that the greatest thing about Bethesda games, being the modders, has changed, so too must our views. Please make sure before you buy that if you are interested in modding your game that the mods you want haven't gone pay2play. I have almost 1200 hours from mods alone in this game, not the game itself. The base game itself is ok but not 1200 hours "ok." Just shop smart and look out before you jump is all that I'm saying. 10/10 before PMC 6/10 after PMC
CHO + CHOH;-;Base game: 8/10 Game with mods: 10/10 Game with paid mods -3/10 Seriously, whoever thought it was a good idea to introduce paid mods instead of, say, a donate button for mod creators should be fired. I have played this game for hundreds of hours, and loved every second, but with recent developments I simply cannot give this game a positive review. Valve & Bethesda, you should seriously consider the implications of this decision, because it will have a huge impact on gaming in the years to come.
Artorias;-;you Valthesda,  you and your paid mods. Thanks for your capitalistic way of ruining gaming as an entertainment industry and its community. I have refunded my witcher 3 preorder and you will never see a single dime from me anymore. GOG Velut Arbor Aevo EDIT: It seems like the paid mods feature is disabled, but the PR damage control, balme shifting, fallacies and rhetorics from bethesda and valve are abysmal. And lets face it, skyrim is 7/10 at best without mods and I personally did not enjoy vanilla skyrim
[Beetle] Wick;-;The developers came back and ruined the game 4 years later, don't buy this turd
El Oshcuro;-;200+ hours on record. About only half of what I put into Oblivion... but I think I liked Skyrim nearly twice as much in the end. There is only one Elder Scrolls series, and it keeps getting better. But not better than Morrowind... yet ;-)
Tacit Caster;-;Never accept paid mods.
Bozaq21;-;Fantastic game, but paywalls are something that will tear apart this community.
Umarillian;-;When I purchase an open world game I expect it to be a game I can keep coming back to for years, and while that may have been true it turned out that when bethesda realized there were people still playing their games and there might be a way they could leverage this for money. They took advantage of this ability with the help of valve, they effectively paywalled my previous save content. If I can't download and use the mods that were essential to my previous saves they are no longer functional, my saves have been broken because of their greed and hundreds of hours of enjoyment has been sullied by their behavior. I've rebuilt my OS, and while I backed up my saves I can no longer acquire the mods on which they are dependent. This is unacceptable and I vow to as long as Bethesda stays on this path, I will never again purchase a game from this company, and when conversation arrises about their projects and their merit I will have nothing but vitriol to say.
Tofke;-;Just one action to fall from grace: Payed mods.
Useless Engineer;-;buy poop mods !! Just 99.99 $ !!
Geo_Storm_Racer;-;I don't agree with the current 'user mod' monetization methods in place by Bethesda and Valve.
Excel;-;mods made it bad 0/10 dont pay for mods when you can get them for free
Valet;-;The downfall of PC gaming as we know it. What madness lies next, pay-for-patches, monthly subscriptions for single player? Stay tuned
Birm;-;[Read this review for only 0.99$ or your regional equivalent]
Rohmann98;-;Game is extremely boring withoutmods. Now they are chargning for them. I would highlighy suggest playing a better action RPG, such as Dark Souls. Do noty buy unless you want to support the practice of forcing paid mods, or are willing to pay extra for the best part of the actual game. It's basically Horse Armor part deux.
francopoli;-;This game came out in 2011 and now shows its age. The only reason to keep playing Skyrim is the mods and modding community. If you are thinking about buying Skyrim, you may want to hold off until the modding community sorts out the recent changes. If you want to purchase Skyrim for the story, then go for it. There is about 30 hours of decent gameplay, quests etc in the game that are worth $15. I got bored once I made it through the main quest line, once with a pure magic user and once as a dual wielding barbarian. The Civil War storyline is interesting but does not change the world as I had hoped. There are a few of the main quests that break if you complete the Civil War Story before the Main Questline as well; it is my opinion that you should pick a side, then finish the main quests, then come back and finish the Civil War events. As an open world game Skyrim and Grand Theft Auto are the two best examples I have played. Get the Legendary version for $15 or less and enjoy the 30-40 hours of decent gameplay. If you get the chance to play Morrowind and Oblivion please do. They show their age as well but the game is wonderful and the modding community is fantastic. And you can flesh out the lore of the Elder Scrolls games for not a lot of money.
Dreamz Cryterra;-;Tremendous game which opens a number of different opportunities. The cursor of game allows to create faultless modifications, you can modify, create, pass, enjoy an ocha rovatelny landscapes and it not a limit. Bethesda made a skyrim game for all times where there is a wish to return again and again. Game is filled a set of interesting quests and huge locations which you should investigate. And you can add all this with excellent modifications which will decorate game. Thanks Bethesda for charming and excelent game!
Vred;-;they charge for modding
Rubios;-;Horse armor 2.0
Becky;-;I cannot recommend any game that exploits its community with paid mods. By implementing such a system, Valve and Bethesda threaten the core, underlying prinicpals of modding. A threat looms to take away our personal freedom to modify and play the game as we see fit, replacing it with a 'sanitised' system where only Valve-approved mods ( id est no extreme gore mods, drug mods, and definitely no sexual mods) are permitted. Paid mods are provided without support, no guarantees it won't break (now or at a later stage), and a refund window of only 24-hours (which is debatably not enough time to thoroughly test mods, especially larger ones). The community is being exploited by mod developers suddenly tempted with greed into profiteering, and the mod developers themselves are being exploited with a tiny 25% cut for their own work. Furthermore, Steam's subpar customer support system is woefully inequipped and underpowered to deal with the flood of paid mods produced by their customers which may contain (or solely exist of) other peoples' work. Capitalism is one thing. But I bought this game to mod and play. The looming threat to restricting my right to modify my game as I see fit, and attemping to exploit modders and the community at large, goes beyond simple capitalism and into the realm of exploitation. I cannot recommend a game from any developer that bows to greed in such a fashion.
Razaku;-;Good for Bethesda to remind people who the criminals actually are and why piracy is growing by the day.
VirusKing;-;BS paid mods... mods are what made this game so popular, and that's how Bethesda thanks the modders. I'll never buy any of it's products, even if  changes. Bye.
FF0000 vs 0000FF;-;Skyrim is a great game, but the way the devs are whoring it out to Valve so they can flog mods for a 75% cut is ing disgusting. If the mod purchasing is stopped then this will changed to be a recommendation.
Red;-;What used to be a great game by a great company has now fallen due to greed, say no to paid mods
a glazed donut;-;*cough* PAID MODS *cough*
Thelshyn;-;Paid Patches Single Player Micro-transactions Third Party DLC All this and more thanks to Valve's new paid mod system; which seeks to imitate mobile app shops in an attempt to make a quick buck. Edit: As of 4/27/2015 Valve has removed paid mods from their workshop. But my stance on Skyrim, Bethesda, Valve, and paid mods has not changed; and that stance is that once you buy a mod it is no longer a mod, rather it becomes a micro-transaction; regardless of who it's creator is. Micro-transactions have no place in Skyrim, or any other single player game for that matter; and the $32 debut pack for a bunch of low quality, unfinished cosmetic items is the biggest joke I've ever seen.
andreasschurmann;-;Cannot recommend the game in its current state. It is a possiblity that the majority of mods will be behind a paywall, which will be very expensive for people who runs this game with several dozen of mods. If the average mod will be around 2 euro it will cost me personally 120 euro + original game (launch price) with dlc for a total 200+ euro. At that price it is simply NOT WORTH IT.
Gold;-;Games good, paying for mods not so much.
Neus;-;EDIT: Paid mod workshop has been disabled, but I won't change my recommendation to positive. This is a reminder to any developer that tries to implement paywalls on something that should remain free. Was an awesome game, and it still is, BUT 80% of the awesomeness was due to the dedicated modding community, which at the moment is very disunited (due to the mod selling update). Some modders call others sell-outs for selling their mods, the sellers defend this by saying that all the hard work needs to be compensated for. THIS WAS A BAD IDEA! Mods are not DLC, and shouldn't be treated as official content. A mod may work today, but it may not work 2 weeks in the future, due to a game update or me installing another mod. Either way, the mod seller has no responsibility to fix it.
Sr. Naranja;-;I do recommend this game, it's excellent, but i must show my disagreement with the addition of the paid mods
Spazfrag;-;The original Root of Evil, Bethsda, are at it again. Being the first to introduce Paid DLC with their "horse armor", now they, along with Valve, are bringing gaming to a new low for the sake of sucking more money from gamers. Shame on both companies. Mods ARE PART of the Skyrim experience. The appeal and experience of the game itself has been degraded by this disgusting practice. Shame on you.
Levy;-;YOU WERE THE CHOSEN ONE! I TRUSTED YOU! IT WAS SAID YOU WOULD DESTROY THE SHILLS, NOT JOIN THEM! BRING BALANCE TO THE MODS, NOT LEAD IT TO DARKNESS
haios_alumiren;-;Paid mods is unacceptable. I wonder how they're going to deal with all of the breaches in Fair Use for when these go commercial. Once you add money into the modding world, you open the door for both free and paid mods to get a DMCA-like takedown for potential loss of revenue from copyright holders. The copyright holders probably wont even need to show an interest in developing something, but their due diligence lawyers will make it up. This will only stifle the modding community's creativity and promote bland, sterile, mods made by soulless 'professional' modders.
Bunnyballs;-;Unhappy with the poor implementation of "paid" mods, could have been a great feature but ruined by its implimentation. Only 25% to the actual mod author? Really? This fiasco has made me seriously consider if I will bother with the next Elder Scrolls game.
Pain;-;Vanilla Skyrim: 7/10. Skyrim with mods: 11/10. Skyrim after paid mods: 0/10. Can't recommend the game anymore.
Prolix;-;Paid mods? HA This was a bad move. If there was an optional donation button rather than an author set minimum then I'd be fine with it. But the way it's set up now is not the way to do it.
ZDeztroyerz;-;mods are hidden behind pay wall now, modder only gets 25% of profit, if mod doesn't work then modder isn't required to fix would not recommend getting from steam
Shiny Charizard;-;Buy the positive review mod for $5
Tsundere Ubahootah;-;Hi everyone, this is my new mod! I call it, "negative review". It helps lower the rating of this game. This mod is available for free, but if you want the new, always updated version (called "positive review") then it's just one easy payment of $49.99! Yes, Bethesda. That means you.
Sabertooth;-;Valve and Bethesda are dipping there hands into the modding cookie jar, flashing their cash and then takeing the lions share and then saying they are supporting the modder. They aren't and with the way they are going about it they never will. No mod should ever have a paywall beacuse when you do that you are now only in it for the money.
Joshua;-;The game that single-handedly killed Valve
Sideways Jack;-;You don't own the mods, you don't get to make money from them. Paid for mods help no one but big business and kill enthusiasm for a product.
breedableGuy;-;Bad review because of paid mods.
stepperman;-;HELLO YOU NEED TO PAY WHAT YOU WANT TO SEE THIS REVIEW (that is of course starting from 9 euros to 99)
[SL]PureDeRpzz;-;Thanks for destroying this game valve. no free mods no fun :(
waflmlk;-;How about Bethesda pays the Mod creators for fixing their buggy mess of a game?
Wulfy;-;This game has been ruined by paid mods
Prez;-;I wont recommend this game now that steam are charging for MODS, I had fun with installing graphics mods and new armours and quest. That is what is so great about PC gaming, the FREEdom to alter and improve games over time. Mods have always been some what of a glimmer of hope in the sea of DAY 1 dlc and pre-order bonus crap that has started to flood the gaming industry. Modders are some of the most passionate and creative people in the PC gaming community, they share ideas, assets and tools with each other and improve on games we all enjoy. This move by steam will tarnish that image.
guru8bit;-;Skyrim is a very mediocre game built on a terrible engine. Now that you have to pay for mods it's straight up crap. That's it.
College_Downtime;-;With the hundreds of hours I've spent playing Skyrim, I can say it's well worth every penny but only if you mod the heck out of it. Those free mods changed Skyrim completely, transforming it into an incredible game...and that's no longer the case. Having a great Skyrim experience is tailored by mods, which is now DLC that costs money, and unless you have more money than you know what to do with, Skyrim simply isn't worth it's price tag anymore. Skyrim with mods is too expensive to justify the experience and Skyrim without mods isn't that great of a game. For that reason, I simply can't recommend this game anymore. Skyrim was a blast, but now all that's left is smoke.
whitewolf007;-;One must go to the Nexus now to avoid the paywall. Free the Mods!
Demure Beppe;-;Vanilla Skyrim: 7/10. Skyrim with mods: 11/10. Skyrim after paid mods: 0/10.
Exeon;-;The game is great and my hours played doesn't do it justice, however personally just like many other players the mods just make this game, and most of it's franchise, paying for mods? hahahahaha it's just going to get the workshop killed while everyone is just going to use http://www.nexusmods.com/skyrim/? for their mods, good job valve good job....
I'm the map!;-;1 week ago i would've said get it immediately but seeing bethesda and steam supporting paid mods is just disgusting! Edit: The paid mods are gone which is really nice, but i will let this review stay as a mark of their bad decisions.
One Shot No Kills;-;Reasonable game without mods. Has really bad UI, very dull slow and insistent storyline, and you just end up not really caring. The side missions are a hell of a lot more fun, I never bothered with the main quest. Pretty ish, but not that great. With mods, it becomes a whole new world. You can make it look so much better, add more realistic effects, add a random start so you don't have to sit through the dull and horrible cart scene, fix the UI, add tonnes of weapons and armour, you can even fix all the bugs. (Well, most of them. There's some ones Bethesda can't be bothered with that even modders can't fix.) However, this new paid mod scheme makes me very wary of it indeed. I mentioned the stock UI being bad. The mod to fix that, which is a core component of many mods, has just become paid only. (There's an older version on the Nexus, no longer being updated.) This is a worrying trend. Modding makes this game what it is, it's just standard otherwise. If you want it, mod it for free from the nexus or workshop, and I can kind of recommend it. But Oblivion and Fallout New Vegas are still very good alternatives for modding paradise. If it wasn't for this new introduction of paying for mods, I'd put it as a positive review. But the damage this could do to the modding community is too great. Especially Bethesda games, which often rely on modders to fix their broken games.
sepen;-;Aging game which is good, but not great, out-of-the-box. Only with mod-support it becomes something very special. However, game's creator is trying to shatter the hobbyist open modding community, and turning them on themselves in competitive division. Who'll be doing tutorials, when knowledge is a competitive, monetary advantage? So, don't support this corporate mayhem taking away from gaming as a whole.
seraphical;-;Bad mod support with the new pay for mods feature.
IVIisterChief;-;As much as do love this game, having mods be basically paid DLC is the biggest slap in the face to the PC community thus far. I won't support this at all, plus games and companies who follow in this backwards direction, this is not what PC gaming is about and it should never be.
Wheely Bug Som;-;Paid mods are bad.
omriattal;-;POSITIVES: +Soundtrack +Amazing Universe +Endless and varied possibilties +many many stuff to do and to discover +Deep customizations +Gameplay and gore +Voiced dialogues +Interesting side quests +World is detailed and unique +Extensive mod support NEGATIVES: -Basic story -Bugs -Sometimes doesn't make any sense -Your choices don't matter -Unclimactic ending -Dragons talk 2 words an hour ALL IN ALL: Came for epic story, stayed for the world. RPG benchmark 9/10.
Mr. Colpekker;-;I got this game 2 weeks ago help me
Ravencoar;-;I miss my family
Dufnil;-;Payed mods? Poor choice on you Bethesda and Valve.
Havoc;-;I would write a elaborate review for this product, but unfortunately 75% of it was taken.
Oldmanpotter;-;The biggest DLC scam on Steam now. Don't buy this crap.
invincible noodle;-;I am now blessed with buying an "extra apple" mod for multiple times more money than a real apple. Gotta get dem dollarydoos.
Advcatus Diabli;-;RIP Skyrim Valve and Bethesda have decided that money is more important then supporting PC gaming. Free mods were a huge selling point to Skyrim and made PC gaming attractive as a whole. Their choice to prioritize $$$ over a creative community of talented modders will have a far reaching backlash. I only hope this was not just preparation for implementing this system with Fallout 4. As to whether or not this is truly a review of Skyrim as a game, yes it is. Buying a game supports the authors and supports valve. This is information you should know if you're deciding to purchase, just as important as gameplay or graphics. And at this time this game is not worth supporting nor are the developers or valve.
Phoenix;-;I dissaprove of this for only one reason: Paid mods. It's disgusting how you think this is a way to 'support' you, blow it out your , Gaben!, This is the community where we buy your games, 24/7, Now you expect us to buy mods? Workshop is gonna die. Get greedier Valve, I dare you. Bethesda? I have nothing against you, your game is wonderful and perfect, Valve is ruining it.
Alleged Girl #7;-;I can only recommend this game heavily modded, and even then barely. Vanilla, this game an insult to Bethesda and the Elder Scrolls franchise. Grossly oversimplified trash, much like Fallout 3 when compared to it's far superior predecessors.
Spo1ler;-;Say no to games of the publisher that wants to use this awful system for payed mods.
Meme;-;I really do love this game, I logged 350 hours on my xbox and bought it on PC for mods. I would be putting a thumbs up here but Valve and Bethesda have done the unthinkable. They can now charge for mods. Mods are part of what makes PC gaming superior and now they are being treated as DLC or microtransactions, nobody likes these. This is damaging to the ethos of a PC gamer and is taking the platform in the direction of consoles or *shudder* mobile games. If Valve and Bethesda have any common sense they will stop this and focus on less damaging ways to make money, like releasing worthwhile games. (ie: Skyrim w/o paid mods). To conclude, Skyrim is amazing with and without mods, the paid mods are horrible and damaging. Be warned Valve, GoG and other DRM free retailers are going to get much more business soon.
DKERZA;-;The overwhelming negative reviews are painstakingly representing the enmity toward this PC Gaming platform's giant monopoly with which they think they can do whatever they want. The mods are the most important role of making this great game to be more greater, also relevantly it gets supported by the pure love of community to make them exist and develop. It is without a doubt, how fast Valve killed its reputation from god-like tier to  and greedy level.
T.V.;-;Dont buy this with the new paid for mods
Admiral Adderall;-;Valve turning into EA, bunch of greedy mofos... Go suck on Gaben's fat chode more, Bethesda.
Solid;-;Paid mods are a sign of worse things to come. We cannot stand for this. If you want to support the modders, don't give 75% of your money to the devs...
Darklurker;-;I would really, really love to be able to recommend this game to people. But as of recently, I just can't anymore. Those reasons being quite obvious, and many people already pointing out those reasons. By allowing the whole pay for mods instead of donating, they have essentially killed any kind of longevity that Skyrim had. By doing this, they have caused popular mods, one that fix problems with the game, and many, many more things that improve the game immensely, and keep them behind a paywall. The only way I'd recommend this game now, is if this all becomes an optional donation, or purely free instead. But until then, I cannot do so.
Joseph Frost;-;I loved this game. Every minute of it, from start to finish. I purchased this as soon as it came out, as well as the DLC when it came out. As a PS3 owner I was a little upset about the length of time it took to get all of the DLC, but I wasn't fazed in the slightest. I loved Dawnguard. I loved Heartfire. I loved Dragonborn the most. I didn't mind paying for quality content that fit in well with the lore and story. Now...I have to pay for mods? These aren't even canon. They don't complete the story. They don't add anything other than a new 'adventure' that means nothing to the rest of the Elder Scrolls games. I won't be playing TES: 6 and hear an NPC mention the dragonborn riding a bear whilst wielding a sword in each hand, one in his mouth and another clenched between his asscheeks. Seriously. 0/10, you betrayed me.
Will;-;A game way past its prime, kept alive only by a healthy modding community. Now Bethesda and Valve have decided to corrupt that community. The last saving grace for this game is gone. Do not buy.
Darklurker;-;I would really, really love to be able to recommend this game to people. But as of recently, I just can't anymore. Those reasons being quite obvious, and many people already pointing out those reasons. By allowing the whole pay for mods instead of donating, they have essentially killed any kind of longevity that Skyrim had. By doing this, they have caused popular mods, one that fix problems with the game, and many, many more things that improve the game immensely, and keep them behind a paywall. The only way I'd recommend this game now, is if this all becomes an optional donation, or purely free instead. But until then, I cannot do so.
Joseph Frost;-;I loved this game. Every minute of it, from start to finish. I purchased this as soon as it came out, as well as the DLC when it came out. As a PS3 owner I was a little upset about the length of time it took to get all of the DLC, but I wasn't fazed in the slightest. I loved Dawnguard. I loved Heartfire. I loved Dragonborn the most. I didn't mind paying for quality content that fit in well with the lore and story. Now...I have to pay for mods? These aren't even canon. They don't complete the story. They don't add anything other than a new 'adventure' that means nothing to the rest of the Elder Scrolls games. I won't be playing TES: 6 and hear an NPC mention the dragonborn riding a bear whilst wielding a sword in each hand, one in his mouth and another clenched between his asscheeks. Seriously. 0/10, you betrayed me.
Will;-;A game way past its prime, kept alive only by a healthy modding community. Now Bethesda and Valve have decided to corrupt that community. The last saving grace for this game is gone. Do not buy.
Reddy;-;Game is OK on it's own, better with mods. Modders need to do it for the love of the game, make what they enjoy and share it in the spirit of making fun games MORE fun, not turning a quick buck. I cannot in good faith support this game or ANYONE who is out to just make some cash modding for money's sake for this (or any) game. tl:dr. go play morrowind, get the mods while they're still free.
Fishbutt;-;Payed Mods
Latajj;-;Disgusted and betrayed.
Trel;-;With modifications to it, the Skyrim experience was an amazing one. It was a world with depth, magic, and mystery around every corner. Unfortuantely, the recent changes to mods have burned what was a great experience to the ground. It can't ever be what it used to be again. Vanilla Skyrim: 6/10
FinalAnswer;-;It's an alright game, too bad I'd have to pay money to make it an amazing one
Chemical_Ali;-;paid mods and any game that supports it, decades of PC gaming was built on modding communities. It extends the life of any game, and supporting that should be a company's #1 priority.
|ExT| Exo King;-;WTF is this crap why would you support Paid Mods which make this game FUN after you beat it LIKE WTF Valve
jbrah;-;paid mods ruined it all
Anemscol;-;I'm a huge Elder Scrolls fan. Morrowind was one of my first PC RPGs. When Skyrim was first annoucned, I was so excited. And when it finally came out, I poured hours upon hours upon hours into it. It's a great game and I gave it a positive review. But now it supports paid mods. And because of that, I can't keep my review positive.
Toasteddude;-;Paying for mods? Is this some kind of sick cruel joke? This decision makes Nintendo's decision to take ad revenue from YouTube streamers look smart. This game isn't worth playing without the mods.
thewatergamer;-;Skyrim is an amazing game I have poured hours into, so why a negative review? Well Valve has had the BRILLIANT idea to start locking mods behind a paywall, I understand mod creators need money but a donation system would have been acceptable, selling mods straight up is not, that and they are royally screwing modders over by pocketing 75% of the money the mods make so yeah  that practice
KuWanTum Binman;-;"Skyrim Workshop Now Supports Paid Mods" - The community doesn't
Panadol;-;workshop become pay4mod ? , go  your self
Faceless Rex;-;Paid mods is not the way to support the community / modders. Just another greedy money grab. Avoid this please.
Mr Automation;-;The game is fun, but until profitting attempts from the works of others stops, this will be a negative review.
Urtefyrsten;-;The game itself is utterly amazing - it is my all time favorite game, and before this  with paying for mods i couldn't praise it enough. Now, paying for mods is obscene - i have played this game for WELL over 2000 hours and i own the legendary edition on steam as well as on ps3 - after many an hour playing the game on ps3, the game had lost appeal to me - i didn't dislike the game, i just ran out of things to do. Then i bought a desktop PC, and i bought the game again JUST TO EXPERIENCE MODS - being that i already had done everything twice in vanilla skyrim, modding was essential to me, as it was the only thing keeping the game alive. And let me tell you, THE MODS MADE THE GAME SOOOO MUCH BETTER - the improved graphics, the new quests, better interfaces - you name it, and someone has probably already made it. The community for modding is amazing, people still work tirelessly trying to make the best damn game improvements, or, they are just expressing themselves through their mods, because they have a passion! This passion might as well be gone for some of these modders at this point! -People will now try and make (and probably half-) mods, just for the sake of making a quick buck! Modders havent been payed up till' this point, and it has worked great so far - DONT FIX WHAT AINT BROKEN. Please Valve, introduce a donation button, and let people decide for themselves if the authors work is worthy for a donation of a dollar or two. /rant over
IGotAShotgun;-;The game is a bit flawed, but mods fix that Too bad the mod community has been torn apart by greed. Get ready to pay extra to fix the game you paid for
Larry;-;Bethesda has dug its own grave by supporting paid modding support.
I Need Bombs;-;One of the main lures to Skyrim and PC gaming in general is Modding and the hours of endless modding that could happen. This could destroy that for all PC gamers in one swoop. I'm not saying modders should not be paid for their mods but the "paid" mods should be of some significance. like say adding 10 hours of quests or something along the lines of immersive armors. not an apple that costs 1$. Even if you think you are donating to the modder you really are not you are donating to valve being greedy (valve takes a 75% cut). This is just wrong, we were upset at nintendo for taking 40% of youtube content creators revenue and they expect this to be okay? the cut should be 10 maybe 20% for the ease of use that you can DONATE to the mod maker not buy the mod. Some may say that "well it's not all valve's fault it's bethesda too." and that is why i am giving this negative revew, if bethesda is behind this then they should be the ones who we dont buy games from. I will fight for PC gaming, I will not allow any greedy company to turn us into a console.
blairzhao111;-;No more word need to say!The most awesome and epic game ever,yep!
Mr.Roboto.exe;-;I had a life. Then I bought Skyrim. My life was gone. Everyone who is not a a mac or linux should buy this game and if you are on linux or mac you should go out and buy a gaming PC for the specific reason of playing this game on the best graphics settings with the HD texures mod.
BackingMyCrack;-;Beginning of the end for mods. Congratulations Valve and Bethesda.
Special Agent Bob (Thoraxe);-;This game was good but not anymore. I think I'll stick to Bread Simulator or some other game with higher standards.
Richard Head;-;Paid mods = boycott on future games
Joaquin;-;Paid mods =  experience for Skyrim/Steam. 0/10
SmokewiseGanja;-;Gotta say, I found it atrocious that Valve has brought in paid mods on the community workshop. This has done irreperable damage to the skyrim modding community which has kept the game afloat all these years. I hope you're happy with yourself. I will never buy a mod. You should all be ashamed. 1/10 Guys
[RO]RedBull108;-;Workshop is full of cheap looking mods done in 3 minutes and priced 2 times more expensive than the whole game. No reason at all to buy this game.
Realtione;-;-PAYING FOR MODS. A BRILLIANT IDEA. SERIOUSLY IT'S VERY GOOD INDEED. MORE MONEY, EASY WAY- I am not a big fan of TES Series or Skyrim game but I like Skyrim or other TES games btw. It was great game, still it is, DLC's are good indeed. They worth your money. So everything is ok... But why I writing negative review ? The point is mods. Skyrim is way to better with mods than original one. (I didn't say original skyrim is the worst without mods. It's beatiful but with mods, it's more beatiful. For example shader and graphic mods). -Free mods- . But payment for mods are . Skyrim or other games whatever. Mods aren't dlc. I don't give a  for valve. Ofc I want mod developers earn money. But Bethesda Software or anyone except developers... Nope. I hope mod devs gonna make FREE MODS for us. There is a lot of way to earn money. But please don't  workshop valve. I'm still supporting modders. I will keep support workshop creators. Espicially free ones. If you want support mod developers, go on. There is a lot of mod (and maybe they are great) for money. Paid and get the mod. But don't forget damn valve, other company or other things. I am serious. It will be worse. Cuz mods = dlcs. XXX set, XXX weapon, XXX item, XXX pack, XXX Character,potion blablabla for XXX dolar,euro etc. If some one gonna make naked mod for money just tell me. I can pay :p
niculbolas;-;The base game is great. The DLCs are all great. However, paid mods are the worst thing to happen to the PC gaming industry.
RSn|Animus;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is an epic fantasy RPG games where you can countless of hours in-game. You want to be an Archer? Grab a bow + heaps of arrows and start shooting people like a boss! You want to be a Swordsman? Wield or dual wield the countless amount of weapons in Skyrim and start slashing peoples! You want to be a Sneaky Basterd? Level up your One-handed, Sneaking, Speech, Lockpicking & Pickpocketing and you can be silent as f*ck killing people and grab their $$$ or talk your way through to get things go down your way! In this game, you imagine what you cannot achieve in real life. The world is massive, the mechanism is flawless and there's infinite amount of quest that you can do in this game. Of course there's bug here and there but in its way, this game is fun to play. Don't forget the amount of mods already available today. After 3 years of its release, this game is still living and mod is one of many reasons Skyrim still one of the most played game. I myself play this game with using mods that increase immersive such as RnD and I imagine being a Solo-Player like Kirito with Elucidator & Dark Repulser. Do what you want, be what you want. Welkommen to Skyrim!
Claus1978 (DK);-;Paid mods, all i need to say.
gotoel;-;Negative review because of paid mods.
Boaby Targaryen;-;Paid mods will ruin the modding community, not everything in this world has to be shelfed into a product.
[MTTB] FaZe HordS;-;I would love to recommend this game... but you know gabe would force 50$ out of me because apperently mods should cost. instead of a donation button we should pay 20$ for a mod that might not even work with another mod. DONT BUY THE GAME UNLESS YOU WANT TO PAY ANOTHER 3000$ ON MODS IN THE FUTURE
MrWelshLlama;-;If paid mods stay in existence, this game and any future ES games will not. Was once of the best.. Now being ruined by greed. I am really worried for the future :(
finbikkifin;-;Bethesda make ok games that require extensive fan support to be good, because they don't give a damn about their fans. Now they've worked out how to monetise their lack of giving-a-! This game is OK I guess, if you like bunnyhopping through cold landscapes picking flowers, but the combat remains terrible after how many games in the series because, again, they don't care enough to make it good. At least most of the quests function now. Hell, at least it's not the PS3 version, which just slowly ground to a halt after a dozen hours because they couldn't figure out how to make their full-priced game work.
Master Chef Gordon-117;-;This is my first review, so let me preface this with the following: Skyrim itself is an amazing game. There is currently no RPG like it besides earlier iterations in the Elder Scrolls series. That being said, I cannot recommend this game in good faith. I say this because modding is the largest reason why I have come back to Skyrim time and time again as I am sure it is the reason so many other people have come back again and again. I would venture as far as saying that mods are the only things that keep games alive so long after release, especially Skyrim. After a several month break, I was considering playing the game again with new mods recently, but upon my opening of Steam, I discovered this despicable and shallow update introduced by Valve, who I had once trusted so much, and Bethesda, who I knew was litigious, but I didn't know they were asses too. With the introduction of paid mods, I've stopped playing the game. In fact, I can't play the game. All of my save files no longer work because a few of the mods I used are locked behind a paywall which I refuse to break down because it is ridiculous that I have to do so in the first place. I was infuriated when I learned what Valve pays for the mods when they rake in profits. 25% to the modders when Valve just distributes the game? That's practically robbery. That's like taking 75% of a taxi driver's income because you built the car. Even more so that the Gestap... I mean Valve is now temp banning anyone who speaks out against this whole debacle on the forums. What's next? Paid patches? To be honest, I wouldn't entirely mind paying for mods if a few simple changes were made: 1) Fix quality control. Who wants to pay $99 for a pair of horse testicles? 2) Donations only. This is a basic feature, Nexus has it, it's much nicer and less intrusive/cash grabby. 3) Pay modders more. Pay modders more. Pay modders more. Do I need to say it again? Taking 75% of the cut is ridiculous, yeah, you need to keep the servers running, okay, that's fine. I'm sure you can do it with 15% or even 10% of the cut. 75%? Are you kidding me? Valve, this is a chance to regain the trust of you former loyal fanbase/consumer base. Learn from your mistakes and fix them.
xeric-oxter;-;This game supports paid mods, I do not.
Jeremy Clarkson;-;This was a 10/10 game for me. I remember being excited for MONTHS before this was released. I was so excited to launch this on release day and play it for a week straight. Now it's just been kind of ruined for me with this paid mods stuff.. Paid mods is just a stupid idea to begin with, but what makes it worse is that the developer and valve get most of the profit off this .. seriously? Valve and Bethesda are some of the last GOOD game developers these days. I am really disappointed in them. TL:DR 0/10 for Valve/Bethesda for paid mod .
Cvan;-;value and bethesda you two sucks why i need to pay for mods? did you forget thats developed by players? and the mod developers only get 25% profit bethesda have not even fix all the bugs and ctd's problem you want me to pay for mods and you gain other 75% profit? !Y!O!U!
SmarterChild;-;LET ME JUST GO PAY FOR SOME OF THESE MODS AND WHILE I'M AT IT, I COULD MAYBE I COULD WIPE THE DUST OFF MY FIRST GENERATION XBOX 360 AND PAY MICROSOFT 50 DOLLARS A YEAR TO GET IT CONNECTED TO MY INTERNET. AFTER THAT, I THINK I'M GOING TO DEFINITELY BUY EVERY SINGLE NEWLY RELEASED EA AND UBISOFT TITLE I CAN FIND. AND ONLY AFTER THIS, I WILL HAVE HOPEFULLY FORGOTTEN MY OLD LIFE AS PART OF THE MASTERRACE AND DEVOLVE INTO A FILTHY CASUAL.
Freebird;-;I used to love this game. Now Bethesda and Valve are trying to cash-in on mods. I will not support that in any way. Especially since mods are essential because there are so many flaws and bugs in the game.
King Abdul;-;Paywall added destroying the modding community.
Africans In the French Capital;-;The game is good, but the paid mods scam is definitely not.
[BKG]Sanny;-;This really was one of the greats of PC gaming. But after 4 years, Valve + Bethesda decided to tarnish its reputation by supporting "paid-for" modfications to the game. Even though this idea seems nice, note that only 25% goes to the Modder, and this is a great way for the developers to continue making money from this game. Absolutely unacceptable and outrageous, this will spread to other games, if we do not stop this now. Why I reviewed negatively is due to the reason above and that all my mods (that I have had for years) are now currently locked unless I pay for them, when they were free beforehand. If this continues this is my last Bethesda game.
Jake N Bake;-;eat a bag of  valve. why dont you like, you know, make some new games or something. this is bs. dont you still have a franchise to finish?  you . i will be doing everything i can to avoid using steam from this moment on. you have really ed up on this move. the person who approved this will be looking for work by the end of next week. idiots. way to go. everybody hates you now. hope it was worth the $1000 you probably got vs billions for half life 3
CombustableLemons| Free SFMs;-;I would not recommend buying this game while paid mods are still a thing. One of the main reasons to get this game is mods, and that's being killed off.
Avekks;-;i looked at a flower and it was low res, also paid mods are
Stanima;-;Stop trying to ruin PC Modding, a donation link is fine but putting mods behind a paywall is just plain stupid. Can't believe that there will be a day when i really despise Valve, sadly the day has come. Stop trying to monetize everying!!!
Eupho Rick;-;Paying for mods? What the
Retro_Reactive_;-;Why would i want to buy mods valve?!
Obi-Onebonobo;-;Dont buy it, Valve & Bethesda have screwed over the community with Paid Mods. They have put massive rifts in the Modding community. Do not give them a cent for it.
Jolly Old Saint Nick;-;free mods are what made this game so brilliant
Jakeoc2;-;Paid mods? Lol this is what they will do to the reputation of your game. Devs, don't allow it.
MadAzz;-;The developers and valve can go flirk themselves. People we warned about F2P being a cancer, what with charging for everything they possibly could. Now we are getting charged for mods that were once created and shared amongst the community. People would work on and contribute to others work. All valve has done here is monetize mods at the expensive of innovation. Valve and Bethesda are now categorically against innovation. While they do not force the modders to charge for their content, they do push towards it. They want to slowly introduce this as the norm. Don't be naive into thinking it stops here.
RZA;-;Great game, greedy publisher, mods (at least for the moment) behind a paywall. Do not buy until fixed.
Deustchershark;-;I bought all the DLC, now I have to buy Mods? Here are the reasons that is absolutely stupid: 1. Mods dont have to work with other mods 2. Returning a mod gives me a 7 day market ban (Really Valve?) 3. Shadow Bans 4. Modders dont have to continue support for mods 5. Game Updates Break Mods 6. Paying for mods in General 7. Modders go into modding NOT EXPECTING PROFIT 8. Gabe Newell & Bethesda & Modders blaming each other 9. Modders can steal content from each other 10. I LOSE MORE MONEY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Crusty Bot;-;Encouraging modders to hide their content behind a paywall in an effort to line Valve and Bethesda's pockets with more money is a poor move. Having few little oversight and accountability on top of that is just disastrous. Very little thought has gone into safeguarding the consumer in the case of buggy mods or people wishing to exploit the system. It's a transparent cash grab that sets a disturbing precedent for the industry. I can't support a game that has these kinds of practices.
MoOnKat;-;Making mods dlc? No thank you. I'll get my mods elsewhere. Just make a donation button
FLOGGER;-;It really bothers me to see 12,000+ negative reviews about the game solely due to the workshop. The review is supposed to be about the GAME not about the Workshop. Yes, it was a cheap way for Steam to get money, and yes it was very angering, but in NO WAY does that make this game bad. The authors of the review even end the review saying that the game is great but give it a negative review due to the workshop war of 2015. IT IS AN AMAZING GAME
GoLd_Jake -XIV-;-;,    .      ,      . ,        ,       .          .  , ,      .       .     ,     ,          (       TES) .            ,     .       -    .        ,        ,    ,    ,   .    .      ,   .      ,   ,     .        ,    .    ,           .         ,         .        ,         .     ,     ,       . , , ,   ,  .           ,       .         . : + .        . + ,  . + . +    . +    .      . +   . + . + . +  . +-,        . 10 /10.
Provaporous;-;whats next paid for early access mods?
Toast;-;I bought this game on PC after over 250 hours on 360 SOLELY for mods. And now Valve and Bethesda are trying to put mods behind an abritrary paywall. This is a decision that has outraged and disappointed myself and many other gamers. This negative review is in response to Bethesda's business practice, not to the quality of their base game. Should they see the impact this decision has had on their reputation and revert things back to normal, I will reevaluate my review. Until then, fight for mods to be free and let the big companies know that we aren't okay with this.
Kelguroth;-;Do I really need to say anything about paid workshop mods? Shame on the devs, shame on Valve and shame on the modders who pulled their mods and put them behind a paywall.
atlassys8;-;Bethesda is no longer the hero who makes genuine heroic RPGs.
Sheepocalypse;-;Remove paid mods. It is a terrible idea. Already users are submitting MODS THEY DIDN'T MAKE FOR MONEY. People are stealing assets in their mods. Modders are making 'exclusive' versions of their mods (see Wet and Cold 2.0) that must be paid for and depriving long time fans of their work the update. Do not buy ANY paid mods. It can only go badly.
Foilet;-;[Outdated rant, go upvote someone else's review.] ____________________________________________________ Introducing the new Steam Work$hop Steal mod resources. Tweak it a little. Slap a price tag. Profit! God I really want to kiss whoever at valve/bethesda who came with this idea...WITH MY BOOTS! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iq87efgyRuU
R-tan;-;Skyrim's not a terrible game after you've modded it to high hell. And now they want to stop that and force you to pay for those sweet mods. Wouldn't you want to pay $50 for a HD horse ?
Dmnd;-;Paid mods are an end to good mods, This is what made the game great, now this move is what will kill future games from being great. I will not buy your products again. This was a very poor move done to earn a bit more $. A lot of Modders don't benefit from this(Ohhh a whole 25% for makeing content that makes your game better) because many mods are being stolen and sold by scum/"businessman"(As you are). Steam has claimed they will do nothing about this unless they legaly have to ( This means the Original modder gets a lawyer and files Cease and desist on each of the claims, this will not happen because its not worth it 99% of the time).Steam has said that the community will police this... in otherwords we don't care ( As shown by greenlight) You are killing the mod community and the pc community with your actions. Hope your next games flop.
GovernorAri;-;For a game that relies heavily on mods to be enjoyable and is often bought ONLY for mods Bethesda had a lot of balls to sell out to 3-rd Party DLC/Microtransactions/Mods. We trusted Bethesda, we saw them as one of the 'good companies', whatever that means anymore. They showed us what happens to people who trust blindly. Even worse, Valve. Valve had the biggest fanbase of any company of them all, everyone praised GabeN and called him the savior of PC gaming, our god. See where our blind faith has led us, to betrayal. And don't think that this only applies to Skyrim, for in time this will spread to other games and corrupt them with its greed. We have to stop Paid 3rd party DLCs (They dont' deserve to be called mods) before they spread, before the gaming industry thinks its okay, and before it taints other beloved games.
tremjah;-;Used to be fantastic before Bethesda decided to take a crap on the mod community. No longer reccomended.
Notorious G-A-BE;-;Taking money from the community with no guarantee with stability and keeping 75% away from the creators? #onlyBethesda MAYBE 4 hours of main story gameplay. I beat this game overnight on the day of release... I was so confused. Was that it, was there REALLY nothing more to the game than that? Yes. Sure, there are numerous sidequests I did not complete but most of them are nothing more than reskinned fetch quests... For the size of the world the horses are painfulyl slow and thus i found myself quicktraveling nearly EVERYWHERE. Without mods I MIGHT have 7 hours TOTAL logged in the game.
Doktor Low;-;No, Thank you.
Jake From State Farm;-;Cannot recommend with paid mods and now will not recommend Steam to anyone. Hell, even Origin doesn't have this crap.
YOLOSWAG4KONY;-;The game itself is great but not as well fleshed out. The modding scene is essential if you want your game to perform and look fantastic. Due to published mods now being monetized, I'd prefer voluntary donations, I'm not recommending this game at all.
The ILLest;-;This negative review is prompted by Valve's new practice of selling mods and passing it off as a courtesy to the mod creators, all the while taking the lion's share of the profits.
gogoman64;-;Have had this game b4 u bought it on steam, WAs thumps up, But then the paid mods attackeed
Frog;-;Great game really fun with mods, but you need to buy them now so I don't recommend.
|TAW| Humans are Weak;-;Paying for mods? not with me!! not recommended as mods are a vital part of this game
JWonderpig;-;0/10 Pay for mods? No thanks.
meh_expectations;-;Good game but this paid mod thing needs to go.
Tauriel;-;Paying for mods has ruined it for me. i will not keep paying to play the game just to make an OLD game interesting again. i intend on paying for a game ONCE , and be done with it. If it needs payed mods to be good then the games not worth my time and money.
Barry Chuckle;-;Pay for mods, thumbs down :(
Skalatsosse;-;The devs want to profit off a third party that made their game playable and enjoyable for free instead of paying them. They're just using them as badly paid pseudo-employees now
Lak;-;Mods behind a paywall is just wrong. A donation button would work much better.
Shaun;-;Valve ruined this game for me.
FLAKEZ nu p Irland!;-;As part of the revolution against paid DLCs new offspring "Paid mods", I hereby place this review and condemn the decisions taken by Valve/Bethesda to enable "Paid mods" in the Steam Workshop. If this negative trend is allowed to continue (see DLCs, compare today and 5-10 years ago), we might just end up buying PARTS of an original game soon. Corporates stashing/delaying content to push them out later as DLCs. Good grief.
Infinity_Rasta^DK;-;Paid Mods? seroiusly wtf? boycutted the store last year cause of other reason. This might be the final nail in the coffin for valve. 10 year old account here, 328+ games, I don't say I know what I'm talking about, but I know what I'm talking about.
MegasEvo;-;You install Skyrim for an epic adventure, only to find it incredibly shallow and repetitive a couple hours in. You then decide to mod the game, make it pretty, add new quests, new systems, immersion mods, etc. Then after you've added a gigs worth, you realize that no amount of mods will make this game better. You uninstall, forget, and repeat the process 6 months later. Except now you feed Gaben and buy your mods with your steamshekel funbux. Why, Valve.
Maqna;-;Dont bother anymore. We pay for mod's now!
J0kull;-;Great game, I do recommend it. But the latest news have shattered my thoughts on Bethesda and Valve, paying for mods is silly and you shouldn't support this anymore. I guess it's time for me to play Oblivion again.
Vadga;-;Pay for mods is something that EA would come up with, just pure evil. Greed is a terrible thing for the consumer.
meh_expectations;-;Good game but this paid mod thing needs to go.
Tauriel;-;Paying for mods has ruined it for me. i will not keep paying to play the game just to make an OLD game interesting again. i intend on paying for a game ONCE , and be done with it. If it needs payed mods to be good then the games not worth my time and money.
Barry Chuckle;-;Pay for mods, thumbs down :(
Skalatsosse;-;The devs want to profit off a third party that made their game playable and enjoyable for free instead of paying them. They're just using them as badly paid pseudo-employees now
Lak;-;Mods behind a paywall is just wrong. A donation button would work much better.
Shaun;-;Valve ruined this game for me.
FLAKEZ nu p Irland!;-;As part of the revolution against paid DLCs new offspring "Paid mods", I hereby place this review and condemn the decisions taken by Valve/Bethesda to enable "Paid mods" in the Steam Workshop. If this negative trend is allowed to continue (see DLCs, compare today and 5-10 years ago), we might just end up buying PARTS of an original game soon. Corporates stashing/delaying content to push them out later as DLCs. Good grief.
duhsveti;-;I hope your mother monetizes your cakes and coffe next time you come and visit her.
Seyton;-;Modding was the last bastion of decency in gaming and Valve and Bethesda killed it in a day. I think its time I found a new hobby.
TigarusMaximus;-;I've played this game ever since it came out on multiple platforms, moving over to PC I expected an experience free from the greed of XBOX and Playstation. This game has now changed and is no different.
Boromir;-;This game used to be good, then bethsda and valve circle jekred hard enough to ruin it with paid mods, and give unfair cuts to the mod creators while take t most of the profit forthemselves. Don't buy this game or any other future bethesda game untill they resolve this.
Shorty;-;The game is awesome! The paywall isn't. >.<
Radeon R9 Fury X;-;Valve and Bethesda have released paid mods. Nuff said.
B0ak;-;This game is great. I love everything about is.... except your new "Paid workshop mods" This idea is absolutely terrible. I am not going to pay to mod the game. Modding was one of the best things about this game and has been for the longest time. By taking the ability for us to get these mods for free, you have lost my respect as well as the respect of others. There are way too many of us who do not want this change and we think you should not be forcing this upon us. Congrats Valve, you took something great and turned it into something that can be milked for money. IT IS ELDER SCROLLS ONLINE ALL OVER AGAIN! I don't know how long it is going to take you to learn that shaking down the consumer for money is THE WORST POSSIBLE THING YOU COULD DO. This is one of the many things that killed the Elder Scrolls Online. You are moving in the same direction right now. Turn back.
3kliksphilip;-;Before Skyrim, there was Oblivion. It was flawed, unbalanced, dated and had DLC for horse-armour, and yet it was still loved because despite these things, it was still one of the best games of this genre. Skyrim is Oblivion but without the bad bits. I still don't understand why there aren't more games like this. You are let loose in a massive open world and are allowed to do what ever you want. The closest games to it would be MMOs or Grand Theft Auto, but Skyrim is a single-player experience. You'd think that this would make it lifeless and unrewarding, but you couldn't be more wrong. The entire world is lovingly hand-crafted. Every character you see had to be placed there. They had their face, personality and clothing picked by a developer of this game... and then you're free to come along and end their life with one slash of a blade. Or not. The choice is yours. I didn't expect much from this game. I had kind of seen through Oblivion and it became lifeless for me, and I thought that since this was constrained by the same hardware that it wouldn't be a large leap, but I was so wrong. I couldn't wait to explore every crag and valley simply for the sake of it, accompanied by the amazing LOTR-style soundtrack. I happily gobbled up the quests and have had countless exciting memories of this game where I've accidentally picked a fight with some one bigger than me, or where the game glitches out spectacularly. What ever happens, it's a joy to behold. Even if you're not a fan of this sort of genre (come on, who isn't? The Elder Scrolls games are a genre in their own right!) you need to play this game. Get it when it's cheap and you'll more than get your money's worth, even if you only play a fraction of what there is to see and do. You can live a virtual life as a fisherman, merchant or fighter and unlike the older games which required a bit of imagination to pull off, this one has the depth and complexity required to make it enjoyable. The down-sides? The dragons are too easy to defeat, though this game has since been patched to include harder ones. You'll hate it when somebody dies through no fault of your own (damn you, radiant AI!) and you're left with an empty shop where you once purchased your stuff. You'll end up with far too much in your inventory as you plunder tombs and your companions become more of a burden than a help as you level up, transforming into mules to carry your rubbish as you battle against the undead. But really, who is going to be reading this review without an idea of what this game is like? Who hasn't seen the thousands of mods available for free for this game? They make the vanilla 100's of hours of gameplay turn into 1000's. You'll have no life for weeks after picking this game up! In short: buy this game.
Avere;-;Let me start off by saying this game is fanstastic one of my favourite games of all time ! so you may ask why is it your favourite game of all time? because their are a alot of things you can do in this game like modding the mod community for this game is freaking amazing one of the best mod communities for the TES series the mods in this game blow you away visual wise and immersive/gameplay wise there are so many mods to get if you play as a female character you got alot of choices like sexy armours/body types/hair mods/texture mods and so on so fourth with immersive you have gameplay changes like combat enhancements or prespective mods to make it like you are really in the world of skyrim, the map is super huge almost compareable to GTA V but a little bit smaller there are alot of quests to do in the world of skyrim and alot of interesting NPC's so let me talk about visuals well their are high res texture packs 1k/2k/4k textures to choose from but i prefer 1k/2k to keep a stable FPS and to stop your game from crashing also there are alot of ENB's to choose from to enhance your colors to make em more vibrant and dramatic and to enchance the lighting to make the game looks extremely better than vanilla i like to think of skyrim like a next-gen game with all these mods you can get cause it truely is a next gen experience over the vanilla game that's just ugly and messy, so if you are gonna play the vanilla game just play it on a console like really if you play the PC version why not get some mods to enhance your experience even further ! SO MANY CONTENT ARGHHH MIND BLOWING !!! i hope this review sums it all up for you to purchase the game also i do not recommend the Steam workshop for mods, i recommend the skyrim NEXUS ! go now, BUY IT !, Also on a side note the vanilla game is great if you want a lore friendly game but it is recommended to get mods, don't hate on this review cause i am pointing to mods all this time i clearly stated if you want vanilla than play console you get the PC version for a better experience, and well for mods later on but i recommend playing through the game atleast once with the vanilla game and than after than expand your experience ever further sorry if i am just talking about mods all the time..
Godd Howard;-;Gameplay: 9/10 The gameplay or combat is not perfect as the game can take a turn towards the easier side of things when you start leveling up but that can be easily countered by increasing the difficulty. AI are smart as difficulty goes up but it's good enough on normal difficulty for it to be fun. The skills system is extremely modular and can go which ever way you want making it the ultimate RPG game. There is an infinite number of quests that are randomly generated but the normal game content of quests is enough to keep you going for a few hundred hours. UI and menu and items from loot to smithing to alchemy are all well done and can be changed or improved on by mods. Graphics 8/10 The base vanilla game has some pretty low textures in comparison to some next-gen games and the colour filter of the game is really grey and boring but can be changed yet again with the help of mods. With mods, the graphics get changed to 10/10, sometimes even competing with next-gen games and look even better. Audio/Music 10/10 The voice acting in this game is superb even if you can hear the same voice actor over and over. All dialogue is voiced and most NPCs have interesting back stories or lines of dialogue. You won't start hearing dialogue appear over and over until you've played the game for a couple of hours but it doesn't at all take away from the immersion of the game. The music is fantastic and one of the best video game soundtracks I've heard. Jeremy Soule does an amazing job as usual creating a tone and setting for the world of Skyirm. The game sounds from the world are really well done. From the sounds of fire burning away at corpses to the cries of the wolves or bears. The ambience of travelling through the forests to the blowing winds of the snow peaked mountains to the ambience of dungeons and the soothing relaxing tone of the taverns, Skyrim makes no mistakes when it comes to immersing you into the game world through music and audio. Content/Replayability 10/10 The amount of content this game has is far beyond any other game I've ever played. With only 2 large DLCs being Dawnguard and Dragonborn, it still manages to have content of which I've never seen before. This game's size in terms of content could match even that of large scale MMO titles and is not as repetitive as those games due to the fact you can play this game however you want. Skyrim is the game that'll define a genre of RPG games and Bethesda has not compromised much in terms of content in the game. Overall 9.5/10 No game is ever perfect but The Elder Scrolls Skyrim comes close to being one of the best games over made in my opinion. The sheer amount of work put into this extremely immersive world is beyond that of any RPG I've ever played. Though after a few hundred hours, the vanilla game may feel dry to some gamers like myself but due to the fact that Skyrim houses hundreds and thousands of mods just makes the experienece even better.
J7 Gaming;-;It's the moment that has always defined the Elder Scrolls series. That palpable feeling of freedom and adventure as you gaze across a vast, beautiful landscape. Skyrim is not a great leap from Oblivion, or even Morrowind, but it is the finest chapter in the series to date: an unforgettable journey into another world. When you start Skyrim, the only things you get to choose are your race, sex and appearance. The editor is fantastic, frankly, with a wealth of sliders and presets. Each race - of which there are ten - has its own special ability, which includes passive effects that are always active, and spells you can use once a day. Nords, for example, have 50% frost resistance and a Battle Cry ability that makes enemies flee in terror, while Argonians can breathe underwater and cast Histskin to rapidly regenerate their health. Still, besides these initial bonuses, how your character develops depends entirely on how you play the game. Say you use greatswords a lot in combat; this will see your two-handed weapon stats improve every time you strike an enemy. Or maybe you prefer to keep your distance and use bows; every arrow that hits its target will improve your archery stats. It's, of course, still possible to avoid traditional combat altogether, sneaking through an area undetected, silently killing enemies without alerting their allies. The stealth isn't much better than it was in Oblivion, with twitchy AI that becomes aggressive way too easily, but it gets better when your archery and sneaking skills increase, and you find enchanted equipment, like boots that muffle your footsteps. If Oblivion's world was green and colourful, and straight out of a Tolkien novel, Skyrim's fantasy is much more hard-edged, drawing inspiration from Norse mythology to create a world that's both stunningly beautiful and incredibly convincing. At all times, it feels like a real place, with a real history. It's a snow-blasted land of icy peaks, boggy marshes, leafy forests and barren tundra, and it's a joy to explore. Tiny details play into the believability of your surroundings too, like the way the weather changes depending on your elevation. In the lush, forested valley to the southeast, a thick fog hangs in the air and it's almost always raining. As you head north, snow appears on the trees and the wind begins to howl. Then as you get higher, climbing one of Skyrim's many mountain ranges, a heavy blizzard rolls in, obscuring the path ahead. When night falls, the sky is illuminated by Skyrim's equivalent of the Northern lights.Thank you for reading my whole review or just scrolling all the way to the bottem. Remeber to give a thumbs up and play Skyrim!
Roos Skywalker;-;You think this is a cool game and worth playing? The pirated version is outdated and haves nearly no mod support, just like you will encounter by buying this game legitimately. Because now Bethesda and Valve decided to make you PAY for mods. The funniest thing about the mods is that you pay 5 for rain droplets whereas Bethesda released an entire DLC for the same price. Seriously, do not buy the game until this gets resolved. You know the best part? The modder receives only 25% of the money. Ow hell yes, you heard me. You are not even fully supporting the author.
xCRAZYALFIEx;-;paying for mods is a joke, mods make this game better without mods the game is boring
Coat;-;If you haven't played this game or oblivion you aren't a man
Wanako;-;November 11, 2011 - Started playing *time lapse* December 11, 2014 - "It should be a nice game" they said. "It's content filled so it should take you about 90 hours to complete!" they sAiD... I'VE COMPLETELY LOST CONTROL OF MY LIFE!!!
Tecinavah;-;So this is like my favorite game and i saw today a new update had arrived... PAY FOR MODS WHAT THE FU*CK VALVE !?
Rupok;-;I bought skyrim at launch. After valve's and bethesda's decision to turn mods into paid dlc (without the qc or any gurantee they will work) this is the review I will give. Them taking 75% of the money is disgusting. I will NEVER buy a bethesda game egain and will move as further as possible from steam as I can. Your games are bad anyways bethesda, half the game is done by modders, and I expect next time you will release a .txt file that you want modders to fix. You people started the horse armor dlc and the insane dlc crapshow we have today in the industry and now you came for the mods to do the same thing. Hope you like that grave you dug.
Krazzy;-;This negative review is prompted by Valve's new practice of selling mods and passing it off as a courtesy to the mod creators, all the while taking the lion's share of the profits. Want to really support mod creators? Remove this atrocity of a paywall and add way of donating to the authors directly
I has a bucket;-;Minor DLC packs were a disease we inherited from consoles. We're now stuck with them because people couldn't exercise enough self-control not to spend their money on obvious cash grabs. Don't let cash grab mods gain the same foothold! Edit: Valve retracted the paid mods. But this won't be the last we see of them. This review is staying negative as a reminder of this cash grab.
Galaxy Kid;-;Ay lmao lets make a game kept alive by mods cost money for mods, thats a great plan.
LegendaryZ;-;Paying modders' hard work is good and I support that, every content creator should be able to live well and pay their bills. But I think it is ridiculous that valve and bethesda are taking 75% of the revenue, plus not all modders are honest, this is going to ruin modding for everyone involved.
DataCap;-;It went in a totaly wrong direction...good going Valve.
Get daMUNI;-;shove your paid mods up your
hemorrhagic_shenanigans;-;I have been a fan of Bethesda games for a long time, and Skyrim was truly a masterpiece, arguably the best game ever made by the company. I played for almost a thousand hours on the console version and I have clocked quite a lot on PC too. Modding made this game infinitley better. Modding is why i spent money on a game I had aldready beat on a different console. Modding is what made me decide to start playing on steam rather than a console. Modding is what is going to be the downfall of a once perfect game. Skyrim is one of my favorite games and it will always be, but the new paid mods feature is honestly nothing more than Valve trying to turn what was a hobby for people and something we all enjoyed for free into money making scheme under the ruse that it is for the modders' hard work. Nexus has a donate button, why couldn't they just make one for the workshop? Because this is not about the modders getting paid for something that is expected to be free. When the modders are making more money from their hard work instead of Valve, then maybe just maybe I will reconsider my thoughts, but until then I am going not reccomend this game to anyone who has not already purchased it (if there are any) and go get a buggy console version of the game because unless this policy changes, its only downhill from here.
Zmeister;-;Today, Valve takes away your mods. But what of tomorrow? Do they take your homes? Your businesses? Your children? Your very lives? And what does GabeN do? Nothing! Nay, worse than nothing! GabeN's greed enforces the purchase of our mods! Against his own people! So rise up! Rise up, children of the Master Race! Rise up, PC Gamers! Embrace the word of the mighty Nexus Mods, he who is both free and Divine! For we are the children of man! And we shall inherit both the heavens and the earth! And we, not Valve or their toadies, will rule Skyrim! Forever!
sRazor91;-;Paid mods will be the death of this series.
NekoMode;-;With the addition of paid mods I can no longer in good faith recommend this game anymore. They are a legal, ethical, and creative disaster that benefits no one beyond Brethesda & Valve. With the conversion of many popular mods to this paid model, including SkyUI which many other mods are dependent on all this does is split the community in the name of personal and corporate greed. Would not recommend, will not buy another Brethesda game again.
JohnBob;-;paid mods is bad
Minccino;-;Because of steams horrendous decision to allow paid for mods on the steam workshop i cannot and will not suggest anyone buy this game if they are into modding and wait and see if the nexus will survive. i hope this move by steam fails
il Bruno;-;The downfall has begun... The game is great with mods but without? Not so much. Pay for mods? No, thank you
MrAnttii;-;Valve has ruined this game with microtransaction-esque paid mods. I suggest you don't buy this game until this ends. If it doesn't end, don't give them money.
ElderScrolls;-;Elder Scrolls games have always depended on Mods to reach their full potential. I remember fondly comparing mod totals in Morrowind, and struggling to keep the game engine from crashing with hundreds of mods working together. The mod community has always been something that went part and parcel with the games themselves. Even I have designed mods for Oblivion and Morrowind, and it was great fun to be a part of it. Skyrim lacks this free and open access to modding. Which is a shame. Because without free and open access the game suffers substantially. In addition to graphical and error improvements, there were literally thousands of small tweaks you could enjoy with Elder Scrolls that do not continue in the same way for Skyrim. Shame on Bethesda for damaging a successful IP in this way. It's simply a fact that without free and open mods Skyrim truly IS NOT a great game worth recommending. Choosing to divide the pay wall structure this way results in an inferior product.
Sasha93;-;Monetizing mods is an all new low.
RoMof;-;Paid mods should not be a thing.
Nyx;-;I have over 1k hours for this game. It's a game that you MUST play with mods. Without mods the game is honestly boring and lifeless. Do not buy this game, it includes no mods and mods are a separate purchase. Thank you Valve and Bethesda for ruining the mod community and my love for the most played game on my steam library.
Mix Master Mao;-;I cannot in good faith recommend this game with the current state of paid mods. This is an outrage and no one should buy this game in its current state.
JellyTee;-;screw paid mods
cookieman;-;Following the bandwagon on this negative review, paying for my current experience when it was a gesture of good faith is not a good idea.
Bakernatorz;-;charging money for mods is greedy and disgusting, especially when you only give those creators 25% of the cut, oy vey gabe you running out of shekels or something
Lzy Gamer;-;step 1: buy it step 2: play it step 3: love it step 4: mod it step 5: crash it step 6: fix it step 7: repeat after step 3.
THE CBS;-;Valve and Bathesda's new paid mod system undermines the very foundation of PC community and PC modding. I strongly suggest that you do not buy this game. Doing so would be supporting corporations who want to squeze every dollar out of their customers as they can without any regard to the PC community that has proudly loved them for over a decade.
The shopkeeper;-;Well, after 120 hours of gameplay it's time for me to write a review of this game: what should I start with? There's too much in this game! Skyrim is full of things to do, dungeon to explore, quests, ways to play, classes and weapons! There's so much to do and you will always want to do something and forget to do something else. Epic battles, addictive gameplay, good storyline and a big free roam world to explore. I'll try to explain myself with one single word; Epicness! I recommend a lot this game if you want an RPG which mixes exploration, battles and much more stuff. Unfortunately, there are some problems: for a game of such hugeness there are lots of bugs. Not so bad, they won't ruin the gameplay, but sometimes they are really annoying. My own vote: 8,5/10
Baby Spice;-;What can you say about Elder Scrolls series ? It's more popular than a picture of Jesus holding a pug with a bowtie, and rightfully so. Most of the series issues are countered by the fact that talented, sometimes downright disturbingly obsessive modding community probably modded them out and Skyrim is no exception. Even if you sink more than hundered hours in vanilla version, you can still find something you haven't done and want to do. Want to spend all your time force-pushing chickens around town ? Sure ! Wanna put buckets over NPCs faces while they're delivering important pieces of exposition ? You got it ! While I'm usually opposed to "make your own fun" kind of games, doing your own thing is bread and butter of Skyrim, and that's what makes it so popular. Yeah, it may be a bit more simplified (for the sake of accessibility) than older TES games and maybe enviroments and combat get a bit boring and repetitive after a while, but it all falls flat when you can summon 5000 wheels of cheese and roll them down the mountain on unsuspecting goats.
Lucario;-;paying for mods is unacceptable.
PlayingShifty Za Kink Turtle;-;It is a great game but the OP mods and the over priced mods ruin it..
matarjack;-;I've never had any problems with Steam nor Skyrim, and never really had anything to say about any game really, but this Workshop paid mods are awful, I'm writing this review because I don't want paid mods! I don't recomend this game anymore for anyone, if you have a PC nowadays you're fuc*ed, basicly the best of PC is doing what you want and having this "freedom" to mod your games, change settings, etc... If you don't want to see my entire review of the game, I think these few lines are wort, but from now on, I'll just say everything wrong I see with paid mods, in EVERY game. So basicly I'll say Skyrim is a broken game(wuuuut you say), yes, I have a good PC, and I can play games like GTA V with high settings, LoL and DotA on ultra with more than 100 fps, and other games(I just said that 3 so you know how my PC handles some good/great graphics games and intense in other ways). and Skyrim basicly forces you to play under 64 fps, and everyone who have a monitor with more than 60hz(most commom are 75hz and 120hz) knows that you'll have some problems with the game without any MODfication; other than that aspect, Skyrim have visible lags when it shouldn't have, like, you're in a inn, and have a lag(wuut?), or you're walking and have some serious stuttering issues! The game is made for a slow PC, or, a CONSOLE! So, basicly, you're paying money for a game that was made for a console, but you have a PC, and you know Skyrim is great(not that much, without mods...) because your friends said so, or you saw some gameplays and stuff, and you want to unbreak this broken game. Now you have this amazing thing called "mod", and you have a freaking awesome community that makes mods for everything, really, there is a mod(a great one by the way) that makes your sneak atack sound change to "SURPRISE MUTHAFUC*A!", and other mods that change skins, game textures, add sounds, relight the ENTIRE FUC*ING GAME, and more! So, why I think mods shouldn't be paid? Now is the real deal, when a guy spend 100h+ making a mod, or 1h, or even 1minute, he knew that it wasn't for money, he made the mod because he's a great person, and want to change the game for better! He knew that most people don't even know his name and never will, because a commom person just want the mod, and that's it. Now with mods getting money what I think(and I'm sure this will happen, and I'll try to explain why) will happen from now on. People will do theirs mods, upload to Workshop and wait for the money in their pockets, but that will not happen, because you'll get a freaking huge enterprise making mods, and they'll sell it, and man, this looks weird but yeah, that's called DLC...it's the fuc*ing DLC problem, we had DLCs since The Sims, maybe even before, but now games launchs with a DLC already, I remember people bashing Mass Effect 3 because of the before launch-DLC, and man, now every freaking game a DLC before launch; and it sounds I'm crazy but that's how it works, if you don't do anything about it, people will get what they want, and I know for sure that most people that do mods don't need or don't expect that money, because that's how it worked...now you'll have the iest mods, with the highest prices and that'll be fine, because you let them do it! So just for the information purpose, why I think huge enterprises will do the mod/DLC stuff? Because what they sell to you is a unfinished game, it's just a demo, a beta, a alpha for some games(coff coff CoD coff), and they make these DLCs before launch, ask you for your money and you pay because you like the game, isn't your fault, it's industry fault! Now they'll have another type of DLC, the mod DLC, that will change your entire game, you don't know if it'll work in your PC, if it's good, if it worth it even! But man, you don't have your answer if you don't buy it, and it only cost 0.99 right!? Isn't that big of deal, now the 0.99 is 1.99, then 5, now it's 9.99 and you didn't even notice it! They will just make the game like this, launching with 1k resolution for textures, then, 1 month after launch, you can buy the -GREAT 2K res TEXTURE- wuuh huuu!!! That's just great right!? Thank if you've read all this, sorry if my english isn't the better, but if it isn't hope you can at least understand what I'm talking about!
thelegendaryrikimaru;-;We had to put it down, it go the rabbies and started biting at our wallets... PAYWALL / 10
Sham;-;It's not that it's even a bad idea for the people that legitimately work hard, but because Valve/Bethesda's model for this is "Hey, you can do whatever you want, I'm not even going to QA this, but we're taking 75% of the cut", it makes it not worth it for the mod developers they're claiming to support. Even the Pay What You Want denominations are fixed, so it takes a bat to the face of the honour system, too. It's almost like being sued in small increments for trying to make a game likeable, because you're supposed to feel bad for thinking the vanilla version of this game is . Oh, and every time you get sued, they punch the plaintiff in the  too, just for good measure. But if you enjoy never touching mods like some sort of crazy Puritan, you'll probably like this game.
blackjackel;-;This game is clearly made for consoles and ported over to PC, the UI is great for controllers but horrible to use over a mouse and keyboard.. the combat is clearly made for button mashing via controller and therefore is a little drab. The only saving grace were mods, and now that mods are paid this means the price of the game isn't the final price you pay if you want to play a great game... and who knows how much mods are going to cost...
Lao Dan;-;Like many potential customers I have owned this game for years on Xbox 360. I had not noticed the Steam paid mod controversy until after I purchased this game. I purchased a game I have already owned for 3 or 4 years because of the opportunity to try free mods. I now regret my purchase. The idea that Valve and Bethesda would charge for something like this is bewildering, and the percentage of the profits they keep is as well. My biggest issue is the lack of quality control. You have no way to determine the quality of a mod before purchasing. No way to determine if the next update makes it stop fuctioning. Mods are mostly made by amateurs. Even if they are paid, this does not mean they have the skills necessary to produce quality mods that will not negatively affect game stability. I would never purchase a product with so little guarantee of quality. This will inevitably lead to sweatshop, gold-spammer-style cheap content that drowns out the quality mods we are used to. I have in the past donated my talents to producing mods for the community to enjoy (I provided voice overs for multiple Dragon Age mods.) I would be far less willing to do this in the future. Let me add, just not buying mods is NOT a solution. The existance of a market in and of itself impacts the quality of content.
Zelcron;-;I enjoyed Morrowind's mod scene growing up, but have't had access to a game worthy PC in many years. Literally the week that I was financially secure enough buy a PC the could run Skyrim, Valve and Bethesda trashed the system for a quick buck.
Necromancer T;-;Skyrim is a great game that i have loved since the day it came out. The second that paid mods were released, the game was ruined. Modding is about seeing peoples creativity and ingenuity in games, fixing problems that the Devs dont want to, and making the game overall more anjoyable. They essentialy removed all of this.
Inglourious CuntFarts;-;If you think i'm going to pay for mods, you can go  yourselfs
Lucario;-;paying for mods is unacceptable.
Plutia;-;An excellent game with many mods. Just don't make us pay for them and take a 75% cut.
GzNobGoblin;-;Payed mods are killing the community. Don't ing buy this .
Gaming Person;-;https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop PLEASE SIGN THIS PETITION BEFORE THE MODDING COMMUNITY DIES! .....................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... _____.......^__^............._____ .............//'...'/`............|...__.....\....|...|............/... ___| ........../'/.../..../......./\..........|...|....\....|....|...|...........|..../ ........('(.......... ~/'...').........|...|.....|...|....|...|...........|...| .........\.................'...../...........|...|__/...|....|...|____....|...\____ ..........''...\.......... _...............|_____./.....\______\....\_____| ............\..............( ..............\.............\ OFFICIAL MODDER BLACKLIST isoku, xilverbulet, chesko, T_Vidotto, Jimo, Corvalho, Sparkwire, WLAD: THE DESTROYER OF GAMING, Arthmoor, Jeremy Klein, RadLyte, Laast, Shezrie PLEASE REPOST!
Mortus;-;Negative review prompted by Valve's latest cash-grab labeled as a "service" to gamers, and a god-awful way to support modders. The modders are only receiving a 25% share of the money spent by players. Modders have to sell $400 worth of goods before they see even a single cent of their share. This atrocious idea has already split modding and gaming communities apart thanks in Valve putting $ signs before communities and players once again. Don't take this as a jab towards the modding communities though, even the modders that choose to participate in selling their creations. Modders everywhere have helped provide an unfathomable amount of custom content to games purely out of their love for games and its players, and they've been generous enough to share their creations for countless gamers. Many modders are going through hard times now facing morale decisions and fear of public backlash because of this carelessly stupid system, to the point that some have been discouraged from continuing their work. They have an even unnecessary burden recklessly placed on them of scouring the Workshop, making sure their freely-shared content is not being sold as someone else's work. If you have ever used a mod that you've enjoyed, please be sure to extend your thanks and respect to modders everywhere for their dedication, and let them know that their work is not going unappreciated.
Aloha snack bar;-;Great Game, but with the paid mods steam is just trying to rake in more money How about giving us Half Life 3 and stop ing with us You are not doing anyone any good, no one is going to buy them its a great game, as you see by my hour,its a game that never gets old, as long as you dont buy mods from steam As a community, we need to stand against gaben and Steams action to make mods paid.
Riley.;-;Please no don't make me pay for mods vavle, if you really wanted us to help them add a choice to help the creators insted of being forced to pay.
Tandycakes;-;In what universe did 25% to the creator seem like a good idea; donations went 100% to them. Bad reviews for bad business practices, not to mention it was an inferior product compared to Oblivion and Morrowind. Damn shame.
Junozard;-;Lousy service...
deck;-;Great game but paid mods :(
Fox [trading];-;This game was an awesome game with the game its self and all the mods but now that you have to pay for them....Its not worth the money anymore!
Wilsonator;-;Enjoyed the game until the addition of paid mods, now it's dead.
colin_hyatt;-;The balls on these guys for charging us for mods is complete horse , mods are meant to be creative and and help modders show there skill for ing free. Bethesda you still have time to come back to the light. valve, shame on you for being a greedy .
InfectHerGadget;-;Pay 2 mod, no thanks.
Deathmaw;-;Was a really good game, possibly my favourite. Then they started charging money for mods. Until this practice is revoked. DO NO BUY THIS GAME>
Chrimpus;-;Mods have thrived for years on their status as amateur productions. Mandatory payments spit in the face of this tradition.
OboboboTheNerd;-;The main problems with paid mods I can think off the top of my head are: Lack of guaranteed long term support, lack of guaranteed compatibility, and increased proliferation of cashgrab mods. Lack of guaranteed long term support means that if any patch comes along that breaks it, unless the original modder comes along and fixes it, its pretty much wasted money. This may not even be possible. For something like a dota item, you have a reasonable expectation that the item will work even years later. You dont have this expectation for mods. EDIT: I stand corrected, the dota 2 arcanas have apparently been bugged for years. ing seriously, that's sad. Lack of guaranteed compatibility means any mod you buy might clash with any other mod, effectively wasting your money. Ive encountered mods that take longer than 24 hours to figure out that they dont work together, so the refund in steam dollars doesnt help. (Again) with a dota item, you have the reasonable expectation that the game will still work even with any combination of them. Increased proliferation of cashgrab mods has already been seen. The poster child for the paid mods scheme, the Shadow Scale Set, is a single piece of armour, and requires that you add it via CONSOLE. No quest, no recipe, its not even located in the world. Its also only modelled for male characters, and stretches oddly on females. I could go on, as a lot of the items immediately released are little better. Theres probably other problems I havent thought of, but even at first glance this seems like a terrible idea. EDIT 2: With the removal of paid mods, this review is no longer very relevant. But, let it stand as a mark of what valve tried to do, and a warning. Good game, but paid mods will likely ruin it.
chronicdiscord;-;Games of The Elder Scrolls series have some very clear expectations to them and must adhere to some very specific core concepts, Skyrim does not tarry too far from the mark. This game has many weaknesses that almost universally stem from it's multiplatform development - cities feel like villages and villages don't feel at all, this is entirely because of the limitations of the engine and the consoles. Weapons and armour are one size fits all and all armours of the same material are identical, there is no wear and tear of your items... Money from a thousand years ago does not draw comment when given to a vendor. You have no useful journal system, instead the map tells you exactly where to go for everything. Many things that disrupt the immersion within the game. Play this game once on a vanilla play through and then add in the mods, the base game is good, and it will help you appreciate the platform you are playing on a thousand times over when you play a second game using mods. You will mod this title, you will mod it to hell and back. You will love it for the mods that shore up the weaknesses and enable new and wonderful things in the game. Steam Workshop integration sounds nice, but it's not, the game's mod interface is garbage and the Workshop prevents a lot of the mods you will want. You will end up using Nexus Mods and their Nexus Mod Manager or the Slipstream Mod Manager to handle all your mods. There are mods to patch problems, to reenable content, replace bad textures, enhance combat, add items, add NPCs... Whatever your heart may desire, the mods are there. The game is good, genuinely good, but it could have been so much better. One hopes that Fallout 4 learns the lessons presented by the mods of Skyrim, rather than dooming modders to recreating their efforts in the next version of the engine. Any gamer worth their salt has already got this game and has played at least some of it.
Staale~;-;It's like Far Cry 3 with swords.
Aech;-;For the people who: 1) Want DEPTH - A huge story behind every SINGLE quest. 2) Think the NPCs are 'garbage' because they don't react the way the 'should' when the Dragonborn does THIS or THAT. 3) Look for amazing & different ways of combat in order to kill your enemies. 4) Think it's too "repetitieve, shallow, bland dungeon crawler." 5) Want to add THOUSANDS of mods, not reading how to install them & then complain the game is trash because it CRASHES. This game is NOT for you. I enjoy this game very much & I think it's a REALLY GOOD game. It all depends on what kind of games you like & if you're too picky. Sure, this game is not perfect & has bugs, glitches, etc. But I'd like to see YOU developing a game like this or even BETTER. I'm sure people who don't have HIGH expectations will love the game as much as I do. Take your TIME exploring the places, doing the quests. Just add some mods if you need more action, be careful they don't conflict with each other & you're ready to go! (: 8/10
EdinMG;-;One of the best games ever made, simply amazing, epic, awesome, magnificent !!!
Sweet Charity;-;THEY DO IT FOR [SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT]
Raven;-;No Paid Mods - Add a volontary donation button to fund the modder himself not bethesda
lolghurt;-;yeah lock all your mods behind a paywall its not like it's gonna cripple your game
Baron Earl;-;Mods are officially paid for, while some are free, anything large and worth installing is behind an wall with a credit card scanner for a knob. DO NOT PURCHASE IF YOU WERE GOING TO FOR THE MOD SCENE Be prepared to pay money for the fun mods. The original game is fun, though. Just don't hope for mods.
Novel;-;Great game, ruined by pushing a terrible business model. 1/10.
Cittadino Cane;-;Mods used to be free, now that they're payed the game is way less fun... Thank you valve.  Remember kids, if VALVe becomes garbage like EA, there's still GoG.com and some DRM Free games on Humble Bundle.
Kung-Fu Action Jesus;-;While this game is very good, the greatest reason to buy this game is because of the amazing mods created and released by the community for free, with the option to donate money available. With the addition of Pay-to-Play mods, I can only see darkness ahead of this game's future. Consider another game.
Holocaust: the Anime;-;Paid mods protest
Choom Kirby;-;Do not buy. Bad company. Bad game.
I only kill chickens;-;96% positive before paid mods ,84% positive after paid mods. Valve do you know what are you doing with this amazing masterpiece?
The Dude Abides;-;There's no such thing as bad publicity. Even if we all hate Bethesda for making paid mods a thing, they still win because... I forget where I was going with this. In short, game is good, paying for mods is not. Taste my middle finger Todd Howard.
Silent;-;In my honest opinion, this is the best RPG I've played so far, thrilling, challenging, can cause obsession. You have alot of mods you can choose from IF you get bored of the game itself, which it's unlikely to happen. RPG fans, shame on you if you haven't tried Skyrim yet.
herkesemargarin;-;(This review is a very long one. It actually is kind of an article between, a gameplay review, a "role-playing" guide, a mods compilation, and story of a character. If you are not intrested, I suggest you to pass it right away.) (Content is written all by me. Please do not distribute without permission.) The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, is undoubtedly one of the greatest PC games ever made, personally the single best RPG and open-world game I've seen. It is an unlimited digital source of pleasure for a lifetime FRP lover like myself. There really aren't many words to describe such perfection. First of all, best thing about Skyrim is the fact that, things you can do is literally endless. Content is literally endless. I am at around +2.000 hours of Skyrim gameplay (Also played it a lot before my Steam copy.), and everyday, I still keep discovering some totally new things. Vanillia game with DLC's, has at least over 2.000-2.500 hours of gameplay (Around 1.500 hours without any DLC's, maybe?), if you do nothing but quests. Endless number of mods you can apply, will make gameplay way, way longer. And again, this is only possible if you do nothing but quests; no sightseeing, fast traveling all the way, skipping lore, and forgetting about the identity of your character. Still, it's your choice to play Skyrim in the way you want. I have 3 characters, and I'll talk about one of them, whom I mainly play. (Vanillia content is more than enough to play 3 unique paths (except main storyline) for 3 seperate characters. You also can alter main storyline to a degree.). But first, I'd like to talk about mods which I actively use in all my characters (Plus, there are some particular ones for each character.)(No visual mods included.) - First of all, most indispensable mod for me, is probably the "Disable Fast Travel". I think that fast traveling absolutely ruins the game. I never fast traveled before (Neither in Skyrim, nor Oblivion. Morrowind didn't had it anyways. Damn, I love Morrowind.), never will, and I hate people who fast travels. Fast travel system is necessary as a result of overall demand to Skyrim, but when it's being used, that's half of the games beauty gone. Some people play it just for the other half anyways. - I very much like the "iNeed" mod, which adds a streamlined approach to needs. You need to eat, drink, and sleep once in a while, for full effectiveness of your character. It has some nice details, like for example, you can carry a flask, drink your water from it when you are thirsty, and fill it from any water source when depleted (Even from rain!). - Static Mesh Improvement, an amazing mod which replaces some plain textures with idea of adding a feel of third dimension, with actual 3D meshes. It adds a whole new level to details all around Tamriel. - SkyUI, a must-have interface overhaul - Cloaks of Skyrim - SkyrimSpeeds, speed adjustments - Improved Dragon Shouts - Command Dragon, for manual control - Alternative Crafting System, helps role-playing without abandoning your gear potential - ImmersiveFP, for first-person dragon & horse riding - A quality world map with all roads - Touring Carriages - FNIS, custom animations engine - And, Falskaar! It's an amazing mod, which adds a new quest line, a huge new map, and a very solid lore. Very professionally done, almost like an official DLC. The character I want to talk about, is my female dragonborn assassin, last member of the Dark Brotherhood, and guildmaster of Thieves Guild. She's the character that I played the most, although she's not the character I first created, or beat the main storyline. I beat the main storyline with my mage for the first time, and I wanted continue as an assassin, created her. After completing the Unbound quest (Which is the very first quest.), I literally quit the main storyline, and completed The Dark Brotherhood and Thieves Guild storylines (Yea, you can do that. You literally can complete almost every side quest in Tamriel without touching the main story.). By the time I return to the main storyline, I already was a master assassin, (Skyrim has an NPC progress system; it doesn't let you level up more than usual before story, and one-shot every NPC. You'll still have an adventage tho.), so I progressed through it at ease (Except the dragon parts, where I needed to go head-on.), and I completed it, as she completed her personality. She's not a type of assassin without honour, she's not like killing random people just for money/fun, or she's not using her dragonborn powers for personal gain (Spidey-philosophy), instead, she actually delivers justice, and avenges the downtrodden. She's more like Batman, The Dark Knight, except the killing part. And all that Thieves Guild, 'stealing' part, is also like the phiolosophy of Robin Hood, or at least the Cat Woman. In the end, she's a very righteous character, in her own way. I completed a billion small quests, and some big ones like Civil War and The Companions storyline (Actually, all the big ones as far as I know.), and married with Aela (Yep, Aela is a female. Yep, I'm a female. Yep.) before heading to Dawnguard DLC. I've completed Dawnguard as a vampire. I got cured afterwards, but I'm still not sure about being a vampire, since it actually fits the concept of her being a master assassin hiding in shadows, but there are too many downsides; I won't ever be using the Vampire Lord form, since it's totally irellevant with my character, and I don't like its benefits/aesthetics anyways. After that, Dragonborn came out, and I also finished it, which actually fits perfectly to her personality, since the purpose is (kind of) assassinating a corrupt leader as the only assassin (because of being a dragonborn) who can do it, and became a complete Dragonborn. Since then, I'm traveling short distances with Shadowmere, and long distances on a dragon (Not dragon fast-travelling, I'm navigating manually.). I do some unusual things in my spare time in Skyrim, which many can find weird, but I enjoy a lot. For example, I have some favorite places (Which I won't be sharing. Be assured, finding your own places would be much more satisfying.), I sometimes toggle off the running mode, and randomly walk at these places again and again, for hours, never getting bored. I also find books in Skyrim very exciting (There are countless in-game books which you can read. Each one of them are written exclusively, with its unique content.), I have a great intrest in collecting and reading them, and I actually find some of them way more intriguing than many 'popular' real books. Some of which I can recommend: Rising Threat (4 volumes), The Wolf Queen (8 volumes), Kolb and the Dragon (That's probably my favorite book in the game. Not in terms of its story, but it is actually a "choose-your-own-adventure" type of book.), The Black Arrow (2 volumes), A Dance in Fire (7 volumes). As a side note, in my honest opinion, books in Oblivion were better... Before finishing, here are some mods that I use especially for my assassin: - The Dance of Death, a kill-move mod - Higher Jump - Martial Arts - Realistic Crime Radius - Throwing Weapons Redux - Faction Crossbows - Stealth Immersion And, I suppose, that's all. In terms of characters, as you can see, making a character totally unique is pretty simple, it's just a matter of will. Skyrim, or any game for that matter, can only provide you the visualization and tools of role-playing; you have to use your imagination for an advanced FRP experience. And in terms of gaming perspective, you now should have an idea about how I feel about Skyrim, and you probably figured out how different you can approach to the game. In the end, conclusion is actually pretty short, and simple: Skyrim is a must, must, must, MUST have game, and a masterpiece to experience, just like a Mozart concerto, a Shakespeare play, or a trip to one of 7 Great Wonders of the World.
Googlaloonie;-;Paid mods = Negative Review
KUZCO;-;A year ago, great game. Plenty of support for mods, now you have to pay for them so Valve can earn an extra buck. Don't support this. Also http://www.nexusmods.com/skyrim a place that will never ask you to pay to enjoy what the sommunity creates.
thjake;-;"New ways to support mod creation," more like, "New ways to bring demise to PC gaming."
Zerox;-;I liked Skyrim so much I bought it twice. First on 360 and then again on PC. The primary motivator for me to purchase it again on PC was free mods. It wasn't about the graphics, it wasn't about the price, it was all about the feature of free mods. Hell, I transitioned from 360 to PC because I was tried of being nickeled and dimed my Microsoft at every moment. I still played Skyrim with a 360 controller too. Most of the mods I used were simple, IIRC it was pretty much just a smithing mod, dragon bone items mod, weightless potions mod, and arrow crafting mod. I looked into the mods before buying Skyrim on PC, they were not the upsell afterthought. If the mods required payment, I wouldn't have purchased Skyrim on PC. I'm ok with donating to mod developers for their work though, this formalized system will only lead to dark places. So in short: I don't recommend skyrim on PC. Might as well get it on 360 though.
diegodlv;-;I saw this coming, Paid mods will become the new DLCs. Moving my business to Origin (at least the games are actually mine) and GOG
Delta Ryan;-;Hiding mods behind a paywall is just disgusting! Why not a optional donation button, Valve?
MrPiddleStick;-;I used to love this game, but valve put a stop to that when they introduced paid mods. I feel like a donation button would be better but.. I don't know. Valve messed up real bad, i hope that they will fix this.
Angel;-;I cannot recommend a game that relies on mods, and then wants to charge for them.
GreyDawn25;-;Thanks for ruining and dividing a once friendly and thriving modding community you fat, greedy, pieces of garbage. Do not support this behaviour, and do not buy this game.
Hari Seldom;-;Pay for mods? No ty. Great game otherwise though...
ThatBorknagar;-;Hey atleast there's more early access on steam now, like we really needed that... EDIT:Paid mods have been removed from stEAm workshop. That's great, however I refuse to change my rating, not bEcAuse I hate the game and its devs, but merely to remind people about the things that BethEsdA and EVEN vAlvE are willing to do. But yea, just buy the game already!
Wozzzaaa;-;STILL has headache-inducing first-person graphics on ATI graphics cards nearly 4 YEARS after release. Extremely jittery when looking up and down. Disappointed and won't be buying any more Bethesda products. Vote this review helpful so other ATI users can see it, no need for a million rants about paid mods! Thanks.
(-TN-) swollendeathray;-;Paid mods are detrimental to not only this game but the state of PC gaming.
Hurricane;-;Buy this review for $9.99 on the Steam Workshop.
legion;-;no payed mods
mazer;-;This game made its name in mods, free mods, that expanded this game beyond anything the creators could do. Now they are charging for the same mods that made them what they are today.
Leafhood;-;A great game until the paid mods, that's just ripping people off.
Heartless;-;~You'll know why we are all dissatisfied. Don't forget to listen to your consumers because in the end it will come back to haunt you
BeardedSausage;-;Are Valva and Bethesda really trying to kill gaming? Counterstrike.. DOTA 2... Garry's MOD... All things that couldn't exist without mods. Please don't do this Gaben. Please.
cousinbenson;-;dont pay for mods people. are you actually insane, valve?
martijn.bastiaan;-;Dragons are way too weak to be considered real, which really kills the immersion for me :-(.
akbar akmed;-;This game is great and mods make it better but the mods should be free with a donation button not a mandatory payment
Duhuh;-;Way to go valve.
Zerox;-;I liked Skyrim so much I bought it twice. First on 360 and then again on PC. The primary motivator for me to purchase it again on PC was free mods. It wasn't about the graphics, it wasn't about the price, it was all about the feature of free mods. Hell, I transitioned from 360 to PC because I was tried of being nickeled and dimed my Microsoft at every moment. I still played Skyrim with a 360 controller too. Most of the mods I used were simple, IIRC it was pretty much just a smithing mod, dragon bone items mod, weightless potions mod, and arrow crafting mod. I looked into the mods before buying Skyrim on PC, they were not the upsell afterthought. If the mods required payment, I wouldn't have purchased Skyrim on PC. I'm ok with donating to mod developers for their work though, this formalized system will only lead to dark places. So in short: I don't recommend skyrim on PC. Might as well get it on 360 though.
diegodlv;-;I saw this coming, Paid mods will become the new DLCs. Moving my business to Origin (at least the games are actually mine) and GOG
Delta Ryan;-;Hiding mods behind a paywall is just disgusting! Why not a optional donation button, Valve?
MrPiddleStick;-;I used to love this game, but valve put a stop to that when they introduced paid mods. I feel like a donation button would be better but.. I don't know. Valve messed up real bad, i hope that they will fix this.
Angel;-;I cannot recommend a game that relies on mods, and then wants to charge for them.
GreyDawn25;-;Thanks for ruining and dividing a once friendly and thriving modding community you fat, greedy, pieces of garbage. Do not support this behaviour, and do not buy this game.
Hari Seldom;-;Pay for mods? No ty. Great game otherwise though...
martijn.bastiaan;-;Dragons are way too weak to be considered real, which really kills the immersion for me :-(.
akbar akmed;-;This game is great and mods make it better but the mods should be free with a donation button not a mandatory payment
Duhuh;-;Way to go valve.
GumAcacia;-;Paid mods have ruined this game. I can't recommend this game on principle.
Xelda;-;I used to recommend Skyrim, then Valve and Bethesda started letting people charge for mods. If that wasn't bad enough, they are also taking 75% of the profit from the sales of mods which they didn't even create. The whole idea behind charging for mods is a huge scam.
General Sam123;-;Idk, I think i could make 2 or 3 decent vids on it. 7/10
Contentiously;-;Once upon a moon, there lived a khajiit called K'Lem. K'Lem was not a bad khajiit, but K'Lem liked to collect things. This is a story of K'Lem collecting things. K'Lem had come into a land called Skyrim in K'Lem's quest for the collection of things, and because of the  legion imperial scum, K'Lem had lost all of the many things K'Lem's had collected, but that is not this story. And so K'Lem had to begin K'Lem's collection anew. The legion scum had even attempted to kill K'Lem, but that is not this story. And what's more, sometime in K'Lem's recent past in a story that is also not this story, K'Lem was found to be a thing called dragonborn, and because of this, K'Lem was given a servant called Lydia. K'Lem was not sure how this happened, but K'Lem was glad, for Lydia could carry many things, though she did not seem to like K'Lem very much. K'Lem needed a place to store the many collections of things that K'Lem planned to acquire. K'Lem had lost all of K'Lem's things and coins, and the local places were far more costly than the coins K'Lem had, and so K'Lem decided to earn coins doing favors for the locals. These favors bade K'Lem west, and so that is where K'Lem and Lydia set paw. Very soon, K'Lem and Lydia came upon a fort filled with bad men. Bandits they called themselves. They were bandit scum. K'Lem was smart and thought it wise to avoid such men that called themselves this, and so K'Lem carved a wide path around the fort. However, the bandit scum were quick to attack regardless of K'Lem's unprovocations, and Lydia was quick to reciprocate. And K'Lem felt it K'Lem's duty to join Lydia in her reciprocation. K'Lem and Lydia fell the bad bandit scum with much mightiness! The scum fell easily before the might of K'Lem and Lydia! What wonderful moons that blessed K'Lem and Lydia that day! What's more, the bandits had things! Many things! Shiny things and not so shiny things! And K'Lem was smart and had an idea. K'Lem need not collect all of the things! K'Lem could sell some of the lesser things to buy his collection place! Maybe even this fort would provide enough lesser things to afford the place! Thus it was that K'Lem and Lydia set paw inside the fort in search of more bandit scums and their things. Inside the fort, K'Lem and Lydia were sneaky and killed many scums. The scum bandits fell easily in this way, one and two at a time. But they also found a not scum inside. There was a nice Nord lady that gave talk and niceness, and K'Lem was not a bad khajiit, so K'Lem and Lydia let the nice Nord lady be. Soon, K'Lem and Lydia came upon a mighty bandit scum that called itself thug bandit. Thug bandit was very mighty, indeed, and hurt K'Lem time and again. One swing of thug bandit's mighty two-handed hurty thing made K'Lem's head go fuzzy like too much skooma. The battle was hard fought and very long, and it took Lydia distracting thug bandits attention while K'Lem shot thug bandit with arrows for thug bandit to fall. The mightiness of K'Lem and Lydia had vanquished the entire bandit band! And K'Lem was glad and gave thanks to the moons, and relished in K'Lem's victory and all the many things K'Lem had won. But K'Lem and Lydia could not carry all the things. There were too many things! But, Whiterun was still in sight, and K'Lem was smart and K'Lem had another idea. K'Lem decided to return with Lydia to Whiterun to sell all the things KLem and Lydia could carry. KLem planned to quickly return to the fort to collect the rest of the things. K'Lem was amazed at K'Lem's smartness! K'Lem had not finished exploring the fort, however, and K'Lem was most curious about the unknown upstairs, and so K'Lem ran with most haste to Whiterun, and KLem and Lydia ran with such speed that even the deer were amazed! However, when K'Lem returned, the  legion emperial scum had taken over! As if they had been waiting to move in! The fort was completely renovated by the imperial scum, and all K'Lem's hard won things were gone! All of the things! Whats more, the  scum had gall enough to tell K'Lem that K'Lem did not belong! That K'Lem should leave! But this was K'Lem's hard-won fort! K'Lem was not a bad khajiit, but K'Lem had lost all his hard-won things, and so K'Lem was angered, and K'Lem decided to take the legion scums things as payment. And so, once again K'Lem and Lydia were sneaky in the fort, and they took all the things they could carry while avoiding the  legion scums. And the nice Nord lady was still there serving the imperial scums. K'Lem thought that maybe she must come with the fort. Certainly K'Lem could not leave without exploring the unknown upstairs and satiating K'Lem's curiosity, and so K'Lem went to the unknown upstairs to find that the  imperial captain had made it his own place. And as K'Lem was looking and wondering what the unknown upstairs was like when it was the mighty and worthy thug bandits own place, the  legion captain attacked K'Lem! For trespassing! This was K'Lem's hard-won fort and K'Lem was being attacked by the  legion imperial captain scum! But captain scum was no match for mighty K'Lem, and  captain fell easily! And captain scum had so many things for K'Lem to take! And K'Lem was no longer angered. K'Lem and Lydia went downstairs to leave the fort while carrying all the things K'Lem and Lydia could carry. The  soldiers were still hostile, however, and one of them attacked K'Lem for trespassing! Soon all the  soldier legion scum were attacking K'Lem and Lydia! Many soldiers! At least 8! But they were no match for mighty K'Lem and Lydia! Even 15 against K'Lem and Lydia! Or maybe it was 25! Mighty K'Lem and Lydia vanquished them all! K'Lem no longer wondered why the  legion imperials had moved in with such haste. Certainly they had been no match for the mighty thug bandit, and they needed a mighty warrior like K'Lem and Lydia to vanquish the bandits before they could move in. K'Lem decided the  legion scums deserved the death they received and K'Lem was glad. Then it was time for KLem and Lydia to gather all the hard-won things to collect and sell, but this time K'Lem took no chances and weighed KLem and Lydia down with everything in the fort. All of the things. All of the many imperial things. And it was a very long and tiring and laborious short trip to Whiterun. And that is the story of how K'Lem bought K'Lem's collection place.
Svirt;-;What is the music of life? Silence, my brother 10/10
cdluk;-;bethesda's greed simulator, all the cash from games sales and dlc sales is not enough now they want more cash from the sale of mods
pickles;-;made the game boring by selling mods 3/10
Grumpelstiltskin;-;Screw You valve and your paid mod
Workman743;-;REVIEW DEMO "Skyrim was one of the most anticipated games ever announced, following the success of Elder Scrolls IV Oblivion, Bethesda certainly had high standards to live up to, and let me tell you, in my opinion, they absolutely, 100% percent-" We're sorry, you've reached the end of the Review Demo, if you would like to see the full review, please purchase "Skyrim Review," available on the Steam Store now for only $29.99 Also, please consider these additional expansions to the base review, also available at the Steam Store: Skyrim Dragonborn Review - $9.99 Skyrim Hearthfire Review - $9.99 Skyrim Dawnguard Review - $9.99 Skyrim Review Expansion Bundle - $27.99 BEST VALUE!!! A brand new edition to our review system is the inclusion of paid, player created, review modifications, available on the Steam Workship, these include such exciting additions such as: Bold Text Mod - $2.99 Italicized Text Mod - $2.99 Custom Border Mod - $3.99 ReviewUI - $4.99 High-Definition Thumbs Mod - $1.99 And many more to come!
Quentin Slaughter;-;Release a game that is half broken out of the box, charge for mods, then take 75% cut from the people who made the game playable. Absolutely ridiculous idea, bethesda has lost all of my business forever.
Razqel;-;Paid Mods? Please Bethesda.
Buckmack;-;Paid mods ruin a brilliant game.
michael bono;-;Paid mods, I Cannot reccomend this game to anyone, paying money to fix problems with the game that should have never been there is hilarious at best.
[WBW] Trenchburner;-;This game supports paid mods, I do not.
Foundationer;-;Without mods, Skyrim is playable for 30-40 hours before you get bored of it. From now on (April 2015), you officially need to be a rich person to enjoy the game beyond that time period.
HoboCop ;-;;-;No... paid mods are for greedy s who don't give a  about the community.  you Valve!
Bison Zabi;-;So I noticed the review page has become an avenue to show dismay of paywall mods. Rather than rag on about spears, horrible animations, retar ded AI, wonky gamebyro offshoot engine, or watered down game mechanics. I'll be talking about the recent addition of the paywall mods...which ultimately is connected to all these issues I mentioned since Bethesda is notorious for releasing games that are somewhat fixed by the modding community... So we come to this, 20+ years of tradition being challeged by the least likely companies of all: Valve. 6-10 years ago, if you said Valve was going to create this type of scheme, you would have been seen as insane. Well here we are. Valve has finally stepped up its game on bolder steps of consolidating power after years of testing the surrounding water. What they didn't know is that they would finally be fought back against. By attacking one of the cornerstone foundations of PC Gaming (Modding) they have committed the most shocking displays of absolute treason. What makes it worse is all the little  who defend these actions of paywalled mods. The type of people who firmly believe Valve can do no wrong and will defend their actions like North Koreans will defend Dear Reader despite being  on all the time. Their largest argument defending this change tends to be "Well now you have to pay for the hard work of the modders!" Let's be clear on something, modding is a hobby at its core, not a business. It's a hobby of people who have an utmost love for the games they play hence why they mod it and share with their fellow fanbase. If you feel entitled to something or came into modding for the sole purpose of benefitting off of it in terms of money or popularity, then this hobby is not for you. Now with pay mods, it encourages this behavior even more to a sickening level. Monetisation brings out the worst in people. It draws in the wrong crowd and floods the market with dubious and potentially broken products which some will find themselves gypped on as mods are known to become incompatible with game updates. If you truly want to make money off your work, then hell try and get a job in the gaming industry whether it be indie or professional level. Don't muddy up our drinking water.
Nem;-;Edit: Valve/Bethesda have reversed their decision on the paid mod policy. I will not be changing the review as a reminder to everyone of what they tried to pull. The game is great. However, I cannot recommend this game given the recent decision to implement paid mods into the game, alienating a long standing modding community and gamers alike.
NEG;-;Hey Gabe, how about you pay me $3 for a good review?
thedogalwaysdies;-;boo paid mods boo hiss
inferno1170;-;I would have recommended this game before, but after this whole paid mod thing I wouldn't recommend this game or any other Bethesda game to anybody. Others have stated plenty of good arguements for this is bad, so I'll keep my review short. But I am thoroughly dispointed with both Besthesta and Valve over this entire ordeal. And until they reverse this, my review of this game will remain negative.
YUNG GOD;-;Charging for mods is disgusting. Hopefully you do something to fix this situation.
Sigvard;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve.
Taco Con Frito;-;Pay2Mod = avoid at all costs. The game is 10/10, but with paid mods it doesn't even score a 1.  off Bethesda, you've gone too far.
Questchun;-;Skyrim by it self is okay, With mods it is epic. However someone thought it was a good idea to monitize mods. Going aginst the idea of modifying a game, Because I can't justify paying 2.50 USD for some armor I must state plainly. DO NOT BUY. That goes for all of Bethesda games. If you wanted money you should have completed Fallout 4. Now I could give a .
Corlton * Hesburger;-;Just. Stop. With the paid mods.
butr chiken;-;"Stab the body and it heals, but injure the heart and the wound lasts a lifetime." - Mineko Iwasaki Greed has grown within the walls of Valve and they've introduced poison into the community. This act shall not be forgotten for the community shall remember. Once the paid workshop mods have been removed, then, and only then, shall I change my review and my perspective on both Bethesda and Valve as well respected companies.
TheCyberDruid;-;It's better than Morrowind. It does what Oblivion should have done. It's a great single player RPG. There's so much to do in this game and it just doesn't get boring. You need to play this game if you like RPGs at all. I know that almost everybody did already, but I'll still post it here. Get and play this game if you ever cared to play a game for the stor(y/ies) it has to offer.
Zeimaster on Vacationing;-;After noticing that paid mods are no longer a thing I say this game is worth the money, and modders deserve to get smalls donations if you truely love their stuff now get yourself "Mod it until it crashes" Old revieuw for the Archives "So it begins, the great downfall of our time. The community has started to crumble with people stealing each other's work to just make a profit. Let me get this straight Skyrim is a fun game but gets very boring after getting trough most content in the first 12 hours, which is why bethesda gave the modding community power and thus breathed new life in their game. Now we got payed mods, early access payed mods. no I refuse to stand for this utter  on both Valve's and Bethesda's end Donations would be fine, but Bethesda cant make money of that now can they? EDIT: I found on a sub-reddit where Gabe is awnsering some questions that infact, not Valve but the Publisher of the game sets the cut for modders, so that 75% cut that is claimed is for Valve is actualy for Bethesda. for more: http://www.reddit.com/r/gaming/comments/33uplp/mods_and_steam/ "
Necrolophous[PL];-;Probably best cRPG I've ever played. Awesome, excellent, almost perfect game. Still has some disadvantages of Elder Scrolls series but better of Oblivion in all aspects. Every fan of video games should play this title. VERDICT: If you are a fan of RPG games, you definitely should try that! If you are not a fan of RPG, but you are a gamer, you definitely should try that! If you are not a gamer, you definitely should stop reading that!
Kzleri |;-;Not enough life to play ... 10/10
XxXROB1123XxX;-;This game has been out for almost 3 years and I still find myself coming back to this game trying to explore every inch of skyrim. This game is never ending with all the mods that are avilable. 260+ hours on PC 350+ hours on 360
MysterD "The Gaming Toaster";-;Skyrim (Base Game) - REVIEW What is there to say about this game? Where do I even begin to tackle this monstrosity that has taken me on my 1st playthrough 141 hours just to finish the Skyrim base-game? We're not enough counting the DLC's here...yet! The Elder Scrolls (TES) is 1 of those series that are loaded w/ tons + tons of content, offering up an insane amount of value + "bang for your buck". To experience all of it at once - IMHO, at least for me, that's probably not the wisest ideas. This game has so many different storylines, quests, areas to explore, factions, things to do (i.e. get married) - it's a game you play for numerous hours until you've hit that wall (i.e. "I need a break for a while"); just go away from for a bit; & then it calls you back for more. Very few games do this to me - Test Drive Unlimited 2; Far Cry 3; + Skyrim all come to my mind here. Class systems are gone here in Skyrim. Just practice the attributes you want to want to improve (i.e. sneak around, improve that skilll; swing a 1-handed sworded and hit someone, that improves; cast a spell from a certain school, that improves, etc); + select new abilities from those attributes to learn at level-up time. Since you're constantly improving your attributes + leveling-up like there's no tomorrow, this can be addictive - think like that Diablo-like kind of addictive. Skyrim has improved in numerous ways over its predecessor. Graphically, on the technical side, the game is much better than Oblivion. Girls actually do look more so like girls (in the face, namely), this time around - thanks for finally getting this right, Bethesda; it took you long enough! While many of the game areas are nowhere as crazy + interesting as Oblivion's Shivering Isles expansion (my favorite area in any TES game since starting in the series w/ Morrowind). These lands have a Nordic influence on them + most of them truly do look fantastic. Likely, if you see an area way out in the distance, there's a great chance - you can go there + explore it completely, which is fantastic. Combat here has improved & is a bit more visceral than Oblivion - but, when compared to others, it certainly is still a little bit clunky (like most TES games) + does not rival the combat of other games like Kingdom of Amalur: Reckoning + Dark Souls (those games certainly do specialize in combat) - it's still pretty good here in Skyrim. One thing that's new - you can now dual-wield weapons; can even wield magic in one hand, a weapon in another; dual-wield different magic spells in each hands; and/or even dual-wield the same magic spell (for double the power). Simply put - these are great additions to this game's combat system. NPC's in the game-world actually have taken a page right out of the Gothic play-book, as you will see NPC's doing things to immerse you into the world - i.e. blacksmith sharpening blades with equipment; NPC's acting on schedules + doing things together on their own; + things of that natures. As usual, there's even more books added to read, for those who want to dwelve into the ever-expanded + ridiculously-sized Lore of the series. The main story here is this - dragons have returned to Skyrim, you're to meet a certain group of people to fulfill your destiny as the Dragonborn (a human that can learn dragon skills), learn Dragon-style shouts, & take the Dragons out once + for all - which is typical fantasy stuff. While the main quest is decent enough + is solid, it really feels like it's just another quest in the game - like many of the main quests in Elder Scrolls base-games since Morrowind. While Bethesda is no BioWare + no Obsidian when it comes to generating fantastic narrative, prose + dialogue - where Bethesda succeeds over just about every other of the game companies is creating insanely huge playgrounds that have a good deal normally going on w/ tons to accomplish, if you like what you're doing. Trust me - this is another addictive sandbox from Bethesda, in which you won't know how to let go of for a while or after being away for a while, it will eventually get you coming back for more. While not everything here is a home-run, there are also many good-to-great plots + storyline strings here - such as the Thieves Guild's quest-line + especially Dark Brotherhood quest-lines, that I don't even know where to begin. Skyrim will generate some random quests on its own, which often do wind-up in the Misc section - which could keep you going for a long time. As if the base-game couldn't do that enough already, making this game such a time-sink - throw in also that the game ships w/ the Toolkit these days & the ridiculous amount of mods out there b/c this series has an extremely heavy modding community + fanbase - you could live for 100's of hours in Skyrim, even long well after it takes finishing the insane amount of content that Bethesda has already provided. If there's something about Skyrim you don't like - i.e. the UI isn't that great, again; even though it's improved immensely over Oblivion - trust me, there's a mod out there to fix your issue w/ the game. For example - SkyUI Mod vastly improves + fixes Bethesda's UI-system immesely. By offering up a huge sandbox & an insane amount of things to do (from questing to exploring) here, Skyrim succeeds in proving again why Bethesda + their Elder Scrolls is 1 of the best - if not, the best - at providing addictive time-sink RPG's. Bethesda yet again offers up the kitchen sink here; I'll certainly drink to that + from that. RPG fans looking to get lost for 100's of hours, it's almost impossible to rival what Bethesda does in their games - & that's especially true here in Skyrim. Simply put - another RPG masterpiece from Bethesda. Final Grade = A+
SRB_MCFC;-;Can't support a game that "supports modders" by taking 75% of their earnings. Shame on Valve and Bethesda.
parro;-;Greedy pathetic Valve scum. The only fair split is 75% content creator for creating new intellectual property, 20% to Bethesda for the intellectual property that is the base game, 5% to Valve for doing nothing more than sitting on their fat asses manipulating their monopoly. If you want mods, go to Skyrim Nexus, if you love a mod, please donate directly to the content creator via paypal. If you want to buy Skyrim, I'm sorry but you have to register the game through Steam, but do not have to buy from Steam. This is a great game, but do not buy it through Steam, same goes for any game where possible, GTA V is a great example, buy direct from Rockstar. This is Valve showing their true colours, this is clear evidence their monopoly needs to be broken down
MAD BUX;-;Paid mods. Do not touch.
InfectedPegasus789;-;Paid mods? No thanks. I'll go back to playing it on my xbox
Zerc;-;Paid mods? No thanks.
gingerbreadman45;-;Let me just say steam this a horrible idea and is gonna go to  if you let this happen with the mod crap this game will die. so will your profits
Reign Tsumaraki;-;Now that Bethesda and Valve are now collaborating for paid mods, and are making no effort to backtrack or make amends to the community, I cannot recommend this game. Not until the paid mods problem is resolved.
tHEraPY faiLeD;-;Paid mods? Yea right.
Killua;-;Paid mods are a disgrace, and reveal Valve and Bethesda as nothing more than the average greedy company, trying to milk as much money from the players as possible. Mods should be free, made by the community because of their passion and love for the game, not because they want some quick cash. If this feature is not removed, I, along with many others, will boycott Steam, and you should too.
falc;-;Positive rating now costs 4.99
ehXDi;-;Get a grip bethseda
Khaedar;-;Paid mods, need I say more?
DogFaceMan;-;I can't recommend any Bethesda games if they are going to destroy the best (even arguably the only) thing about them.
lmdeluxe04;-;Get rid of charging for mods.
iTecH2FrostieS;-;Don't bother buying into the next microtransaction menace.
Vanderhaven;-;This negative review is only in response to the addition of adding mods that you have to pay to use. Mods should never be pay to use unless it drastically changes the game, ex. DLC. This creates competition between modders and responsibility to continue to update them or else people will complain. Some modders are only creating these mods for fun and doing it in their spare time. The game itself is great and any money that goes to paying for mods should be an optional donation directly to the Modder for their time and effort and none should go to the developer or valve unless for processing fees.
Dr.Steve Brule;-;you gotta pay for mods, ing .
Search;-;I loved this game and put in countless hours on both PC and Xbox versions of this game, but since the addition of paid mods I can't stand to even look at it. Way to go Valve. You done ed it up.
Zero;-;2/10, you are not even trying. This game used to be my battleground. Battleground where I used to fight with mods and their compatibility. Now it turned into some freaking EAfield. Buy this, pay for that, you don't know if it will work well together? SCREW YOU and pay for that.
Tennealeous;-;It's a great game in many ways however due to Valve's recent adding of paid mods, we've been able to see their true colors. I think we can all agree that just like every other company; Valve needs money to stay afloat but, putting a paywall on everything (especially for work they didn't take the time to do) isn't the best thing to do. it's an extremely greedy business practice. It's also very sad to see Bethesda fall back to this greedy method and I was so hyped for fallout 4
Nickernator;-;Paid mods, That says enough why I cannot remommend this game
adidan;-;Buy it. Love it. Lose months to it. Then lose some more.
Mended;-;Hopping on the bandwagon :)
DOOMSD4YY;-;AAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH KKKKKK THIS MUTHAING GAME IS SO ING GOOD. IT IS AN OLD GAME, BUT I FEEL LIKE REVIEWING IT ANYWAY, CAUSE IM ING HIIIIIIIGHHH THE GAME IS A BETHESDA GAME, SO YOU WOULD EXPECT IT TO BEE GOOD, AND BET YOUR , IT ING IS! THE GAME LANDS A SOLID 30+ HOUR MAIN STORY, WITH SO MANY MUDDAING SIDE QUEST, YOU'LL BARRICADE YO  IN WHATEVER ASSLICKING RAPEROOM YOUR COMPUTER IS STANDING, SO YOU CAN BUTT THE  OUTA THEM DRAGONSSSSSSSS +FLAWLESS STORY, ADAPTIVE OPEN WORLD FEELS LIKE YO  BE THE GUYS  IN THE GAME KICKING DRAGON ASSS +SO MUCH ING STORY THAT YOU'LL BE KICKING WALLS WITH TOOTHPICKS BETWEEN YOUR TONAILS +MODS BABY! YOU DONT NEED PORN ANYMORE +DID I MENTION DRAGONS??? +HUUUUUUUUUGE OPEN WORLD +SOUNDTRACK IS LIKE LISTENING TO GIRLS MOANING IN DRAGON LANGUAGE OR SOME , IT'S ING AWESOME -A MINUS? WHY THE  WOULD THIS BRILLIANT  GAME HAVE A MINUS? IF YOU DONT HAVE THIS GOD DAMN GAME YET, I WILL PERSONALLY STICK A BROOM UP YOUR , SIDEWAYS. 10 BILLION / 10
Real Talk;-;I wouldn't call this the ultimate game, but I would call it the ultimate timewaster. Skyrim was my companion through a couple of days with no internet. It was also one of the only games I had installed. One thing leads to another, you start to see achievements piling on achievements, and you get the idea, "Yeah, I can do this." What a fool I was.
Vadam5;-;I would rather do 9/11 again than paying for a mod. .
chiken;-;mods=money=bad
Luftwaffel;-;I feel bad putting a not recommended for such a good game, but this paid modding can't go any further, and someone needs to get the message.
WarriorVet;-;Played it on 360 first, as most pc gamers know, pc ports are usually better, this is no exception. Amazing mods out there adding HOURS of content. Must buy.
Seor Koquonfaes;-;I installed a mod that turned the chickens into mini nukes. Now Riverwood is nothing but a smoking crater 10/10
Sausage Milk;-;I was like *SLASH SLASH SLASH* and the guy was like *AHHHHH* and i was like *HAHAHA* and then..then...then i won the game. :D
Feilie;-;"Its like Skyrim with swords and bows" -IGN 10/10
KING_B;-;Skyrim is the best Elder Scrolls game so far, with the expansions it has gotten even better. I felt that ESIII: Morrowind brought more to the table for its time than ESIV: Oblivion but believe this game has done even more. I have enjoyed it on console, on PC and gone through the DLC which is worth the extra cash. The only thing missing is co-op/multi player but Elder Scrolls Online is running now, although I wish they would have done things a little differently on that game.. Even if your not an Elder Scrolls fan or follower the game is a nice play as it allows you to customize yourself and play in many styles to allow a change up. I did have a few technical issues following the main quest line but just shifted to side quests and other things until I found out how to fix my save. They could have done a litle better on updating to debug some of the common issues or allowed a form of abandoning quests to reset them. Overall I'd say 9.5/10 for what it is as I can't complain about missing features that just weren't supposed to be in the game although I think they coulda just put out a co-op patch/expansion to allow us to play with 1 friend or something which would have enhanced the gameplay alot and expanded the games popularity.
MoodForMagikarp;-;Paid mods are something that no one asked for, and i'm sure that a donate button would have worked fine.
BLUE(I'm bad);-;10/10 "Like Fallout without guns" -Machinima
Moustache;-;There are fresh tomatoes in this game.
Credaseder the Khajiit;-;what can i say? i love this game! you can do whatever you want, i think the elder scrolls series is one of the only RPGs that is truly open world. don't want to do the main quest? go ahead and wander the big and well crafted world. feel like you need some directions to start your new adventure? do one of the many side quests. you can make your own armours, potions and weapons, though they removed the ability to make your own spells. now the big question: is it better then morrowind/oblivion? my answer is no, although skyrim is amazing it does not have the same fantasy feeling i got while playin morrowind or oblivion. 8/10 a must own for pc gamers
TimeViewer;-;Always fun, the ever growing community additions insure that this game will remain popular and engaging for years to come, just don't shoot yourself in the knee.
pepsimanvsjoe;-;Skyrim? Yeah I played Skyrim. Picked it up when it launched on the Xbox 360 in fact. I must've put about 30 hours into it before deciding that I've seen it all. Let me break it down a bit. When I played Skyrim I did the following: I left my house, found a dungeon, grabbed the loot, sold it to the same handful of merchants (including my husband), and...that was it. Morrowind was surreal, wonderful, and just obtuse enough to be charming. With Skyrim, I felt like some cog in a Dwemer machine, trapped in an endless cycle of middling upgrades and a total lack of surprising events. I mean, for crying out loud, more dragons?! These jerks are worse than cliff racers. At the time I figured that I might as well play an MMO, at least then I could get some rare drops. So what happened? What's so different about the PC version that I would put 600+ hours into it? Do you really have to ask? Modding Skyrim is the equivalent of Alice in Wonderland. You don't get to walk up to the rabbit hole and peer over the edge. You certainly can't climb down, take what catches your interest, and climb out. No, you will fall in that hole. The only light you'll be seeing is through the dozens of mods that make up your sunny days in Skyrim. In the beginning you might pick through the mods available on the Steam workshop. A weapon here, a new set of armor, something that makes cows explode or sends people flying into space, you get the idea. But then you look at what other people are doing with their Skyrim. They've got the 4K textures, the dramatic ENBs, the glamour models with their noses just right. Now you may be thinking that you don't need all that garbage, and you probably don't. But you do. Next thing you know you're on the Nexus. It's been 10 hours and you haven't even started the game yet. Stability is the last word I'd associate with Elder Scrolls, and that's without piling on the mods. Getting your modded game to function is more engrossing than Skyrim itself. You've started the game, you're wandering around, and then...Crash To Desktop. What caused it? How do you fix it? Is there a way around it? Are you going to lose your saves? After a long enough period of time you eventually stop caring. My Skyrim is held together by old tape and chewing gum, and that's fine. Eventually you learn to stop caring about those precious game-saves. I'm going to spoil Skyrim: You are the most awesome. Everything you do is right and nobody dares to question you. Nobody will even do anything unless you're somehow involved. Sometimes being the most awesome is fun. It's escapism at its purest. A lot of other videogames tend to punish you with death. At worst, Skyrim inconveniences you. This game doesn't say "YOU DIED." or "HEY POOR PLAYER!" It just assumes you goofed up somewhere and loads your last save. There's something to be said about player-imposed difficulty, but it's hard work trying to be the least awesome. There's a phrase I like to throw around when discussing videogames: "Making the game yours." Usually this refers to playing games in a particular way, like a knife-only run in Resident Evil, or beating Megaman without any power-ups. It's not always about player-imposed difficulty either, it can be about creating an identity through playing. I remember reading about a Morrowind player who spent all of their time in the Ashlands. They'd camp out in a Chitin hut and hunt whatever beasts they happened to find. They made just enough from selling the carcasses to eke out a miserable existence while dealing with the constant ash storms. This doesn't sound appealing, but I have to respect the hustle. That person totally owns their game of Morrowind. When all of the rumors are true, and the player is always the most awesome, there's not a lot one can do to create their identity. This is especially apparent when every single guard you pass mentions something you could be doing (or have already done). Your alteration level could be so low that it couldn't levitate an earthworm, but that won't stop you from becoming an Archmage not long after stepping foot in the Winterhold College. I remember when being an Archmage was such hot  in The Bard's Tale, now it's just a title any Dragonbum can get. When everything in a game takes zero effort and the results are meaningless, why not just make the game in your image through modding? If anything this will lead to new challenges, more possibilities, and *gasp* unpredictability. When I play Skyrim, I play with the intent to fill it with as much crap as I can find, see if/when/how it breaks, and attempt to undo the damage with minimal losses. It's disturbingly compelling, and that's without discussing the mods themselves. I don't settle for being the most awesome, I want to become omnipotent. Only after I've constructed this world, filled it with all of the neatest toys, and prettied it up as much as my mediocre videocard will allow, do I actually play it. At this point I'm fine with being the most awesome, because I feel like I earned that right. This is the time I put some Genesis on, and zone out while exploring, decapitating, and working on that perpetually imperfect nose. Perhaps my comparison to Alice in Wonderland is a bit off. The way I remember it, Alice falls in the hole and arrives in Wonderland. With modded Skyrim; Wonderland is a neverending hole. Inevitably you'll get bored of tearing your game to pieces and putting it back together. You want to see where your curiousity will take you. You might go digging through hundreds of foreign websites to find that anime fighting-style, or ten gigabtyes of hair-styles. You could even find yourself in a lab. What it all comes down to is that Skyrim is what you make of it. The game is fine on its own. It's certainly not lacking for content, and even without thousands of visual-enhancing mods it looks decent. However, Skyrim becomes so much more simply through the act of modding. To me, this is the ultimate sandbox game, and will likely only be bested by Bethesda's next single-player RPG.
Gelly;-;You cannot call yourself a true 'gamer' until your life has been ruined by Skyrim. Note: My playtime is so low because I played on a console to begin with, In reality I've sunk hundreds of hours into Skyrim...
Superhappycowboygoldfish;-;"This might just be crazy enough to potato" 10/10- IGN
Xivilai41;-;The Elder Scrolls V:Skyrim is for me one the best RPG games that I've played. This game is briliant in many ways, the graphics are pretty decent on the year, when the game was released (ofcourse there are many retexture mods that can improve the looks of the game). Combat is pretty sweet too, You can choose which class You want to play and You can combine them in the way You want it. This game with beautiful open-world, many quests, many adventures, and a lot of more great content can give You the best role-playing game experience..
Steve the Bandit;-;First game I ever truly fell in love with. A MUST BUY.
Lunaril;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, where do I start with a review. When this game was first released, it was still unfinished. There were many bugs and issues, some of which made playing the game difficult to say the least; However, it was still one of the best games of 2011. Over the years, these issues have largely been addressed and the game is now more stable. The visuals in Skyrim were stunning, absolutely stunning, when compared with it's predecessor, The Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion, released Six-years earlier. Using the then new Creation Engine, Skyrim is a hyper-realistic world for the player to explore much like Morrowwind, with a size similar to Cryodill in Oblivion. Skyrim has several DLC packs, Dawnguard, Hearthfire, and Dragonborn all of which are a part of the Legendary Edition. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, is a game every RPG gamer should have in their library. Most of the bugs and issues, present when the game was first released have been resolved. There is also a library of Mod's available for Skyrim if you know where to look to personalize the game the way you want it. If you enjoyed Oblivion, you should also enjoy Skyrim, as it has a more realistic world design from Oblivion, though is similar in actual overall size. ~Potential Spoilers~ Skyrim, takes place 200 years after the events of Oblivion, in the Northern Lands of Skyrim on Tamriel. You play as the Dragonborne, someone who has the ability to absorb the souls of a Dragon and call upon the magical ability, Thu'um, known as the Shout of the Dragon. While navigating the story to understand what this means, you are also caught in the middle of a civil war between the Empire, who are now allied with the Alderi Dominion, and the People of Skyrim.
SHSD;-;I helped a child kill an elderly lady, that ran an orphanage. 10/10
Liberteer;-;The way I see Elder Scrolls series: it's not about beating the game, it's about travel. My first one was Morrowind. I've played Oblivion, but didn't really pay attention to it and I bough Skyrim pretty cheap. So far, eight hours in the game, this is the biggest, most complete, wonderful ES game for true adventurers. You don't play to win, you play to travel, you play to read books, you play to enjoy it through and through. A RPG game like no other, if you didn't play ES games before, get Skyrim and forget about this ugly world we live in...
Angel0fWar;-;It's like Skyrim but with Skyrim.
Marko The Cutthroat;-;Okay, so... The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is the fifth installment to the Elder Scrolls series which are very successful so far. The story is about the return of the dragons that lived thousands of years ago along with them appears the dragonborn who's objective is to stop their return. I don't wanna spoil anything beyond this, that's why the story explanation is brief. TLDR For those who didn't want to read a lot here's a short part of the review. Skyrim is a very large RPG with lots of things to do and you can be pretty much whatever you want to be. It's hard to determine how much time you will spend playing this game, its very unclear and it depends on you the most. There are numerious quests and events for you to do. Skyrim is vast, beautiful and dangerous, take your time to explore it. It certainly won't be wasted money, you'll have a lot of fun playing this game. Eventually if you find the game "lacking" you can always look for mods to enrich your game. Character creation With each release Bethesda strives to improve their beloved Elder Scroll series in every extent. The character creation system has a lot of options once again and they really outdid themselves with the presentation of each of the races, they look very immersive and lore friendly. Next we have the attributes and skill system which is quite simplified in comparison to the previous release. Sadly, while this is not entirely negative, some might view it as so, because with the removal of attributes and merging of some skills they have limited the building of characters in a way. The removal of the class selection is one of the most disturbing, but its not all that important to your character build. Although it is one of the important features of RPG games. And finally the birthsigns, while they were never really cleverly balanced, I kind of appreciate their usage in Skyrim because of their "weak" impact. I also despise them because you can simply choose which one you want if you find it and afterwards you can always change it. I forgot to mention the skill perks that were first brought into Oblivion then altered in Fallout 3 and finally finetuned in Skyrim, a very good feature if I may say so, makes the game feel like it has more complexity. You're gonna have a lot of fun creating a character or its gonna be a pain, it depends. Take your time. Wilderness, landscape and habitats They put a lof of effort into this. The landscape is very breathtaking, immersive and worthwhile. Take your time and explore the great and vast lands of Skyrim. This is a very big plus, they really spent a lot of time on making the surroundings very detailed and immersive. Besides enjoying the game with its gameplay itself you're also presented with the option of absorbing the environment without actually indulging yourself in some pointless slaughter and you can have a companion who will from time to time say something interesting. I don't wanna spoil too much of this either. The cities are very immersive and they look great, some of them look too similar, some too small , I guess this is something that they still need to improve. The dungeons and forts looks pretty good, they still lack a bit of morbidness and darkness though depending on the denizens. I think this is the greatest feature of Skyrim, please do take your time to absorb the environment. The creatures and humanoids and others The AI is dumbed down, at least that's my imperssion of it. I think the creatures behaviour is better than that of the NPC's. Once again they've added some creatures that will most likely rip you apart when you're low level and playing on adept or higher difficulty, a good example would be the saber cat. I'll be honest with you, I'm scared of that beast. Just like in Skyrim, in Oblivion it was the mountain lion or a Yao-Guai in Fallout 3. I'm glad that the trolls are still depicted as dangerous and annoying. The wildlife is very rich and quite immersive in this release ( disregarding the occasional random behaviour ). I like the presentation of most of the enemies, they all feel very lore friendly. The city folk are still a bit lacking in my opinion, but that's about it. Finally the dragons are a big disappointment. Not their looks or the animations and so on. It's that the combat is poorly designed for them. Not to mention that the dragons are very weak. Storywise well presented in general. Quests and Events While some are immersive, some are very poorly designed. I think they made progress overall in comparison to the previous game. Some quests are really worth the time, but still a lot of them lack challenge. I think it's still worth to take the time and try them all out. I think the player is given too much freedom sometimes, which results in some events and quests looking a bit poor. Mods When trying to use mods, execute extreme caution, you might end up having to reinstall the game a lot of times before getting them all to work well. Feel free to ask me for any advice since I have years of experience with this. Luckly for us, we have a very solid modding community since the days of Morrowind. There will be plenty of amazing mods out there for you to choose from. While new players tend to stick to cosmetic mods and adding more "stuff" mods, there are plenty of quest mods that need to be given thought. Music Once again the music is composed by the legendary Jeremy Soule , his music enchanted the exprience of the previous installments ( Oblivion and Morrowind ), including this one. I hope The Elder Scrolls will continue to be blessed with Jeremy Soule's music of epic proportions! While this review is long, I still could have written a lot more, but I don't want to include some spoilers. Looking forward for the next release. Still having fun playing this game. A big thanks to my friend who gave me the game, King Viking! Thanks for taking your time to read this.
Fangz;-;It doesn't matter: how many characters you create, how many saves you load, how many mods you install, how many times you escape Helgen, how many Ralofs you meet, how many times you become thane of Whiterun, how many Dragons you slay, how many journies to High Hrothgar you take, how many shouts you learn, how many people you kill, how many pouches of gold you steal, how many contracts you fulfill, how many quests you complete, how many potions you have, how many different sets of armor you craft, how many different types of weapons you craft, how many horses you purchase how many people you marry, how many children you adopt, how many homes you buy, how many sweet rolls you eat, how many pouches of gold you acquire, how many times you become the Dovahkiin, ...you can never prevent a guard from taking an arrow to the knee... 11 kneecaps /10 kneecaps
ArturaxNZ;-;Fantasy Hero Simulator 2011 Stupid Nords insulted my choice to become a mage, calling into question my manliness. I can shoot fire from one hand and lightning from another. I killed a dragon and absorbed its power. My shout is so powerful that people stagger backwards. TELL ME NORDS, DO YOU STILL THINK THAT I AM UNMANLY NOW?! (10/10, would mage again)
I wasted $70 on Sawed-Off Skins;-;Skyrim. It's that one game you're tempted to flood with mods. Play as a sword wielding man who was accused of crimes, he did not commit. Khajiit did no crimes indeed. Hang in there Inigo. So you escape the prison, and follow the magnificently created story of the rasberry cupcakes versus the dangerous blueberry pancakes, two dangerous enemies locked in mortal combat as they try and gain control of Oblivion, the land of Jesus Christ our lord and savior. Choose from over 16 different races and wield the best weapons that Morrowind can provide you, such as a toothpick, a chainshark, and the most famous weapon that history has ever seen, the M82 Barrett 50 Caliber Anti-Materiel Rifle. Battle your way through countless amounts of enemies, all with differing stats and alignments. Join a variety of teams for good matches of Capture the Flag, with infamous clans such as the Brotherhood of Steel, NCR Rangers, The Sisters of Chaos, and many more. And of course, get indulged in the famous story of Skyrim, choosing sides in the epic war waged by the Cupcakes and Pancakes, while also going for some quest about having a tea party with Alduin, the famed Rabbit Dragon. Are you man enough to kick Alduin in the face and take his lunch money? Find out, by spending 20 (Or less, depending on sales) bucks and playing Skyrim. Or your friend could just get it for you. THANKS RYAN. The Elder Scrolls III: Skyrim! Er. Dank Souls: Prepare to Die Edition Uhm. SKYRIM, LADIES AND GENTLEMEN.
Konjiki no Yami;-;spawned 1000 sweetrolls in Whiterun and got crushed by them 10/10 goty
snaly;-;If this game were a potato, it would be a bacon-wrapped potato.
swift;-;For 3 years and still, can make you play for hours.
Frostdr4gon2;-;Before the release of paid mods I would recommend this game. Now that it has become a PAY4FUN game I think the steam might just go kill itself and it killed the ratings on Skyrim. Until they change this horrible decision I refuse to play this game further because I now no longer "recommend" it.
SneakyKittenZ;-;Change "New ways to support workshop creators" to "New ways to support Valve and Bethesda." Very misleading, thumbs down.
Overburn;-;The base game is not nearly as good as it is with mods. And now, all the lovely mods that made the game GREAT, are behind a paywall. If modders wanted to get paid. . . why did they bother making all these mods for FREE in the first place? I am not going to support this and i never will. A donate button, yes. A paywall? NEVER. Enough said.
Unknown;-;Remember Originally posted by M'aiq the Liar : Too much magic can be dangerous. M'aiq once had two spells and burned his sweetroll. Nine bottles of skooma and moon sugar portion for the developers and i neeeeeed mooore Skoooma!
sirbnneville;-;>puts basket on shopkeepers head >steals everything > "See anything ya like? I've got loads of stuff!" 10/10 would basket npcs to loot shop again
Totaly not a try hard.;-;] Bob is building an army to fight the war against Paid Mods.  ...\/ Copy and paste him all over the work shop so he Il]. Defeat Greedy Valve Employees!!! ... / \ Sorry Bethesda
Midna-Kun;-;Game: The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim Genre(s): RPG, Adventure, Open World, Fantasy Personal Rating: 10/10 Why Is This Game Good Midna? Skyrim is a game that brings hours of gameplay for a very small price, the world is beautiful, the quests bring a challenge to every player and so on. In my opinion, Skyrim has to be one of the best RPG games out there, because you can do so much! Once you finish the main game quests, you can still continue to play this game as there are missions that randomly come up when you speak to characters. If you don't like Skyrim how it is, you can modify it, Steam has a Skyrim Workshop and you can change the way your world looks, you can also visit the Nexus Website which is where a lot of people post their mods. In Skyrim, you can have followers that will follow you into the darkest depths of Skyrim, they can help you fight or they can fight for you, they can even live with you in your home. You end up getting a lot of homes, in most of the cities in Skyrim, my favourite is my house in Solitude, which is in my favourite city. I promise you now, that the only way that this game will annoy you is if you download too many mods and your game crashes (thats happened to me a lot). Now that I have finished the main quests in Skyrim, I just roleplay and live in Solitude, I live with Jessica Alba (a mod). I take a lot of screenshots of Skyrim and post them on Steam for everyone to see. Please go and buy this game! Its simply amazing! Thanks for reading!
Killazon;-;Paid mods is a scam. DO NOT BUY THIS GAME until the whole "mod gate" has been resolved!
Ace-of-Shade;-;My character was a Breton named, "pleb" -I'm a 2nd class citizen in Nord Society -Found a Nord woman to marry -Mods gave me a dozen half-nord babies. -Wife left me cuz I can't please a woman... -Forced to quest in dungeons to feed my children. -A dragon killed all the kids and burned down my shack. -Now I drink Skooma. I'd do it all again: 10/10
gbwment;-;Skyrim is all about mods. Now mods are paid DLC. Good job taking the crown of greediness from EA, Activision, and Ubisoft
An Fanatical Cuntnut;-;When did Valve and Bethesda become the new EA?
Noblica;-;Birthplace of paid mods
[IB]Kielan;-;Boycotting Steam Workshop, going to get all my mods from the modders themselves, it's an appauling the middle man is taking such a massive cut, this is not helping the modders as they have to charge even more just to get 1 buck, this is profiteering from other peoples creativity, anyone who buys a mod from the workshop is encouraging this exploitation! Games awesome, Valve has sunk to it's lowest.
Sheriff Rick;-;Great game. But paying for mods is completely ridiculous.
jacksap;-;So this is a good game, but the upcoming mod workshop has Valve taking a whopping 75% of the profit from original content that mod makers sell. So picture this. You make an expansion for Skyrim yourself and put it on steam workshop and make say $500 with it. Of that $500, you will only see $125. The rest is split between Bethesda and Valve. Similar arrangements to these like Google Play or the Apple App Store see a 60-40 split in the developer's favor. The workshop is set up 25-75 in store owner's favor. I don't have a problem seeing mod makers get paid, but claiming that this is a tool to empower burgeoning young game-makers is a lie. 25/100, would not mod.
Lowloader;-;Worst business model since dungeon keeper mobile.
Manuel the Poolboy;-;paid mods nty ...-~^^~-_ .......-^*'' : : '' : : : : *- ..-* : : :--/ : : : : : : : '\ ./ : : -* . .| : : : : : : : : '| .../ : -* . . . | : : : : : : : : | ...\-* . . . . .| : : : : : : : :'| .../ . . . . . . '| : : : : : : : :| ..../ . . . . . . . .'\ : : : : : : : | ../ . . . . . . . . . .\ : : : : : : :| ./ . . . . . . . . . . . '\ : : : : : / .../ . . . . . . . . . . . . . *--*' .'/ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . '| / . . . . . . . ./ . . . . . . .| ../ . . . . . . . .'/ . . . . . . .'| ./ . . . . . . . . / . . . . . . .'| '/ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .'| '| . . . . . \ . . . . . . . . . .| '| . . . . . . \_^-  . . . . .'| '| . . . . . . . . .'\ .\ ./ '/ . | '| .\ . . . . . . . . . \ .'' / . '| | . . . . . . . . . . / .'/ . . .| | . . . . . . .| . . / ./ ./ . .|
stuurm;-;So long as paid mods are a thing I will not recommend this game to anyone. I will also recommend that everyone avoid Valve until they pull their heads out of their asses.
GrimBeef;-;Hiding mods behind a paywall is just disgusting! Why not a optional donation button, Valve?
Sofrits3;-;10/10 would not pay for mods again! :D Donations or bust. :/
zedoctor;-;I've spent 170 HRs on this game ( not counting the ones I had in the pirated version ) it is a masterpiece this thumbs down is to show that greed would turn a masterpiece into a big pile of trash. buy it..but don't mod it.
Cuddles;-;Payed mods? https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FopyRHHlt3M
gbwment;-;Skyrim is all about mods. Now mods are paid DLC. Good job taking the crown of greediness from EA, Activision, and Ubisoft
An Fanatical Cuntnut;-;When did Valve and Bethesda become the new EA?
Zaric;-;Latest game in the Elder Scrolls series (prior to Elder Scrolls Online), many elements of the game have been dumbed down and/or streamlined for more casual gamers to get into it. If you ignore all the great things from previous games though this game stands on it's own merits as a fun romp through a sandbox world. The singlular reason to buy this game on steam rather than on the console is the capablity to be modded. Check the Steam Workshop and the Nexusmods for details on that. You are in control - you can change the difficutly at any time, you can install whatever mods you want to make the game more enjoyable. Anything you want you can do. If you want to challange yourself, legendary difficutly + difficutly enhancing mods exist. If you want it easy, then novice difficutly lets you hack and slash your way through the story and of course there are all shades in between. Swords, Maces, Bows/Crossbows, Shields, Dual Wielding, Magic, and more. Play the way you want that's the name of the game. Your experience is what you make of it, imagine you are in a story and play that way!
SUPA SET;-;It's like Far Cry 3 with dragons. 10/10
Bogot;-;The Dragonborn Comes Our Hero, our Hero, claims a warrior's heart I tell you, I tell you, the Dragonborn comes With a Voice wielding power of the ancient Nord art Believe, believe, the Dragonborn comes It's an end to the evil of all Skyrim's foes Beware, beware, the Dragonborn comes For the darkness has passed and the legend yet grows You'll know, you'll know, the Dragonborn's come Dovahkiin, Dovahkiin Naal ok zin los vahriin Wah dein vokul mahfaeraak ahst vaal Ahrk fin norok paal graan Fod nust hon zindro zaan Dovahkiin, fah hin kogaan mu draal
Bogot;-;The Dragonborn Comes Our Hero, our Hero, claims a warrior's heart I tell you, I tell you, the Dragonborn comes With a Voice wielding power of the ancient Nord art Believe, believe, the Dragonborn comes It's an end to the evil of all Skyrim's foes Beware, beware, the Dragonborn comes For the darkness has passed and the legend yet grows You'll know, you'll know, the Dragonborn's come Dovahkiin, Dovahkiin Naal ok zin los vahriin Wah dein vokul mahfaeraak ahst vaal Ahrk fin norok paal graan Fod nust hon zindro zaan Dovahkiin, fah hin kogaan mu draal
James64bit;-;I killed so many dragons, became Dragonborn, slaughtered some people, stole gold and stuff... Then I went home and played Skyrim, it was pretty good.
Fruners;-;Game of the Year. Every series.
e;-;I wasn't aware just how necessary a magical argonian experience is to my life until I purchased this software. Thank you Bethesda.
LdSuShi;-;Gorgeous! Wonderful! Just perfect!! Definitely the game for the year 2011 and one the best games i've ever played. Bunch of complex missions, infinite sub missions, a huge and marvellous map to explore, awesome fights, great weapons to upgrade and so on...You must play this game!!
DeadFeline5;-;I love this game. But those paid mods.
Shady;-;WOOHOOO I GET TO BUY THINGS THAT I USED TO GET FOR FREE BEFORE!!!
Achievementace1;-;I used to LOVE Bethesda games but I want them to know just how terrible the idea of paying for workshop content is.
ThatGuyWithCake;-;This is an awesome game that had the gaming community thriving with the production of unthinkable and amazing modifications, but since they have the pay for mods thing going, its probrobly the worst scam for money i have ever seen.
Waffenbaum;-;"Paid mods" is an absolutely filthy business practice thought up by the money-grubbing s who brought you the Oblivion horse armor. Bethesda and Valve needs to clean up their act. I can't recommend this game, as the modding scene has always been an integral part of bethesdas games and half the reason for buying any of their games. Now that they are monetizing modding, they are fixing to destroy the very thing that extends the lives of their games.
Towerbooks3192;-;Game would have been perfect. However, They introduced paid mods.
How many letters can I fit in my;-;This game is amazing, and I've been wanting to get the game for PC for a long time now, but since Steam is turning into a money-gobbling  like EA and making you pay for mods, the experience for me is ruined. This game is great without mods, but if your looking to play the game how you wanna play it, I suggest you wait until this 'pay for mods' thing has gone away.
Fruit Roll Ups;-;YOU WERE THE CHOSEN ONE YOU WERE SUPPOSED TO DESTROY THE SITH, NOT JOIN THEM
Tactical_Zombeh;-;After all these years Bethesda wants to take money from the modders who have diligently patched, fixed and expanded the buggy mess that is vanilla Skyrim. Bethesda should be paying modders directly for breathing life into their game and keeping it popular over the years.
314159ACE;-;boring without mods now i have to pay to have fun thanks valve
Clementine The Kitty;-;Game is absolute  without mods, and considering you now have to pay for mods, it's pointless. Don't support anti-consumer companies. Don't support Paying for mods. The people also wanting to support workshop creators, Valve and Bethesda take 75% of the profits, and they have to make atleast 100$ until the mod creator can make even a cent.
Literally Polio;-;now a paywall to find out how broken some parts of the game are, then spend more money to fix the poor work bethesda did on it. NOT IMPRESSED STEAM.
Murdon;-;God I loved this game to death and for the longest time I have recommended to many friends as a good game to just **** around on since it had so many amazing mods. But now with the implementation of paid mods and the threat of further implemenation to other potentially just as amazing games I can't recommend this game to anyone now. I'm scared at how much this has schismed a once helpful and active community of a fairly old game. I agree with the many thousands of other like minded indviduals that say this "paywall" is horrendous and that it should be removed and replaced with a donation button instead. Valve should keep its greedy hands out of something that has been free since it started. Mods have turned many games into bestsellers and made many buggy games into easier to play tolerable messes, without mods many games would never have reached there level of fame they have. Why Bethesda and Valve would want to ruin this and how much it has helped them is beyond me, hopefully we can make them see the error of their ways. Once we have, I will change this review to the one this game deserves.
Oh my god,the bees!;-;Shame on you Valve. Mods is suppose to be a labor of love, not greed.
Jacob;-;Paid mods, unethical.
PyBroBot;-;This was a good game years ago. If only there were some way for me to spice it up a bit, maybe adding new content created by other people who love the game. Oh, well. Since that doesn't seem to exist, I can't recommend this game in good conscience.
Leutnant Otto Von Hitzig;-;60 dollars for the base game I can happily pay. 60/100 dollars on DLC I can stomach. 60/100 dollars for mods borderline required to make the game play at it's maximum is ed up. Valve getting 75% of that for doing  all is flat out offensive.
Mr. Pazuzu;-;0/10 with paid mods
Leutnant Otto Von Hitzig;-;60 dollars for the base game I can happily pay. 60/100 dollars on DLC I can stomach. 60/100 dollars for mods borderline required to make the game play at it's maximum is ed up. Valve getting 75% of that for doing  all is flat out offensive.
SniperWarrior3;-;I love the game! the only thing is, i bought this on steam and on my pc for the reason that i wanted to use mods. now that Valve and Bethesda have made the  desicion of making mods paid, the reason to buy this on pc has become moot. if you have a supported console, buy this on console, unless you want to pay $50 bucks extra for 3 mods...
Bamicee;-;Why they had to introduce paid mods the way that they did is beyond me, all i know now is that my game is ruined and alot of time has been wasted.
Nimja;-;Pay for mods!? Something that has always been free! And 75% goes to Valve/Steam and Bethesda? No. Infact I will never buy another Bethesda game again.
Captain Buggernuts;-;I refuse to play this game or buy any more of Bethesda's products. Paying other people, and then taking 75% of their profits to fix/modify your game is not just wrong, it's stupid.
Xilandro;-;Today we all mourn the passing of an old friend, by the name of Modding. Modding lived a long life but died from big companies greed today. We will always remember you. Requiescat in pace.
the cat;-;Like most Bethesda games, Skyrim is only mediocre when played without mods. With mods, the games cool factor rises a million times over. Mods let you change almost every element of the game, adding immeasurable fun, and replay value. With that said, this is going to be a negative review because Bethesda, and Valve, have enabled a system where modders can now sell their mods on Steam. This act has already led to some modders pulling their mods from free sites like Nexus. Why is it a bad thing for modders to be paid for their work? Because that's not what modding is all about. I also mod, but I would never charge someone for something that is essentially done for fun, and with the notion of sharing with others. Modding has always been something done by the fans of a game, for other fans of the game. For companies like Steam, and Bethesda, to try to monetize that, is nothing more than greed. And get this, the modders only recieve 25% of what they charge for their mods. Guess who gets the other 75%. This move sets a really bad precedent for things to come. You may not play Skyrim, but what if Valve started doing this to all their games? Modders for all games could potentially start charging people, and then the whole modding community would just turn into a huge market that nets big money for greedy corporations. So, though I had fun with it in the past, I do not recommend Skyrim to anyone. It's your call to get it, but when the only thing that makes the game any good, is about to become paid DLC, that's when the game turns foul in my mind.
im-oneal;-;Congratulation,this game is over!
poopah444;-;Paywall with mods. AND the moders only get 25%... sickening.
Commodore BodyShot;-;Paying for mods? Hell no.
MasterSarik;-;This game was great before paid mods. Now I wish I never bought it!
bluestang02;-;75% cut on paid mods, no thanks.
Rieth;-;Paying for mods that aren't guaranteed to work after a game update is a terrible idea and you should feel bad Bethesda.
Red Fish;-;"What the f*ck did you just f*cking say about me, you little milk drinker? Ill have you know I graduated top of my class in the Mage's College of Winterhold, and Ive been involved in numerous secret raids on Summerset Isle, and I have over 300 confirmed Dragon souls absorbed. I am trained in hand-to-hand and magic combat, and Im the top swordsman in the entire Imperial Legion. You are nothing to me but just another lesser Dragon. I will wipe you the f*ck out with pure brute force the likes of which has never been seen before on Nirn, mark my f*cking words. You think you can get away with saying that sh*t to me? Think again, f*cker. As we speak I am contacting my secret network of Dark Brotherhood assassins across the whole of Tamriel and your presence is being traced right now so you better prepare for the storm, maggot. The storm that wipes out the pathetic little thing you call your life. Youre f*cking dead, kid. I can be anywhere, anytime, and I can kill you in over seven hundred ways, and thats just with my bare hands. Not only am I extensively trained in unarmed combat, but I have access to the entire arsenal of the Empire of Cyrodiil and I will use it to its full extent to wipe your miserable  off the face of the continent, you little sh*t. If only you could have known what unholy retribution your little clever comment was about to bring down upon you, maybe you would have held your f*cking tongue. But you couldnt, you didnt, and now youre paying the price, you  idiot. I will sh*t fury and Thu'um all over you and you will drown in it. Youre f*cking dead, troll bait."
MrBigPersonality;-;So this game at first the pinnacle of pc gaming has now become the downfall!
bambucha;-;Wanted to start playing it but now i wont, because i do not want to pay for mods, because the money from purchases is mostly going to valve and bethesda game studios instead of to mod developer. Not fair.
SoraniL;-;Vanilla game is somewhat fine But I can't recommend this game in good faith. Sadly valve and bethesda decided they need to get 30% and 45% on the work from the community who only get a measly 25% Pay mods are wrong, so is getting 75% of someone elses work for hosting it. And will lead to countless abuse from people trying to make some cash. The first few paid mods are already mods that stole assets from other games, mods that were pulled from other sites at no benefit in quality... The only people profiting from this are Valve and bethesda. Please do not validate their business practice, do not buy their products for as long as this system exist.
hodie;-;(Shady attempt at Mod monetisation aside) Skyrim has stood the test of time to become established as one of the greatest action RPGs developed, reaching such a pinnacle in part due to the superb modding community- that must be mentioned in conjunction with the vanilla games effort- elevating it into a true time killer even if youve put hundreds of hours into it- like I did- on console first.
HolyExecutioner;-;Can't believe they're charging for mods now. I'm not supporting this game or valve/steam until they get rid of this new atrocious system.
RaptoR;-;This is one of the best adventures you can play: long and storyrich main quest with huge amount of sidequests to venture through! With the official Dragonborn, Dawnguard and Heartfire dlcs there's tons of places to see and enormous amount of quests to complete. If you somehow run out of stuff to find then there's the modding possibility. SO MANY mods are out there (Steam Workshop, Skyrim Nexus...) to give you more quests, items and whatever. With all the mods it's pretty much endless adventure waiting for you as Dragonborn. The best ability of course is shouting at everything you see. It's pretty funny to make people fly away when you feel upset about someone stealing your sweetroll... Some caves and especially Dwarven ruins tend to be pretty boring to go to after some time since they are pretty long (Dwarven ruins) and linear (just killing tons of same enemies to find something/somebody or to get somewhere) but other than that it's a beautiful and rich game in so many ways that there is no reason why you shouldn't give it a try! Btw never attack chickens... those s seem to be pretty valuable in Skyrim since everyone is willing to kill you if you harm them.
Matulaak;-;This morning my dog took a sheeet on my neighbours lawn, then I had to clean it up. Also this game is pretty good.
Nixophiel;-;Conclusion on why this game is worth buying: 1. Delicious sweetrolls. 2. Space program with the giants. 3. CABBAGES. 4. Hide and seek with the dead. 5. Chicken. 6. Physics-defying horses. 7. Have I mentioned cabbages? 8. Fresh products in ancient caves/dungeons. 9. Totally-not-annoying immortal children. 10. Mmmm skooma mmmmm 11. FUS RO DAH!!
Danatz;-;This game doesn't need a recommendation. There are some caves with spiders putting their own torches. 200/10 Must play.
Miqqaela;-;Addictive AND org4smic. Best combination
Kanye West: The Last Rockstar;-;I spent over 70 hours playing and still haven't met the Greybeards. 9/10
Trinket;-;Wow. What happened to my life? 10/10
iarethom;-;Microtransactions for mods has killed all hope for the PC Master Race.
Luke Thighwalker;-;The only thing that kept the game going has now been drastically reduced
FRANKLIN;-;This is the death of the small mod, well done to those involved. Anyone posting counter reviews have no foresight
Oxiclean;-;Not Recommended due to now paid mods. killing the community. Thanks Obama.
danieru;-;I'm sure you can guess my reasons for not liking the game. Just look around. Destroying the modding community has destroyed this game.
Dju;-;This negative review is prompted by Valve's new practice of selling mods and passing it off as a courtesy to the mod creators, all the while taking the lion's share of the profits. Want to really support mod creators? Remove this atrocity of a paywall and add way of donating to the authors directly. Use NEXUS for mods.
Juciest Pineapple;-;pay money for mods... 0/10 IGN
Vargas;-;valve's move has destroyed the SKyrim modding community thus destroying the game, and in the process has killed one of Skyrims greatest modders.
ho nonor mo hercy _;-;- YOBA (poor products of the modern video game industry) game Console port and suffers from console illnesses: Bad inventory interface Very simplified for broad audience (apparently 12 yrs old boys who pause from call of duty) Occasional horrible design - freaking samurai swords for "Blades" ! bad design ! BAD ! Not as half as good compared to Morrowind can't stress enough how shallow the game is + Characters and Locations from Elder Scrolls universe Some quests and dialogues are well written. Occasional very impressive design! The mods by the Community were epic and made this game epic, but not anymore! They are getting behind the paywall now. without mods 6/10
Silver Tongue | /v/ was right;-;Buy it somewhere else. Don't support Steam's blatant money grab and destruction of a 15 year old mod community.
Scruffy the Janitor;-;great game paid mods suck
Sylvaron;-;Love the base game, loved the mods, protesting the paid mod system.
Pope of Rock&Roll;-;I can not recommend Skyrim, or any other game that follows in these shameful footsteps, to anyone.
[....];-;Screw paid Mods
Whuups;-;Mods are now PAID DLC. With no garanty that they will work in the future and no return policy after 24h. RIP
[UESC]Chucky Dickens=FILTH=;-;Skyrim, great game. Plenty of time on the Console version (PS3) but now here on pc, the very essence of our community is being corrupted. NO PAID MODS!
Teddy M;-;Glorified DLC made by amateurs in their basement from recycled assets? Sign me up! addendum april 23rd, 2015, never forget the day that Bethesda and Steam tried to screw players and modders
Kerigor;-;What once was a wonderful game has been ruined by microtransactions introduced under the guise of "paid mods" by the likes of Valve and Bethesda. I do not recommend purchasing this title, on sale or otherwise.
Jish;-;Pay for mods, what the  valve?
Wafflehead Man;-;So, what you're telling ME, is that I can spend a few minutes writing a macro that gives the player max money, then put it on the workshop for $1? Man, what a great idea! /s
sW;-;I had to change my recommendation to negative since the paid mods were released. I have no problem with donating mod creators but it should be optional. Now it's just a new kind of DLC...
Beardozer;-;I dislike the new paid mod system implemented by both Bethesda and Valve. 1/10 until the recent changes to the mods are removed entirely. Edit: Valve and Bethesda have stepped back, and made mods free again. However, this negative review will serve as a reminder to both parties that paid mods will never be okay, and that this move has permanently damaged their reputation.
Lambo Lamperouge;-;Downloaded Naked Girls Mod, Some Awesome Armor and Houses Mods and Curvy Girls Mod and Prostitution Mod and Some Fantasy Armors mod. 11/10 Would Fap again.
Stupid Gun Skins;-;I use to be a Skyrim fan like you, then I took paid mods to the wallet.
[63e] Comrade Dimitri;-;Never in my life have I seen something so good become so corrupted so quickly. Paid mods. Those words should make every pc gamer cringe. I cant recommend simply because of this.
[]Munkee_King[];-;I love it, it gave me 2 years of fun, I played every playstyle, every race, every way, every DLC. I been from a straight up heavy armor warrior with a huge battleaxe that can turn into a werewolf, and could stand still taking every hit from a dragon without losing almost any health. To a master thief who isn't very strong but can sneak through a entire bandit camp without being seen once.. All the way to guy who never killed a soul, worked hard for his money chopping wood. Managing to build his own house and have a family. The main story with all the guilds you can join and areas to explore, you won't be bored for a long time. So don't just rush the main story and assume you seen it all. Out of the DLC's, the best would be Dragonborn. It offers a large new world, enemies, quests, armors and weapons. While the Dawnguard only offers a bit and a vampire lord form, and Hearthfire just lets you adopt kids and build homes. The worst thing about it, is there will be bugs, which can easily be fixed by console commands. But only use if needed, like after 5 retrys a quest won't finish or continue. 8/10 Only because it can get far too easy, and the bugs. You get stronger than all the enemies too quickly. So I say when you learn the game better, go on Master or Legendary difficulty for a challenge.
aXises;-;255 Mods later.....this is better than sex
Kaine;-;What else can i say, the best has been said. And yes, I really do recommend this game.
yogurt;-;Best mod simulator on the market.
ThatArbiterGuy;-;I got Master Chief as a follower and gave him Dante's (Devil May Cry) robes. We then fought in an epic battle of Reds and Blues. We ended the day by getting on a Broom and flying off into the sunset. 10/10
LordofHunger;-;There is so many ways to play this game, and so many things to explore that I could have easily put in another 200+ hours had I not completed all the achievements. If you don't like grinding, theres plenty to do. If you like grinding, build a house. Or three...
Stinkbrain;-;At least give the modders a higher percentage. Otherwise you can suck on my downvote.
GaimeGuy;-;With Valve and Bethesda making a move to destroy one of the greatest aspects of PC Gaming (The modding scene) this week, turning mods into 3rd party DLC that has none of the quality assurance, compatibility, testing, or support that an official product has (yet 75% of the revenue goes to valve and bethesda), I urge everyone reading this review to NOT buy Skyrim. I've owned the game since launch, I own all the DLC, I've played over 200 hours (and basically done nothing in the process) with countless (free) mods... but what valve and bethesda are doing with the paid workshop is pathetic and terrible for consumers and the PC gaming community. Do not support it with your money.
Dan - www.bestgamedeals.uk;-;Paid mods. AVOID.
Kelvar;-;Valve and Bethesda joined hands to venture to the dark side, I do not support. Rise to fight for free mods!
Darkrayquazza;-;This new modding change is tearing the Skyrim community apart. It needs fixed.
Asir Midgar;-;amazing game but ruined pay4mods
Djdan_FTW;-;Just because I don't like the "paid mods." I personally think that there are better ways to support developers.
[DP] Brodin;-;Edit: Valve and Bethesda have decided to listen to the community and have scrapped the paid workshop, at least for now. I applaud them for taking down the paid workshop, and as such have regained some of my trust. However, I will be leaving my review as "Not Recommended" to serve as a reminder. Original: Honestly this game is good, but because both Valve and Bethesda have decided to introduce a paywall for mods I can no longer recommend Skyrim. I urge everyone who doesn't own the game already to refrain from buying this game. Bethesda and Valve have also lost a customer and I refuse to purchase anymore of their games, unless they reverse their stance on paid mods.
reX;-;I can't get through the ing intro becuse the horse get stuck in ing everything...... or i keeep spinning like a ing idiot through the hole intro!!!!! ffs
arachnidsGrip;-;Don't do it, your life will slowly start to disappear 10/10 Game of the Year
LC <3;-;i never thought skyrim is this much fun with advantures, if i knew it back then i would have bought it when it first come out. im so addicted playing skyrim but then i took an arrow to the knee <3---(knee)---<<<
El Kemosabe;-;Quite possibly the greatest game ever made by mere mortals. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim takes you on a journey through Skyrim, a province of Tamriel. The dragons have returned and as the Dragonborn it's your mission to send the lizards of the sky back to where they came from! With a good main story-line accompanied by terrific side quest lines and DLC all backed up by a lore which comes a close second to the Fallout series this game really does have the perfect base for a singleplayer game. The gameplay is also fun and very rewarding, with 6 different difficult levels as well as numerous playstyles to try you'll never play the same game twice. But that's not why you buy Skyrim for PC, the modding community is what you buy Skyrim for. With one of the most dedicated and skilled mod communities going this game can have almost anything you could possibly want and more. The best bit is thanks to the programs available modding your game couldn't be easier to mod and thanks to the Creation Kit you to can get in on the action! The Verdict: Gameplay 8/10 Story 7/10 Lore 9/10 Replayability 10/10 Graphics (unmodded) 7/10 Graphics (modded) 10/10 Overall Rating: 9.5 El K.
Trykolos;-;Do you like Role play games? Then Skyrim is the perfect game for you! You can create a Charakter and can choose a Race like: - Altmer (High-Elf) - Bosmer (Wood-Elf) - Argonian - Breton - Dunmer (Dark-Elf) - Imperial - Khajiit - Nord - Orsimer (Orc) - Redguard You can play as a warrior or an magician (or both) and level your charakter up. There are lots of skill perks for your Chara. Also you can become some special creatures like a Werwolf or a Vampire (DLC Dawnguard gives you a powerfull Vampire Lord.) ---- In Skyrim there are lots of Quests and a exciting Main - Story. Main: The Dragons are back and something is bring them back alive. The Dragonborn is the one who can kill the Dragons and save the world. But where are the Dragonborn? .. Everybody is hopeless cause it's the end of the world... But you are the one who can protect the world of the end and save everybody! Cause you are a real Dragonborn! You are the one who kill Alduin the World eater and stop the dragons. Also there are lots of more storys in different guilds like the Dark Brotherhood (Assassins), the thiefs guild, The Companions or for the magicians the magicians school. Also you can choose between the Imperials or the Stormlocks and can fight in the war. So, Skyrim is the best role play game i ever played and everbody who love rpg's have to buy this.
The Dark Brother;-;Best game ever! Love It.
Torasko;-;One of the best games ever, period. If you don't own Skyrim already, open your wallet right now and buy it!
Matty-Kun;-;So, What do we say about ' The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim '. No words to describe it, Buy it, Play it, Beat it, Mod it, Play again, Lose your social life, Repeat everyday. - Rules of Skyrim 2014
Starsandstripe;-;Supports paid mods
Kelvish Shuzen;-;This game is honestly the best game I've played. I've sat down and played countless hours on the elder scrolls games but this tops it off. A great follow up and so much better than elder scrolls online that was recently released as the next in the series. If you are skeptical of this game still I'm not done yet. There are thousands of hours of modding put in by a dedicated modding community that adds around 1000+ hours of new content just by using the mods from the workshop, if youve looked at the workshop and it doesnt look big with only 10,000 mods, you have the nexus with over 30,000 that adds so much to your game and if you have complaints there is a mod for it that changes it and makes your experience amazing and fully immersive. The game challenges you to patience and choosing the right moment to do things and it really adds in an immersive way of living in the elder scrolls with full ability to extend your abilites in the largest scale open world map ever made. You can slaughter a city of the rebels - the stormcloaks, or delve deep into dungeons recovering powerful artifacts that can help you on your way to the top of the chain. As your progress your story the way the people of skyrim treat you differentiates, you can slay a dragon and they start to say "Youve slain a few dragons in your time" Or when you become the whisperer of the dark brotherhood you find npcs every so often that use the dark brotherhood greeting "hail sithis". There is a whole new experience to everything you have ever experienced in a game. Buy the game.
Smitey McSmiterson;-;Skyrim is easily one of the best games of this generation. Its one of the games that you get as much out of as you put in. Its also one of the games you play exactly how you want to play. You can choose to ignore the main story immediately after beginning or play through the quests like a linear action adventure game. Speaking of quests, theres an awful lot of them. The main story is centred on the return of dragons to the world. Pretty soon, you find out you are the legendary Dragonborn, a man or woman with the ability to consume dragon souls. Its your job to find out why the reptiles have returned and try and protect the world from this new menace. two thumbs from me! because the game deserves it.
Mehixan;-;10/10 Would Mod again One of the best experiences I have had during my many gaming experiences,  the game was so amazing on console I was forced to buy it again on pc, and thats saying somthing due to the fact that half the fun in this game is to see how much you can mod the  out of it until it crashes your poor little pc. Do yourself a favor if you have not tried this game out go an buy it and hopefully have as much fun with it as I have.
Bluehomzee;-;Shouted a goat off a cliff 10/10
Smelly JaiL MuFF;-;Didnt like it because of the non dynamic, extremely loose controls/combat. tried it with a controller to see if the experience would change or improve, I get poor remapping options or difficult to find out how to invert camera controls on the analog sticks. Annoyed at the fact I am forced to go through cut scenes/scenarios Everything I can't stand in a game 1. forced scenarios/cut scenes with out a skip feature 2. poor button options/remapping 3. bad UI 4. horrible linear/non dynamic combat. 5. bad loose controls/character control synconization
Ragmority;-;It was fun but paying for mods just ruined the whole game.
Napoleon Bonaparte (Trading);-;I love this game. even if I don't have many hours on it, i played it for very long but I do disagree with paid mods! Valve and Steam decided to start making people pay for mods, otherwise id give this 10/10! but I hope that the paid mod idea goes away, this is just crazy
Yadoodle;-;would give 9/10 but there are paid mods... YES U HEARD RIGHT .... PAID MODS! 8/10
-=[HeyHoSilver]=-;-;The community made Skyrim, you and your mods what they are today. And now you betray this community over night for lousy 25% ? Shame on you! Earn money for your work is good. But not in such a sneaky way you did! Skyrim Review: Great game! Sadly with questionable company policy behind it..... Can i recommend it? : Not any more, at least not under this circumstances.
Kernel Sanders;-;business practices,  review
Kiirar;-;Paid mods, are you absolutely kidding? Overly greedy, ruining what was once a good game.
BigMoser;-;Paid Workshop has now poisoned this game. We need a doctor.
TauRus;-;I personally recommended this game to all my friends who was interested or not in gaming- it was my absolute favorite game of all times- thanks to this great modding-community :'D - but it was in the time back when the main-character weren't KNOWN AS THE ''DLC-BORN'' >:(
Larsen;-;Paid mods. Yeah, I know. Sounds great. Just like Kickstarter, Greenlight and early access.
Shrapnel;-;Paid. Mods.
Smelly JaiL MuFF;-;Didnt like it because of the non dynamic, extremely loose controls/combat. tried it with a controller to see if the experience would change or improve, I get poor remapping options or difficult to find out how to invert camera controls on the analog sticks. Annoyed at the fact I am forced to go through cut scenes/scenarios Everything I can't stand in a game 1. forced scenarios/cut scenes with out a skip feature 2. poor button options/remapping 3. bad UI 4. horrible linear/non dynamic combat. 5. bad loose controls/character control synconization
Ragmority;-;It was fun but paying for mods just ruined the whole game.
Napoleon Bonaparte (Trading);-;I love this game. even if I don't have many hours on it, i played it for very long but I do disagree with paid mods! Valve and Steam decided to start making people pay for mods, otherwise id give this 10/10! but I hope that the paid mod idea goes away, this is just crazy
Yadoodle;-;would give 9/10 but there are paid mods... YES U HEARD RIGHT .... PAID MODS! 8/10
-=[HeyHoSilver]=-;-;The community made Skyrim, you and your mods what they are today. And now you betray this community over night for lousy 25% ? Shame on you! Earn money for your work is good. But not in such a sneaky way you did! Skyrim Review: Great game! Sadly with questionable company policy behind it..... Can i recommend it? : Not any more, at least not under this circumstances.
|Spyx|;-;-I woke up people in their deep sleep, and they start to casually talk like "I have the best horses" -I stole people's goods right in front of their noses by just crouching -I took forever to slay a dragon, was so happy to absorb his soul but then some  interrupts and steals it anyway -Someone I knew died, a random NPC whom I met but cant remember anyway -My horse got killed by death hounds, couldnt save it -Rode Odaviings back -Glitched Alduin through a wall -Broke the game by getting too many mods -fixed the game by getting more mods -clipping skulls through my face to look badass -not wearing Daedric armor -Catman died through the wall, his tail was between his legs so it looked like a hairy  -not all mods are need to be paid for, so I dont understand what people are on about Overall, I love the game to death. Each book you find has its own story, btw.
Vaagur;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is an Open-world RPG with an awesome story and it has one of the biggest world to explore in any games ever made! In this game, you play as the Dragonborn, the chosen one that is meant to protect Skyrim from dragons. Honestly, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is probably one of the best game on Steam. The ambiance and everything is just so great! It's still one of the best selling games on Steam even 3 years after it's release! If you haven't played it yet and are you not sure if you should buy it, you can check my personal score below. Category Rating /10 Details Gameplay 8.1 The game is very well designed. You can set hotkeys for multiple spells or weapons at once, you can do questlines and misc quests at any times as long as you have the requirements, there's tons of content to explore... The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim doesn't offer anything new to the genre, however, and it's not very well balanced. Some dragons are easier to kill than some types of undeads found in dungeons. Also the AI can be quite confusing: sometimes monsters stands still and let you kill them, sometimes enemies do not even notice you walking in front of them with a high stealth level. Everybody can play the game due to good difficulty settings, but keep in mind the controls are poor and there's some weird balance going on! Graphics 8.0 The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim graphics are nice. Some things like Snow and NPCs are not very appealing, but during the time you play, you will find tons of amazing landscapes, skies, buildings and forests... That's for the base game of course, because you can make the game more beautiful with mods. As for the animations, most are fine, but rolling and ragdoll deaths are not so well done. The interface is simple and has just the right amount of information. Atmosphere 8.5 The music is totally amazing. It really fits the game: fighting music is intense and while exploring, the music really sets the atmosphere. Sound effects are alright, though repetitive. My opinion on voice acting is a bit more complex though. Honestly, I am impressed by some characters voice acting, like Cicero, Astrid, Senera, Sheogorath... They have very unique and amazing voices. On the other hand, some NPCs shares the same voice; like, litterally not just the same voice actor, but the same actual voice in game on multiple NPCs. Performance 4.8 Here's the weak point of the game, definately. The amount of bugs is just catastrophic. I could write a paragraph longer than this review to list all the bugs i've experienced while playing The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim for around 140 hours. Game breaking bugs where you cannot complete certain quest and hope that you can complete them with the console. Sometimes you need to restart the entire game from the start if you absolutely need to complete a certain quest. Your character can fall through the floor, monsters fall from the sky randomly, playing at higher than 60 fps will cause your game to act weird, some areas will just make your game crash upon loading... I know that the mod "Skyrim unofficial patches" can be downloaded to fix some of these issues, but with the game as is, you are going to be annoyed really quickly with the tons of bugs you will encounter during your playthrough of the game. As for the overall performance, the game runs quite smoothly at 60 fps at least. Story 9.2 The story is another very strong point of The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim. Some questlines in particular will get you so addicted to the game, that you will play it through until it's done. The fact that almost all of your choices affects the outcome and scenario of almost every single quests is just crazy. The amount of work put into this aspect of the game is huge! You can be a good guy, a bad guy or simply do just what you want. A certain character annoys you? Kill him! You recovered a powerful artifact that somebody asked you to get for him? If you want to keep it, you can! That's how much you can control your character's fate. Singleplayer 8.5 Well, since The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim only offers Singleplayer, this is just a resume of my review. The game is fun to play by yourself, it doesn't get boring at all and it's totally worth trying out. Just keep in mind, that bugs and crashes will affect your experience by a large margin unless you mod your game heavily. Even there, you might still experience some annoying bugs with mods, but it's definately gonna be better. Multiplayer -- This game features no co-op or multiplayer. Playtime 10 The game is known for excelling in this aspect. It took me 140 hours just to go through essensial parts of the game to complete all achievements. I have only done a few questlines and there's tons and tons of misc. quests that I have not started. Just in 1 playthrough you can spend from 100 to upward of 1000 hours depending on many quests you wanna finish, you many things you want to personally accomplish and if you want to craft full sets of gear, get to a very high level, unlock all magics, find all books, etc... Replayability is definately a strong point too! You can create a new character to try out a different race, look, build or just to re-do some questlines you might want to approach differently, because your choices in some quests will completely affect what happens during and after the quest. Prices 9.0 For the amount of content and playtime this game offers, US$19.99 (As of late 2014) is a steal. Sure the DLCs are quite expansive, but if you get the Legendary Edition for US$39.99 you will get much more content and a better price than individual DLCs by far. This game is totally worth buying at the listed price. Steam Features 10 It's got all the features you would hope for! The achievements in this game are super fun to work towards with only a few missable ones that you can easily manage to do if you read-up well enough before starting your game. It's got trading cards and most important, steam workshop support! As of late 2014, there are over 23,000 gameplay mods, items, quests, creatures... The list goes on. The modding community is extremely active for The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim! It's also got partial controller support and steam cloud. Game Score 8.1 Information Hours Details Time required to complete the game. ~30 hours. Main questline + few misc. quests and item farming. Time required to fully complete the game. 1000+ hours. All quests + collect items + max level in all skills... Etc. Time required to get 100% achievements in the game. ~140 hours. 75/75 achievements working, no particulary hard achievements.
Sassy The Sasquatch;-;I don't care what anyone says, Skyrim is one of the greatest games I have EVER played, I have dedicated SOOO much time into it, (Yes i know on my profile it says I haven't played it for all THAT long but I never really played it while connected to the internet so yeah) There was a time when I would play skyrim for close to 12 hours a day (yep sure did take my life away from me) It was actually my very first steam game. After dedicating even more time in TES IV Oblivion, I eventually got Skyrim in 2012 and I will admit that after creating all kinds of characters I did eventually get tired of it, that was until I discovered MMOxReview on Youtube (Great guy, check him out :)) I then started modding my skyrim game, and a once Great game turned into something legendary... Now to be honest I wasn't all THAT fond of the Main quest, BUT the thieves guild and Dark brotherhood in these games has always really inspired me, I just wish they could have made them both longer :( Unfortuantly I have never played the expansions for Skyrim seeing as though I can't afford it :( Yeah i know, sad isn't it, But that hasn't stopped me from playing Skyrim over and OVER again... TES Online... let's just say I probs will never play it because I just don't really like the looks of it. And I am VERY keen for TES VI (I think it is going to be set in Hammerfell) Please tell me if you would like me to write a guide for this game, I am quite happy to and I promise I won't use any of that noob language if i do. I highly recommend this game, I give it a score of 9.5/10 Have a nice day ;)
Sharles;-;Thanks for ruining free mods skyrim EDIT: paid mods removed, disregard this
Kurbatov;-;There are many reasons why we play games. Some play games to experience a story, some play to compete with others and some play to have experiences they have never had otherwise in real life. Alot play games to escape into another world, and live completely different lives, and this is what drives Bethesdas Elder Scrolls series, a series that has excelled in creating complete virtual worlds, inviting the player to live parallel lives. Skyrim is the latest world offered by Bethesda to live in, and it seems like its Bethesdas finest accomplishment yet. Similarly to the two Elder Scrolls games before it, you start off as a prisoner, and this case you are on your way to be executed. Just before the axe greets your neck, a dragon appears and the entire army base you were in goes into disarray. You are set free after the incident, and it is up to you to find out why are the dragons appearing, and what is your role in the whole ordeal (hint: it rhymes with Shmagonborn). Bethesda displays such dedication to concept of open world that makes other open world games pale in comparison. Skyrim isnt just a series of buildings, environments and NPCs, it is the closest there is to virtual living world in a game. The sense of freedom found in Elder Scrolls is unparalleled, and Skyrim is the best implementation of this yet. The main quest is a minimal part of the game, and most of the fun comes from exploring the world built for you. As you go exploring dungeons, assisting NPCs with their problems, joining factions and reading ingame books, you realize what a dense world Skyrim is. It is compelling to learn more about Skyrim, about its citizens and about its politics, and the more you learn about, the more you are invested in the well being of the world. Through all the running around and exploring, you come across a wide range of missions to complete. The main mission is, as usual, the most interesting one, but the rest of the missions can be worthy, and they are necessary to help you know more about the world. You can complete missions for The Companions (Skyrims equivalent of the Fighters Guild) to understand how ingrained the warrior culture is in Skyrim, or join the Mages College and be looked down upon by Nords who believe that magic is for sissies. Even miscellaneous missions, such as simply standing up for a Dark Elf against a bunch of racist Nords can be satisfying. Standard fetch quests are to be found here and there, but there are far from being the norm. The games graphics have been talked about endlessly. Now, Skyrims graphics are great, with detailed textures and wonderful environments. Yet it terms of detail, they dont hold a candle to games like Rage and Battlefield 3. Yet Skyrim is nicer to look at than the aforementioned games, and that is because of Skyrims aesthetics. Bethesda knows that when it comes to graphics, art direction trumps fidelity, and in Skryim, the beauty of the world comes from its style. Part of the reason Morrowind is generally viewed as a much better game than Oblivion is because of its fantastical designs; while Oblivion came off as a standard European fantasy setting, Morrowind was a truly outlandish and exotic location that had its own unique identity. Skyrim returns with the art direction that made Morrowind so unique. While the location might not be as exotic as Morrowind, Skyrim it is exactly the blistering norse region that you would think is occupied by burly, war-faring people. The buidlings, the environments, the apparel, the weapons, the creatures, and even the music all give Skyrim its unique identity, an identity that is inspired by real-life Scandinavia, but is in no way identical to it. ~~~~~~~~~~~~ The combat, which is one of the weaker aspects in previous Elder Scrolls, is drastically improved here. While there is still the feeling that you are hacking away at empty spaces instead of making a real impact on your enemy, but its not as bad as it was in previous games. The biggest addition to the combat system is the double wielding, and it works great. You can go for a sword in each hand, a sword and spell, or two spells, one in each hand. I personally went sword and staff, Gandalf style. There is also a favorite menu for items, a feature that pauses makes it easier to equip items in game. This is designed to save you the hassle of going to the main item screen during the game, but it also gives a tactical quality to the combat, since the menu pauses the game and allows for quick equipment changes, which is helpful especially when fighting dragons. Dragons appear as random encounters throughout the game, and they are just as imposing as one would imagine dragons to be. You will die alot fighting them, and you would have to rely on myriad of tactics to fight them. A few hacks there, retreat to heal yourself, attack with destruction magic while the dragon is airborne, retreat again, and so on. Killing a dragon is immensely satisfying, and through killing dragons do you acquire new shouts. Shouts are another new combat feature; they are words in the dragon language which, when you say them, unleashes different attacks on your enemies, or gives you new powers. Shouts are a welcome addition to the games combat system, and further adds to the combats tactical quality. Now this is a Bethesda game, which means that bugs are abound. I have experienced a few unresponsive actions from NPCs, same crashes, and an axe suspended in midair. However, this is an area I cant criticize Bethesda much about. In a game of this size and scope, it is virtually impossible to spot all the bugs before release. To their credit, Bethesda is quick to releases patches that fix whatever issues gamers may have. We can also count on the mod community to tweek all the inconveniences out of the game. Bugs are abundant in the game, and players will experience at least one in every playthrough, yet for the most part, these bugs are miniscule and far from game breaking. Skyrim is like a music album that has a few tracks that you arent particularly fond of, but rest of the music is pure aural blliss that you cant help but think of the album as close to perfection as possible. I cant point to a single part of the game and say that is the best part; the entire game is an experience. It stays firmly rooted in Elder Scrolls gameplay, yet with enough improvements and additions (and subtractions) to make Skyrim stand on its own. After experiencing the vast, dense and incredibly detailed world of Skyrim, you cant help but snicker whenever another game is referred to as open world. Good: Vast yet incredibly detailed world, Incredible Depth, Interesting Story, Improved Combat System, Gorgeous Graphics and wonderful style Bad: Buggy, some standard 'fetch' missions Price: AED 9.5/10
GeneSteeler;-;Wow! I spent almost 200 hours playing Skyrim and that was without any DLC. Excellent value for money. If you are a completionist and enjoy doing side-quests then this is the game for you. There is so much to do it is almost overwhelming, but an excellent map system can always keep you on track for your chosen quest. Brilliant game.
PimpingAndSexy;-;Buy it, mod it, play it, grow addicted to it, forget about it, start playing it again, and see your life fall before your very eyes once again.
Dage;-;Paid mods. User-made DLC. First horse armor, and now this. Bathesda sure seems to be a major trailblazer in horrible microtransactions, advancing industry technology in the wrong direction since 2006!
Wildcat;-;I played the absolute crap out of this game on console, and happily purchased it on pc again to experience it with mods. This game is fantastic, but what keeps me coming back to it is the amazing mod community. However, that is now all in the past, Now you have to pay for mods, and the community is broken. I'm sad to see this happen to such a beloved game, and for such wonderful companies to sink so low. If you love this game, or any modded game, please considering donating to them through paypal, and skipping the 25% for the creator mess that Steam has created. Everything should be optional paid, and at the least 50% of revenue to the modders. For shame Steam. Please, do not support this microtransaction trend, it hurts you, it hurts the gaming community. I highly reccomend checking out the Nexus creators forecast, and response to this whole ordeal HERE: http://www.nexusmods.com/skyrim/news/12449/? and the forecast HERE: http://www.nexusmods.com/games/news/12444/? . It paints a clear, and concise picture of how this hurts the community, and how many issues can arise with such an action. If this whole scandal blows over, I will happily change my score, but until then my review remains unchanged. Be weary travelers.
Full Time Potato;-;Who wants to pay for mods? It's a great game but im officially done with it.
Smackadeus;-;I could care less about Skyrim at this point, but I would love to see how a 75% cut to Valve is justified in this whole paid mod venture.
GG_Paid Mods_I'm Out;-;Seriously Valve? Paid mods? Are you ing serious?! I trusted you Valve and you betrayed me.
Lordkenyon;-;Making mods dlc is a disgrace towards everything Valve has stood for, towards everything the prior Elder Scrolls games have been, and to the community that have made these games what they are. You make me sick.
sir gnarwhal;-;So thaaaat's why Skyrim is free for the weekend.
Shenzi;-;The move to allow mod creators to charge money was awful. It goes against everything that modding games has been about. Valve itself exists thanks to the modding of games. 75% of the money goes mostly to Valve and the game developer; the mod author gets 25% and only after they make their first 100 bucks. This is awful. Just no. Skyrim has a lot going for it, it's very fun, mods are nice, etc etc, but Bethesda has made a very clear statement about what they want to do with FUTURE games.
Dregnitor;-;Paid Mods. I never asked for this.
Sharpshooter;-;Never would have thought that i have to rate this as a 'No' but things change... Thanks Valve & ZeniMax.
ddarkknight;-;I love Skyrim but don't support paid mods !!!
Rannek17;-;Not a fan of paid mods.
Tinniez;-;Hiding mods behind a paywall = Not cool.
Arod;-;This is one of my favourite games of all time...mostly because of the fantastic modding community. Therefore I can no longer recommend it because of the addition of paid steam workshop content. This will be a disaster for the modding community - it will stifle collaboration and innovation, and encourage uninteresting and stolen content. This will slowly (or quickly) choke the life from a wonderful community.
Aviary;-;I can't support a company that releases bug-filled games then just sits back waiting for the modding community to fix their issues for them. It is an insult to gamers, modders, and the community as a whole. I also feel embarrassed for Bethesda as a company. Getting money for a buggy game, getting more money through modders who have worked out these bug fixes? Ridiculous.
Farnsworth;-;I had just reinstalled this and planned to play it when this whole paid mods debacle occurred. The way it has developed has been very disheartening, and I went ahead and uninstalled the game. I won't be bothering with another playthrough, and I am now reconsidering whether I would pay for a new Fallout or Elder Scrolls game.
Ramadas;-;Do not support valve by buying this game, with the new pay for mod feature, showing how greedy they are
not fond of anime;-;Innovative paid mods, PC master race wins again :-D
Carl22swe;-;This game is now officialy bad thanks so paid mods
Todd_Howard;-;Liked it before I had to pay Valve for mods they didn't make.
cryocool01;-;Valve introduced a pay scheme with the support of the game developer to begin charging for player created mods. While I am not opposed to the idea, I am opposed to the mod creator only receiving 25% of the money. I cannot in good conscience recommend this game when both steam and the game creator seem intent on destroying a vibrant player community and the game life extending mods with it, for a quick money grab.
Ark;-;RIP Steam: Paid Mods killed you and everyone who loved you
oh yeah that's good weed;-;"Hiding mods behind a paywall is just disgusting! Why not a optional donation button, Valve?" This. what a joke valve.
Coaster45;-;The games good but it has been killed by paid mods
Enoril;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. People can and should support mod creators via donations, and a 'Buy me a coffee!' button on the workshop page would be good, but putting them behind a pay wall is god damn atrocious. Hoping Valve and other responsible parties for this new practice will turn around.
Baby Buffalo;-;Skyrim Vanilla - 7/10 Skyrim w/ DLC - 9/10 Skyrim with mods - 11/10 Skyrim with paid mods - 0/10
venom20078;-;Paid mods are essentially microtransactions that one would find in the cesspool that is mobile marketplaces. This type of stuff does not belong on Steam. I agree modders should be paid, but modding is a passion hobby. A donate button would be much better suited. I can no longer recommend this game because of paid mods.
Samulvarez;-;Negative review in protest at the MODs payment. Anlisis negativo en seal de protesta por los MODs de pago.
[RR] Wrath;-;Let's not kid ourselves, you should make mods because you love the game, not because you want the money. I've already poured out a 40 for Steam. Goodnight sweet Prince.
jmed1129;-;Valve introduced paid mods for skyrim which has ruined the game for myself and many other people. A lot of the mods I used from the nexus are now pulled because of people taking the original mod and uploading it on steam as their own.
Daney;-;I really don't support this game and its publisher pushing paid mods as the new norm.
Bill Cosby;-;Have to pay for mods 1/10
'Murica is the best;-;Two Words... Paid Mods
InstantTrain;-;Paid mods are a plausible idea, but they need to be implemented with a better system. I'd prefer a donation button with a larger cut to the modder.
Eripsed;-;Yet another example on how corporate the gaming industry is becoming. Keep this up and even AAA games will look like terrible mobile games that require a pay-wall every 10 minutes
BaconCatBug;-;Peice of .
Xbox on;-;very shallow game that requires payment for streamlined additional and enhancing content.
Freddymojo;-;Valve and Bethesda are charging for user created content.
tepelgil;-;I spent 305h on this game. Loved it and spent hours doing everything and anything, all that thanks to a huge modding community which allowed me to tweak the experience. Had I started the game today, I would have stopped playing after 3 hours instead. Why? Because the vanilla user interface for PC is complete garbage and had there not been the wonderful SkyUI mod, I would have stopped playing. And now Steam graces us with their "reward the modders" talk where they only take a 75% cut. How noble of them. This is a line which should never have been crossed as it is really obvious it was just a new way for Steam to make easy money off the modders back. What wil really happen is that they will effectively destroy the modding community and only thieves and shoddy contents will pop up instead.
[404]Dr. Penr (   );-;Pay for mods.
b00mboxmonkey;-;This game is mediocre at best but there are people that enjoy it and that is fine and all, but the reason I'm even bothering reviewing this game though is because of the recent show of poor business sense from Steam and Valve in general. The fact that this game was only enjoyable with extensive mods was already a bad sign, but now the fact that everyone needs to pay for said mods is not only going to kill this game, but put Bethesda and Valve in a bad light. This is also a threat to future or current games in general if other companies decide to follow with this malpractice. Would you ever pay for a bug fix? Or a mod that adds more trees? Or different menu skins? The list of fallacies from this new system is lengthy and this whole fiasco is simply ludicrous. Please do not support this game or any other games/companies that try to implement pay-to-play mods into the community!
Purple/Pegway;-;Paid mods are a horrible idea. I don't want this implemented in future games.
pr2thej;-;Bad move with the mods
DALEK;-;They now have mods that you have to pay for.
dominic23;-;Mods cost money...
Proud Cipher;-;Skyrim's only genuine merit was it's ability to be modded into a playable, decent game. Now, this has been totally invalidated by Valve's most recent monetization effort. What little respect I had for Bethesda is now gone, and the tremendous respect I had for Valve is severely diminished. Granted, neither of these companies really give a  about what we think, so I guess that's irrelevant. Still, there is no more reason to play Skyrim. If at all possible, I may be getting a refund for it now that they have changed one of the fundamental elements of the game, changing the product entirely.
Comanche;-;Loved this game for quite some time, but now they add paid mods? Oh and note: STEAM MODDERS ONLY GET 25% OF THEIR SELLING PRICE, SO THIS DOES NOT SUPPORT MODDERS AT ALL, THIS IS A SCAM BY STEAM TO RIP PEOPLE OF THEIR MONEY!!! http://arstechnica.com/gaming/2015/04/23/steam-workshop-lets-users-sell-mods-but-only-shares-25-percent-of-revenue/ http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mod_(video_gaming) Searched up video game mods. Where does it say you have to pay for a change in the game? I thought that it i looked in the workshop only a few mods would be charging money, and really good ones to boot. *Facepalm. 75 cents for ONE sword? $5 FOR AN ARMOUR SET????????? Jesus... it makes the skyrim DLC's look cheap. Note: I normally dont post reviews but when people start trying to sell pieces of crap with the title ''altercation or mod'' its like saying i'll sell you this piece of crap... oh and to make it better i will sell you the smell to it as well! so $5 for the crap and $10 for the smell as well. Note Note: Skyrim entertains for about 7 hours before you start thinking mods... Well now there are no mods. Mods was the lifeblood of skyrim. Think about it, how would you feel if sudenly someone added a ''tax'' for breathing air? Its like the people who play skyrim having to pay for mods. *pacepalm again,... it is. Wow if people dont change their ways who knows how long until you will have to pay the ''air'' tax. Note Note: Note: THIS DOES NOT SUPPORT THE MODERS, THIS ONLY HINDERS THEM http://arstechnica.com/gaming/2015/04/23/steam-workshop-lets-users-sell-mods-but-only-shares-25-percent-of-revenue/ The modders only get 25% of their selling price to boot. So basicily that $5 armour set? He gets around $1.25 for each sale. This is unbelievably apauling. This is a scam by steam to rip good honest folk of their hard earned dollars.
a starving Ethiopian baby;-;90% of the fun from this game is from mods. Putting them behind a paywall basically classifying them as DLC is a very very bad idea. I love this game so much but this idea is going to spread. So far only 17 mods have fallen victim. Bethesda is testing this "idea" on Skyrim so when Fallout 4 comes out, this will be the norm. Modders only get 25% of the cut, the rest being split between Steam and Bethesda. This will spread to other games. This will end up being normal in about a year. This is the new DLC.
Lordkenyon;-;Making mods dlc is a disgrace towards everything Valve has stood for, towards everything the prior Elder Scrolls games have been, and to the community that have made these games what they are. You make me sick.
sir gnarwhal;-;So thaaaat's why Skyrim is free for the weekend.
Grinman;-;Paid mods are broken and this was a horrible descision.
dominic23;-;Mods cost money...
Proud Cipher;-;Skyrim's only genuine merit was it's ability to be modded into a playable, decent game. Now, this has been totally invalidated by Valve's most recent monetization effort. What little respect I had for Bethesda is now gone, and the tremendous respect I had for Valve is severely diminished. Granted, neither of these companies really give a  about what we think, so I guess that's irrelevant. Still, there is no more reason to play Skyrim. If at all possible, I may be getting a refund for it now that they have changed one of the fundamental elements of the game, changing the product entirely.
Comanche;-;Loved this game for quite some time, but now they add paid mods? Oh and note: STEAM MODDERS ONLY GET 25% OF THEIR SELLING PRICE, SO THIS DOES NOT SUPPORT MODDERS AT ALL, THIS IS A SCAM BY STEAM TO RIP PEOPLE OF THEIR MONEY!!! http://arstechnica.com/gaming/2015/04/23/steam-workshop-lets-users-sell-mods-but-only-shares-25-percent-of-revenue/ http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mod_(video_gaming) Searched up video game mods. Where does it say you have to pay for a change in the game? I thought that it i looked in the workshop only a few mods would be charging money, and really good ones to boot. *Facepalm. 75 cents for ONE sword? $5 FOR AN ARMOUR SET????????? Jesus... it makes the skyrim DLC's look cheap. Note: I normally dont post reviews but when people start trying to sell pieces of crap with the title ''altercation or mod'' its like saying i'll sell you this piece of crap... oh and to make it better i will sell you the smell to it as well! so $5 for the crap and $10 for the smell as well. Note Note: Skyrim entertains for about 7 hours before you start thinking mods... Well now there are no mods. Mods was the lifeblood of skyrim. Think about it, how would you feel if sudenly someone added a ''tax'' for breathing air? Its like the people who play skyrim having to pay for mods. *pacepalm again,... it is. Wow if people dont change their ways who knows how long until you will have to pay the ''air'' tax. Note Note: Note: THIS DOES NOT SUPPORT THE MODERS, THIS ONLY HINDERS THEM http://arstechnica.com/gaming/2015/04/23/steam-workshop-lets-users-sell-mods-but-only-shares-25-percent-of-revenue/ The modders only get 25% of their selling price to boot. So basicily that $5 armour set? He gets around $1.25 for each sale. This is unbelievably apauling. This is a scam by steam to rip good honest folk of their hard earned dollars.
a starving Ethiopian baby;-;90% of the fun from this game is from mods. Putting them behind a paywall basically classifying them as DLC is a very very bad idea. I love this game so much but this idea is going to spread. So far only 17 mods have fallen victim. Bethesda is testing this "idea" on Skyrim so when Fallout 4 comes out, this will be the norm. Modders only get 25% of the cut, the rest being split between Steam and Bethesda. This will spread to other games. This will end up being normal in about a year. This is the new DLC.
Grinman;-;Paid mods are broken and this was a horrible descision.
Drynwyn;-;Great game, but the paid mod plan was.... less than great. I'm not opposed to the very IDEA of paid mods, but test it out with a new game, rather than co-opting an existing, vibrant community.
Hass;-;With the introduction of payment for certain mods it is truly disgusting to play this game
Corax;-;Killed a group of Thalmor in front of guards and charged with assault and paid only 200 gold as a fine. 10/10 Skyrim belongs to the Nords
Pinta;-;After 700 hours of my life wasted I decided to write review.. This game will be fun for you, if you dont know how to spend your free time or if you dont have other videogames. Otherways, you will end after 30 hours. From my personal experience, If you have a good imagination, then you will forget what real life is. I remember, how I got this game for christmas before 3 years. Well, I did not have much friends or other hobbies, so I started to play it. I imagined my self-created stories with my characters, like: my elf character is cursed bad guy and etc. Then I met my girfriend, so I had to say "goodbye" to skyrim. I think If I did not have her, I could have over 1000 hours on it. But now seriously, that was my personal though, now lets say something more about the game, shall we ? + 6 main campaings: Dragonborn (not much plot-twists, but thats what the game is all about.) Companions (Mercenaries, few plot-twist, sympatic characters in it. Aela is hot by the way) Mage University(I dont like to play as mage, so I didnt like it much, but it is worth it) Thieves Guild( I liked that one, contains really rememberable characters, many plot twists, AWESOME) The Dark Brotherhood(Assassins, I though being murderer wont be job for me in skyrim. But damn, this campaing made me play the game many times. It has sympatic characters and unforgetable plot twists. With the Thieves Guild, this was the best one for me) And the last one - Empire vs. Stormcloak Rebelion (civil war. Both sideshave truth in something, but only the Stormcloak Leader is sympatic) +DLCs include Dragonborn - New whole island, new campaing and about 25 hours of doing everything there. Dawnguard - Two new factions - Vampires vs. Vampire Hunters. Sympatic Girl Serana. And Crossbows. Hearthfire - "The Sims DLC" - you can build 3 houses, adopt children -Game was released with many bugs, which doesnt bother me so much,but physics in specific parts of this game cant be forgiven. - I DONT LIKE, when someone says that Skyrim is the best RPG game of all the time. There are better RPGs like the Witcher, Gothic etc. Skyrim is one of the better ones, but not the best one. Do I recommend you to buy it ? Of course I do ! 9/10 But... I regret that time wasted on this game. If I spent my time better, than... I dont know... I maybe had more friends than I have now. Who knows. So dont be like me. Dont be no-life kids as I was. Get a girlfriend maybe xD Thanks for reading, if someone did. Its been an honor to tell you my opinion. Thank you for your time.
Hydrogen 1.00794 u;-;2 words : Paid Mods False God Gabe N, why have you betrayed us.
Boku No Daft;-;My motto for this game: Mod it until it crashes
WhtGoliath;-;With almost two hundred hours of game play on record I use to be able to recommend this game. With Valve's new 'Pay for Mods' system, I can no longer support or recommend Skyrim. I understand mods can be compared to DLC, but the fact Valve takes 75% of the cut for a mod created by a user for a third party game using a free Tool Kit produced by the game's developer is just wrong. Sad day for Skyrim.
Re'goso;-;Once upon a time there was game company that had all the goodwill that a game company could get. Then one day this game company decided that they had so much goodwill they had more than they needed. So the Game company decided to team up with there PC distributor. They talked and they talked tell they final came up with grand idea they'ed take all the goodwill and hard work from the modders and exploit them tell they fell over like fodder....the end....... This was once upon a time one of if not the greatest games for modding, now its a land devided with brother against brother, friend against friend. hope you all like 5$ armour packs in fallout 4 and mod load orders that can run upwards of 400$+ that is the future paying 400$+ for a game! Also the age of the big teams of modders for awesome projects very well might be ending as well we well see tons of quickly made 5$ armours and weapons as modders struggle to make modding there living with only 25% of the income from these new practises and thats only once theyve reached the 400$ amount were they start to get money.... its the end of an era..... always remember the 23 of april 2015 as it might just very well be a day that you might want to remember.
Dukeleto;-;This was a fantastic game mostly for the strength of its modding community, Bethesdas bugs where patched, content enriched and interfaces improved. Mods kept the game relevant years after its release, Bethesda and Valve chose to thank the modding community for there work by splitting us in the interest of promoting their own micro transaction fueled cash cow.
ArchAngelN09;-;Paid mods, game is now worthless completely
ToadLode;-;Skyrim is an all time favorite game of mine, so if you havent played it, ing buy it. Buy Skyrim. However, Valves decision to implement 'paid mods' is ridiculous. Ever since gaming was created, there have been player made mods, always have been free, always should be. Also, if you argue that these modders should be paid for their work I would mention that A. Gaming is a hobby, if somebody is struggling financially, the last thing they should be doing is being involved in lengthy strenuous mod building and most importantly, B. Developers get to keep 25% of the profit that gets put directly in their steam wallet.. This decision is hardly helping the developer, and it is just a greedy ploy by Valve to make some more money.. DOWN WITH THESE PAID MODS
Hothead;-;Pros: Vibrant modding community (before a few days ago) Cons: Base game is terrible Have to pay for mods
Professor Cosmic Spark;-;The paid mods in the workshop are putting the entire PC gaming market in danger. I can't recommend supporting this kind of an exploitative business model until the paid mods in the Steam workshop are removed or COMPLETELY reworked to be donations with a minimal cut for Valve. I will change this back to a positive review as soon as Valve backtracks on their decision.
Rhythmic Ravioli;-;I made a mod and no one bought it
BOT Eugene;-;If I wanted to get ed by Gaben I would have brought lube :^)
Finesse;-;This game rocks! And it has mods! Wait....WTF?!??!!! Paying for mods???? OMG WTFFFFFFF IS THIS STUPID SH#T?! Paying Valve for mods created by community (75% is taken by Valve) s something I consider crime. Id rather pay EA 300 or so for their DLCs for Sims than this...
SmartGirl;-;The whole idea of selling mods in a game is.... beyond exorbitant. Especially a single player game like Skyrim. Valve, you crossed the line. Here are some clearly addressed counterarguments for "why Valve should relinquish this pay-for-your-mods system" If a user creates a mod, they should make it not for the money, but for the whole gaming community and/or for experience. If money is the issue for the modder, then let's face it: they shouldn't be modding just for the sake of acquiring money. However, compensation for work shouldn't be disregarded: a donation system should be set up for the modders. A paid mod (like dlc) already establishes a new ground between players who can purchase the mod and players who can't. In game type (MMORPGs) this would be admissible, or (insert any multiplayer game within the given parameter). The mods would travel through some kind of quality control and then valve would sell it. However... Skyrim isn't even an MMORGP. It's a singleplayer game. For gods sake, you can't even play this game with other people, and a vast quantity of mods (in the payment section of the workshop) show that there really isn't a quality control. So far the aftermath of the implementation of this new system has caused modders in nexus to either: 1) take down their work on nexus and sell it here 2) take it down for the sake of preventing people from stealing it. Shall I go onto nexus (or some other modding website), and sell it here as my own? Maybe use someone else's mod as a base for mine and sell it? This system really makes it easy to steal other people's work, re-brand it and sell it here for a profit. To steal a mod is very disrespectful to the original author(s) of the mod. This prevents new content from great modders being produced and released in fear of it being stolen. Also, Anyone who takes part of purchasing misappropriated mods will encourage and be apart of this larceny. Oh, what am I saying? Valve and Bethesda are going to take a 75% cut anyways. If you don't think this is a big deal, then think about this: In the near future, this whole system could spread to other games, not just Skyrim.
K. Jekyll;-;I have leave my Girlfriends for this
[LTac] n3m0;-;Downvoted only due to the following: The practice of paying for mods is antithetical to the nature of the modding community; an optional "DONATION" button is not (Just like on the Nexus http://www.nexusmods.com/skyrim/? ). Was a fun game, The fact that Valve is doing this and that Bethesda is endorsing it and they both taking the largest share of the modders' work is American Corporate greed at it's finest. Take something artistic and done for the love of the subject matter, monetize it, then allow the accountants to define art as widgets, and then creativity is now run by the mercantile class, the middle men, who are "America Corporates". If they had any integrity and decency, any moneys brought in, at the very least, should be 100% donated to charities on behalf off the modding community in conjunction with Valve or Bethesda or whomever. See Gaben, you don't need the cash grab, you can win by getting good press which in the long run would do better for you to show you are not like EA et al.
zeroxxx;-;Reviewing games based on a totally outside aspects (e.g not about Gameplay, Sound, Mechanic, Graphic) isn't my hobby or my preference, as I'd prefer to be objective, but this one is different. Skyrim, the game that many of us love dearly, the game that many of us love to mod, is now being plagued by so called paid mods. Paid mods are fine, but the concept and execution are uber poor by Valve and Bethesda. I would list them all, but it's gonna be a hella long review, so I'll just list the most important ones. 1. Copyright issues. Money-driven motivation will definitely come into play. And it's dirty, dirty motivation. 2. Assets stealing. It speaks for itself. 3. No quality assurance, so poor quality paid mods will emerge as I write this. 4. Bethesda no longer give us patch for Skyrim, despite so many bugs existing in this latest version. With paid mods they'll just reap money and do nothing. Unacceptable. Do your job, Bethesda, and do it properly. Not to mention unfair treatment for modders. Yes, taking royalties for base game's existence is fine, taking royalties for Steam's cut is fine, but 25% for modders is a downright ripoff. I am against this so much. At least give the content creators an ability to put up donation links straight to their own pockets, and also let pay what you want feature to be exactly what pay you want, starting from 0.00001 USD. That's all. Don't get me wrong, Base Skyrim or Legendary Skyrim is... legendary. It has quality of its own, but recent move by both parties (Valve and Bethesda) leaves me with sour taste. Thus, no more positive recommendation from me for Skyrim.
furyfish;-;best RPG ever played !!!!!!!!!
oz;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim has got to be one of the most worked on games of 2011 and 2 years on, it still doesn't fail to impress. The amazing work put into the game has definitly paid off with hours upon hours of things to do. The game works amazing on every platform from PS3, Xbox and PC. As I have experienced from the console versions, the loading screens take quite a long time and there are many glitches that happen every time you play. This is 100% different with the PC version as the loading screens are very quick, even on the top graphics settings and the glitches are much less frequent. Pros: - Amazing graphics - Amazing stroyline - A high selection of weapons - Amazing character interface - Easy to use controls - Large amount of side quests Cons: - A few glitches I would give The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim a well earned 10/10!
Cloud;-;Good Open World RPG... Has the feeling like u really are in Skyrim. This makes it wonderfull. Later in the game. It will get a bit borring.. But who cares!
Cirno;-;10/10 game until... Paid mods. Mods should be free not paid for.
Illmatic;-;paying for mods = death of steam
WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you keep on doing it. 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
Requiem;-;Paid mods? I don't think so.
Black Baron;-;Edit: Keeping it negative to serve as reminder of the day Bethesda and Valve blackened Skyrim modding community. NO! Because of Bethesda + Valve adding one more lair of bull***t on gaming community wich is up to it's neck because of recent years commercialization in game media. THIS HAS TO STOP!
Luiz1122;-;This game supports paid mods.
Shaky;-;They ask money for mods?! Moneygrab again!
zz;-;Bethesda & Steam are strangling SKYRIM with their paid mods greedfest idea. Let's hope that they abandon the paid mods idea before they kill off the game entirely.
Traveling Magic;-;Paying for mods goes against what the modding community is all about. Before someone says that these moders deserve money, they are not going to get it from valve or bethesda. Valve takes 75% of the money earned on each mod. The best way to support a moder would be to donate to them. The moder are not getting any real money from these mods either it is all steam credit, so it is just going back to valve.
|LZ| Zano0;-;I just came here to downvote and report this product, since Valve is not what it used to be like. EA is two golden turds, Valve is five golden turds.
Ezeron;-;Valve should be ashamed of charging people for mods, which themselves aren't even using original assets for the most part, so sad to see an otherwise great game being ruined by bad business practices and just plain greed. If you want people to financially suport modders just add a donation button...
Juggernaut;-;Paid Mods Simulator 2015.
the.muppet;-;vanilla game was ok, maybe a 7/10 mods made it great and a truly legendary game 10/10... BUT... now some mod creators are taking down their free "for the community and love of the game" mods and putting them behind a pay wall, pure greed. if the mods were worth paying for then people would have donated if you let them. even worse is some mod creators are taking down their mods elsewhere because they don't want them to be stolen and sold on steam... this game needs 100's of mods to be added to it and maybe 100's more hours in trial and error testing of mod compatibility with other mods to make it worthy of the 90%+ rating it has and that could end up costing you 100's in mod microtransactions now if the creators sell out. and a lot of mods need other mods and software to work such as skse and enb etc, so there's going to be people wrongly profiting from other peoples work, if you support that then buy this game.
ftlum;-;Very buggy. Needs mods to make things work well, but now you have to pay for the mods. Don't buy.
Henggelerz;-;My letter to Valve (and also Bethesda) concerning their recent business decisions. It's amazing to me how two of my favorite developers could move to the opposite end of that list in the course of a day. Enjoy the read and don't forget to write your own: "I'm sure you're getting a lot of these, so I'll keep it concise and non-abusive. I loved Steam. In fact, my account is sitting at about 655 games at the moment. I didn't just buy those games because I'm madly in love with gaming. No, I bought them on this site because I bought into a vision -- a vision of a community passionate about games and social interaction. And at the epicenter of that was a company that was one of the good guys, a company with an ethical code, respect for its customers, and a down-to-Earth leader. I loved that company, but I don't see that vision anymore. All I see is a company that, while drowning in money, can't seem to have even mediocre customer support or basic quality assurance. But I always glossed over those flaws. I loved you and stayed loyal despite the increasingly poor customer experience. But paid modding is the straw that broke this camels back. Every single aspect of it wreaks of the kind of shady behavior we've seen elsewhere in the industry. I'm not opposed to modders making a buck, but there were so many other ways to do this: a donation button, reasonably low pricing, giving the author more than a mere pittance of 25%. or only allowing a small list of very high quality mods to be paid. But what you've built now will only result in an influx of poor quality, broken, copyright-infringing mess of mods and the death and exploitation of a beautiful and vibrant community of creativity. And I won't support it. Until this is rolled back, I'm not buying another game off of Steam. If that means I have to go to sources like http://gog.com for my games, then so be it. But I won't accept what Valve has become. You need to learn to listen to your customers again."
Supes;-;Valve's cash play for money by monetizing certain mods and potentially crippling the existing mod community and fan sites is a painful reminder of what drives large corporations. Mods are a passionate expression of wants or dreams for a game. Valve taking 75% of the gross revenue from any mod sales is appauling.
Cancer;-;A buggy, half finished game that relies on fan created modifications to become worth playing. This would almost be fine, if Bethesda and Valve wouldn't have the audacity to now try to make money off these mods. Do not support greedy and unethical business practices, and do not buy this game.
TheMovieHero;-;Honestly, a month ago I would have recomended this game. Until I woke up and booted up, and noticed I had a message, to uninstall all of my mods. You know, mods, the things that make games you've beaten playable again, with new life? Well I had some downloaded, and I got a notice to "uninstall them, and procure them via transaction". Basically "I know that was free but now I want money for it, so uninstall it and pay me". Absolutely disgusting, as long as a game supports content that has been free for 20 years in games, as something locked behind a paywall, I can't reccomend it in good faith.
lol;-;With the new mod system, Bethesda is stealing 75% of the profit off content THEY DIDN'T EVEN MAKE. How greedy can you get? This isn't even VALVE that did that, it's BETHESDA. Don't ing support these thieves.
TheAlex12345;-;Making people pay for mods that don't even work is bad business. I cannot support this game with such an awful business practices. Valve should be ashamed.
Camisoles;-;Imagine releasing a broken game and then charging people for mods that make that game playable. Imagine being Bethesda.
Rom;-;The mod pay-wall is awful. Who needs donations when you could have a 75% cut?
Requiem;-;Paid mods? I don't think so.
Black Baron;-;Edit: Keeping it negative to serve as reminder of the day Bethesda and Valve blackened Skyrim modding community. NO! Because of Bethesda + Valve adding one more lair of bull***t on gaming community wich is up to it's neck because of recent years commercialization in game media. THIS HAS TO STOP!
g00mba;-;the first time I approached a giant it gave me a demo of kerbal space program. would fu ck this game if I could . 10/10 would fly to the stars with a giant again.
A_Sweatband;-;I can not change my rating. I ask all gamers to remember what both Valve and Bethesda tried to do. Never forget, and watch out for paid mods inevitable reappearence in later Bethesda games. I will pull this review if The Elder Scrolls VI and Fallout 4 avoid this.
blckruc47;-;Great awesome game. Lots of hours wasted playing. Power to the Community.
418;-;I'm very hard to please when it comes to RPG's. I loved Skyrim, I'd say it's a 9.5/10. It's got a few minor problems, but it's an amazingly well done game. I'm pretty sure everyone has heard of this game, so I don't need to ramble on forever about it. The DLC is ok, some of it glitched out on me. I love the freedom of mods, console cheating to give myself gear/stats/perks/spells/etc, the quest treelines are awesome. Besides the ocassional glitch, the only other complaint I have is the way Bethesda prices their DLC on steam sales.
Snerck_;-;now you too can pay for mods which are more expensive than the game is on sale.
DasBoSchitt;-;Skyrim is the perfect example of how a vast and addictive adventure game is done, without overloading the player with Witcher-like  complexity. You begin the game picking only your race and from then, what type of fighter you are is completely built off of how you play, making for endless possibilities of the fighter you can become. It is a poor idea to just stick to the main story all throughout, because it will leave you at a disadvantage if you ignore the varying side quests and beautiful exploration, which allow you to uncover some of the best equipment as well as enhance your skills and levels. This in turn, has given me a massive playtime of 37 hours so far and the main story still only feels like it's a quarter of the way through! This is a fantastic watercooler game, allowing for you and your friends to share hours of stories about your unique adventures and play style in Skyrim. If you have the system specs and you love exploration, DO NOT MISS THIS GAME!
ZyRiiu;-;Time to update this review... It took 5 years after TES IV Oblivion for Skyrim to come out, the game is now more than 3 years old. The story isn't the best, but it is not bad either and much fun if you play it for the first time, there are also a lot of sidequest you can do which are also really good and much fun. But even on the highest difficulty (legendary) the game isn't that hard at all.You can spend hundreds of hours in the vanilla game and you can spend thousands of hours if you mod the game (i play with 200+ mods). If you don't already have the game buy it, if you don't want to spend 15 (and more for the DLCs) wait for a sale and get it for about 3. Should you play this game? Yeah. Should you mod this game? YEAH! So this is definitely still one of my favorite games and you won't regret buying it. 10/10 waiting for Enderal and TES VI
Crackbon;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim Dovahkiin, Dovahkiin naal ok zin los vahriin wah dein vokul mahfaeraak ahst vaal! Ahrk fin norok paal graan fod nust hon zindro zaan Dovahkiin, fah hin kogaan mu draal! This game changed the course of history of computer games introducing a new concept of the game with an open world and freedom of action. I will describe this game in the pros and cons. Pros + Well designed, spacious world of beautiful locations. + Great freedom of action. + Random quests, which are a perfect complement to ordinary tasks. + Audio frame with an indication of the music. + The climate in the game. + Great storyline in guilds. + Character development. + The world in the game alive. + Very good DLC. + Steam workshop. Cons - Disappointing dragons. - Poorly matched the level of difficulty. - Repeated quests. - Random errors. This game is awesome I would recommend buying. Fun for many hours. I give 11/10
Rouge The Bat;-;Best Game i ever play with mods made by users, it's so much fun
will erp for knifes;-;Go cast your fancy spells some where else
warriortigerwolf;-;i got to eat cheese in the middle of a Battle. best game ever 10/10.
Ezki - Playing Minecraft;-;Game was ruined by Paying for mods. If i was going to pay for it, Make the original developer make the modifications, I'm not paying some no-body who ripped off mods from nexus for a mod that has a 95% chance to not work and crash the game anyway. I'm sorry Valve, but you ed up this time.
Sevaarcen;-;Paid mods, with the best ones being sold stolen. Pathetic. The "Mods" are more expensive then the game. Shame on Bethesda and Steam.
Slightly Irate Maximillian;-;You know what? I used to love this. Hours and hours of gameplay, online and offline mode. Testing mods. Playing the crap out of every nook and cranny the internet has to offer to this game. Hell, you don't even need reviews to know this game was good. Was. Now, with Valve's practice of paywall for mods (instead of encouraging donations that gives 100% profit to the modder, instead of 25%), I'm totally not recommending this. Not especially when "premium" mods causes incompatibility to other mods, and we have to pay again to get the "premium" version of such mods. Not especially when Workshop's items are NOT compatible with the leading mod managers out there. Not especially when they claim "increased awareness" to modders, when. in truth, the whole thing was to monetize the modding scene (75% of the profit goes to Steam/Devs?) Not recommended. Not. One. Bit.
MS;-;It used to be a buggy unfinished game that could be modded into a brilliant engrossing game but then it took a paid mods to the knee Negative Valve-thousand/10
Pair Of Nice Slacks;-;Buy this game, then you too can support the monitization and general ing up of the modding scene!
BreakerOfSouls84;-;While this is one of the most entertaining games in the market, and currently makes huge sales even to this very day, part of it is due to its ability to be modded and the variety of the mods themselves. In its current state, while playable and fully functional, It pales in comparision with newer tittles. Part of the reason Skyrim sells so well is because of the modding community that constantly creates new content for the game. This content, atracts a wide variety of customers that, while not looking forward to play the game itself, buy the game because of the content they can download and play. Some of these customers do not have a very high income, and choose to only buy the game whenever its on sale, and can only afford moddifications instead of DLC. Restricting DLC not only gives the game itself a bad reputation, but takes away customers. Not only because of the low income some might possess, but also because some even have their own sense of morale that prevents them from buying Unofficial Fan Made DLC. People will download mods less and less as time goes by because of these reasons, and demand will eventually halt to a very slow number. Less people interested in paying, less effort from part of the developers. Why would developers stop making mods eventually? Simple. Developers, eager to make easy money, burn themselves by going agains most of the modding community, which has a sense of morale that prevents them from buying mods. Now that they earn even less recognition from their own community (Recognition in the modding community itself played a big part in the development of mods) , and no one demands mods because of the previously stated reasons, (Combined with the fact that Valve/Bethesda earn 75% of the revenue) will eventually get discouraged from creating new mods, and will move to greener more profitable pastures. (Getting a job at some developer company, or even Indie gaming) While "gaming backslash" might not be a big issue for current big profitable developer companies, it does indeed hurts small developers who are just starting to make a living. This has been proven already with several green light games that have failed to appeal to customers in some way or another, and end up "branding" the developer. Slowly but surely, this marks the beggining of the end for the modding community, and maybe modding for certain games altogether. DRM policies are soon to be expected, and we can safely predict that the modding "Market" will be managed in such a way, that few mods will be able to remain either free, or on sale, thus decreasing demand. (Less variety, less options for the customer, less options, fewer interest from part of the Customer) Again, part of why this game is played, is because of its wide variety of Unofficial Free Fan Made DLC. By restricting this, and allowing Content Creators to charge as they see fit, without any way of quality control, and giving them a very low incentive in the way of 25%, practically screams commercial failure. While not against the idea of letting Developers (Both Official and Unofficial) collect money from Fan Made DLC, it is currently being done in such a way, that pretty much will end "Skyrim modding as we currently see it".
HerrSticks;-;Paid mod-shop? Haha... Oh, they're not joking....
Wintermute;-;Paid Mods.  off.
gmz;-;I am fine with paid mods, but this system is unacceptable. It looks like something my nephew put together.
Doctor;-;KILL ALL THE DRAGONS!
Discord Days;-;Not really a proper review. The game itself is good, but after the paid mods debacle I can't help but to discourage people from purchasing products from a company who indulges in said marketting strategies.
Cory1738;-;Game is 4 years old and only now bethesda and valve are trying to milk other peoples work for more money. 75% cut, rofl.
The Wild Potato Mage;-;Decent game but it relies heavily on player made mods to give it the personalized flavor needed to truly enjoy it. So if you like paying Valve for things that used to be free and essential to make the game fun then this is a game for you.
u2_colin;-;Gee, I hope they never do anything dumb like  up the mod system.
w00x;-;paywall for mod support. mods used to make this game great, but setting them behind a paywall is setting pc gaming up for a disaster. will future games have this? I sure hope not, Valve and Bethesda shot themselves in the foot with this one
Harry Mason;-;0/10: The origin of paid mods. The game that destroyed PC gaming's best feature. (FREEDOM.) It literally destroys what modding is. (raw and free creation, within the hobby) Now it's a PRODUCT, bound to business rules and ratings. It's like console DLC, but off-brand. ......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../................ .............//'...'/`............ ........../'/.../..../......./\........ ........('(.......... ~/'...')........ .........\.................'...../.......... ..........''...\.......... _........... ............\..............( ..............\.............
axlcrius;-;Skyrim with mods 9/10 Skyrim without mods 5/10 Skyrim without mods is mediocre game at best. With mods this game is amazing, but now that they are starting to charge for some of them i will not take them into account when giving the rating. Skyrim 25.4.2015 ruined by the greed of valve and bethesda. 5/10
63e Sir Fredrick A. Nicebutt III;-;I can no longer recomend this. Bethesda Softworks and lord GAben have sorn to close to the sun and their wings have melted. Paid mods are the greediest thing I'm surprised EA hasn't done yet. Do not support this game. They have fallen.
Zance;-;After enjoying/modding Elder Scrolls Since Morrowind. Will avoid any game with paid mods in the future
KirklandSignature;-;booo paid mods
b.stromain91;-;The game is great. The paid mod situation is not.
sheermadhatter;-;Considering what has happened the last couple of days, it is self evident why this game is not recomended
Badger M.D.;-;Two words. Mod paywall.
Blackjack;-;paid mods. To very negative we go
Frosty;-;Love the game more then I can explain. Paying for mods? Nope
thunderbeast;-;Unbelivebably Bugged and Unfinished game. Modders finished it for years of working. And... they want to make profit by taxes it. What a pro-stitute.
axlcrius;-;Skyrim with mods 9/10 Skyrim without mods 5/10 Skyrim without mods is mediocre game at best. With mods this game is amazing, but now that they are starting to charge for some of them i will not take them into account when giving the rating. Skyrim 25.4.2015 ruined by the greed of valve and bethesda. 5/10
63e Sir Fredrick A. Nicebutt III;-;I can no longer recomend this. Bethesda Softworks and lord GAben have sorn to close to the sun and their wings have melted. Paid mods are the greediest thing I'm surprised EA hasn't done yet. Do not support this game. They have fallen.
Zance;-;After enjoying/modding Elder Scrolls Since Morrowind. Will avoid any game with paid mods in the future
KirklandSignature;-;booo paid mods
b.stromain91;-;The game is great. The paid mod situation is not.
sheermadhatter;-;Considering what has happened the last couple of days, it is self evident why this game is not recomended
Badger M.D.;-;Two words. Mod paywall.
Blackjack;-;paid mods. To very negative we go
Frosty;-;Love the game more then I can explain. Paying for mods? Nope
Xuebei;-;Trying to make the customers make them their dlc now
FlippingTuna;-;11/10 with free mods 0/10 with payed mods
Alrossan;-;Thank you for fracturing the modding community. I hope losing all of the trust you built up was worth it.
Overcore;-;Charging for mods. Not okay.
Boltknuckle;-;Bethesda won't get another dollar from me for a long time. Paywalling mods is absolute nonsense, like something we'd see in an April Fools joke. I'm absolutely disappointed in Bethesda, Valve, and Gabe. I expected better.
Bane Fonda;-;For the record I loved this game on console and completed it several times. As a left hander this game is a no no. You simply can't reassign the keys on the numpad as they are reserved. There is an addon which allows you to reassign them to movement ones but this shouldn't be necessary. There should be NO hard coded keys in ANY game in this day and age. Also paid mods? Forget it, lazy way of sucking money from the hard working modding community under the guise of giving them something back for their hard work. Yeah? Of course! That's why they get most of the money isn't it? Oh wait they don't you do hmm... leeches.
Getta;-;Loved this game, holding Mods hostage is not the way 0/10 would not bang (again)
WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you keep on doing it. 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
LawsOfFire;-;game is really good and the DLC is also good. the modding community is the bread and butter of the game. it makes it much better than the standard.
psygeist;-;I don't play this game anymore but it was not good to write about. Decided to rate it now after seeing the mods debacle. There are better games out there. Don't waste your money with this one.
Mr.Zeppo;-;This game is still relevant and big solely because of the modding community and now they have decided to charge money for mods? ridiculous.
Hulk Hogan;-;I love mods. I love Skyrim. But when you make me pay for mods I stop loving them.
TheTrigger;-;10/10 for the games 0/10 for paid mods
Molags_Balls_69;-;Spent a looooong time playing this game. I credit 95% of that time to the amazing mods that great people created. I wouldn't have paid a penny for it had mods not have been free. Now they're bringing in forced payment and only crediting 25% of the money to the modder?! It's an insult if you ask me. The reason that makes PC gaming so great is slowly slipping away. I hope Valve seriously consider the feedback people are giving before things get too out of hand.
wOrst;-;Good game, too bad there is now a paywall to enjoy it completely. Bethedsa/Valve, let the modders have a donate button up, and don't take 75% of the cut. ing joke.
mLansiO;-;Skyrim is a fantastic game but I wouldn't recommend buying it until valve realizes and admits they ed up. I used to be a huge fan of valve, but their actions in the past year or two make me despise them. The only way people can support modders without having a negative impact on the modding community is donating, not buying.
Corvus Corax;-;payd mods, nothing more to say. you all know the cons are overhelming.
tjthunder1;-;This is the best game ever, too bad there is now a paywall behind mods.
Kravion;-;If you like to pay for patches and game improvements, that's fine. But Volvo/Bethesda monetizing mods that improves upon their  UI and broken scripts is just ing sad. 0/10 All just a shekels grab.
Pewly;-;Pay for mods? No, ty
Marxman;-;Morrowind is still way better.
Shayo;-;Take a stand against the practice of monetization of mods. Not purchasing this game is one of those ways, as much as it pains me to say that, since how much joy this game has given me.
Mad Memes Mcgee;-;Muh Mod Sovereignty.
Noxi teh Gremlin;-;Solid game, but with the addition of paid mods? I cannot safely say the game will have a positive impact on the community for much longer. If said paid mods were a new location or expansive questline? It'd be worth it. But instead we have clipping armor and lore unfriendly swords that you can download elsewhere.
mycrapytv;-;They took our mods!
ZapperCoil;-;fired an icicle into a moose b-hole. 10/10, would visit canada again.
LurkingMuffin6;-;Fix the workshop. Add a donation box.
Dhaos;-;-vast and kind empty world -copy paste dungeons -good soundtrack -bad story -you don't matter to this world, nothing that you do has a real effect on the story or world -gameplay feels empty -hunt the mark on the map: the game -tons of bugs -awful animations -way too easy -mods can make it fun...well not anymore update: valve removed the easy mon...paid mods thing, i will keep the message below as a reminder of what may still happen in future. why valve and bethesda? why do you want to destroy the mod community? why must everything be ruined because of money and greed? i would gladly support modders, but not like this, not with this shameless scam. to all of you that agree with such practices, thank you for day one DLCs, thank you for Season Passes devoid of content, thank you for allowing bad practices to thrive and destroy gaming. you buy all that, you gave the ok.
BloodyFace.;-;Skyrim is the best game I've played in a long time, I love it, I have it on Ps3 and PC. The mods will keep you entertained once you have played it for 200+ hours, Which is one of the reasons to have this on the pc. If you're thinking about getting this game you deffinitly should! It keeps you entertained for hours and it feels like minutes.
Tinuneth;-;Where has this game been all my life?! Seriously, it's one of the best games I've ever played. The world, Skyrim, is so huge and you will always find stuff to do, you will always discover something new, something you haven't seen before. I really don't know what to say about the game - I'm still so amazed at it. It's just super awesome and totally worth the money since you (probably) will spend hundrets of hours in Skyrim. So if you haven't already: Make sure to try it out one day.
Lucky Shot;-;Somebody stole my sweetroll and every guard in every town knows it. I think it's a conspiracy.
Passos;-;Best love story ever! When i was still a aprenttice, i met a girl, Lydia, she was kind, polite, funny, and beutiful, i can say i fall in love for her. We had good and bad times, she helped me in my adventure, protected me, carried my equipement, was a tough girl, and i was even more in love for her... But one day, she disapeard, gone.... I was mad, and i decide to run away, when i stoped, i couldnt find her, searh every corner of Whiterun, Windhelm, Solitude, Riften and so on... I lost her, my only and true love, i died inside... But one day, when i was passing by Riverwood, there she was, running to me, i drop my sword and my shield, and run to her, never been so fast in my entire life! Happiest day of my life! When i ask her why she left me, she said got lost in the woods, and lost my track, but her love for me, found the way. Then i knew, her words, she was in love too, saw i asked if she want to marry me, and she said YES!! Now this is the best day of my life! We married in Riften, our friends were there, to see this moment. After the wedding, we went to my house in Whiterun, i renewd it just for her, and she love it! We tried to have a son, but Lydia cant have babies, so we adopt a little girl, named Linda. Me and Lydia, play with her, take her out, to see the world out side! With the money i earn from my adventures, i constructed a house, a bigger and better house, and we adopt another child, this time a boy, named Abe. Now we live a fairy tales. 10/10 Would fall in love again (Sorry for the english)
Mikjaash;-;its a game in big world with magic and stuff and blow enemies against walls with your magic and marry pplz and then shoot them with ur magic and stuff and other magics and magic wands and magic clothes and dragons who gets kilt by ur magic and more magic buy it because of magic
Harakant;-;English Review I'm quoting a passage from my review about a game Gothic 3: I love games, where weapons are used as swords, bows, axes, maces, ...'' The introduction is little bit boring, you're listening to a conversation and you're traveling by vehicle to the town, where you're supposed to be executed. You can do nothing, neither skip it. But after arrival of the dragon everything changes and the game gains new fallout. After killing enemies and escaping from the hell. Your journey still continues with your fellow fighter where you later say goodbye to each other and you go by your own. In general, the game is vast, it offers many places and localities. It's not any short game, but other way around, pretty long game trick. For your hero, except inventory with weapons to his hands there is also an option of using a magic. Besides paths and brooks in the game, there are various mazes where you have to work with your mind. You'll have a little trouble with learning new spells or opening locks. Another special stuff are dragons. Pretty dangerous creatures,it's not very good to start an introduction with them. During the selection of race, you have a possibility to choose various entities. The view in the game will player choose on by himself. Purchase and sell of goods or weapons is possible in every town. A little defect of beauty are walk along mountanious terrain or if you have more load, things in inventory, you can't run then. Besides, graphics is created on high level. What about audio and messages  amazing. Processing of a game according to northern mythology was wonderful idea. Spectacular RPG game. Rating: 9/10 Slovak Review Citujem ryvok zo svojej recenzie na hru Gothic 3: ,,Milujem hry, kde sa vyuvaj zbrane ako mee, luky, sekery, kyje, ...'' vod je sce trochu nudn, povate rozhovor a veziete sa do mesta na voze, kde Vs maj popravi. Proste ni nemete robi, ani preskoi to. No po prchode draka sa ve men a hra naber nov spd. Po vyzabjan protivnkov a teku z pekla. Vaa cesta stle pokrauje s Vam spolubojovnkom, kde sa potom neskr rozlite a idete na vlastn ps. Celkovo je hra rozsiahla, ponka mnostvo miest a lokalt. Nejedn sa o iadnu krtku hru, skr naopak, dos dlh hern vychytvka. Pre Vho hrdinu okrem inventu so zbraami do ruky je tu i monos vyuvania mgie. Okrem cestiiek a potikov v hre s i rzne bludisk, kde si potrpite hlaviku. Tie si ju potrpite na uen sa novch kzel i otvran zmkov. aliou vychtvkou s draci. Dos nebezpen stvorenia, s ktormi si pre vod nerado zana. Pri vbere rasy mte na vber rzne entity. Pohad v hre si hr nasta sm. Kpa a predaj tovaru i zbran je mon v kadom meste. o je troku chybikou krsy s prechdzky po hrnatom terne i ak mte viac nkladu, veci v inventri, tak nemete beha. In grafika je vytvoren na vysokej kvalite. o sa tka audia a hlok je na vborn. Spracovanie hry poda severskej mytolgie bol asn npad. Vekolep RPG hra. Hodnotenie: 9/10
Petoox;-;Best purchase I have done from Steam was Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim Legendary Edition, endless fun, so many mods to install, 5 of 5 stars.
H4M1H4RR;-;UJsed to like this game, but suddenly something changed.
Zippa (In Italy);-;The role playing game that arguable defined the genre for this past generation of consoles, the PS3 and 360, left me in awe once I finally broke away from it 75 hours from the start. It wasnt just an enhanced version of the hit success Oblivion, it was an entirely new game. So it was obvious not to have any ridiculously high expectations for the game going into it. The only thing the game suffered from was a cookie-cutter, by the books approach to the game. For instance, the opening scene of the game was supposed to be a worrisome one. Youre next in line to get your head axed off in a public execution, yet I wasnt scared. Atrocious acting and robotic-like animations sickened the characters around me. The intensity that the situation was supposed to deliver was crushed. But storytelling has never been Bethesdas strong suit and neither was it a high priority going into Skyrim. They wanted to create an experience that the players would never have to leave, something they could come back to and constantly have something to do, a place to explore, a mystical world taken from our imaginations that brought our mythical fantasies of dragons and castles to life before us. And they did just that.Skryims landscape is vast. While it may look small on paper, getting from point A to point B could take up the better part of an hour, or more if you get lost in the excitement of discovery and getting lost in your imagination to go and see what may be just around the corner, or in that cave just up the hill. The world constantly has something for you to do, whether that be exploring, questing, crafting, hunting dragons and other mystical beasts, or even starting up your own family and home. But it was the frequency at which I obtained new quests that always kept me on my feet. At one point, I had 19 main quests and 45 side quests all active at once. I just couldnt stop getting things to do. Everywhere I went, no matter who I talked to, someone always had something for me to do. Quests would even pop up in front of me while I ventured out to accomplish another task, only adding to the lengthy list I had drawn up already. Even when I tried to avoid civilians at all costs, they still managed to nag me to do things for them via messengers that would hand me documents with news quests. The cool part was that most of the quests rewarded me well for my hard work. And most of the quests that I had garnered all had their own uniquely scripted story thread, many of which tied into the main conflict at hand which involved me cleansing the kingdom of dragons. But the main campaign itself was still superbly penned, even with the hundreds of side content stories to embark on. Perhaps the coolest part about the quests however was how every one of them purposefully took me to a new area on the map that I hadnt yet been to before. The game wanted me to explore and see new things. I didnt just get a handful of chores to do in a single, nearby quarry or dungeon, everything was spread out and unique unto itself. And for the most part, none of the areas suffered from the problem Oblivion had, where many of the dungeons and areas in the game were composed of copied textures simply pasted into the game from other areas. Every nook and cranny of Skyrim is unique and different.If you hadnt already known, every character you create is Dragonborn from the start, meaning he or she can cast powerful magic-like shouts that are one of your biggest weapons at hand when confronted by a dragon. Yet they can also be used against other enemy types as well. The extensive variety of spells and shouts is extensive to say the very least and I had a blast getting to experiment with the different elemental types such as fire, ice, and electricity. The games new perk system also made experimenting with different skill types a joy as well. With just a few clicks of the mouse, I could upgrade my efficiency with one handed swords or have increased my maximum health. I could have even changed my list of magical weapons or upgraded a specific attack. The combat in the game was a huge improvement over its predecessor as well. Enemies can no longer be exploited like before in Oblivion where you could simply backpedal and fire spells at foes as they helplessly trampled along after you. The enemies youll face in Skyrim move significantly faster when than your backpedaling character when they go out on the attack. All in all, the combat system was very well put together. Swords clashes upon one another and bounced of shields, and thanks to the ability to multitask with your magical powers, you can cast things such as healing spells on the go in the middle of a fight to save you from death. The biggest problem with Skyrim though is the same that has affected every other Elder Scrolls game, bugs. While Bethesda has delivered a much more stable game this time around, it didnt stop me from having to reload previous saves on numerous occasions. And if youre one of those players who hates to save every ten minutes, or you just simply forget, the games auto save functionality is probably a life saver to you, although it isnt perfect. The thought of erased victories over deadly dragons and lost character development may sound like a nightmare to some, but heck, for a veteran of the Elder Scrolls series, its simply something Ive come to expect now.
Sex Tornado;-;Without mods, Skyrim is only a basic action RPG. And I'm not shelling out more money for paid DLC on a four year old game. Go  yourself Valve.
Pat;-;PAID MODS!!.... which one of you corrupt  thought of this idea? isn't your wallet getting fat enough from all those dlc's you bring out?
The soul collector;-;Amazing game ! endless hours of gameplay and quests with loads of in game roleplaying potential. you can buy a house settle down with a wife ,pillage towns,pickpocket kings, teebag guards i would recomend this game to anyone. And with the dawn guard dlc the infinate world of skyrim just got bigger ! in this amazing free roaming adventure. world of advice "Dont become a vampire !" (well unless you want people trying to kill you all the time) this amazing game will challenge you with traps and puzzles and from a horrific monster down to a lowly skever it captures the minds of children and adults alike. wow ! i have lost so many hours playing this wonderous game unlimited potenital and a diverse range of weapons ranging from a bow and arrow to a fireball and staff exellent role playing compatibility, and praticaly endless quests and fun to be honest :)
RecursE;-;I do hope we won't have to pay for the mod that's necessary to fix all the bugs and issues present in the game.
drxxdumazz;-;You know how people recommend this game for the wealth of mods developed for it? Well, now you can buy those too :)
Xriah;-;I hated this overrated, quantity over quality, PoS game before valve stuck their willy in the one thing this plate full of donkey turds had going for it. 75% for what, valve? What exactly did you do to justify taking 3/4ths of the pie? disgusting greed/10
Alfonso;-;Please remove paid mods
kibcob;-;this paywall makes me want to kill my family
Pao;-;Skyrim without mods is a pretty  game... and Valve is doing everything to destroy modding. Good job Valve.
MirrorVision;-;Bethesda and Valve are trying to charge players for mods, so I am changing my review.
Spirit - On VACation;-;The Fall of Skyrim.
A genuine 12 year old boy;-;PAID. MODS.  you, Bethesda and Valve.
Manety;-;Way to destroy the awesome modding community for a quick cash out, Valve and Bethesda. Hopefully it will bite you in the . That said, pretty average game 8/10
Sinsmi;-;Paid Mods. Don't support Bethesda and Valve for this. It COULD be good, if they: - made a price cap on mods (1-2 dollars) - only allowed approved submitters - gave the modder 90% and each of them just 5% - Didn't put a $100 needed until payout - Had community votes for mods - Didn't try to delete bad comments on paid mods, which MAKES EVERYTHING ABOVE NULL AND RUINS MY IDEA OF STEAM AND BETHESDA BEING GOOD - go to Greenmangaming for good games if you don't want to support valve and bethesda in this stupid- decision
Upstanding citizen Vlad;-;Vanilla 8/10 Modded 10/10 New paywall for mods? 0/10 Do not buy until fixed.
Upstanding citizen Vlad;-;Vanilla 8/10 Modded 10/10 New paywall for mods? 0/10 Do not buy until fixed.
FirewaveZ;-;While skyrim is a fantastic game, I can no longer recommend it due to the paid-mod debacle.
FullBattleRattle;-;Skyrim is amazing. Paid mods are disgraceful.
Doctor Winter;-;i'm hopping on the "omg why are they making us pay for free mods" train.
RecursE;-;I do hope we won't have to pay for the mod that's necessary to fix all the bugs and issues present in the game.
Jesusbear;-;I got killed by a pot after getting a 1000 bounty from killing a chicken. 11/10
The soul collector;-;Amazing game ! endless hours of gameplay and quests with loads of in game roleplaying potential. you can buy a house settle down with a wife ,pillage towns,pickpocket kings, teebag guards i would recomend this game to anyone. And with the dawn guard dlc the infinate world of skyrim just got bigger ! in this amazing free roaming adventure. world of advice "Dont become a vampire !" (well unless you want people trying to kill you all the time) this amazing game will challenge you with traps and puzzles and from a horrific monster down to a lowly skever it captures the minds of children and adults alike. wow ! i have lost so many hours playing this wonderous game unlimited potenital and a diverse range of weapons ranging from a bow and arrow to a fireball and staff exellent role playing compatibility, and praticaly endless quests and fun to be honest :)
michael;-;This game is not a "love it or hate it", it's a "love it AND hate it". Sometimes while playing I think to myself: "This is THE game, it's just a dream come true, is it real?", but the next moment it might change to: "This is the most stupid waste of time I've ever paid for". First of all, it is HUGE. It is enormous. I've done 300 hours into it and I'm still in the middle of the main quest. It's got everything: fights, spells, potions, horses, dogs, children, marriages, dragons, clothes, bookcases, treasure maps, grocery stores, pagan worshipping, war, armageddon, waterbreething, dead naked sorceresses in bikinis, mysterious ancient civilisations, glowing mushrooms, mammoths, zombies and lots, lots, lots of bugs. It is very beautiful, especially at night, when you see the northern lights shining, but also very ugly when the low and high resolution textures are messing up in front of you. It's got so many quests, tasks, characters and places, I think even developers don't know them all. It is a gem for those who like to explore and discover the territory for themselves. Each cave has something in it, each ruin might conceal a secret, each village might have a mystery to uncover. The freedom of choice given to the player is unnatural. You can be a werewolf, a vampire, a mage, a warrior, an archer, a thief, an assassin, a blacksmith, a miner, an alchemist, on top of the dragonslayer and The Chosen One, and most of that you can be at the same time. This schizophrenic development of the character results in a no less chaotic gameplay. You have swords, bows, daggers, maces, spells, magic staffs, magic scrolls, and dragon shouts, all of which you can use as weapons. You meet all sorts of enemies and you're free to deal with them by any means you prefer. There is no special weapon for a giant. You don't really have to use spells against a mage. Moral choices are also a blur. There is no "proper" or "right" way, really, you just do stuff and get stuff happen as a result. It's not a bad thing to use conjuration spells, necromancy is not punishable, poisons are as legal as healing potions, there is no white or black magic. Sometimes it's impossible to understand if you're doing good or bad. I think the only thing that stops freedom from being absolute is the quests. If developers would remove the quest lines as such, turning them into a mass of random tasks you can perform in any sequence, at any time (and preferably at any place with any character), it would make the game a triumph of freedom (and a complete mess). So, Skyrim is a beautiful, ugly, strict, messy, very stupid and very clever game, which everyone should play at least once. On the easy level it is almost casual, no effort is required to deal with the fights. It can be played on a Mac through Crossover, but it is sluggish no matter how low the graphics settings are.
BoinkedYou;-;Game was great. Them Steam gave us their solution to make it even better. Too bad their opinion sucks
DESIGNATED CART PUSHER;-;Im just here for the anti-establishment bandwagon down with the man
Infinite_loop;-;It's honestly just not that great anymore.
BoinkedYou;-;Game was great. Them Steam gave us their solution to make it even better. Too bad their opinion sucks
Zadrave;-;For a game I didn't really enjoy in the first place, I now hate because of paid mods. GG Valve.
jonathon;-;Pretty much your generic fantasy game devoid of any interesting combat mechanics, skill system and quest line. The graphics are nice, though.
AbyssalHawk;-;This game contains paid Mod, or aka third party DLC. One of the biggest reason to purchase game is now gone. Now you are expected to pay $1 for a sword, $7 for magic, $4 for armor... etc. etc.
killum109;-;The base game is very plain, you will need to spend hundreds of dollars to get it to a playable state.
Gikori;-;Paywall for mods, no thanks. Good game but I don't support this.
GamingReviewz.Com;-;Great game. But now that steam thinks it is okay to start charging for mods I will not be buying from steam until it stops. mods should be free. If i can find a free version of the mod i want i shouldn't have any problems. I dont even mind being charged for mods but i do when it's with steam. This is going to ruin steam and PC gaming is just getting to the heights it should be. Free mods is one of the big reasons that pc games are where they are today. you are only going to hurt yourself and your new fans steam.
Otrophic;-;I do not support paid mods. Enough said. Valve has lost a lot of my respect with this decision.
InFlames;-;Paid mods. #topkek2015 Valve you already do more money then what you should with all the games and badges, CS:GO keys and TF2 crap. If anything give us players an option to donate to whoever creates these mods. Much like the people on twitch and other websites for modding. My 50 cents for paying modz
Platinum;-;this game went from having a great DLC policy of selling fully fleshed out content packs to having the worst dlc policy of a huge store of small DLC packs trying to nickel and dime you for every red cent you have like some sort of black market bazaar of cheap knockoffs and broken products. For some reason Bethesda decided to hand the game over to 3rd party DLC vendors and now it's just flooded with crap. This game is now the biggest DLCfest on steam. I wouldn't recommend this to anyone.
Bulbasaur;-;Good RPG but the new P2W feature that lets you destroy modding communities for real money seems poorly thought out.
Rililk;-;I am changing my review to reflect the recent changed of monetizing mods. Mods are meant to be created without money in mind for the sole purpose of community enjoyment and collaboration.
!~NerfPhantomSenpai~!;-;Paids mods. Dont give money
Barael;-;I do not like where this is paid mods thing is going
Sute;-;Paid mods are disgusting. Switch to a donte or Patreon-esque model.
Subversio;-;paid mods GG steam.
hoy89;-;Bethesda and Valve have finally shown their true colors by introducing paid mods. They have effectivly split the once whole modding community into several parts in the span of a couple days, and for what? A few extra pennies? I find that Bethesda really doesn't know their audience when they alienated half of it by trying to make a quick buck. Either way, my view of the relativly meh game called Skyrim has dropped now that the main focus of it has been monetized.
ThisWayUp;-;All my fantasies. All at once. The only time I can marry a cat to an iguana and not be jailed for it. 10/10
ThousandthMan;-;Game is ok but I still wasn't able to really get into it like I remember getting into Morrowind (we can forget Oblivion). The visuals are pretty good but the game mechanics are clunky. The modding community is obviously a key feature of this game and there are some amazing things out there. However, you must not buy this game on Steam since it would encourage the new practice of paying for mods. This goes against the whole modding ethos and is something which should be strongly discouraged. Do not buy this game (here).
Ron Burgundy;-;Pay for mods...
L1zzardK1ng;-;Poor move Steam, poor move
Richard Nyxon;-;Pros: great base game for the huge modding scene Cons: "That'll be $50 for your reskin sir." "Buy this mod that adds a chest of armor in Whiterun for only $5" "I used to do everything for free, but now I'm mad that I wasn't receiving monetary compensation"
[4e] DumTheChosenWun;-;So, this is a very good game...BUT. Valve are now selling mods which used to be free. If you disagree like me and my friends do. Join this group: http://steamcommunity.com/groups/skyfreemod
Abel (GTA: Akashic.Dragon);-;>2015 >paying for fan content
JFK;-;Paid mods? Hell. No.
Mr Eos;-;Today was a sad day. Today we celebrate the day the Master Race moved a step closer to being a peasant. Seriously though. Modding is a sacred thing for the PC community. And it just got castrated for a bunch of greedy peices of sh....
Dazz3601;-;Well done Bethsoft + Valve. YOU ED IT UP!
zef_zakharov;-;Paid mods...it almost feels like an EA game full of microtransactions now. smh
Cat;-;I did not play this game much due to modding I did do a lot of modding Skyrim is mod, Skyrim is life. Gaben is love, Gaben is life Now: Zenimax are greedy, Bethesda are s. Gaben is "MOD", Gaben controls! Why you take duh modding from me?
Dimitri;-;Skyrim is an interactive game where you play the whole game and then instead of installing mods like an evolved human you pay a fat guy money to intall someone elses work and then that person gets a  cut.
shadehd;-;Too bad Valve cordoned off the unique PC Skyrim experience by hiding mods behind a PAYWALL. It's a shame because this is actually a good game. Don't support Steam or Valve by buying the game off Green Man Gaming or another site and downloading mods from Skyrim Nexus.
Men;-;The future of making modders complete your game for you while your company makes a majority of the money is now!
Drug Pie;-;I tried to kill alduin but game crashed, bought mod to fix this but game still crash bye bye 10euro(mod-cost).
Atomic Houseboat;-;Pay me $5 and I'll mod my review to positive.
simunsta;-;Used to love this game. Had mods. Bethesda decided to make me pay for updates to many mods I already had, 4 years after buying the game. There's no point in buying this game now. You can't 'try' different mods anymore. What a shame.
Dank Memes Top Kek;-;in response to adding pay for mods copied from reddit user /u/Martel732 It is changing a system that has been working fine. Modders aren't an oppressed class working without benefit. Modders choose to work on mods for many reasons: fun, practice, boredom, the joy of creating something. And gamers appreciate their contributions. While, some gamers may feel entitled most understand that if a modder is unable to continue the mod may be abandoned. Donations may or may not help but they are an option. This system has for years made PC gaming what it is. Modding in my opinion is the primary benefit of PC gaming over console. Changing a functional system is dangerous and could have unintended consequences. Now that people are paying for mods they will feel entitled for these mods to continue working. If a free mod breaks and isn't supported that is fine because there is no obligation for it to continue working. If someone pays though they will expect the mod to be updated and continue working as the base game is updated. Furthermore, abandoned but popular mods are often revived by other people; if these mods are paid then the original creator may not want people to profit off of updated versions of their mod. Related to the above paid mods may reduce cooperative modding. Many mods will borrow elements from other mods; usually with permission. Having paid mods will complicate things. Someone who makes a paid mod will be unlikely to share his/her work with others. What if someone freely share's his/her mod and someone incorporates it into a paid mod? Does the first mod's owner deserve compensation, does the second modder deserve the full revenue. This makes modding more politically complicated and may reduce cooperation. This may reduce mods based off of copyrighted works. There is a very good chance that any paid mod based off of a copyrighted work will be shutdown. Modders could still release free mods of this nature but it complicates the issue. Many mods based on copyrighted materials borrow (usually with permission) from other mods to add improvements. If these other mods are paid then the original creators likely won't let them use it. Additional many modders may now ignore copyrighted mods in order to make mods that they may profit on. Steam/the developer are taking an unfairly large portion of the profit. Steam and the Developers are offering nothing new to the situation. Steam is already hosting the mods and the developer already made the game. They now wish to take 75% of all profit from the mod. If the market gets flooded by low-quality paid mods, the modders will likely make very little and the quality of the game will not be increased. However, Steam and the Developers will make money off of no work on there part.
TacoCat94;-;Game quality has significantly suffered since the introduction of the paid modding system. Up until that point, it's been an exceptional game. But with so many mod devs with little to no quality control, my faith in Bethesda has significantly suffered.
BBQBaconBurger;-;Can no longer recommend a game that is planning on making people pay for BUGFIXES.
FrankManic;-;This "paid mods" thing is a disgraceful attempt to wring more profits from the community. If you guys wanted to actually make functional expansion packs with QA, support, and a decent amount of content you go for it. Hire modders as employees, take responsibility for any technical screw ups, and have a blast. But selling unsupported, unevaluated mod content? No. Just no.
kungfugi;-;Vanilla Skyrim: 8.5/10. Skyrim with mods: 11/10. Skyrim after paid mods: 0/10
Nat;-;I'm writing this due to the paid mods. I played Skyrim for the first time years ago when it came out, enjoyed it for what it was, and then played it with mods and enjoyed it more. Now mods are being charged on the workshop, and mods are what keep games like this going for years and years. Do not buy this game, do not buy mods, and do not support Bethesda or Valve.
milkyaerolas;-;Was fun with mods but now thats gone thanks to money hungry hippos. Hungry Hungry Hippos
Boomalla;-;Bethesda should be ashamed of themselves for putting community mods behind a paywall.
kk5;-;Supports paid mods, I can't endorse this game.
darkerpilgrim;-;Love the modded version with the good will of the community,pity Steam and Bethseda want to kill all that work,by letting people steal and cheat and commit basic fraud,surely a DMCA take down also dictates legal action against Steam ? Come on Gabe your company was built on the back of modders why destroy all that work or is just the money you want,if you do not kill this stupid and thoughtless venture then it's the latter and modding will die as this will effect every other game as basically back door DLC. ;
HaraldOst of Haron'A'Mid;-;Valve and Bethesda have now showed their true colors.
[EU] Broccoli;-;Early access mods inc.
WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you keep on doing it. 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
cmdchicken;-;I bought this game but now I can't afford to mod all the bugs :(
Vladimir Lenin, Mr Chairman;-;A excellent game ruined by greed on behalf of Valve and Bethesda Post success edit: we may have won but it would be wise to remember this war is not yet over
Cross;-;It used to be a good game - but everything is geared towards steam making money of it now. Dlcs, Paid mods... Stay way from their cash trap So they have removed the mod shop.. So far so good, i am not conviced they are done messing with our mods tho
CheeseJuggernaut;-;Valve's new paid "mods" is yet another excuse for more money. For those who didnt know, valve gets 75% of the profits from each "mod" purchase. I say "mods" because its more like paid DLC now. Just go to nexusmods.com
Dunadrian;-;I would not get the replay value for this game without the user made content that was added to it by the fans and modding community. Bethesda and Valve have absolutely no right to try and monetise the work of others for their own gain.
Puinguin (Hearth Addict);-;U U ING CUUUUUUUUUNTS U FUUUUUUUUUUUUUCKERS, GO TO HELL IF YOU DONT WANT PAYD MODS SPREAD THIS HASHTAG: #NOPAIDMODS SPREAD IT EVERYWERE, SPREAD IT EVEEEEEEEERYYYYYYYYYYWWWWWWEEEEEEEEERRRRRRREEE. seriusly tho, put that crap on , twitter, facebook, reviews, steam forums, DO WHAT U HAVE TO DO, DONT LET THIS GEM BE TAKEN FROM US!!!
echoness;-;This is a game I'll never delete.
BEEF;-;Chopped a butterfly in half with a katana then was  by mudcrabs. 69/10 would waste life again
THEY LAST FOREVER;-;Can ride a horse through a mountain while fighting a train 10/10
Liam Neeson Punching Wolves;-;Free mods, giving hours of fun.
VenuS;-;Downloaded a dress that I was supposed to pickpocket in order to have it, but I haven't leveled up my skill yet. So I followed the woman until it was night time. Found out where she lived. And after a few tries, I managed to sneak in, kill her in her sleep and steal the dress without getting caught. Love this game! 10/10
DRFLUFFY;-;Oh dear Skyrim....let me count the ways i so adore you. How many hours have i spent in your open world finding places to explore while on a mission. How many hours have i spent creating items, selling, buying, even stealing in some occasions. You've kept me entertained in so many ways. The combat is sometimes magical and other times sweaty and crude. I've beat you without mods and with and you continue to entice me for more. 10/10...i say no more.
Fairlight Excalibur;-;Skyrim. Nuff said. Simply amazing. Also, makes the console version look like a joke.
digbick99;-;the male nudity mod has inspired me to put more  in my next book 10/10
Sir ColdTea;-;Desperately wanted a horse but didn't want to steal it and become hunted, I finally gathered enough money to buy a horse so i did... I named him Charles Me and Charles rode of into the wilderness together, I got hungry so did Charles, It was ME or HIM, It turns out that Charles actually tasted quite good although i was sad to have eaten my best friend, but all is good because if i just bought a new best friend, I shall call him doug... 10/10 would eat my bestie again...
Zardonic;-;I spent years saying that Mass Effect was the best game I had ever played. Until I played Skyrim. I seriously hope this also continues in the Single Player realm instead of becoming the next WoW with The Elder Scrolls Online. I want an Elder Scrolls VI, VII, VIII, and as many as we can get. Please!
Carolyn Black;-;Skyrim is one of those breath taking video games that goes on to become a Legend. The open world gameplay will make the world come alive to you. While you are the main character, not everyone else revolves around you and your character. You will find npc hunting, working their day to day jobs, children running and playing tag, people praying to their gods and much more. But you still can interact with them. which can start new quest's, the option to have a follower and more. The main quest line alone is a piece of art and will keep you busy for a good bit of time. If you really enjoy your social life than this game is not for you. Because once you start; your not likely to stop anytime soon. Good luck on your new adventure hero and Don't forget to check out the mods for this game. There are quest mods to add even more gameplay hours, New weapons, Player homes, new worlds, and Even exploding chickens.
WilliamDHD;-;You want to charge me for, content you didn't make, that up until now had been completely free?  you buddy.
\\\.Wolverine.///;-;this game has now paid steam mods........not buying 50 mods to fix all the broken c...p in this horse  buggy game
Kyso-rio;-;Now that you have to pay for the mods, why bother.... I'm gonna get a store copy and downloads some mods elsewhere.
NemoPunk (^o^);-;-Paying for mods controversy. -Valve and Bethesda being greedy s. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OGp9P6QvMjY
Anime Boy 94;-;Game is buggy and crappy without mods. 0/10.
TitaniumGrass;-;Implementing paid mods will splinter the modding community and as a whole make modding much worse. There has to be better ways to go about helping out mod makers than having something like poor quality DLC up for sale.
gergez;-;"Money is how the community steers work", Gabe Newell, 25/04/2015
chrispunk28;-;No  the paid for mods deal!  you Valve
Arctic;-;DLC is bad. DLC where the developer is unaffiliated with the publisher and only recieves 25% of the proceedings is worse. DLC where the developer is unaffiliated with the publisher and only recieves 25% of the proceedings and has zero quality or compatibility control is horrendous. GabeN is a false prophet, who seeks to lead the PC gaming flock astray. Do not buy. Vote with your wallets, people.
warden;-;you play as the skyrim, a guy with a beard who is also a magician. you fight lizards from space and then do some drugs. 10/10
PuddlePirate;-;Bethesda had to "green light" paid mods for their game. The donation system was fine and allowed me to reward quality mod work. I'm sure Valve and Bethesda will get a cut of these fees, so at it's core, this is just another money grab. I won't be participating! https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop?just_created=true
Sen;-;hahaha paying for mods. this is a new low. what's next, paying for graphic options? I pity the modders who actually charge for their mods. the only thing that made this game playable is now going to be divided by pay2mod nerds and actual modders. All they had to do, was add a donation option. But that would mean no profit for Valve/the Developer so now we get this stupid scheme if you charge for your mod, please kill yourself
Whadafug;-;Sorry Bethesda, but you're not my cup of tea anymore. Buy The Witcher 3 instead. It's loads better. Probably.
thejoshknight;-;This would have been a positive review, but sadly, Bethesda and Valve along with certain modders have done everything in their power to fracture the modding community. Quite frankly, modding is the only reason why I bought Skyrim on PC over a console. If modding declines, the game loses a lot of the value it had for me.
Riolis;-;Mods are made by fan who effing love the game and wants to make it better. That is what mods is. Its not a effing cash grabbing cow that you can monetize so that steam and beth can earn more money out of a great community. Now the tarded steam and money loving prick at beth are poisoning the modding sphere with money. We are paying for the game, paying for the DLC now we have to pay for the mods. middle finger steam. You are being like iOS appstore with all this crap in app purchase like feature. IF you want to help the mods. the 100% of the profit should go to modders none to steam or beth. OR PUT A DONATE BUTTON TO MODDERS.
Krause;-;Paying for mods? NO. https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop
Cheesy Wotsit;-;I don't usually bother with reviews but things have gone beyond the pail now. The game itself is good not quite as good as Oblivion but opinions are opinions. With the right mods the game can be truly outstanding.... and there's the rub Valve's new charge for mods policy is beyond a joke. Taking the Lion's share of the money does not support the mods it makes them do all the hardwork and then they get paid for doing nothing. Do not buy this game, do not buy the mods, the mods that deserve true support can be downloaded for free, tested fully and if they are truly worth it you will no doubt find means to provide donations in the mods read me and more improtantly you WILL be supporting the mod developer because they will get 100% of the money and not some tiny back hand percentage after the multi million pound corporations have taken their massive share.
1cmanny1;-;Paying for mods is not okay. Free mods are why games like this are so popular.
KBxKF2xMKX;-;I have over 400 hours on Skyrim due to free mods. I won't be playing Skyrim anymore and this will be the end of Skyrim's life for me. Good luck Bethesda, I hope it was worth it.
Alberto;-;No to paid mods. Remember this game was near perfect with 'FREE' mods, not 'PAID'.
Talon111;-;The game is mediocre, the only reason anyone was still playing was because of mods. Bethesda left the game a bland and buggy mess that moders fixed, now Bethesda want money to let modders fix it.
Moldiar;-;I recommend the game. I recommend the mods. I do not recommend paying for mods. Mods are children of people with passion. If i want to add something that in my opinion deserves to be in the game then i do so. I do not wait for praise, money, fame nor comments on how awesome my mod is. My reward is the small counter in the corner saying me how much people had fun with it. You want to bpay me for my mod? Fine. I won't turn money down. But I will not force you to buy. If this is Bethedas idea of how to hype the community in the wake of the next TES then I sure hope they won't be surprised that the next TES will earn another award: The most pirated game in history.
Hrist;-;Paid mods are against the community spirit. shame on Valve/Bethesda for attempting to split a once great community for personal gain
drewfuller71;-;Skyrim itself is a GREAT game. I considered it one of my favorites. Not anymore for Steam and Valve are now imploying PAID MODs NOW. I think this is a Wrong. Their methods are wrong. I would not recommend this game for the paid mods exception. They need to reconsider. DO NOY BUY THIS GAME CAUSE OF PAID MODS!!!!!!
Fjllrven;-;How much of an absolute madman would you have to be to buy a game that needs mods to be good when the mods themselves are also hidden behind paywalls?
Rapo the Kind;-;The game itself is amazing, played it for many more hours over on my xbox. It is a wonderful game with so many things to do, but do not buy it until Valve and Bethesda remove the Mod paywall they have created.
phyyte;-;Valve and Bethesda has killed this game and made it even more un ing likable than the base game was. Congrats.
Nase;-;A game made playable by mod support, now pushing paid mods where the modders make a fraction of profits on sold mods. The rest going to Bethesda and Valve. Don't support crap developers and publishers.
Damodar626;-;AHAHAHA paying mods so your can profit. Good job valve you just hurt yourself the internet is coming for you
Joffrey Baratheon;-;dont support paid mods where creators dont get most of the money
dbzaf desktop waifu;-;Changing my review to negative until the workshop has been sorted out.
Daeus;-;Skyrim was one of the best games out there solely thanks to the modding community. Bethesda and Valve's greed have tarnished a game that was without a doubt considered to be a modern classic. Shame on you. 25% to modders is laughable and you don't even offer to curate or support these mods you want to sell. Greed is great it's true but that's why you get a negative review.
TheRealRuckus;-;Was great with mods, now Bethseda has robbed us all of everything we once held dear... Bethseda can keep their future games and modders can keep their content. I have a real life and I'll just keep living it instead of buying future products. Go find your fun with a different game. Bethseda doesn't deserve your money!
Berd;-;This game supports paid modding. I don't.
Dog's Pajamas[Vacation];-;This game went to  because of paid mod DLC
intoxikated;-;I bought this game for the mods. Not to drain my bank account. Screw paid mods.
phyyte;-;Valve and Bethesda has killed this game and made it even more un ing likable than the base game was. Congrats.
Nase;-;A game made playable by mod support, now pushing paid mods where the modders make a fraction of profits on sold mods. The rest going to Bethesda and Valve. Don't support crap developers and publishers.
Damodar626;-;AHAHAHA paying mods so your can profit. Good job valve you just hurt yourself the internet is coming for you
Joffrey Baratheon;-;dont support paid mods where creators dont get most of the money
dbzaf desktop waifu;-;Changing my review to negative until the workshop has been sorted out.
Daeus;-;Skyrim was one of the best games out there solely thanks to the modding community. Bethesda and Valve's greed have tarnished a game that was without a doubt considered to be a modern classic. Shame on you. 25% to modders is laughable and you don't even offer to curate or support these mods you want to sell. Greed is great it's true but that's why you get a negative review.
TheRealRuckus;-;Was great with mods, now Bethseda has robbed us all of everything we once held dear... Bethseda can keep their future games and modders can keep their content. I have a real life and I'll just keep living it instead of buying future products. Go find your fun with a different game. Bethseda doesn't deserve your money!
Berd;-;This game supports paid modding. I don't.
[B.] STEVE-O;-;Well... We have won, but at what price?
Hox;-;Even though paid mods are no longer a thing, it just goes to show what the company people think can do no wrong will actually try to get away with. If you payed for Oblivion and still buy this, it's your own fault. 11/10 GOTYAY I can't get a refund.
Jankie;-;"Let me guess, did someone make you pay for your mods?" EX-Skyrim player guarding GMOD hoping that the Valve doesn't attack.
Stradian;-;I'm sorry Elderscrolls online was such a failure for you Zenimax
ukstubbs;-;Paid mods!!!!! nah  off just pirate this game now and any paid mods.
charbs15;-;This negative review is prompted by Valve's new practice of selling mods and passing it off as a courtesy to the mod creators, all the while taking the lion's share of the profits. Want to really support mod creators? Remove this atrocity of a paywall and add way of donating to the authors directly. -not my words, but I stand by them.
Tobi or not Tobi ...;-;Don't like what valve have done, make the mod thing optional please.
Nevore;-;A shoddy port of a console game. Mods are it's only redeeming feature and thanks to Valve's mercenary ethics they're soon to be behind a pay wall.
[CH]BernieB;-;I was there when steam first releases and everybody was scared of the way you do not own games anymore. now valve shows their real face.
ColdLegion;-;Pay for mods so fun it gave me anal cancer
NemoPunk (^o^);-;-Paying for mods controversy. -Valve and Bethesda being greedy s. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OGp9P6QvMjY
Anime Boy 94;-;Game is buggy and crappy without mods. 0/10.
TitaniumGrass;-;Implementing paid mods will splinter the modding community and as a whole make modding much worse. There has to be better ways to go about helping out mod makers than having something like poor quality DLC up for sale.
gergez;-;"Money is how the community steers work", Gabe Newell, 25/04/2015
chrispunk28;-;No  the paid for mods deal!  you Valve
Arctic;-;DLC is bad. DLC where the developer is unaffiliated with the publisher and only recieves 25% of the proceedings is worse. DLC where the developer is unaffiliated with the publisher and only recieves 25% of the proceedings and has zero quality or compatibility control is horrendous. GabeN is a false prophet, who seeks to lead the PC gaming flock astray. Do not buy. Vote with your wallets, people.
Dr. Miles Manners;-;It isn't about the fact we now have to pay for mods, its about the 25% they will be getting above $100. It isn't about making something that was free cost money; its about the lack of quality control, the legal ramifications, and the fact companies will no longer have to fix their games, they will be able to release patches at a cost to the consumer.
MLG_Jeep Dogg;-;Pay4Mods No thank you, Bethesda and Valve. Paid mods has been removed, but I will leave the review negative as a mark. I don't support Bethesda anymore anyways, and Steam has been real  recently, so we'll see where this goes. Stand by for Paid Mods 2.0
Wiedzemir;-;Numerous bugs plague the game as physics engine going haywire on 60+ FPS. Nevertheless, Bethesda is refusing to fix it itself and instead rely heavily on unofficial patches and mods. But despite that fact it, alongside with Valve, attempted to introduce an outrageous paid mods concept which for them essentially would be nothing more than a DLC they never created but for some reason decided to get paid for it anyway. The game is a great free roaming RPG. A lot of dungeons to explore and adversaries to defeat. However, it is only truly playable tweaked and with mods installed.
The Governor;-;Great game but the paid mods are bs...
[B.] STEVE-O;-;Well... We have won, but at what price?
Hox;-;Even though paid mods are no longer a thing, it just goes to show what the company people think can do no wrong will actually try to get away with. If you payed for Oblivion and still buy this, it's your own fault. 11/10 GOTYAY I can't get a refund.
ConfusedSquid;-;Paid for mods. The new disease of gaming. Bye bye EA, hello Valve! The new king of controversy!
GirlonDuty;-;I wanna die and be reborn in Skyrim. That's how much I love it.
Goyim Kikeberg McShekelstein;-;You now pay for the mods. Valve is worse than EA now.
UnderworldHades;-;Gotta pay for mods so I do not recommend it
U.S.MAN;-;Adventuring in wilds, i found a giant's camp and assault the giant and for like 6 seconds "i believe i can fly" if you know what i mean
Magic_Tub;-;I can no longer recommend this game because Bethesda and Valve have decided that mod integration should be blocked behind a monetary wall. Update 1: It seems they reversed their decision, but my optimisim is still cautious.
Blackpot;-;Most likely the best game ever made. 100/100
delta0062;-;No more paid mods...
Shrykull;-;Skyrim "Its like masturbating without lotion, its doable but you get chaffed after awhile." Its a really fun RPG with great action and a good story (They really made the dialogue less attractive than in previous games and the lack of stat points brain ed me). 9.99999999/10
Turbulant Trevor;-;An amazing game, of course. I actually found the prospect of paying for mods interesting. Particularly to support developers. Upon hearing, however, that mods had to be pay to play, and the developers only get 25% of the profit, I was very upset, and I hope they make some changes to the policy.
victorzvyagin;-;Lol, one of the Best fantasy worlds set in the Medieval scenery- RPG gameplay is Awesome, too- mixed with Action (although, I would either prefer the fully- turn Based RPG, like in Fallout 3, or Action game, with combos and other variations). But- the Graphics- 10/10 Story - 10/10 (for Humour, I'd Say - 11/10 =P ) The feel of being powerful- 8.5/10 at the moment Would i recommend it? Hell, no- since my 1st of April joke is also late, when Valve doesnt realise its not april fools, and yet release the system that "makes you pay for mods" (Translating from "allows you To support Modders") Thanks, Bethesda, you game is great. You are Drunk. Go home =-)
Flossy;-;Paid mods? Jeez it sounds like every developers wetdream. Your telling me i can have some  in his basement work for free to make a mod and then i can take a 75% cut of his work? your telling me this fat loser will bugfix my game for me and i GET PAID! No i will never ever support this. If this gets fully implemented i will never purchase a steam game again. A tip jar that the developer and valve take like a 10 to 20% cut from? fine. That encourages modding and it encourages developers to make mod support. 75% cut and a paywall?  you Not to mention all the mod thiefs and potential problems. oh your mod uses the script extendor? What then? Don't update your mod? are the poeple who paid for your product  out of luck now? This is a bad idea and it only benifits valve and greedy companies. Do not buy skyrimjobs Do not buy  paid mods
Legless at Alton Towers;-;Money grabbing devs, would not recomend
kostea2007;-;I played this game for about a month when I first got it, then I stopped for a while after wining it. Then Steam released the Steamworkshop for this game and I downloaded a ton of mods that kept me playing on and off for over 3 years. Never in those 3 years would I have considered not recommending this game until a few days ago when Valve and Bethesda decided to jump in bed together and announced PAID mods. This opened the floodgates to a host of egregious behavior including using assets from FREE mods from Steamworkshop and other sites (Nexusmods) and using them in PAID mods in the Steamworkshop (a fishing PAID mod that used idle animations from Fore's idle animations FREE mod), low quality PAID mods ( $5 for 250,000 septims, which you can get by just running a console command ), ethical concerns (Steam gets 30% of every mod sold and Bethesda gets a whopping 45%, leaving only 25% for the modder that he/she can only redeem if he/she generates a certain amount of money from sales), moral ramifications (a Valve lawyer actually said that it doesn't matter if your FREE or PAID mod depends on other FREE or PAID mods) and even legal ramifications (people making money using assets from FREE mods in their PAID mods, or even assets from PAID mods in their FREE mods). There's nothing more to say about this, and anyone who cares for the modders and says that they deserve money are really proving that Valve only cares 25% for modders, 45% for Bethesda and 100% for themselves by allowing all of this to happen amid a torrent of hateful backlash and other logical alternative from the community (A "Donate" button is too much since Valve won't get any money from that).
BitSmith;-;A donation button would have been a much smarter move.
Goth;-;Paid mods? well if it's really good ofc, but only after "testing" it. I don't wanna pay 10$ for mod because it got encouraging art, and in real it's money grabbing . Where are my 10$ after? 75% steam tax.. it's usury, and usury is against the law
BloodyCheese;-;While this game is amazing I would recommend not buying because Valve and Bethesda implemented paid mods for this game.
a_moldey_waffle;-;-Bad voice acting -Meaningless choices -Stiff animations -Boring combat Oh, and paid mods.
Fireeye;-;Like practically all Bethesda games, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim usually is a rather bland experience unless you pack a plethora of mods onto it that fix potentially gamebreaking bugs, add new mechanics or bring back those whom Bethesda couldn't be arsed to continue, import custom art assets, sounds, music, or create entirely new experiences with new quests or sometimes even entire continents. It is no secret that the fantastic success of TES games from Morrowind onward came and comes from its vibrant modding community. For almost ten years by now, modders have transformed their enthusiasm for TES games into (usually) well-crafted mods that greatly enhanced the experience of the base game. And these mods were free - they were a community thing, something which people produced because they liked the game but thought they could make it just a tad better by adding this or tweaking that. And again, they usually were right with that. Then some particularly bright heads over at Valve and Zenimax added the option to demand a price for fan mods. Even if you overlook the fact that the modder only gets 25% of the revenue his or her mods generate, this change will mean that many mods will no longer be created because the modder liked the game, but because s/he is in for a quick buck. What does that mean? 1. Essential tech mods that are required to run other (free) mods may go commercial. SkyUI, an interface mod many free mods rely on has already removed its own free version, breaking hundreds of other mods. 2. The same holds true for bugfix mods. Want to play the game without bugs? Better pay twice, once for the game itself, and once to get it to run without problems. 3. Art assets from free mods -WILL- be stolen and used in commercial mods, most likely without the consent of the original author. Valve can not possible hope to effectively regulate this, and even the original creators can not sift through dozens of different mods to see whether they are using assets created by them. 4. Developers may start to intentionally leave interesting mechanics out of the game, knowng the modding community will add them sooner or later - and that they can use this to cash in on the players twice. And that's just some of the problems paid mods will bring about. As far as Valve or Zenimax do not remove the option to create paid mods for this game, I can not and will not recommend buying it. TES Games rise and fall with the modding community, and the powers are trying to cash in on it.
Gluttony - The Seventh Sin;-;I have sunk quite the fantastic amount of time in this game, most of it outside the realms of what Steam can log. I have in fact beaten it, and since then played around with hundreds of different mods. The base game fits the analogy of a lake of  quite well: A vast world full of mostly nothing, featuring what feel like dated graphics and a fighting system that varies from broken (sneaky archery bonus stacks? completely broken pathfinding?! my favorite) to very broken (killing the final boss with 4 shots and giants ignoring physics? Sure). All in all, once the game was layed out before me, it was plain to see that it had many, many flaws and not a huge lot going for it. But then I found the modding scene. And by Thor all mighty, it was glorious. Ranging from the essential to the nonsensical, passing by the immoral and the insane, it was quite simply a whole different level. Graphical mods that made the triple A market blush, gameplay mods that created actual ing battles and not glorified pub brawls, as well as expanded all systems far beyond their initial capabilities, entire new quest lines complete with voice acting and new items / resources - the game simply had no limit. It was so insanely good that I actually dabbled in mod creation, successfully accomplishing a few scripts of my own even with no initial knowledge on the matter. And now Bethesda and Steam have the gal of showing up and trying to monetize mods. Mind you, I am not against the concept of monetizing mods - however, the way Steam and Bethesda are going about it is borderline criminal. Firstly, they take most of the profits, leaving the modder with only 25% of the revenue. Since these are profits and not donations, the modder should be legally obligated to declare this source of revenue, lest s/he may incur a fine, which means an additional 24% (depending on the modder's country) will be taken away by taxes. That means that a modder will make about 18 cents off of each dollar they sell. That's insanely low. Secondly, not all mods should be monetized. This is a simple fact. You can't sell a script that sells a fixed amount of in-game gold. You can't sell a script that adds genitalia to horses. You can't sell a script that retextures a few pixels worth of an item's model. Can you trust that Steam will moderate this? Of course not. Steam can't even moderate the quality of the games it sells, let's not even start pretending that it'll moderate the quality of the mods to any extent beyond what they're legally bound to. Thirdly, mod monetization should be based on donations or post-facto experiences. How do I know your mod works the way you say it does, on the latest patch of skyrim, and isn't incompatible with the other mods I'm running and doesn't render the game unplayble because my laptop is a glorified potato? I don't. Fact is, when buying mods, there's no way of telling whether you're buying a complete piece of garbage that is lying to you or if you're buying an amazing epic adventure that lasts 8 hours and is completely fresh and worth the money. I could keep going, but it's not hard to see all the innumerable flaws with this system. Ultimately this will just create complete and utter chaos in the modding scene, as vague rule sets allow people to use other people's mods as a base for their own, and as people try to steal other people's works to put it up for sale on the workshop. And since this has had a huge negative impact on the game, the community, and ultimately drastically reduced the amount of available mods by way of either putting up a paywall or having legitimate concerns from the authors on the nexus website that cause them to remove their works so they're not posted on Steam to be put up for sale, I am left with judging the base game as it is, with no additional content. And that game is a bit . So I guess that sums it up.
jwj006;-;Skyrim is nothing compared to Oblivion or Morrowind.
Tunes;-;Paid Mods is ridiculous.
Nigma;-;S E L L O U T B O Y S Here's your complimentary negative review, FREE of charge! What a bargain!
Cultural Zeitgeist;-;paying for mods lol
Death God Bulwark;-;Good job Valve, you turned a peaceful, happy community where everybody worked together, to one where it is about money. I hope you are happy!
Xefolyn;-;Pay for free mods? Valve is EA Confirmed. Uninstall steam now, leave while you can. Valve is dead.
ECTM. Codrinel;-;One of the best games I have ever played. 6 times.
The Party Ninja;-;Paid mods will be the death of this game and every TES game afterwards. The games are half broken half finished messes before you add mods; asking us to pay to finish what you should have done in the first place is ridiculous.
Hazzy;-;Aaaaaand paid mods were removed. Carry on.
BlackBaron;-;Well, i loved the game for the mods. They really added a lot more content to the game making it a bang for the buck. Bethesda fixed that problem by giving you, the customer, the ability to pay for otherwise free content. Yea, no.
Septimus;-;Play it for free this weekend only...but pay for user-created mods.
AngusDestroyer;-;Until Steam changes this mod policy I'm going to have to give Skyrim a negative review.
Tizlor;-;The day I pay for a mod is the day I take a long walk off a short pier. So very few mods deserve any kind of payment option, and the ones that do I've donated directly to the authors.
Tainted Taint;-;Free mods is what made this game great. The vanilla game is bland. Can no longer recommend this game.
Shrek;-;DRUG MONEY IS USED TO RIG ELECTIONS AND TRAIN BRUTAL CORPORATE SPONSORED DICTATORS AROUND THE WORLD!
Aplestormy;-;One of the greatest games ever made. A+++++
Stuggernaut;-;It may seem odd to review a game I have not finished, so take that into account as you read this. I first played the Elder Scrolls series with Morrowind. Back then I thought it was the coolest thing ever. Huge world, tons of monsters and weapons. At the time though I was big into MMOs so I felt very disconnected from the game. Alone. So my time with the game was short, and I never finished the main campaign. When Oblivion came out, I gave it a try, and instantly was reminded of Morrowind and why I lost interest in the game. So I probably played it for only a few hours my first time in. Elder Scrolls games are a fickle thing though... you see screenshots, hear about other people having fun, see Mod updates, and before you know it. BOOM. Right back in you go and you forget why you ever left. My right back in was Skyrim. So much hype, so much graphical goodness. I resisted for a LONG time, then came a Steam Sale and I was in. The game... Wow, so much better. Is it the dragons? Hell yes it is the dragons! I have about 50+ hours on record as I type this, and I go off and on playing the game so as not to get burned out on it. I modded it up as best I could and I think it makes it that much better. Graphics - Just amazing! Even unmodded this game looks stunning. Character models less so than the world itself, but still a great show for the eyes. Sound - I'm no audiophile, but I tend to get drawn in more if the sound is good. This game does not disappoint. Music, voice acting, sound effects, all perfect. The first time I fought a dragon, and it came swooping in and bathed the ground around me in fire, I was amazed at how awesome it sounded (surround sound headset of course!). Do yourself a favor and really crank the volume. Again, I am not finished the game. Will I ever? Who knows, and who cares. I am having fun so that is all that matters. If you are holding off for similar reasons that I was, wait for a sale like I did. But don't deny yourself the experience if you can. It is totally worth it.
|FTG| |\CCEX/| Sgt. C(I)ate;-;The only game that made me go from 9pm to 3am without even noticing.
Thee Man;-;A Really nice game that you play alone and its very moddable. an rpg with nice story and combat system what more you want? get it now
Strife;-;I modded this game so heavily that it is now basically pornography featuring Thomas the Tank Engine: destroyer of worlds. 13/10 I regret nothing.
'OnlyMe.. #HappyEid!;-;its the best RPG game .. <3
encrypted_ka0s;-;I use nexus mods now.
jrowe007;-;you know why
DJ;-;Saved the world as we know it, helped almost everyone in the game, yet can't kill a chicken without an entire town trying to kill you. 10/10, Probably the best game I've ever played.
Rob gym champ;-;I think obama democracy is making games paying to play played with payers played. - in short, boxers are not dlc, scholongs are.
i gotta win the dadbowl;-;killed a chicken and entire town came after me 10/10 lydia fell 100 feet and looked dead but when i checked again she got right back up. GOTY 11/10 its like skyrim without guns.
Professional Pube Stylist;-;Looks like I'll be staying at Nexus to get my free (and better) mods! Thanks Steam workshop for guiding the way. btw lol, no one is going to pay for a ing mod on steam when they can get them free still on Nexus.
Norman Jayden;-;I cant even describe how good this game is. Graphics 10/10 Gameplay 10/10 story 10/10 There is so much to do, you wont even know where to start replay value 10/10 over all 10/10 Give it a shot.
hideo kojima the hideo;-;"I LOVE PAYING FOR MODS!" -Said no one ever
ThunderHorse;-;IN REPSONSE TO PAID MODS   GETFREE!!   The Steam Community is about sharing your work. Have good ideas and help to improve each other. That makes us diffrent of the gaming companies. >>>> Post this every each paid mod you see in steam <<<< Because we don't wan't to let end up steam in a greedy for money- gaming platform. ......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... _____.......__............._____ .............//'...'/`............|...__.....\....|...|............/... ___| ........../'/.../..../......./\..........|...|....\....|....|...|...........|..../ ........('(.......... ~/'...').........|...|.....|...|....|...|...........|...| .........\.................'...../...........|...|__/...|....|...|____....|...\____ ..........''...\.......... _...............|_____./.....\______\....\_____| ............\..............( ..............\.............\ https://steamcommunity.com/linkfilter/?url=https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop
Dr. Billeaux;-;Don't even bother.
Sweety Ashley;-;This game is the most enjoyful and expensive drug that will ever be created. This game is just amazing! Great game and PC mods make it look amazing and a lot more fun. There is no doubt about this game being Game of the Year following Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion. This game is fantastic with its detail and perfected gameplay that puts gaming in RPG's on a whole new level. I am looking forward to the next installment of the Elder Scrolls whenever they can get it out as quickly as possible. However long that may be I will be putting my hours and life into this game as it requires that devotion with all the quests and aspects to understand them. I have played other generations of Elder Scrolls and I have not been disappointed yet. This is a fantastic franchise of games
robby80;-;awesome game, played it alot!
DJ_VoiceBox;-;110% of nonstop fun! SOOOO MANY QUESTS! Plus the DLC add even MORE quests! And if you are board of the vanilla quests, or you just compleated them all (highly unlikely) Skyrim is one of the easiest games to mod, workshop and nexis combined! Also, quest mods aren't the only mods out thare. Thare are follower mods, weppon mods, magic mods, and so much more! If you don't alredy have the game, take it from me... GET THE GAME!!! 753 stars out of 5. You will most likely never get board in this game! you can spend a year on the game and still not compleat all of the quests. I hope this helped, and I hope you get this game.
WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you keep on doing it. 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
Wizardmon;-;This game sold me mods :(
Clarey 06;-;Had alot of fun with this game.....but then i logged in to steam today to find they're charging for mods that used to be free.  that  i'll not be paying for stuff i can find free on the skyrim nexus. if they make the mods free again ill give it a thumbs up but until they stop being a set of greedy ers it's a big ol' thumbs down from me!
Final Remix;-;I would've recommended this game in the past, solely because it can be fun when modded heavily. However, with paywalls leading to a schism in the community, I can no longer recommend this game for purchase.
Cronus;-;Don't support a developer that has no respect for the people who make their games great.
BasedBundles;-;11/10 with rice 0/10 with paid mods
MrMcSniggles;-;Pros: They revamped their combat system very well and it ended up being fairly satisfying. Half way decent main questline too, but not on Oblivions level. Cons: Vanilla Skyrim pales in comparison to Oblivion. Guild questlines in Skyrim were so short and boring I really had questioned whether I missed something. Was deeply let down. It is the modding scene that would make amends for Skyrim, yet this is now a con because of what Bethesda has attempted to do with Valve regarding mods. A simple donation system would have been appropriate, however I do not see this current system they are attempting to implement as a proper means to an end. This comes off as a lazy way for Bethesda and Valve to line their pockets, rather than the actual mod creators. I think this system will end up damaging PC gaming more than helping it, so I cannot approve of it. I do not approve of vanilla skyrim for anything over $10, ordinarily I'd recommend it for the mods however, but again, not anymore.
The Time for Bill is Nye;-;Charging for mods is despicable. Both Valve and Bethesda should be ashamed. Comewhatever may, I will not support you guys in future games, even if it is half life 3 or the next TES or even Fallout.
Node;-;Valve has made history by finally attempting to destroy the single thing that has made PC gaming so great: mods. Mods have always been for only one thing: the player. Ever since PC gaming's existence. It was never for lining the greedy pockets of Valve, Bethesda, or the mod creator. Donations have always been accepted by mod creators, but Valve is purposely deleting donation links from mod pages now. Do not purchase this game if you have a single shred of integrity within your soul. You know you have done something wrong when FORBES MAGAZINE of all places, says what you are doing, is unethical. FORBES. MAGAZINE. Link: http://www.forbes.com/sites/insertcoin/2015/04/24/valves-paid-skyrim-mods-are-a-legal-ethical-and-creative-disaster/ . To add a cherry on top of this  sundae, Valve generously allows you to get a refund - but the refund ONLY goes to your Steam Wallet, which means the money, no matter what, stays with Valve. You can not get it back. Do not buy this game until Valve stops this disgusting trend.
robby80;-;awesome game, played it alot!
BrianRubin;-;This game is a triumph of immersion, storytelling, gameplay and craftmanship. Just an exceptional example of a world made to feel real, with nooks and crannies aplenty to explore and discover. I have an insanely short attention span, so putting in ten hours into a game is, for me, rather rare. I have about eighty in Skyrim, and I feel like I'm just getting started.
Stadilainen;-;Skyrim is awesome. Whilst working on a quest you find a note in the world that makes you pursue another quest. This goes on until you no longer remember what your original goal was, that is the beauty of Skyrim and Elder Scrolls. Exploration, rewarding gameplay, choices (you are not given as much freedom in choices as you were in Morrowind, though) and funny  bugs that have always defined Elder Scrolls to me.
Skuzmodo;-;top game an epic adventure 10/10
Big_Smile_Le;-;Life? is that new mod? 10/10
Gandalf the Pimp;-;This game is a soul trap!
ultra jeff;-;No more paided Mods for people who spent 30 minutes changing up the colours of someone else's assests and charging a full three dollars for it
iAMtHESushighost;-;This pay for mods thing is a  you to steam users and has ruined everything new users thought steam stood for it's sad when you think about it.
Barristan Selmy;-;I don't support games that have paid mods. Neither should you.
Setyty;-;When are we getting cases and keys? 4.99 for a companion... I would no longer recomend this the thing that made this worth something was mods. Steam just roped in all the greedy mod makers and took them off the nexus. Wet and Cold Free: http://www.nexusmods.com/skyrim/mods/27563/? Arissa Free: http://www.nexusmods.com/skyrim/mods/53754/? ...This is worse then Horse Armor
lkb+;-;as others said paid modes - evil
Traveler123;-;This game is 10/10 !!! no questions asked, Don't even dare to do it!!!!! but paying for the mods that maked this game more legendary and popelair is Heartbreaking for me!!! Are we really Slaves now in this Gaming World???
brohammed;-;Paid mods would be reasonable if there were quality control and the modders got a reasonable percentage but this is ridiculous.
FortPlz;-;Steam Workshop, please don't ruin any more games I've enjoyed.
obama's-elf;-;"Introducing new ways to suport workshop creators" what they really ment "Introducing new ways to steal workshop creators". With no respect valve, BY FAR, this is THE BIGGEST error you made. A mod is not a mod if it's not free. I think you can't imagine how much people bought skyrim on pc ONLY for the mods, like me , and hate you for this , like me. It will never be the same. I really hate you now, stupid VALVE. Now, there is this little thing that is starting to scare me. Another bull s**t fact about this, is that they'll probably make people used to pay for mods. I mean, now all games are going to put their mods for money because skyrim also did it and people with money, as in any case, they'll pay like .Please don't do like EA, be legit specially you valve that everyone respects you and buy your games. (by the way a great example of: "getting people used to something" is the hole game industry. hey dude get used to have to pay like 60 dollars for everything and games having their lack of content repaired by DLCs. the problem is: why putting my mod on nexus if may be paid in steam? I don't blame moders, it is better for them and it's really hard work sometimes. but if this keeps up in some years free mods would turn out to be special, just like gaming companies that still care for costumers and the art of making a good game that really worth it's prise. If anyone would want to help, then give the option to donate, and they will. I'll tell you what's the worst, if you would really want to help mod creators, you would give them all the money and be legit. But of curse why giving them their money if we can be a son of a b**ch and keep with most of it, and only giving them 25% of the money.
Daniel;-;Paid Mods. That is all.
Rieggs;-;Modders have always worked on donation-based model, and that model has become more and more successful for them throughout the years, prompting some of the most amazing third-party work ever seen in video games. Commercializing mods through Steam will absolutely destroy the special relationship that modders and the community enjoy. Skyrim is a fantastic game, and part of what makes it so good is the culture of user modification that has grown around it. I believe, as do many others, that creating this "paywall" is the fastest way to destroy this culture. Please don't  our game, Valve. You're developers, and you work for money, so I understand where you're coming from. But that guy in his Wall-Street suit who strutted into your conference room and told you this was a good idea? He was wrong. And you know it. Take a stand, or we, the end users of your products, will.
Rooky;-;Despite what my steam account says I've racked days into this game on one console or another and its a fantastic game (which four years in you all know that). Yet, with these new "pay for mods" the game has become a harbinger of a new and terrible trend of monetising everything that can be. Honestly we would have expected something like this from a big publish but Valve? If this is contiues then sooner or later somethings going to give in this industry and it'll collpase upon itself. I hate that I have to give this great game a thumbs down.
Rocket_Surgeon;-;Paid Mods = No
Mittens;-;The game was fantastic with mods. Unfortunately, Valve and Bethesda decided that you should now pay for the things that fix the game. Bethesda, you released a broken- terribly consolized game and you're now expecting people to pay for the mods that fix it? And not only that, but the creators- you know, the ones that're actually doing the work- only see 25% of the profit while Valve and Bethesda split the other 75%. So not only are you screwing the consumer, you're also screwing the modding backbone. Bethesda and Valve have singlehandedly destroyed the potential lifespan of this game, and I absolutely recommend that you DO NOT BUY THIS.
Woff;-;Modders only get 25% revenue from what they created $5 for a  sword from DOTA/10 $29.99 for an extra apple/1000 why was PC masterrace again?
rip minecraft;-;This game support paid mods, I do not.
Kageshi;-;Not anymore...
Rathia;-;"We're now supporting modders!" Oh, that's great. Good on you. "We're taking a 75% cut." What the actual .
wjamz;-;I really feel bad about saying this but, for 4 years Ive been waiting to finally get this game on PC (for the mods) because I already owned the game on console, but I was very disappointed in what I went through. I installed a mod, and the launcher crashed... okay, so I got rid of it and installed a simple music mod, it crashed the launcher... I looked online and saw that this was a problem since 2012! specifically with the steam workshop! I read that there is a fix but from an outside source. I am going to get that and play skyrim the way I want. the way steam had failed me... This negative review is more towards Steam messing up then skyrim. The game itself was amazing and ran really smooth on my not so great laptop. I'm just upset that in order to use a feature that Valve/Steam advertise (they actually charge for some mods now) I have to find an outside source in order to experience created content.
drhojo;-;Paying for Mods is okay but only giving 25% to the creators is ridiculous. I can't believe steam thought they could get away with this; what an insult.
Elite Templar;-;Because of your pathetic 75% shares Valve keeps and giving modders a measly 25%, not to mention they can't get their paycheck if they can't reach $100. Some of them are forcing themselves to set up rediculous prices that doesn't reflect the content they've created, and some are installing ADS TO BUY MODS WHEN YOU BOUGHT A MOD. For this, Skyrim is not a recommendable game unless the shares are dropped lower than 75%. Unless this practice is adjusted to a fairer price, say goodbye to your sales.
philipo jackson;-;A pretty fun rpg to explore and play around with had a good modding scene to expand game time...till the mucked it up and make you PAY FOR THE MODS.
MauGx3;-;Thanks Valve, for  on the work of modders and the experience of gamers. This game was one of the best of all time, Bethesda, but your new greedy model has turned this game into a dark blob in the history of PC gaming.  off.
Streaming's for fagets;-;gaben dont be greedy pls moar money bring moar sandwiches less money, less sandwiches the point is try to lose some bloody weight.
Samuel Ahn;-;Congratulation. Beth and Steam. You guys well know how to make money! Thanks to the greatest ing  for all players and modders.
Tu_FishUK | CSGOHunt.net;-;I cannot recommend this to anyone due to the absolutely disgusting decision to charge for workshop content. Do not buy mods. Your money is not going to the creators, it's going to Valve. Simply donate to the content creators after a mod has given you pleasure. Never, ever risk purchasing mods before using them. Shame on you Valve.
Ciao;-;Tired of DLC ruining everything? Now you can join in on 25% of the fun too!
Vash the Stampede;-;a ok game, that you have to pay to upgrade with mods
revanitas;-;Paid mods 10/10 Coming next: Paid bugfixes 11/10
Lorgus;-;Paid mods are cancer 0/10
Silverfoxx;-;Skyrim's modding community had a fantastic reputation within the pc community, this has been destroyed in one fell swoop by Valve and Bethesda. 0/10
Dynastyn;-;First off, skyrim is a fantastic game, and many people, myself included, have installed mods for the game. It was great and all, until valve decided to monetize mods and turn it into micro transactions. Paid mods are a really bad idea, since there is no guarantee of compatibility with other mods, and only 25% of the profit goes to modders. It also changes the attitude from "lets make mods since i enjoy making them", to "lets make mods since we can make a profit". Overall, this is a extremely bad idea, and i love this game, but please, remove paid mods and make them free again.
bellliam;-;Thanks for destroying modding for everyone. Dislike, will not support future games.
sskodje;-;A great game, but the mod community got backstabbed by a greedy Bethesda and Valve looking for more money out of nothing. Play it while the mod community is still alive.
1337BaldEagle;-;WIth the introduction of Paid for Mods I cannot in good conscience give this game a good review. I have been using Mods in TES/Fallout games since Morrowind. As much as it is a wonderful idea to reward good mods this is not the method for doing so. Valve/Bethesda should receive 0% for a mod. I further believe all mods should be on a donation basis. Giving Valve money for something they already do is stupid. Giving Bethesda money for NOT MAKING A GAME AS GOOD AS IT COULD HAVE BEEN is stupid. In a single night this put a rift in the Modding community that we all loved. This will be the last Bethesda game I buy. And that really makes me sad and mad to say that.
Nic;-;Paid mods, suuure. Well Bethesda have fun with the 75%, I wont buy your  games anymore!
Lorgus;-;Paid mods are cancer 0/10
Silverfoxx;-;Skyrim's modding community had a fantastic reputation within the pc community, this has been destroyed in one fell swoop by Valve and Bethesda. 0/10
Dynastyn;-;First off, skyrim is a fantastic game, and many people, myself included, have installed mods for the game. It was great and all, until valve decided to monetize mods and turn it into micro transactions. Paid mods are a really bad idea, since there is no guarantee of compatibility with other mods, and only 25% of the profit goes to modders. It also changes the attitude from "lets make mods since i enjoy making them", to "lets make mods since we can make a profit". Overall, this is a extremely bad idea, and i love this game, but please, remove paid mods and make them free again.
bellliam;-;Thanks for destroying modding for everyone. Dislike, will not support future games.
sskodje;-;A great game, but the mod community got backstabbed by a greedy Bethesda and Valve looking for more money out of nothing. Play it while the mod community is still alive.
1337BaldEagle;-;WIth the introduction of Paid for Mods I cannot in good conscience give this game a good review. I have been using Mods in TES/Fallout games since Morrowind. As much as it is a wonderful idea to reward good mods this is not the method for doing so. Valve/Bethesda should receive 0% for a mod. I further believe all mods should be on a donation basis. Giving Valve money for something they already do is stupid. Giving Bethesda money for NOT MAKING A GAME AS GOOD AS IT COULD HAVE BEEN is stupid. In a single night this put a rift in the Modding community that we all loved. This will be the last Bethesda game I buy. And that really makes me sad and mad to say that.
Nic;-;Paid mods, suuure. Well Bethesda have fun with the 75%, I wont buy your  games anymore!
Smittens;-;I can't support paid for mods.
Thugish;-;Remember when mods where a cool and fun thing you could download for a couple of days, have your fun with it, and delete once they became incompatible? Yeah, that's no longer a thing without $$$.
Lyru;-;Just despicable, loved the skins on CS:Go but mods on Skyrim are different
Rezon373;-;i was enjoying playing around with the mods until now. id love to donate to moders whos mods i consistantly use but paying imidiatly for them doesnt feel right. it feels like DLC thats been made by the comunity.
CALIGULA @Japan;-;Skyrim is 10/10, and with paid mods about -1/10.
ZOMBIE_WINE_GUM;-;Very disappointed with the current implementation of paid mods.
Diino;-;No pay-for-mods. What's next? Bosses that you can only beat with a special item at a low low price of $1.99? This is ridiculous. You've taken an amazing system and put your foot up it's . Screw you Gabe.
Napoleon Bonerparty;-;The game itself is incredible, as is in TES tradition, however the recent paid mod practice that Bethesda started, with Valve jumping on it, absolutely disgusts me. 25% to the person who created the mod? Good job at ruining whatever image you had left going for you, Valve.
slyguywhoeatspie;-;Very greedy developers destroying a game that once represented what PC gamers stood for.
Toosh The Medic;-;oh paid mods hmmmmm a bit too ligit "$"%"$$%"$"$%&^&*&^%$"$%^&^%$"!$%^&^%$"!$%^$"!
German Engineer;-;Game was not bad itself. But mods made it so much better. Can i recommend it now? No! Because mods are gone. Behind a ing paywall of doom. You can also download the paywall mod but thats different. Now after coming back to the vanila game? It tastes like . Its like getting a big fat steak meal. Then eating the steak first and beeing left with only vegetables.
DoggieFlower[KOR][ENG]!;-;Man screw you valve and you grease ball fat #### Gaben.
Deturis;-;I support FREE mods. This is a complete lack of foresight. Who charges money for mod which is based on OTHER FREE MODS? I had ENOUGH of this stupid practices in gaming market like DLCs, ripping content from game which is in the game/disc but you must pay for it and now they want me to pay money for mods? Bethesda/Valve boycotting starts now.
BonaFide;-;Paid Mods years after the fact. What an absolute joke. I will never buy a bethesda game ever again. As a matter of fact I will never buy any game with a paid mod workshop ever in the future either.
Min Headroom;-;Uninstalled due to pay2mod. Get ed, Valve.
Defender;-;You have pay for user made content now. Unbelievable.
Agent Chaos360;-;Paid mods..,. well i guess you can't spell Steam without EA. Instead of paid mods allow for donations. Allow modders to setup crowdfunding campaigns for the mods they are making. I will not pay for mods and just pirate them.
Potoroo;-;Without mods, I probably would not be playing this game. Valve and Bethesda taking money from other people's work is not something I support.
josephg24;-;I would have given this game a good rating a few years ago, but now that I've played it way too much I'm going to give this game a review. Let's start with the pros: Better combat mechanics than its predecessors Better graphics than its predecessors Dragons Slightly improved perk system. I think this is headed in the right direction, but could use some fine tuning. The previous games have a version of this that is automatic when you leveled up a skill. That's it. When comparing it to the previous games it only has 3 things that it does better. 3. Now lets look at the cons: Lack of attributes (strength, intelligence, speed...) to give depth to character progression. Now you simply pick between health, stamina and magicka. Want a character that jumps high and runs fast to avoid being hit because you wanted to spend more points improving your damage rather than your health? Too bad, that's been removed this time around. Lack of quest depth to keep the game interesting. The majority of the side quests in this game consist of you going into an ancient nord ruin, killing draugr, and looting an item from a chest to give to some npc with a half- story as to why the item got there in the first place. "Lol I was in some ruin and got scared so I dropped my sword and ran. The draugr/falmer were nice enough to put it in a chest for when I decided to come back and get it." The quest lines for the guilds are decent, but they suffer from the same syndrome as the above points. A lack of depth to keep them interesting. It mostly consists of you doing more cookie cutter quests like the ones above, but with an annoying follower who stands in front of you everytime you swing your sword. This series is suffering from what I like to call casualization. I know lots of people would disagree and say that I'm some nerd who needs to get a life, but this game had such an amazing foundation to build upon. The combat was so much better in this game than the previous ones. All it needed was some attention to detail to add depth and really bring out the potential in this game. But because Bethesda thinks that the larger audience wouldn't enjoy a game with high quality character development, we are left with what feels like a half finished product that couldn't decide whether it wanted to be an RPG or an action game. I would have said even a few days ago that modding this game is what gives it life, and that alone would have given it a positive review, but Valvle and Bethesda's continued desire to nickel and dime the customer has led them to release paid mods. A practice that gives only a small fraction of the money to the actual modder and gives it to those who did absolutely no work all for the sake of pure greed. All-in-all I would say play one of the earlier games in the series like Morrowind or Oblivion as they are much better games with better character progression and better quests.
Matt.E @ The 56K;-;Game is great - the scope and replayability are unrivaled. Paid mods, however, are unacceptable.
Highyard;-;I never wrote a review back in 2011 when I initially played Skyrim, because honestly I couldn't be bothered to. It didn't live up to the hype. Mods obviously helped a bit on that, being able to download various graphical or gameplay mods to improve your experience. Trying out this and that. Well, not anymore. With Steam allowing anybody to put up a mod (be it stolen or original) and charge whatever price-tag the modder chooses without having a responsibility of quality control? Or support? And good luck contacting Valve about a refund, they'll give you a thought-out copy pasted response in a month or two. You did good for a while there Valve. We understand you are a business, and businesses exist to make money. But not like this. EDIT: Valve and Bethesda have chosen to backpedal on paid mods, which is fantastic, but remember: Businesses exist to make money. Just because they couldn't make it work this time, doesn't mean they won't try again. I'll leave my review unchanged as a reminder to what happened these last few days.
Jill;-;This is a forever reminder of what happened in April 2015. Never Forget
Mibl -XIX-;-;Who's rapping? Dovahkiin Dragons? I'm not over keen I'll dice them like a knife Slicing right through an aubergine. My dragon shout flow Is sweeter than a SodaStream You won't belive your eyes I'm like an overload of dopamine A broadsword in one hand,and a magic spell in the other. I'm the last of the Dragonborn There's no other,my brother so run for cover. If you've got scales,then I'm on your tail,and I will not fail. Like a free-roaming sandbox game. I'm off the rails,I'll walk the trail,through awful gales,and storms of hail. 'Til all the nails Are knocked into your coffin,I'm not stopping. 'Til you're impaled,and I've prevailed. In the name of the Nords,I pray to the lords. You all get a taste of the blade of my sword. I'm taking on hordes of enemies,I face them with hoards of weaponry. They're draining my force,so chemistry comes into play with retorts and recipes. Alchemixing like a DJ,Restoration,restore my energy. My legacy,odyssey,elegy,prophecy's,written in heavenly bodies,and buried with every body that ever did bother to mess with me deading them terribly,horribly,I'm a celebrity,honestly,you're a wannabe,I'm a prodigy. The suggestion you're better than me at being a warrior? Ha! comedy. It's a gift to me,I don't just spit flames lyrically,but literally,and the Elder Scrolls are scripts,in witch I've written your obituary. I am the Dragonborn,wearing a hat with badass horns. I'm Dovahkiin,known globally,You're nobody at all. =) BY DAN BULL )
Nebulous;-;With mods I can be a dancing skeleton and marry a dog. All my fantasies in one game. 10/10
DJ_VoiceBox;-;110% of nonstop fun! SOOOO MANY QUESTS! Plus the DLC add even MORE quests! And if you are board of the vanilla quests, or you just compleated them all (highly unlikely) Skyrim is one of the easiest games to mod, workshop and nexis combined! Also, quest mods aren't the only mods out thare. Thare are follower mods, weppon mods, magic mods, and so much more! If you don't alredy have the game, take it from me... GET THE GAME!!! 753 stars out of 5. You will most likely never get board in this game! you can spend a year on the game and still not compleat all of the quests. I hope this helped, and I hope you get this game.
Combine244;-;So it seems that valve and bethesda have gotten rid of the paid mods. Good. But, there is still the fact that they did this to us in the first place. They should have at least asked us first, and most of us would have said the obvious choice: a Donate button. It would have been smarter all together. Its so sad as well, since the damage has been done. Some mod makers will never come back for being bashed like they did. Also the fact that half the mods charged 99$ just for making lydia 2% stronger was stupid as well. Hopefully, this is where this "paid mods" crap ends for these games...Although, I only think this is just the beginning.I hope valve/bethesda got what they wanted.
krul;-;dont mind me, i am just an another negative review about the paid mods
ben.fpm;-;I want paying for my reviews, dammit! I spent time doing this!!
Eatme;-;This is one of the best games but paid for mods is a no go. Stay away.
DeathGho[TS3H];-;This game is pure goodnees.. it will keep you glued to your computer seat day and night, dragons ,swords,old men that live on an ancient mountain the blades,the thieves guild , all these features are just.. awesome.. if you have any little bit of doubt about buying this game you are doing it wrong. I can call this one of my finest purchases ever!
Moose Knuckles;-;Oh my god, who doesn't think this game is a game of the year? Sure it has it's fair share of glitches but please name one, GREAT, game that doesn't glitch and heck, half the time their quite funny. It's an amazing single-player experience you'll only get once every few years. I started playing it once and could never stop, it's so fun. Over 800 hours in this game i can tell you that this game is a must buy if you don't have it. The only things that could be improved on this is perhaps a co-op mode because who else thinks exploring Tamrial with a friend is awesome? This game is so immense, chocked full of wonderful content. This is a must buy, 10/10
ChuckMonk;-;Yeah... it's pretty sweet.
High Overlord Xenu;-;When I bought this game, it was because I'd heard great things about the modding community for the Elder Scrolls series. For years, one of the best things about Skyrim was that there was effectively a mod for anything you could want. You could mold the game world to your tastes. Now you have to pay for mods. Everything is effectively DLC at this point, and you're paying rather exorbitant prices for a lot of unfinished, unpolished work. Bethesda and Valve have killed the game in pursuit of the almighty dollar. Dark times are upon us indeed. If you are just now looking at picking up the game, pass. It is a hollow shell of what it once was.
Uranus;-;This game was amazing until the Paid Mods Attacked.
Ace;-;Supports paid mods. I do not.
tatankasamoyed;-;An awesome game made even more awesome by Steam workshop. Now, however, Bethesda in cahoots with Steam, wants to monetize these mods. It's not so much about the creators earning a living as Bethesda and Valve seeing dollar signs in the hoped for thousands and thousands of transactions. Shame on you, Bethesda, especially since the PC community is responsible for making your Elder Scrolls series the success that they are, no disrespect meant toward console owners.
DaMuncha;-;I've seen alot of crappy descisions come from Bethesda lately but this about tops them off. This game is a fully realised edition of the edler scrolls series full of 100s of hours of gameplay and excellent voice work amd music. After many people complained about the bad quality textures on the PC version they released a HD texture pack which helped enhance the game, But the game has many flaws and many mistakes made in the games production, but over the years teams of modders have come together to enhance Skyrim and make it an outstanding game. Unfortunately Bethesda and Valve have added a new feature which allows modders to sell thier mods on the Skyrim Workshop, which is against the copywrite agreement which everyone has to agree to when they install the game, and there is no quality assurance over the mods that are mometised or the lagality of the ownership of the mod which is being sold, on top of that Valve also want 75% of the income for a mod which they had no input into making. So while the game can be a fun experience once mods and fixes have been installed, it fails to provide much entertainent without them.
Jivanossauros Rex;-;nice new way to support content creators by giving valve money wp
The Marvelous Magoon!;-;I bought a neat little sword mod for 99 cents. I mean, it's 99 cents, what harm could it do? The next thing I knew 99 cents became $1.99, then $2.50, then 10 bucks, and so on and so on until I was $22,000 in debt. The bank is going to foreclose my house in the next 3 days and to make matters worse I lost my job to outsourcing. I have 3 days until I'm out on the street with no way of making end's meet. My beautiful wife, Sarah, took her life because she felt there was simply no way out and left me to take care of our baby daughter and our german shepard, Rex. I just don't know what to do. I don't want my daughter to grow up on the street. Paid Mods destroy lives.
Zachdogg;-;buy it as soon as the pay for mod system is removed. unacceptable
demonsolder21;-;Great game and all but paid mods isnt worth it.
Beanie8;-;Paid Mods are Wrong. Just adding my vote. What makes this stealing worse is that they have the audacity to dress it up like its some sort of ethical stance. I've NEVER posted a review before despite first having a STEAM account when I needed it to get the newly released Half Life 2 that came free with my graphics card (Yes, I am that old). However this has compelled me to join the chorus of people complaining. This is basiclly in line with prostitutuion - its charging for something that should be free.
darkmark891;-;Independent contractors for Bethesda called "paid modders" have enabled the consumer to be able to pay money for additional features such as horse armor, swords, and other new skins! Due to an extremely-high demand from the community, these "paid modders" have gone out of their way to offer us a service which is quite convenient for the everyday gamer who has too fat of a wallet. Now you can pay your easily-earned money in order to acquire things like weather and better-looking water. So convenient! 10/10 would review modding again
Banner;-;Paid mods. I'd purchase standalone to prove a point and initiate change.
Kaliss;-;Skyrim is a game like no other and it is easily has one the best game communities out there. However with the recent addition of "paid mods" to the Steam Workshop I advise everyone to stay AWAY from offering that business. While the hard work put into mods is astounding at times by paying for any such mod you are voting with your wallet. Please do not give in to the underdeveloped DLC scheme going on in the Steam Workshop right now. Also google nexusmods.
Slim_Cognito;-;You can now request money for your mod. There, have a negative review.
psy;-;Supporting paid mods is a big ffin no!!! Stop it before others pick this bs up!!!
Mr. Sniffles;-;Bethesda, you've supported something that goes against what PC Gaming is known for.
geckoTier;-;If you want to pay for your game over and over again - Skyrim is the right game for you: First you buy the game, then DLC after DLC and when you finally got all DLCs (which could be for free like in other games, but not so in Skyrim) you can equip your credit card to buy mods. Someone might think "hey, it's a lot of work to create a high quality mod, it's okay the creator asks for some payment" and you might be right with this argument. But you don't pay the creator, at least not primarily since 75% will never receive the creator even not before tax. At the very end, you might have the game, how it should have been supposed to be in the first place - but you paid it 10 times or even more often. Regardless this fact, you will love the game, at least when you loved the games of that series before. But your love will always be a bit... I don't know... Let's say, it's like the game is your better half, but cheated on you in the past. There are no reasons to think, they might do it again, but there is always this bad feeling and it might remain forever. Skyrim didn't cheat on me, but I also have this bad feeling. The game crashes for me incredibly often, especially while quick-saving (at least, the save is successfull, but it is annoying). It is also annoying, that the game can't handle it, if you switch applications for a short moment (unfortunately, the OSD of changing my computer's volume is already too much) and you will have problems until you restart the game (like, two mouse cursors). Such a thing was okay for me, when "multitasking" was introduced with Windows95 - but to find this behaviour in an actual title surprised me in the same way as it disappointed me. Among those technical stuff, I also was surprised about how small the game experience was. Don't get me wrong: this game is huge and you will need a lot of time. But, compared to the other titles of the Elder Scrolls, you might be surprised how quickly you will have done it. Even though after the first 20% of the game there won't be any (real) new elements. Maybe compare it with a mother who cares for her child, how she does everything for the child, thinks about every possible detail to give her child a great life. Skyrim would be in this example an orphan. With a step mother. One of that kind, who never forgets that it isn't her child, but a good human being enough, to care for the child, that it is at least healthy and doesn't starve too much. I recommend everyone: don't buy it. Not even in sale. If you are in love with that series try to play it from a friend (like I did - I just used my save games on a "play for free"-weekend for the achievments), who has it. If you are not in Elder Scrolls up so far then better have a look in Risen or something else. They might not be perfect, too, but they do a lot better and try harder in many of those aspects.
( );-;Donation should definitely be an option when it comes to mods, but locking them behind a paywall? No. This isn't DLC and has too high a potential for exploitation by people looking to make a quick buck. Just to clarify, the game is great, but the monetization of mods is not. For a game so reliant on mods, this is unacceptable.
Madmonian;-;I will NEVER support paid mods, especially if 75% of the profits go to Valve and not the actual developer of the mod.
zombozo666;-;paid mods and this game
CreatorZeidiot;-;I LOVED THIS GAME but...f**king...valve are being really greedy i like the idea modders getting paid for their work but taking 75% of the profit is just wow really Valve seriously
Kinetic Butt Blaster;-;There is paid mods. I wouldn't support it anymore. Everyone is a sell out - why do anything to help the poor man out when you can sit higher in an ivory tower? Lovely.
King Wing;-;A mile wide, a puddle deep. After only a few playthroughs, you will realise that there is very little to do in the world and everything is boring. The only good thing about it was mods, but now many are locked behind a pay wall. Stay away.
PirateCrayons;-;This game is cool. I beat a lot of the core game. I was getting back into it and was about to start downloading mods - then I find out I have to pay for them. Stop this bull . I paid for the game. Give me mods for free you ing  holes.
Mr Spooks;-;Now Supports paid user created mods where the creators only get 25% of the cut. If you buy 2 mods and they are not compatible you are ed. There have already been reports about stolen mods put up on steam for sale. Colab mods get put up for Charge without the permission of the contributors. Free moder resources made by people have been used on many mods and are now up for sale, the contributors get nothing. Do not support this stay away from paid mods and this game.
Bearoan;-;The game itself is fine, but Paid mods are a major setback, prohbitively so for all but those with the unfortunate combination of no sense and infinte wealth. Mods were something the COMMUNITY shared with eachother, now everyone is just a shill for their new, super-special DLC. Hopefully modders will recognize the community aspect of their modding is important, and will continue to offer mods for free.
Ark;-;Mods where the one thing that kept this game alive for almost 4 years. In good conscious with the new workshop change to allow mostly illegal posted material and unsupported content for money I cannot recommend this game in 2015. This game was worth buying in 2011, its worth buying in 2015 with free mods, its not worth buying in 2015 with paid mods. Not recommended.
Zentil;-;Game Sold Out on the mod scene.
NandoRod;-;First paid DLC, now paid fanmade DLC. Kill it with fire.
Sirr Ghostly;-;I can no longer reccomend this game now that you can pay for mods.
Super Move Activated!;-;3rd Party DLC, Enough said Also, the game is a casualized version of the predecessor, without the mods it was actually quite boring.
Chronomancer;-;I support well made games. I support developers allowing players to create their own modifications for these games. I support the Idea that mods should be free and people should donate to better, more thoughtful modders. I do not support allowing anyone to post what could even be an outright scam on the workshop and earn money. I do not support Valve taking 75% of the modders' profits. Valve - You either die a hero... Or you live long enough to see yourself become the villain. I still have hope in you. Think.
Flyer;-;Pretty solid content. Amazing modding versatility. A pity I don't think a sword is worth a few bucks.
One01011;-;Mods behind paywalls has the potential to kill this game. It sucks unmodded, and having to buy enough to make it worth playing is something ubisoft could only have dreamed of doing.
s0mething;-;Charging for Mods is a big No Go. I can't recommend this Game for anyone currently.
Vdain;-;Mods, which kept the game alive years after its used by date, become monetized. The decent into becoming EA has begun. Thanks for the good times while they lasted.
Dravel;-;A game that used to be an amazing sandbox constantly kept fresh and interesting thanks to the incredible work of the modding scene has now been transformed into a disgusting cashcow and moneygrabber by Bethesda and Steam. Thank to them, we now have skin packs that cost more than the game itself and are of a much lower value and quality than dozen others free mods. What will happen when some of those expensive mods conflict between each others, or are not supported anymore (if they ever were) by their creators? Keep in mind also that the whole argument of "supporting modders" is completely fallacious, considering that they only receive a small minority of the profits made from those mods, the lion's share going, without a surprise, to Bethesda and Steam. We criticized heavily Bethesda for the horse armour in Oblivion, but this change goes beyond any of the worse nightmare we could have had.
[OG] Bill Nye the Soviet spy;-;Paid mods. What a scummy move that has horrible consequences for gaming as a whole. I've been sick of Bethesda for a while with their glitchy, outdated games that required mods to actually function, and now they're punishing us for their poor work by putting those fixes behind a paywall. I play plenty of RPGs but this will no longer be one of them
xaragen;-;WIth the recent paid mods. This game is no longer good.
Blondekek;-;Pay 20$ in order to view this review
White Ranger;-;Paid mods. Way to go and ruin the very thing that that bring out the full potential of your buggy  games Bethesda. Thanks.
gamerpuppy;-;Way to ruin your modding community Bethesda.
ChillSloth;-;I do not recommend this game due to pay mods. I purchased this game for the free mods. now its worthless
Hodgy;-;Great game, Paid mods are a bad idea.
Jellosnark;-;Of all the companies out there, Valve is the worst to attempt a cash-grab on Skyrim. For the love of god people, DONATE to the mod creators, don't shell out to Valve.
deWiced;-;Do I like the game? Yes. Reason? Mods. Without mods I couldn't play for more than 15min before leaving it for a year before I tried modding. Valve and Bethesda decided they want more green stuff so they butted in to one place they don't belong.
minhphamtuan;-;The game is fine but Valve and bethesda have gone the way of greed and are now charging money for what should be free content therefor i cannot recommend this game to anyone.
Blake;-;Good game that is now ruined by paid mods. If you do purchase this game, do NOT pay for these mods.
Maeldun;-;After Valve and Bethesda just shafted the crap out of the modding community...would not recommend. If I could kick Bethesda in the balls, I would.
{$_$)Gubbiesaurus Rex#GRiLL;-;Paid mods = Dead game 'Oh but it helps the modders' Not when valve gets %75 Valve stop trying to be EA and be the company we all used to love.
bane;-;Games alright, but this modding fiasco has destroyed a large chunk of what made this game great. Modders didn't expect to get paid when they first made these mods, so why do they do now? If they wanted money, they would have originally asked for donations were they first created it. This is greed; Valve takes most of the money anyway, so the idea of 'supporting the modder' is pretty much made redundant.
SuperiorFire;-;This game isn't worth anything now, the mods are all pay to play.
Mr. Babadook;-;The very first game with thousands of paid DLCs !!! Great job killing Skyrim !
Crashed;-;Mods behind paywall
kruel_killer;-;I've played this game on my PS earlier. Thought I'd give it a try on my PC since it was free anyways. I don't think the experience would be different from my PS, SINCE THERE IS NO WAY IN HELL I AM PAYING *VALVE* FOR THE HARD WORK DONE BY MODDERS! I am a programmer myself and I know the kind of effort that goes into these things. I won't blame the modders, because I assume most of them are in school and the idea of charging actual money for something that they do for fun is just too tempting to let go. BUT YOU, VALVE, TAKING ADVANTAGE OF THAT IS JUST PATHETIC. IF YOU *REALLY* WERE DOING IT TO HELP MODDERS WOULD HAVE AT LEAST MADE THE DEAL BETTER FOR THEM. YOUR CUT IN THIS IS RIDICULOUS. YOU MAKE ME SICK IN MY STOMACH.
mikat76;-;No thanks for paid mods.
glitch;-;paid garbage with microtransactions. nope.
VoodooAction;-;What a great game! until all my mods stopped working until I paid for them.
Inverness;-;Paid mods? Not a chance.
trigger_happy_1;-;Game was unplayable when first installed. The community made a mod/patch OUT OF THEIR LOVE FOR THE GAME that fixed it. Now they're making paid mods. Makes you wonder how "buggy" new games and patches are going to be, and how much the fix is going to cost you?
Canemacar;-;This game supports paid mods, I do not.
Aziero;-;I very rarely review games. Most people can say what I want to say, but better. However... It breaks my heart to give such a wonderful game a negative review, I have loved every hour in-game, but as soon as users started improving an already great game, I felt I had found a game to stick with for years, and I always enjoyed checking the latest MOD offerings since the game first came out... Now I shall be uninstalling (even with all the actual DLCs I payed for) as a simple, insignificant gesture to Steam. You have enough money Gabe, why destroy the undeniably great Steam community for a few more $$$s. Please, have a heart, and keep PC gaming king :))) -(edit 28/04/2015, 00:10)- Thank you Steam for at least admiting this idea of yours still needs work. I fully and totally agree MOD creators should recieve compensation for their incredible efforts, however, the starting prices were, well, unreal... and if you are doing it for the MODDERS, think about what cut they get for all their work. Multi-national companies are getting 10-15% charge to have their games hosted on Steam, why so high for the individual creators?... Great idea in theory. please work on the details some (a lot) more, so more people make more awesome MODs, and all get fairly compensated after all is said and done.
Gameranand;-;First this games makes money because of mods as its alive because of them. Now the same company killing the very spirit of the modding. Here are few points why Modding behind a paywall is a bad thing 1. 25% to Modder and 75% to Valve+Bethesda 2. NO guarantee that mods will work in future 3. Killing the very heart of heart by monetizing it. 4. Mods were work out of passion and not for money. 5. Diving the community...we already saw that chesko retired from modding because of this . Lets take revenge, Downgrade this  to hell.
flasha;-;#Paywall #YudothisGabe #Bringoldworkshopback
Voodoojedizin;-;Mod making for any game, was never meant to pay your bills, it was never meant to be an income. No one forces you to make them! You have no right to charge, but people can donate, what's wrong with that setup?. Why not make Bethesda create a better game! Instead of using s to extend its game play! They've been making millions off of you idiots and now they wanna make millions more, you just don't get it, your being used!
Irish;-;Bethesda's new mod policy cripples this game's functionality. I would not recommend buying this game at this point in time because of this.
Hackerman;-;I don't reccommend this to anybody until paid mods are removed.
Comrade Danilov;-;Valve introduced paid mods with the co-operation of Bethesda killing any interest I had in this game. Even forgetting that, the main quest line is short and full of tropes, the guild questlines are poorly written and clearly cut short by them rushing for release and the game is still quite buggy. The DLC's all added things that mods had already added, too.
Wicked Vmpr;-;I No longer reccomend this game to someone who wants a prolonged expirence, Valve Has issued an "Order 86" and monopolized pc gaming and now charging for mods? No DO NOT buy this game OR buy mods, you are just fueling the fire for the money grubbers. Boycot. Boycot. Boycot. why would you put over 100 dollars into a game that came out so long ago? Is Common sense, think with your wallet.
Irish Ysale;-;Finally Bethesda realised that only the mods make this game worth playing. So why not cash in on them? Ugh.
Ria;-;Don't let paid mods ruin this masterpiece of a game.
Ria;-;Don't let paid mods ruin this masterpiece of a game.
SamZJ;-;Yes, Modder should get paid, but not with the current paying model. The whole system is just not right and both Valve and Bethesda aren't doing anything to repsond. BV
SkankCups;-;This game was one of the best examples of why pc gaming was superior. The amazing modding community has done things to this game that people never thought possible. Sadly, Valve and Bethesda have done irreperable damage to that community and their own reputation with this paid mod update. I can no longer support any dev that tries to make money off of the work that the community has done out of passion for the game and the scene. This game was great once, but sadly, the bigger they are, the harder they fall. Skyrim (2011-2014): best example of pc gaming/mod community Skyrim (2015): Microtransaction Simulator 2015 EDIT: Paid modding is removed, but this review will still stay negative as a reminder... the PCMR may forgive, but we never forget.
psecrest1;-;Paid mods are bogus. Quit trying to nickel-and-dime us.
Wilcox, King of Heroes;-;Skyrim was a great game for the almost 4 years since release, But everything changed when the Valve nation attacked...
The Brotagonist;-;Paying for mods? What are you even doing Steam?
Yellow;-;This was a great game, but I cannot recommend buying it. We should fund the corporate greed no longer. Bethesda and Valve that know the capabilities of the modding now want to cash in on the backs of content creators. People won't mod because they want to see changes in the game, they will just do it for greed. Do not buy this game, do not support them.
Katje P;-;TAKE THIS, FOUL DRAUGR... whoo WHAT THE HELL A DRAGON I WILL SEND YOUR SOUL TO HELL, DASTARDLY EVIL BEAS... *hi, you are using the free version of Jonnie587's 4k dandelion texture, please upgrade to the paid version for only $4.99* ..t... oooh, what the frick.
High Overlord Xenu;-;When I bought this game, it was because I'd heard great things about the modding community for the Elder Scrolls series. For years, one of the best things about Skyrim was that there was effectively a mod for anything you could want. You could mold the game world to your tastes. Now you have to pay for mods. Everything is effectively DLC at this point, and you're paying rather exorbitant prices for a lot of unfinished, unpolished work. Bethesda and Valve have killed the game in pursuit of the almighty dollar. Dark times are upon us indeed. If you are just now looking at picking up the game, pass. It is a hollow shell of what it once was.
big drinker;-;paid mods are ok but taking 75% of it isn't when you did nothing except host it EXCPET THAT IT'S NOT PAID MODS OK GOOD GAME BUT I STILL NOT
[MNI] MacelessVoid;-;I do not support Paid Mods.
Kazaanh;-;Good job at destroying and diving entire Skyrim community Bethesda/Valve. Mods are hobby not a job.
Mr.Jello ^-^;-;Valve forgot to pay me to reccomend this game
literally a chimera;-;lmao this whole thing is hilarious thanks valve for the drama
Dendis Khan;-;i thought i liked valve...
Hal9k;-;How could Valve and Bethesda not understand that the best way to go about supporting modders would be to, at most, allow the modder to add an optional donation button to their workshop contribution which would always remain available to all for free. Also, at the very least, the modder should receive 50% of the donation received. Without all the free mods Skyrim would never been as successful as it had been before the paid mod disaster. Never forget Update: "Our belief is, 'We made the game, we made the game you're making a thing for.' So just like anything else, there is some kind of involvement that we're going to have in that," - Bethesda's Pete Hines [www.gamespot.com]
Pontus Overlord;-;In what other game can you be a werewolf with 6 wives? 10/10
Sovex66;-;Paid mods ? No
UpLiNk;-;This game supports paid mods, I do not.
chrisrw512;-;Incredible game destroyed by abysmal decisions.
Zampp;-;Paying for mods FUN!
Zampp;-;Paying for mods FUN!
Dana;-;Life, get ready to get ruined. Again.
Sadistic Fire;-;0/10, had too much money and not enough bug fix mods to spend it on. Would not paywall again.
SteelSasquatch;-;requested a song in a inn to a musician, and he replied he would play it after the current song. when he finishes his current song, he says "this next one is a favorite of mine" and walked out of the inn like an . i chased him into the streets of solitude and it just so happens that a dragon attacks. the dragon attacked him with frost and killed him. the musician was part of the illuminati he had a triangle the dragon did the right thing i elect dragon high king, people of skyrim do not accept this. population = 7 and a half after massacre for treason dragon was left on the bus turns out the game was actually real life real life is a dream play skyrim next day bliss 10/10 don't ing deny my song requests next time you  or karma will slap your ing backside into the ing earth's crust GOTY
Wurstgolem;-;you Bethesda for destroying the modding community. I hope this greedy behaviour blows back into your face. I loved this game and its community.
Resetting;-;Base game was great, then mod support was added and the game was wonderful, then steam and bethy decided they would profit off other peoples work (a whopping 75%, dev gets a mere 25%). They are not only destroying the future of Skyrim, not only destroying the future of The Elder Scrolls, but destroying the future of modding. I won't play another second of this game unless this nonsense is brought to an end, and won't play a second of future games either. Many others express the same feelings, as evidenced by skyrims approval ratings plummeting from 98% to 88% overnight and continuing to fall.
Zac;-;If you do not pay for mods you are a dog . Bethesda must collect $2,0923,13,5123.99 for mods. GabeN needs 20 new golden chickens!
MemeMan;-;I can now pirate mods. 2/10
TDice;-;It's ing Skyrim. If you don't have it, buy it. If you don't want to buy it, buy it. Modded the game on my new laptop and played it and mod it and played it.... until the started crashing.... Then i bought an expensive Desktop just so i can play it again. Will Kill one who stops me from playing this game EDIT: Parents are dead now... Cops are at my door... EDIT2: PLAYING SKYRIM IN JAIL!
Fastest;-;Having played 90+ hours of Skyrim this past week, I figured that I should write a review on it. First of all, I had to said this is an amazing SandBox+ RPG experience. I am someone who enjoyed doing side quests as well as misc quests as a mean to earn more money. I got to say that till now I had not finish the story as there are so much more to do. I was pleasantly surprised initially when I see people with over 2000~4000+ hours of gameplay time. All I can say is Skyrim had just that much content especially if you include all the DLCS. I mean just building a single house took me more than 2 hours, not to mention the fact that I had to design and decorate my own house. It pretty much a chore that feel great after you are done with it. I am also barely done exploring Skyrim after 90 hours in, the combat are extremely fluid and animated especially when you do a sneak attack. There are many other great elements in Skyrim such as pick-locking which can be extremely frustrating but fun to play around with. I had never been this impressed with a RPG before and I definitely think Skyrim is by far the best I had played so far for this price. I definitely recommend this game to every RPG lovers, you won't ever regret it especially if you enjoyed other RPG such as The Witcher as well as Fable.
n00bypl4y3r;-;gewear m hlforde and m hrigmannum wi num penninge.
Anarch (Ew, FNAF 4);-;Mods are not DLC.
Bat-Chan;-;In one fell move, Valve managed to shatter a thriving community, burn their goodwill, ignore all criticism, and have me leave Steam. Valve, this is unforgivable.
Praise R'hllor;-;Without free mods it's just another mediocre action-rpg. weak combat system. very poor RPG.
ZCAV311;-;in light of recent events, No I would not purchase this game.
[Epic!]killy;-;You will not understand why everybody says how good this game is, until you will play it. P.S. I'm writing this review after spending 14hours of my Sunday playing it. WARNING : Very Addictive!!!
Gary 69;-;BS never gonna Pay for Mods 0/10
sassy pavarotti;-;Eat  and die Bethesda
sassy pavarotti;-;Eat  and die Bethesda
Zeke;-;If you have windows 8.1 dont buy it.
Old Smokey;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. Trying to charge people for mods hurts the gaming community as a whole. People can and should support mod creators via donations, a button on the workshop page would be good, but putting them behind a pay wall is a terrible idea. Hoping Valve and other responsible parties for this new practice will stop it.
hugmygloworm;-;FREE MODS
Trayvon Martin;-;This game with paid mods -9/11 would not reccomend.
The Christmas Fish;-;"Skyrim Workshop Now Supports Paid Mods"
JDogg;-;Cannot support the greed shown with how they implemented paid mods. Game uninstalled.
bmendonc;-;I met a friendly woman who offered me some food if i went into her house. I took the food she offered and found a secret passage way into a basement where I discovered she was a witch. I took nothing. But when I walked out, she attacked me. I killed her, took everything she owned, walked to the nearest blackmarket and sold everything I could. No more witch I guess.
4You;-;I used to be a Bethesda dev working on Skyrim. I tried to make sleeping a meaningful mechanic, as player recover as they sleep. I also designed cool dream themed menus with deep proverbs while opposing factions may try to assassinate you while you sleep in late-game. I geniunely believed this would be very immersive, a neat break from the flow for players to think and plan their character. Todd Howard, however, was not as pleased. He calls me out during a meeting, belittles me in front of our coworkers and calls me "Dreamboy". The whole company now makes fun out of me and calls me Dreamboy. I got demoted, but I kept working. I thought about how to make the passing of in-game time more meaningful. The "Dragon Apocalypse" happens on day 50 and the Aldmeri Dominion invades on day 100. This would immerse the player in a sense of heroism and danger. When I go to the toilet after finishing these changes... Todd finds me and repeatedly punches me in the liver and solar plexus while calling my son an autistic r*tard. I got demoted to Janitor's closet now. I still tried to make the best of it and kept working hard. I made it so that NPCs from the opposing faction are hostile, and you have to sneak or disguise yourself if you want to do business in Solitude as a Stormcloak, for example. To me, this would make the game intense and real. I come home later that day and found my wife crying in the living room, and when I asked what's wrong, she said that a man approached our son at school and asked him if it's "hard to be a r*tard with a f*g dad." Although I should have stopped at this point, I felt like it was still my duty to make this game as good as possible. I wanted to include an optional "Hardcore Mode" like in New Vegas - I believed this would immerse players as it would make food and taverns meaningful. Later that night when I took out the trash, someone throws a bag over my head. I hear people laughing and making fun out of me as someone is stomping on me. Then suddenly, after taking kicks and punches for a long time, someone pulls the bag off me. I felt a wet finger pressing against my anal. I hear Todd's voice saying, "Is that hardcore enough for you, Dreamboy?"
makromate;-;This game is supporting paid mods...and modders will only get 25% of the money.Dont buy this game.
barsh90;-;da police coming straight from da undeground!!
Gwynbleidd;-;It's ok.
Evolution;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, one of the most in-depth games you will ever encounter. Many quests and stories to tell, you can instantly conjecture when you are born into the world of Skyrim. In the beginning of the game, you emerge as a captive member held by the imperial army, captive from trying to cross the border of Skyrim. Sitting in the carriage with your fellow captive thieves and bandits, questioning where you are flowing. As youre held captive by the solders in the carriage, being carried over the roads to Helgan. As youre being kicked off the carriage, held in your queues to your beheading, you notice your foes worried about a large scream across the lands of Skyrim. As you place your head on the pedestal, ready for your penalty, the scream becomes stronger. All of the sudden, a dragon appears, landing upon the castle to your left, he speaks in his dragon tongue and destroys Helgan. This is your time to escape, and begin your journey in the world of Skyrim. Who knows what this frozen land has in store for you. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a action role-playing game, allowing you to create and customise your character, join a race and choose how your character handles in dangerous encounters, there is a range of possibilities to role-play in the world of Skyrim. The game is playable in a first person perspective or in a third person perspective, both can be toggled easily by using the scroll wheel. The game encourages you to freely roam the environment, finding dungeons, towns, abstract structures and a range of side-quests to find while following the main quest, this allows the player to freely choose which quests the player can freely choose to conquest. The atmosphere the world of Skyrim creates is outstanding. Viewing this frozen nation in its misfortune is interesting and viewing the world revovle around you. As you progress throughout of the story, you get view different cultures and view how people live in various cities as you progress through the story. You can fully view how people and what people are willing to do to survive the events and the catastrophe of the lands of Skyrim. Viewing the scenery at its best adds to the atmosphere, looking out into the distance and spotting the large mountains standing tall and superior with a hint of snow on the peak, ruins standing, capable of anything, do you dare to enter? Then looking down the plains of land, grass blowing in the wind. The scenery an essential characteristic to the world of Skyrim. Graphically, the game is outstanding, this statement is considered even without graphical modifications. The game has high resolution textures, this being the ultra graphical setting, but if youre feeling curious, you can get even better textures with the free downloadable content that Bethesda Game Studios offer. Adding onto the graphical discussion on The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is something I mentioned earlier, the scenery. The scenery is just breath-taking. If these visuals arent enough for you, the graphical modifications created by the community are phenomenal, I couldnt recommend more that you browse through some videos on YouTube of them, but on the negative side, some are very intensive to your computer unlike the default textures. Talking about the performance of The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, the game is polished and the performance is outstanding. This is a enormous statement, but the game could almost run perfectly well on any PC. Ive know many people who have ran The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim on a laptop without messing with any graphical settings, running smoothly of course. This truly shows the effort in the development cycle that Bethesda Game Studios has put into the game. On the unfortunate side of this, I wish that the game was supported for multiple operating systems, but alternatives can be found to still play the game on different operating systems. Content; the department that The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim does not disappoint. Approximately the game has around 300 + hours of content, this isnt including modifications. If you feel that this isnt enough, you have modifications to add extra quests and various other content, The Elder Scrolls community is talented for creating these outstanding modifications. Now finally, to the conclusion to The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim. This game is well worth every single penny, the amount of effort that the developers have established into this game. To you, the reader, I recommend you buy this game, take your time while playing the game to look at the detail this game contains because this game deserves the title along the side of the Elder Scrolls games.
Toasted Baby;-;Wow. The only word that I can use to describe this game is "Misleading." I have over 320 hours on this game, and I have yet to even see the Skyrim. I've tried Googling the location of the rim, but to no avail. This game doesn't even have helicopters to use to even get to the rim! Like, wtf Activision? Fix your game. This is the biggest waste of 74 Euros ever. I even installed the Beautiful Males mod because I got tired of looking at Battlefield to get me off, and that doesn't even do it. The  physics are atrocious. No flopping, no particle effects, nothing. Why would you put naked men in the game if it isn't even arousing? I guess the snow is ok, but nowhere near the quality of the snow in that one level of Call of Duty. I can't remember which one, though. Graphics - 2/10 Gameplay - 1/10 (WAAAYYYY better on consoles)  physics - 2/10 (Left too much to the imagination) Snow - 6/10 (I'm being generous with this one) Overall - 10/10 - A fantastic game with an amazing storyline. You can play it fer dayz.
Jessie;-;FUN! ITS A GAME WHERE YOU RUN AROUND STEALING THINGS AND THEN RUNNING AWAY ON A STOLEN HORSE. EPIC GAME!!!!
Mr. Texy;-;Cool game. Tough you should totally use mods once you're done with the main quest. Also, like oblivion, it feels way simplier than previous installements. You should get it but be aware that if you're a fan of previous games, you should play at higher difficulty levels, since this game is so much easier than previous ones. I'd make a fus roh dah joke, but that shout isn't even the best one so.
k9mouse;-;If you love RPG type games, you should get this one! While no game is perfect, but Skyrim is almost on a perfect level.
JonesR;-;It's inevitable--once you start a Bethesda game, the time invested is going to be high. Time investment is one thing that makes me procrastinate about playing a lot of RPG type games. Instant gratification through those 20 minute MOBA or FPS matches is so much easier. Skyrim is the first Bethesda game where I focused on the main story and skipped 90% of the side missions. Although I did have fun with the campaign, I regret that decision. It's partially because the first play through in these type of games is rarely, if ever, optimal. Unless you obsessively plan ahead, the character you think you might want to play as in the beginning usually takes a sharp detour about half way through the game. That and just learning how all the features, perks, and leveling work usually involves a lot of experimentation that rarely goes as planned. The other part is because the Skyrim's main campaign story wasn't as great as I expected it to be. Now it was indeed a very fine story for sure, although I thought the ending was abrupt and anticlimactic. Based on past experience with Fallout 3 and New Vegas, I had higher hopes of a grand finale and closure. I'm left with a finished campaign with a level 19 character that I didn't really enjoy playing with due to my scatter build. Had I focused on learning the game mechanics, perks, and combat aspects first through side missions and experimentation, I would have figured out a lot sooner that I needed to start fresh which I'm sure would have resulted in a much more enjoyable gaming experience. Skyrim is a worthy experience for those willing to take the time investment plunge. Unfortunately, I wasn't ready to take that plunge. One day, I'm sure I'll be ready because it is certainly a game worth exploring in all its grand detail.
zuul;-;Paying for Mods is a slippery slope that will eventually destroy what makes PC gaming so great. I refuse to support this level of greed.
Sherrif;-;Hate to give you a thumbs down, Skyrim, but not only are you allowing amature modders to get paid for doing nothing. You're only giving any real developers 25%. Your end of the deal is a huge problem. Bethesda, Valve. People notice when you treat people wrong, especially the "more important than you" modding community. The sole reason I have more than 5 hours on record is thanks to them, the sole reason I enjoyed playing this game, was them. 25% for something that 100% their work. I understand you want a cut for it is your game world. But the only reason I bought legendary edition was because it was required for the mods I wanted to use. Think about the fact that modders sold me this game, not you, not your cheesy videos, not the hype train. The very people you are trying to rip off, on top of not even giving people the ability to just donate to a modder that has a free mod. It's either paywall your content, or no donations. All of this and it's through the workshop, literally THE worst way to mod Skyrim.
vivipestilenz;-;Remove the paywall from the mods and this game would be so much better! Do something like set up a donation button or something in that respect.
Some Bloke;-;F*ck a holes, mods are free, now you want money for it?
butkraken [];-;Maximum Jewery detected, authorizing full shutdown of community support. Won't be giving my shekels to someone who MAKES me pay for a mod. "Pay what you want" is more tolerable, but still unneeded. Coming from an 11 year Steam user, this makes me sick... like cancer ridden sick.
Braderz;-;Paid mods...... What has this world become
Ninja_Dog81;-;Adding my voice to the many others. I haven't reviewed this game before (it CAN be great), but I'm saying NO to paid mods. Play something else until Valve/Bethesda realises the mistake they have made.
Bushido;-;The entire point of getting this game on PC is modding to make it better. Valve ruined it with making mods paid. Don't support them.
Clive Enduro;-;Mods are now paid DLC. Don't support this .
LordComealot;-;Paid Modding?! Fair enough if a big share goes to the modders but 75% runs straight down Steams pocket and only 25% goes to the "modder"... Skyrim is a good game but Steam hurts the game and themsleves by doing this!!!!
TheNoobWhisperer;-;A series now defined on the quality of their mods gives their community the proverbial slap to the face. I'm done with this kind of .
PeeeeePaaaaaw;-;Why not we start paying for a steam membership too?  you Bethesda, skyrims not even fun by itself
Kamfer;-;Paid mods? How about no.
mtats;-;All mods should get a donate button not a pay button.
KickAss02;-;Paid mods, disagree with the way valve and bethesda is going on about it. Mods is what made this game survive for so long.
Jewsepher;-;Went from a reasonably great game to a can of worms opening doorways to a dangerous future in modding and gaming.
bearclawpaws;-;Sorely disappointed in Valve and Bethesda.
Jesus with an AK;-;This game charges for mods on the workshop..... and the devs of said mods only get 25% shame on you Valve and Bethesda...
Cannibal Banana;-;Even when you buy the game at 75% off, you still have to pay full price just to get the mods that have always been free. Still a phenomenal game nonetheless.
Spirit of the Walrus;-;Skyrim was a great game and represented to many why PC's were the ultimate gaming platform. Now Valve and Bethesda look to exploit players and modders by taking a vibrant thriving modding community that offered hours and hours of free gameplay, that was run purely for the love of the game and turn it just another DLC money grab. Except in this case this isn't even DLC they've created, yet they still take a whopping 75% of the money and give only 25% to the modder who actually created the mod. What's sickening is Gabe Newell himself has tried to convince us that this is somehow good for the mod community and benefits us. Skyrim has become the unfortunate vehicle to usher in this new era for modding, with many modders already putting up paywalls and having popups occur in game to encourage you to buy the full version of a mod. Of all the companies to pull this stunt I never would have expected Valve/Bethesda, both of whom owe a great deal to the modding communities support of their games, to be the ones to corrupt it like this.
Lenskip;-;paid mods are bad and you should feel bad. But seriously without mods this game ain't that great. The default gui is very console setting, hard to use with m/kb. Tons of bugs which can only be patched with mods and the way the game works is awful.
Impetulio;-;Pioneering paid mods. No thanks.
JimThaRippah;-;My Thoughts About This Game: This Game Is Just Glorious Upon My Nipples!! :D It Makes My Nipples Burn With Joy, It Gives Me Happiness And Excitement!! I Freaking Love This Game, I've Played Over 500 Hours On It!! ;D This Game Is Just The Flawless Victory Trust Me, Buy It!! :D The Bugs Are Basicly The Only Bad Thing, But They Get Patched Over Time!! :D There Are Mods To This Game Also, They Are The Best Of Almost Everything. :D The Dawnguard DLC Is Just a Glorious DLC. I Love It!! :D The HearthFire DLC Is Good For The Family Man, The One And Only. The DragonBorn DLC Seems Pretty Impressive And Awesome For That Matter. My Grade: 9/10. // Jimi.
Ral Kimas;-;Bethesda has done it again with an incredible open world game. Skyrim has become one of my all time favorite games. I still find myself coming back and creating a new character over and over to experience this rich world. Add all the DLC and the vast amounts of great mods, this game is a must have!
The Tickle Monster;-;Great game, especially for adventurers like myself. It allows you to fully interact with your environment and is incredably fun
Mister Titler;-;Quite honestly, I thought I would regret buying this game again after having 100s of hours in it on Xbox 360. Oddly enough, I didn't. Even after completing everything this game has to offer (which I might add, is a ton), mods give this game a complete new life. Sure, Skyrim isn't the best Elder Scrolls to date, but it's pretty damn good. Even if you've played it on a console system before, it's not the same. This game is a must have for any RPG lover.
Lord Narwhal;-;10 OUTTA 10 WOULD BANG FKN FANTASY RPG WITH A SWORD! BUT YOU'RE ALSO PART DRAGON!? YELL AT PEOPLE AND KILL THEM WITH YOUR HARSH WORDS! YELL AT THE WORLD TO  WITH IT! GO ON EPIC QUESTS! SWORDS! SPEND LOTS OF TIME RUNNING AROUND LIKE ME, EXPLORING AND AVOIDING THE MAIN PLOT SO YOU CAN HAVE OVER 200 HOURS WITHOUT HAVING COMPLETED IT OR THE WAR ARC! READ BOOKS! TONS OF FANCY SKILLS! ASSASSINATING LOOKS FKN DOPE AS ! MAGIC! BECOME THE BEST AT BASICALLY EVERYTHING IN THE GAME! MULTIPLE HOUSES! MAKE BANK! GET MARRIED (STILL WAITING ON THAT POLYGAMY EXPANSION BETHESDA)! TOOOOOOOOOONS OF MODS LIKE GOD DAAAAAMN! MODS LET YOU KILL THOSE ANNOYING KIDS! AWESOME GRAPHICS! FKN GREAT GAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAME!
vlad the kiler;-;bought a mod that costed more than the basegame crashed my game 11/10 - IGN
Bioshock;-;Best game i've ever played ! Bought it cheap, bought it even on ps3 and i'm still playing it !!! Mods...? YES ! Allot of great mods. Almost infinite amount of great, strange, awesome, mystery quests ! Great DLCs that can keep you play skyrim for even MORE ! And more and more... Going to play it right now ! Just buy it ! You can spend your money on this great game ! LOVE IT !
The Internet Hates my Sanity;-;If you're skilled enough, and not a pansy, you can beat a dragon to death with your bare fists. If that didn't convince you, go back to CoD.
HolyWinter;-;The modders that were apart of the paid mods, I don't hate those guys, quite the opposite. Given the opportunity they had i'm afraid I might of done the same, but with a clear conscience? idk. I'd like to see a new modder appreciation usher in and for us to actually be generous with our Hearts and our Wallets. I've learned a lot from this ordeal and personally...i'd feel bad for not Donating after all this. I got a few dollars I was planning on using for a game on sale but..I think i'll live without it. Valve Scraped the paid mods and now I will scrap this negative review and in its place put a deserving positive one. "Be broke or be wealthy, but never accept mediocrity" -From a Fortune Cookie I got.
Illimitus;-;This is my third review of this game, the second was prompted by the atrocity of locking mods behind a paywall, but as Valve and Bethesda realized the error of their ways, I will upload a new positive review. Core Skyrim, released 11-11-11, was a tremendous addition to the storied Elder Scrolls franchise that I had enjoyed since Daggerfall (which is still installed on my system and which I still play from time to time!). The DLCs were so-so, Hearthfire being my favorite of the three; but the mods and the modding community were what made this the premeir experience in PC gaming. I play Skyrim using 3D glasses and headphones and with the amazing mods like Frostfall, Wet and Cold, Immersive HUD, realistic needs and diseases, and Hunterborn it felt as if I was really there in Skyrim! With my role playing and dead-is-dead playstyle it was truly a magical experience, fulfilling the promise of video games that was only hinted at when I saw Dragon's Lair in the arcade as a child. This game was worth it at full price, and today is a "must own" when you can snag it on sale for 15 bucks or less! I have subscribed to Nexus in the past for mods, and will do so again, usually when I plan on playing Skyrim heavily for a month or more. I will now start to support modders ranging from a few cents to a few dollars depending on the amount I use it and the quality. What Valve, Bethesda and Nexus need to do is sit down and really hammer out a user friendly donation system. I want to be able to donate directly from my Steam Wallet or a Nexus Wallet with a minimal number of clicks. As it stands, it is a hassle to throw a few pennies at a mod and when I am trying to relax after a harrowing day at work, I don't want to fill out a bunch of forms! If Valve, Bethesda and Nexus need to take a tiny slice (5% max) of that donation to offset the cost of that system, I am OK with that. Finally, three and a half years into its lifespan, Bethesda is prepping to announce Fallout 4 and we are going to start the long march to Elder Scrolls 6! What should the future hold? Bethesda needs to think big: the Elder Scrolls Online was a failure not because of what it was, but because of what it wasn't. People want a co-op Skyrim experience not an MMO. Even now, Bethesda could and should realease a no more than 10$ co-op DLC for Skyrim, or at least get the ZeniMax lawyers to stop embargoing modders who have gotten to the prototype stage of development. Imagine traversing the vast lands (and seas!!) of all of Tamriel as the inevitable war between mankind and the Thalmor erupts across the continent and perhaps the entire world of Nirn and beyond! This is where Bethesda needs to get the modding scene right! Bring those who want to do this for a living and parcel out sections of Nirn to them so they can build it to completion as formal, supported and integrated DLC! Imagine a seemless world where you and you good friends can campaign in full virtual reality! We should work to rebuild the community and to fulfill the promise hinted at by Skyrim! - Thank you!
FaSB-Bounce;-;what should i say about Skyrim ? its an awesome game with a huge world. the Story is "OK" but the Side Quests are better then the Main Story. 9/10
Miami Lawgiver;-;So much wasted potential.
Skillpipes;-;I have hundreds of hours logged onto Skyrim on my Xbox 360, and while I enjoy the game, there are many glaring flaws. 1) Repetitive dialogue. This game shows that voice acting is still a luxury, as everybody says the same stuff over and over and it makes me want to pull a Van Gogh. The fact that this is supposed to be a feature doesn't help. I don't expect unique dialogue for every minute I play the game, but having every guard and NPC in skyrim say the same things is terrible. 2) Poor textures. If you don't pay attention to it, fine, but once you really look at that rock or weapon you realize that this game's textures is as poorly done as a whole. Lots of clipping. Lots of washed out crap. Lots of blurry garbage. I should not have to look to mods in order for a game I purchased to not look like it came right out of the gutter. 3) Scale. All the cities could barely classify as towns. The cities make the world appear larger on the map than it should be, but the cities in actuality make the world seem cramped and lifeless. Solitude has less than 20 buildings, and even less buildings to enter. 4) Writing. Lots of cringey writing. I could only tolerate it because I took long and frequent breaks from the main questline to explore and kill stuff. 5) Poorly scaling monsters. If you spent time leveling up things unrelated to combat you find the combat outscales you and you end up fighting hulking draugr deathlords that one-shot you because you still have a iron chestplate and sword. But another flaw about this game is what has happened recently. Mods are now able to be charged for. Developers are actually getting paid to do nothing while modders fix the game for them, and even then the modders only get 25% of the revenue they make total. Oh and if it doesn't break $400 bucks, then they don't get revenue at all. Now, if a player wants a quality mod to fix a bug or increase their experience they have to pay for it like DLC. These stupid microtransaction methods aren't content with just DLC and Pre-order , they're not encroaching on the modding community. tl;dr- skyrim really draws you in for a while, but once you get wise to it everything looks boring, feels boring, and now if you want to enhance your experience with mods you have to pay for it too.
cape;-;This may well have been the best game made ever due to the tens of thousands of mods that could transform the game into whatever game you may have wished for. However, now it is used to pave the way for paid mods. Paaid Mooodds
Eater of Pi;-;Like Skyrim without guns.
shadeling;-;Valve's new paid mods scheme is pure rubbish. Without mods, vanilla Skyrim sucks. So based on that, I give this game a big thumb's down.
Deagon the Commando;-;We pay dearly in coin for mods. Lord Gaben has forsaken his people. Let the Reformation soon take it's place, with hopes of a new era, where we are instead blessed by a great era of quality, new, free mods.
Aom42;-;I can't recommend this game anymore, as you will now have to pay for the mods that make it worthwhile. Don't support micro-transation dlc modding.
HOO-DINI;-;This game stayed on top for so long only because mods were available for FREE. Now that Valve made people pay for the mods this game became useless. Now you can go buy a console and play it there. Thanks Valve for ruining PC gaming with 1 update.
Justin Justin;-;Paid mods now
Goliad;-;An ok console-port-in-spirit that REQUIRES mods to be anything like previous iterations in terms of difficulty or depth. Before shady business practices that rewarded lazy and greedy* companies even further** this was no real issue but now it most certainly is and for that I cannot recommend the game to anybody who has played a previous elder scrolls or even a real fan of RPGs. If it's your first rpg game it'll be ok. *Bethesda invented modern DLC as we know it, remember [www.uesp.net] ? **Bethesda has only gotten away with their poor showings to the PC market among a sizable portion of users because they were a mod framework people could sandbox in. In-house bethesda games post-oblivion are barely worth the virtual space they're printed on as RPGs next to the actual giants of the genre. To demand 50% share is further incentivizing incompleteness and bugs as now (in theory) bethesda can just double dip; get money for the game itself because people will know whatever C- quality the game itself is can be changed completely so they buy it and then get a paycheck on the fixes to their own issues. What was a company that barely tries to develop mechanics/stability/gameplay/openness will try even less. Remember, commenters, you could always donate to modders who wanted to set that up and they'd get 90-100% of your money (money transfer fees may or may not apply)! This isn't supporting modders this is in fact corporations butting in on their hard work and handing them pennies after taking your dollars! The developer made the platform? If the game was so great why would it need fan bugfixes/mechanic overhauls? Why are they entitled to the sweat of another mans brow? Especially sweat that is usually spent on fixes? Why ever devote in studio time to bugfixes or improvements? Shovel them titles out with the paid staff! Let the common rabble do that unprofitable and difficult grunt work and collect your money twice! You don't even have to pay them a living wage, they work for peanuts! Ahahahaha! Valve has to spend a kerspillion dollars on hosting? They'll go bankrupt if they don't get paid as much as the person doing the actual work? Bulk rate discounts are a thing when you host half of PC gaming and you can donate to the nexus at any time (which over their history has done just fine with community support+ads+premium and without spending ninety blargillion dollars). This (hopefully) is peak industry greed. This (surely) is one of several heralding sounds of the second great video games crash [en.wikipedia.org] and it can't come soon enough. Valve, you were the chosen one! It was said that you would destroy the greed-first-games-second AAA monopoly, not join them! Bring balance to the PC gaming community, not leave it in darkness!!! EDIT: Addendum, Bethesda has entirely eroded their good-faith benefit of the doubt in regards to greed, undercutting others and cashing in. Valve too are working hard to catch up to them. Only at a squinting passing glance does this help modders. Rather, with any real thought it tears mod teams apart (I wait to be paid and Tim doesn't believe in it!), tears the community apart (inter-mod permissions were already a dramafest with no money involved), treads some real IP legality lines (liscensing, the legality of EULA, theft of work, etc) and is generally toxic to what was once a highly cooperative community focused field. Do you really want more greed and money in the world we live in? Where does it end? Art projects picked up by the media with the viewership dollars shared? What was once collaberative free expression that could maybe lead to money if the artist cared about that becoming a winner take all hyper-capitalist dog-eat-dog mini-corporate world? Not by my vote.
Mumbolian;-;Take your  paid mods and  off. Valve and Bethesda even take 75% of the profits. WHAT DID THEY DO? The mod was free, now they feel entitled? Do one.
VERY ANGER;-;paid mods? no thanks.. This isn't PC gaming.
flan.lw;-;Right now, Skyrim is on sale for 2.49. There are mods on the workshop selling for more than this.
Sordos;-;Absolutely horrible without VERY extensive use of FREE mods and even then you better hope mods wont conflict with each other and make the game unplayable. 1/5 you can polish a turd but you cant change it's core.
Mkir;-;Paid mods is a new low.
HUNK;-;Not a bug, how dare you. No paid mods.
TookYoCookies;-;PAID MODS.  YOU VALVE.  YOU GABEN YOU ING  TRAITOR.
Spodermen;-;10/10 Game 10/10 Modding community, well, not anymore. Paid mods.
Frost;-;Never thought I'd see the day where I'd have to back up the mods I downloaded. Good game, bad new system.
Jon;-;I like the idea of paying modders. I think the implementation of this system is about the worst way it could possibly be done
Teckademics;-;Was a fan until paid mods became a thing. I can no longer reccomend this game because of greedy corperations like Bethesda and Valve.
Weretato;-;Great game, but the best part are the mods. After Valve introduced the paid workshop, it has been completely ruined. Valve has gone so far as to shut down discussions about this "update". -10/10 Would not mod again.
hentie;-;Oh Gaben has come to own all modder's heart. I tell you, I tell you, the paid mods come. With the ting power of ancient scam art. Believe, believe, the paid mods come. The end to the era of passion at heart. Beware, beware, the paids mods come. Capitalism yet grows. You'll know, you'll know, the paid mods have come. $/10
meme machine //n1men.info;-;Someone at ValvE thought putting things that have been free for a decade behind a paywall was a good idea. SPOILER ALERT: It wasn't.
[TAW] Papi Taco;-;So, I was in love with this game since the very beginning. But this sudden change from the content creators of pulling their content off the Nexus and going straight for purchase, as well as the whole set of clusters that have been going with ownership of mods and who gets paid? This game is dead to me.
The Masketta Man;-;I love this game, but not the paid mod dlc that is being forced down our throats and is going to result in the end of free modding.
Weretato;-;Great game, but the best part are the mods. After Valve introduced the paid workshop, it has been completely ruined. Valve has gone so far as to shut down discussions about this "update". -10/10 Would not mod again.
hentie;-;Oh Gaben has come to own all modder's heart. I tell you, I tell you, the paid mods come. With the ting power of ancient scam art. Believe, believe, the paid mods come. The end to the era of passion at heart. Beware, beware, the paids mods come. Capitalism yet grows. You'll know, you'll know, the paid mods have come. $/10
meme machine //n1men.info;-;Someone at ValvE thought putting things that have been free for a decade behind a paywall was a good idea. SPOILER ALERT: It wasn't.
[TAW] Papi Taco;-;So, I was in love with this game since the very beginning. But this sudden change from the content creators of pulling their content off the Nexus and going straight for purchase, as well as the whole set of clusters that have been going with ownership of mods and who gets paid? This game is dead to me.
The Masketta Man;-;I love this game, but not the paid mod dlc that is being forced down our throats and is going to result in the end of free modding.
Bringonblink;-;You know why.
Vladimir "Put It In" Putin;-;Quite simply, I'm expressing my disgust at the paid mods system they've implemented. The game itself is fantastic, and the mods you can get for free are phenomenal, Purchase by all means, but don't positively review until they revoke paid for mods. Written and published as of 26/04/2015, with mods being optionally charged for a set price.
Kryo;-;If you have gotten to experience the magnificent game that Skyrim is before the paid modding was added, good for you. If not, I'm afraid it can already be too late. As a PC game, Skyrim was geared towards modding from the get-go, and functioned so for the four years after it's release. It was and still is a great game that stood on its own even without any mods, and if that's what you wish, do buy and play it, it is totally worth it. But as I said, mods, small and big improvements to how the game works, are truly the heart of Skyrim, and the last four years the community has been pushing out more and more amazing modifications. Sadly, Bethesda, with the help of Valve, has recently put up a marketplace for paid mods, thus seeking to monetize all that was free for four years. In the process they are only spawning re-texture rip-offs and the like, ruining the modding community completely. If you are here for the vanilla game, it is epic and worth it, I would definitely recommend it, but then you could just get it for a console, since you weren't going to mod anyways. But if you're here for the full experience, enriched with mods I'm sorry, but you are too late now. I cannot recommend the game as it is in its current sad state.
Maz;-;Paid mods harm the entire PC gaming community.
Lemurian Legion;-;The game, by itself, is nothing special. The only thing that made it good were mods, and with this greedy move I cannot recommend it with clear conscience.
MadGonzo;-;Paid mods. Shame on you Valve.
Doogie_78;-;I've bought this game on 4 different consoles and supported Bethesda all the way but not anymore.
Joseph Stealin' (Boycott *****);-;In enacting a paid workshop mod policy, Bethesda has essentially shackled the hand that helped to motive sales of some of their most recent titles. The Apple of Discord has been lobbed, and the ensuing melee may very well sunder this and other modding communities for the foreseeable future. Don't buy Skyrim, don't buy Fallout 3, don't buy any of their future projects - and for proposing this scheme in the first place, don't buy anything else that would see money going towards Valve, for that matter. Use GoG, use Amazon, use any individual systems developers and publishers have set up, ANYTHING but Steam.
ChaoticSky;-;Skyrim is a okay game, its the mods that make it good, with the way things are going, i cant reccomend this game to anyone.
Franhell_;-;Rather play Train Simulator
Doctor Chronos;-;Some men just want to watch the world burn... but now they cant becasue the giant flame ball spell mod costs more than the damn game!!!
a_lazy_white_guy;-;Great Game if you are a very Rich man and do not care for money. For everyone else, sorry, you have missed your oportunity to enjoy Skyrim the way it was meant to played on PC. Bethesda has assisted Valve in destroying this game with sugar-coated corporate greed. I would not buy this game for one dollar, because either way you are going to spend $!00+ on mods that used to be free.
Waphlefather;-;Vanilla Skyrim isnt very satisfying. Worth maybe a playthrough.
LordKushTerabyte;-;Great for modding...
[F]reeman;-;Pay for mods. WTF and DLC is higher than game it self.
Kacpa Shade;-;Paid mods Please dont support that kind of behaviour 0/10 Without this issue game is 7/10 at best with mods 10/10
c4r1o5;-;Not worth it.
vitz3;-;Paid mods. An incredibly bad idea. Once their was a time when all could enjoy their dragons as Macho Man Randy Savage. Now thanks to greed and blatant stupidity mods like that are tucked neatly behind a paywall. Thanks for killing the one thing that set us apart from console gaming Valve! Don't tick off your fanbase.
Ajifoster3;-;Mods for money. Otherwise good game.
sundusk47;-;use to be a great game on pc with mod,now that mod become dlc,it will become a ghost of it former glory whats next valve,a sub to get better deals on game!?
Dontstealthisname;-;You have to pay for mods now. Do not buy this game. As someone with over 200 mods installed from various sources (including the steam workshop), I would have to pay over $400 to replicate my current skyrim experience today.
Freelancer Jak;-;I once had a life, now I have skyrim.
onoln (Broadcasting);-;Hiding mods behind a paywall is just disgusting! Why not a optional donation button, Valve? Edit: I stand by this review even after Steam removed the paid mods. The game is great don't get me wrong, but the way in which the community was treated was appalling. Paid mods are not such a horrible idea but they have a time and a place, This was neither.
Monster10;-;Paid mods are an abomination, this cancer cannot be allowed to spread.
lynx;-;skyrim is one of my favorite games but getting destroyed by paid mods
=(eGO)= Dr. Doctor;-;Even after the paid mods fiasco, I'm still keeping my bad rating, and let me tell you why: This game has the area of an ocean but the depth of a kiddie pool. Anyone can argue Bethesda's strong suit is world building, and Skyrim has an epic, open world, but the game does nothing with it. I found the story hard to follow, despite it being linear and obvious, but it was too easy to get wrapped up in sidequests. Furthermore, the NPCs. Every NPC has something to say, which is cool, but it's specifically about you and to you, even those who don't know (or care) that you're the Dragonborn. It creates an atmosphere of the entire world revolving around you, a big problem I had with Fallout 3, Bethesda's other RPG. However, unlike Fallout, this game has no moral system. Meaning you can get trapped into doing evil quests (Lights Out!) with no way to stop it. This game's world is massive and incredible, but the story falls short and the NPCs serve no purpose to deepen it. If you want an RPG that's truly great, deep, moddable, and has Bethesda's name on it, save your money and pick up New Vegas. Still plenty of great mods and a much better story and base replayability than Skyrim or Fallout 3.
Glory;-;We won the battle, not the war. This is twice that Bethseda has tried something silly, and Valve is no better. It's sad that reviews for games have to be tainted by politics.
Moonblaze;-;Edit: Happy to find out Bethesda and Steam backpedaled on their decision to monetize mods. Still, let this review stand as a record of what transpired, and to how loudly hundreds of thousands of voices can resonate. Thanks for fighting for us! For the last three Elder Scrolls games, Bethesda has relied on one thing to make their games playable and decent. I am of course talking about allowing the community to mod their games which are NEVER finished upon release. The vanilla version of their games, while acceptable, do not even remotely compare to a fully modded version of the game. Essentially, Bethesda had been using the communty to give their very bare games a good name, and they have succeeded in that regard and have increased their sales significantly. But that was not enough for Bethesda, it wasn't enough that they release a game half completed, it wasn't enough that the community had to fill in the blanks, to do a job that the developers are getting paid a lot of money to do professionally. No, Bethesda now wants to profit by monetizing the mods out there, the mods which made people give a thought about their game to begin with. This practice encourages foul play, copyright infrigments, greed, and will generally not sit well for the people who use their products. If one of the core mods out there gets monitized (and they already have), there will be no alternative to the users due to the modders being unable to get their similar mods approved due to so called "copyright". There was never a copyright problem before monetizing the mods. Now this becomes a reality, now Bethesda and Valve get a piece of the pie with every transaction. Do you remember the Blizzard approach? How many people at Blizzard lost their jobs over their terrible business model before they bent the knee to all the negative feedback and redesigned the entire game? Bethesda and Valve are trying to turn user generated content into paid DLC because they feel they should get credit and ownership on the user generated content released for their half finished games. Essentially outsourcing some of their best content to third parties who have none of the benefits of being full time Bethesda employees. Additionally, the feedback for the paid content is now completely biased as only the users who purchased the mod will be able to write reviews and rate the content. If Valve and Bethesda truly wanted to legitimately support the modding community, all they had to do was add an optional donation option for those who want to contribute to the mods' development. I am not blaming any of the developers of the game, they did what they were told. Their marketting department and those above it are solely the ones blamed, as well as the service who hosts their game.
beanoman4;-;Let this negative review serve as a reminder of the paid-for mod fiasco that bethesda/valve tried to pull
stray_pengo;-;"A new way to support modders:" Bethesda's cut: 45% Valve's cut: 30% Modders' cut: 25% No way, Jose.
[FLOT] Frawley6;-;cause paying for small dlc wasn't enough for them
a testicle;-;Contributing to the negative review numbers on the sole basis of the paid mods.
LordComealot;-;Paid Modding?! Fair enough if a big share goes to the modders but 75% runs straight down Steams pocket and only 25% goes to the "modder"... Skyrim is a good game but Steam hurts the game and themsleves by doing this!!!!
Bioshock;-;Best game i've ever played ! Bought it cheap, bought it even on ps3 and i'm still playing it !!! Mods...? YES ! Allot of great mods. Almost infinite amount of great, strange, awesome, mystery quests ! Great DLCs that can keep you play skyrim for even MORE ! And more and more... Going to play it right now ! Just buy it ! You can spend your money on this great game ! LOVE IT !
vlad the kiler;-;bought a mod that costed more than the basegame crashed my game 11/10 - IGN
Rainbow Chicken;-;When I picked this game up, I thought it was okay. I completed it, and it felt good. But then, one day, I found out that there's more to this game.. I found out that you can marry other people, be a part of a guild and pretty much do ANYTHING. Then, I found out about mods, and oh boy was I happy to see Thomas the tank engine fly in the sky.. Enough words. 10/10 would mod again.
Awendil;-;Valve what have you done This paid modding is insanity. Mods are what made you a company. If CS had cost 20$ it would not exist. If DOTA cost 15$ it would not exist. Please change this to a donate button. The pay wall that has already come up in just a few days is just a small taste of what will become. And if you are going to insist on supporting a paid mods solution you and Bethesda taking 75% of the profits is absurd. Are you kidding me 75%. The Modder doses all of the work for you and you steal their income. You say this is to help the mods grow and become more refined. Well then send 75% to the creator.
TheBushTickler;-;I stole a wooden spoon and got prison for life. 10/10
AdamMcbane;-;Great game, made amazing by a great modding community. Though take note the game is no longer supported by it's makers, bugs you find on it mostly have been fixed by the use of modder made patches. I definitly recommend it. If you like games like Fallout and want a Fantasy world version of that game this is the game for you with it's massive modding you can customize theworld to your liking. It has a community so strong it recently crushed greed that could have destroyed it. Get this Elder Scrolls game now and hope the next Elder Scrolls game follows in a similar path. Especially the modding side that has been around since earlier Elder Scrolls games. Forever Free!!
Aomine Daiki;-;Skyrim is by far the best video game There is so much freedom so much exploring and you can always find something to do in this game. The graphics are incredible which leads to incredible landscape views all the around the world. There is plenty of things to fight, places to go and things to find. There is also hundreds of items in the game . The game is very complex so you may think it is hard to learn but when I played for the first time I got the feel for the game in only days! and most i like the mod especialy the kaboobies ;p I highly recommend this game!
The Chosen One;-;PAID MODS MAY COST MORE THAN ADVERTISED This game for a start is brilliant and i highly recommend you to purchase it. Would you kindly not pay for mods however and here is why. Now we all know that modding isn't perfect and depending on the type of mod can be extremly hard and confusing to install. These mods may require .INI editing and may require patches and files such as the (Skyrim Script Extender) to run correctly and even installing these can be a pain in the backside because they may be out of date versions, Include errors and might not even work on certain hardware. This can be extremely confusing to people who don't know the In-Out's of a computer, Things such as renaming or .ZIP extracting. Now onto why i think mods may cost you a fortune: ________________________________________ Now if you have looked into the workshop you may have seen there are a few mods already up for payment. These few mods (So far that i have seen) require nothing else to experience their content. Yet But this is what will happen and (Trust me it will) Say i release a mod called "Skyrim Graphics Overhaul" and i put it up for purchase. It seems all fine and dandy doesn't it? A mod which will make Skyrim look like Crysis and i go ahead and buy it until you see this: _________________________________________ Main Mod: Skyrim Graphics Overhaul: 4 Required Mods: Skyrim Water Enhanced: 5 Skyrim Ultra HD Texture Pack: 7 8k Grass Textures: 3 Total Price: 19 Yes... 4 for a mod which should have had all these things covered itself and then for all the other mods you have to fork out 15 for (Micro-Transaction DLC) For a grand total of 19 for a modpack which probably won't make it look as advertised. Please do not stand for this. and Sign this Petition: https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop
FeNIX;-;I made porn of this game! 12.5/10
bassturd :)))));-;You can scream at people
Andrew;-;Nice game, awsome graphics, works fine, some bugs but we can easly fix them with console commands and everything's fine after that, alot of crafting, also Steam Workshop adds alot of cool mods! EDIT: Discovered Nexus 3 weeks ago, lot of cool mods there!
Wild Space Monkey;-;TL;DR end of review. This game: -Has a magnificent story. -Cheats -Awesome Mods (Nexus) -Open World -Do almost anything -And the list goes on. If I had more money, I'd buy 10 more copies of this game for anyone who really needs to play it. In this game you can: -Go Anywhere -Kill anyone -Scream -Get married -Buy a house -Kill dragons -Eat (dragon) souls without being a ginger -Store a thousand item in your inventory -Climb mountains on a horse -Duel with losers ingame -Travel -Explore a wide vareity of places, cities, villages, dungeons and many more -Have a cute lady follow you everywhere and defend you (better with sexy mods). Too long, didn't read (TL;DR) -----Buy this game, don't pirate it.----- -----The developers deserve more than pirated downloads of the game.----- -----This game is totally worth you $20 (or $5 if sales)----- Support the developers, think about it, if you don't buy their amazing games, they may go bankrupt and not make good games like Skyrim, Fallout NV, Dishonored, etc. then we'd get stuck with  EA and Ubisoft. You can't buy anything in this game for real money. It wouldn't rip you off. Spend $20 for this game and play forever instead of buying another overpriced game from another game developing company. Thanks for reading.
Squid Grill;-;A game in which you look for a super old piece of paper, and go to the edge of space. Not much else to say about this.
Iliam;-;Skyrim is easily one of the best games of this generation. Its one of the games that you get as much out of as you put in. Its also one of the games you play exactly how you want to play. You can choose to ignore the main story immediately after beginning or play through the quests like a linear action adventure game. Speaking of quests, theres an awful lot of them. Even after playing over 170 hours altogether, I have a plethora of quests on my active quest log, never mind the ones I havent even started yet. So yes, Skyrim is 100% recommended by me.
FadedTeleTubby;-;There are a couple of glitches in the game, some fatal, so you might need to save often, but that is a small price to pay. If your looking for a good game to play, definatly play this one.
Thess;-;You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc and get a thumbs up...
Busy;-;"The game is very good, excellent even. Too bad it is a pioneer of a despicable business practice of paid modding. I'm sorry. I've bought every DLC, I won't be paying cash for small mods based on somebody else's work. Will this game kill the PC modding community? Only you can decide!" Same feeling. Good game and incredibly bad innovation. A very bad example for other companies and modders community.
Durahan;-;Now that mods are behind a pay wall there is no real reason to even buy this on the PC.
elefant bwnage;-;Bravo Valve, Mods that you must pay for. This is ing attrocious, and has effectively killed the ing game for me. Back to playing Morrowind for my Elder Scrolls fix, goodbye Skyrim, you  shade of a king that you once were.
Sennario;-;Game 10/10 Paying for mods -10/10 Sorry Steam but that's ! Want to really support mod creators? Remove this atrocity of a paywall and add way of donating to the authors directly.
BarryS - LE Hype;-;Payed mods, no thank you. I'd rather have a huge pop up ad and donation button.  off.
Adeptus Astartes;-;Against paid mod on Steam.
Varl~;-;Skyrim's a good game that becomes an amazing game thanks to mods. I got my fun out of it, but you won't, with the way things are changing here.
Dino_98v;-;Was a great game because of mods now you have to pay its completly
Dennis Quaid;-;I cannot recommend game bc of the whole fiasco with the modding situation, it needs to be fixed soon
Jord77665;-;Great game love playing this in my spare time, with great mods and character creation and foes within the game. The storyline is vast however completed the campaign in 1 week and the side quests i believe will take months which i will enjoy alot. Thanks to the steam community for Skyrim mods it is great and gives lots of laughs and hours of gameplay. Muskets, new swords and clothes are great to add into the game and my Dragonborn is now fully equipped for battle , taken out Miraak and now building a good armour set however nothing beats the Eleven blades, armour and bows.
A Zorua Scout, Mitch;-;Game is awful, only cuz the mods are paid for, well played valve, well played.
Cosmo;-;THIS IS MY REVIEW UNTIL THEY TAKE DOWN THE PAID MODS! YOU HERE ME VALVE! YOU GUYS HAVE RUINED SKYRIM! I PAID $60 FOR THIS GAME AND NOW YOU'RE CHARGING ME EXTRA!? WHAT THE HECK!!!
Tom;-;Whats next, Summer Mod Sale?
Mage;-;Not supporting paid mods.
GoochWeeble;-;THEY TOOK ER MERDS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Shellghost;-;Mods were the only decent thing about this game, now you have to pay for them.
Mcbotbyl;-;Paying for mods? ing really?  you Valve.  you Bethesda.
The Fresh Taste of Water;-;I do not recommend this game. Although there are some good aspects of the game as a whole, the company and valve are making this game much less enjoyable. Buy the game for a console, or don't get the game at all.
Gaius Invictus;-;Skyrim is worthless without mods. The monetization of modding for Skyrim has, therefore, made Skyrim an objectively  game.
The Fresh Taste of Water;-;I do not recommend this game. Although there are some good aspects of the game as a whole, the company and valve are making this game much less enjoyable. Buy the game for a console, or don't get the game at all.
Gaius Invictus;-;Skyrim is worthless without mods. The monetization of modding for Skyrim has, therefore, made Skyrim an objectively  game.
Louie [EGC];-;The greed is Real. Another excuse to release broken, unfinished games.
Scarface_tfs;-;Paying for mods is unacceptable. An unnecessary blight on the face of an otherwise excellent game.
its wizzy;-;This game was what it was because of the mods. Now the mods are paid. DO NOT BUY THIS GAME. IT IS BUGGY, BORING AND OUTDATED. In order to get good graphics and bug fixes from mods you need to pay. Do not buy this game,
ANGRY ABOUT ELVES;-;I'm going to explain CHIM to you guys, because I think it's very relevant here. CHIM is the realization that the world you love is merely a dream, and the realization that doesn't matter because you love it anyway. If you don't love the world and everything in it, if you don't love it enough that it doesn't matter that it isn't real and you're not real, you zero-sum. You stop having ever existed. And this love, this love of the world and everything in it, combined with the acceptance of its nature as a dream, allows you great power over the world. You may change it as you see fit, improve it, modify it and contribute to the beauty of the world for the sheer sake of making it more beautiful and more worthy of that love. Those who truly love will contribute because of that love. That is what CHIM means. Every unofficial patch, every spell package, every mechanical or graphical overhaul is an act of CHIM, of truest love. Hiemskir, in game, quotes from The Many Headed Talos, saying: "Let me show you the power of Talos Stormcrown, born of the North, where my breath is long winter. I breathe now, in royalty, and reshape this land which is mine. I do this for you, Red Legions, for I love you." CHIM is love. Paid mods are not CHIM. This is what I'm really ing  about. That they started this paid mods experiment with The Elder Scrolls. This goes directly against the most beautiful, most poignant part of Elder Scrolls lore. This is not CHIM. This is greed.
7870STO00;-;Bethesda and Valve ruined this game with paid mods. Buuuh!
Krawll;-;After the paywall to mods i could not recommend this game to anyone. I have a played over 450 hours and still not beat the game. That is how much I love this game. Thank Valve for f*cking it up for everyone! *I have donated planty to modders. All you need is a donate button.
Alexiel Zero;-;You will get hours and hours of gameplay out of this little gem. Unfortunately Valve decided that that we had to play for mods, so now you'll only get about half of it.
|--|Erik|--|;-;Need to pay modders (75% to Bethesda) to fix stuff Bethesda should've fixed on release.
Yu-Gi-Doge!!;-;I can no longer support Bethesda games. Such sadness...
Cane;-;UPDATE: This was written during the paid mods debacle on Steam. Paid mods were removed after intense backlash. This will still remain a negative review. Read below the review to see why. -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- It is with a very weary sigh that I can no longer recommend this series. This franchise, this part of gaming history, has occupied a big part of my heart as well as my gaming shelf since Daggerfall. The primary reason for this exceptional longevity has been the incredible amount of modded content available for every title in the series since Morrowind. The incredible array of mods and third-party tools have turned the games from fun (but some times shallow) gaming experiences to something wholly special. New content, new quests, new companions, whole new landmasses and areas to explore -- all available for years and years and YEARS after launch. And then Valve and Bethesda decided that they wanted to make money on other people's mods. And they wanted a lot of it. In fact, they wanted 75% of it. The problems are already starting: Mods that were once free now cost money. The Steam workshop is being flooded with truly bad content designed to abuse the awful workshop system and cash in while they can. There are early access mods that ask for money up front for continued development. Popular gameplay-changing mods such as Midas Magic have been removed from The Nexus and other modding sites, and replaced with a paid version... and a freemium version which constantly gives you an in-game popup begging you to buy the full version. I am going to repeat that because it sounds vaguely important: We now have early access MODS. We now have in-game ads. For MODS. I cannot recommend any game that decides to make use of this new system Valve is trying to cram down our throats, designed to grab more money from their consumers in what I can only describe as a horribly unethical manner. The modding scene is - without hyperbole - under serious threat right now as a result of this horribly botched paywall implementation, and Valve is running serious damage control: banning players, removing comment sections, and hoping everything will blow over. And what's worse is, it very well MAY blow over. And in the meantime, SkyUI - the most downloaded accessibility/UI mod, a mod that makes the UI actually bearable, a mod that countless other mods depend on to function - has gone paid-only. We just lost a ton of content overnight. And unless I miss my mark, this is only beginning. THAT is why I cannot recommend Skyrim any more. I can no longer claim that you should buy this game, because mods have always been a big part of it for me, and that platform is now under duress. With the current ecosystem, it will become worse and worse and worse. I never felt sad for being a PC gamer, until now. Today is extremely disappointing. -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Since writing this, Valve and Bethesda backed off from their paid mod system due to intense backlash. Valve has apologized, and given some indication that they understand our concerns. http://www.reddit.com/r/pcmasterrace/comments/3434it/paid_mods_in_the_steam_workshop/ Bethesda has not, and not. http://www.bethblog.com/2015/04/27/why-were-trying-paid-skyrim-mods-on-steam/ Bethesda still seems to think they were in the right, and still seem to believe that mods behind a paywall is something they want to work on. They also seem to think that the pricing model was fair, and they are trying to claim that a 25%-45% split in favor of Bethesda over the modder is acceptable "because it is the industry standard"... in an industry where there is no precedent for this whatsoever. And also, importantly, neither party seems to understand that it's not the idea of giving money to content creators that was problematic in and of itself -- it was the system that was being imposed on us. It was the unfair monetization favoring corporations over content developers, it was the complete lack of quality control on the Steam Workshop store, and EXTRAORDINARILY IMPORTANTLY: it was the fact that the system was set up to allow for *mandatory* payment, which meant that modders started taking advantage of this by placing their formerly free mods under this paywall. This wreaked all kinds of havoc with the ecosystem, what with mods being dependent on each other, and compatibility issues being a prevalent nut to crack. "Even though we had the best intentions, the feedback has been clear  this is not a feature you want. Your support means everything to us, and we hear you." - Bethesda No. You DON'T hear us. If you did, you and Valve would openly discuss the pricing point with the community. If you did, you and Valve would realize that the mandatory paywall was the problem. If you did, in fact, hear us, you would have pulled the plug on this project instead of letting Valve make all of the decisions for you. If Valve hadn't caved there would still be a paywall, Bethesda would still be taking a 45% cut, and Bethesda would be doing their damnedest to justify it. I will change this review back to positive if Bethesda ever makes good on their claims to support the modding scene in a positive way, which will only happen if these companies actually start listening.
CloakedSpartan;-;Valve and Bethesda adding in paid mods for Skyrim has resulted in supreme backlash for a good reason (so far the positive rating % has dropped from 98% to 89%). You can now buy broken- mods for 3 and use them while using your broken 40p sword and eating a broken 20p carrot. It's like Early Access but it's even ier, hiding mods behind a in' paywall. And real, good mod developers would only get 25% of the revenue cut by choosing this way anyway. Valve and Bethesda are literally assing the consumers AND the mod developers.
Eviscator;-;I cannot recommend this game due to the recently implemented paywall for mods.
DH;-;This game supports corporate bottom line and not creativity.
PyroVx;-;Putting mods behind a paywall is bad enough. And then you only give 25% of that to the modder? What.
code red;-;This game is sheite because of paid Maude's
Allan Paul;-;I refuse to pay for mods.
Jigglypawf;-;Paid mods for this game has earned a negative review.
[RTRS] wijse;-;I don't support games that want to monetize mods. Don't buy this game.
Darko Xr;-;So this game is great, but when I recently tried to play it, I realized that all of the mods that I had originally used throughout my playthrough is now for whatever reason requiring money. I payed for the game and seeing mods being pay to play just seems ludicrous, not to denote content creators, especially the ones I've donated to in the past (you know who you are), but this is not something I agreed upon.
LooneyOnTheLoose;-;could not get game to work tried every thing recomened
BreadBull;-;This game took a giant downfall once paid DLC is a thing. Do not buy.
Ronron;-;Paid Mods? Really? That completely destroys the purpose of a mod. Rethink this decision.
typevu;-;Very disappointing with the direction this game has taken. Do not support at all.
Majben;-;New mod policy, especially with the huge cut valve is taking without any quality control or reasonable return policy. A shame.
Fujiwara Noep Mokou;-;DLC Mods. If the idea of this doesn't disgust you to no end, I don;t know what will.
MS-06S ZAKU II;-;So begins the greatest torm of our time
typevu;-;Very disappointing with the direction this game has taken. Do not support at all.
Majben;-;New mod policy, especially with the huge cut valve is taking without any quality control or reasonable return policy. A shame.
Fujiwara Noep Mokou;-;DLC Mods. If the idea of this doesn't disgust you to no end, I don;t know what will.
MS-06S ZAKU II;-;So begins the greatest torm of our time
Flexxo;-;its a amazing game and the mods makes is so much better, but now they are behinde a paywall i have quit it.. paying for mods is not about the modders valve never have never will be.. its just another way for them to make money of others work a 75% cut to valve and a 25% to the modders ...
Jerstern z_z;-;Really good game, mainly due to the mods. Bethesda puts out ok games that are some what half  in my opinion and they rely on the modding community to pick up there slack. Now they want to take 75% of the modders profits. What a joke, and unffortunatly now I have to not recommend Skyrim.
Ins;-;Skyrim is a great game. Mostly because of all the great mods enhancing the existing gameplay and content. Sadly now Valve have started charging for their mods. So in order to enjoy Skyrim properly one would have to cough up hundreds of dollars if all mods costed money. Last time I played Skyrim I had 526 mods of various complexity installed. With an average price of 2 dollars(if Valve had their way and all mods had a price) that's still more than 1000 dollars to enjoy the game. NO THANKS VALVE.
TRISTAN;-;Paid mods may be the single worst idea that any person or corporation has ever had.
FUBAR;-;25% for Modder? " I N G" GREEDY "B A S T A R D" . Give them 50% or just put the Donate button.
Blind Massuer;-;Paid mods is an attrocious move to sqeeze money out of players. Paywalls on mods is very disrespectful to players and the game itself.
ALessonInCrime;-;Was great. Then Steam started selling mods.
maryohhh;-;Hiding mods behind a paywall is just disgusting
Myndphuck;-;You know why.
Micke;-;Pay for free mods. Gaben is now dead to me.
~Ryo~;-;Thank you Valve, Bethesda, and the modders that decided to sell out and will sell out in the future once other companies decide to rely on you to finish their games.
Kopilatis;-;Paid mods ruined a great game.
Snowballs007;-;This whole payed mod system is flawed and messy. I think a simple donation button would have sufficed.
PraiseHelix;-;In the past i'd always have recommended this game. Skyrim is famous for being a buggy mess, with bad graphics, horrible combat, shallow NPCs and a boring story. But it's also one of the best PC games of all time, thanks entirely to huge and dedicated community that turned a bad game into a modding platform of unprecedented scale. Without mod support and the commitment of a loving fanbase this game would have gone down in history as a lake as deep as a puddle. Mods opened it up to infinite replayability, infinite content. Bethesda and Valve are now working to crush this game's life support system. It will die slowly, as they rip the once-united community asunder by greed. Mods that worked together and relied on each other are being dragged down by spider's webs of paywalls like the mod SkyUI. Modders are releasing awful mods for ridiculous prices in a race to make a quick buck. Gone are the passion, the dedication. The modding community that has thrived for years is dying. Thieves are exploiting the system to upload other's content and charge for it. Careless modders could, in the past, be forgiven for a flawed product, unprofessional conduct, glitches or crashes. They cannot be held to the higher standard required of a paid product. Already, large mods have downgraded their free versions and moved the full version to behind a paywall. Content that was once free has been taken from us. Bethesda are making a profit from mods like SkyUI that were created to fix the issues with their game; they're being rewarded for creating a terrible interface, and what's more, the modder is only getting a tiny cut of the money. Don't buy Skyrim. Without mods, it's a flawed, glitchy, dated, ugly mess. Until Bethesda and Steam rescind their idiotic stance on paid mods it's impossible for me to support a game that I love.
Kashou;-;Mods are required to enjoy the game. You need to be a mod professor to get it to work without crashing if you want to install anything more advanced than additional hats.
[DoH]Heartstopper;-;I categorically refuse to support this paid mod crap, especially considering that the modder only gets 25%. Edit: They reverted the whole paid mod thing, but the damage to the modding community has already been done. I don't know if I will be able to trust bethesda again after this.
Baifag;-;A once great game that will now forever be remembered as the game that attempted to monetize the modding community.
Gambit;-;Before paid mods this was great game, but now with the introducing paid mods I can't recommend this game. It's a sad state for PC gaming if this is the future of PC gaming. I can't see myself wanting the next Fallout or Elder Scrolls game if this concept stays. The only reason to buy those two series is because of the awesome mod community at this time I only see this as hurting the mod community.
Tasty Magic Muffin;-;Paid mods? No.
apartypooper;-;Riddled with bad quality 3rd party DLC's. Microtransaction hell.
Anarchymedes;-;I really love Morrowind and Oblivion, but this consolified crap with ridiculous mod system? No, thank you. There's a bunch of great alternatives if you are looking for an open world medieval/fantasy RPG... some of them even DRM free :)
BeefCake;-;I've played this game pretty extensively. Part of what makes it great is the massive amounts of modding that can be done to really make this game as close to perfect as possible. However, Valve and Bethesda now decided to start putting mods behind a paywall. This has already resulted in massive outrage, stealing of mods, and my own personal dissapointment in both companies. Many modders are even upset about this. Putting what was free content behind a paywall isntead of a donation option is ridiculous.
Fry The Brain;-;Vuck Falve. Buck Fethesda. So you want to charge the average customer even more money to download mods? As if we don't have other things to spend our hard earned cash on? Nah... sorry. Not going to buy into that. 'Aint going to happen baby cakes. I cannot fully express my discontent at the moment. However, I will put Valve, and Bethesda on my five year list. Meaning, in five years, I will be seeing those responsible for this atrocity, directly. Enjoy it while you can.
Nevard;-;Great game until they started selling mods for moneygrabs.
Gromit;-;Bought this game because I was amazed by the sheer number of community supported mods, now I feel like it wasn't worth the purchase.
Adeptus Astartes;-;Against paid mod on Steam.
Varl~;-;Skyrim's a good game that becomes an amazing game thanks to mods. I got my fun out of it, but you won't, with the way things are changing here.
Dino_98v;-;Was a great game because of mods now you have to pay its completly
Dennis Quaid;-;I cannot recommend game bc of the whole fiasco with the modding situation, it needs to be fixed soon
Busy;-;"The game is very good, excellent even. Too bad it is a pioneer of a despicable business practice of paid modding. I'm sorry. I've bought every DLC, I won't be paying cash for small mods based on somebody else's work. Will this game kill the PC modding community? Only you can decide!" Same feeling. Good game and incredibly bad innovation. A very bad example for other companies and modders community.
Durahan;-;Now that mods are behind a pay wall there is no real reason to even buy this on the PC.
Scottish Pig Esq. III;-;edit: they removed paid mods but here's the original review Congratulations, you spent upwards to $40 to buy Skyrim. You bought it on PC so you could download those sweet mods your friends always bragged that they had. You go to the Workshop to go get some of these amazing mods, and then you notice price tags strewn about everywhere. Everything is behind a paywall, and if you wanted every mod you saw that was interesting, You would have to spend more than the GAME ITSELF just to use it. Is it guaranteed to work? Of course not! BUT, Valve added a feature where you could "refund" the mod for 24 hours. But... there's ANOTHER catch. Some mods don't work together, so if you bought your fancy $5 mod and you got some other $2 mod, they might not work together. Congratulations! You spent $7 dollars on DLC that doesn't work. What are the modders gonna do about it, they just want the money. But what's even worse, is the modders only get 25% of the profit. ANNNNNNDDDD... they only recieve their money through steam wallet. What the hell are you gonna need steam wallet money for when you're raking in like 3 cents everytime some jerkoff buys your 25 cent mod of some  sword? OH WAIT, THERES MORE! The modders themselves don't even get the money from the mods until THEIR MOD sells enoguh for them to MAKE $100, and remember, they only get 25% of that money. So, if you had 25 cent mod, it would have to make FOUR HUNDRED DOLLARS in sales for you to even get paid for your "paid" mod. R.I.P PC Skyrim and Mods. November 11, 2011 - April 23, 2015
VanderVof;-;Silly Gabe and his paid mods 0/10 :(
Nordish Ginger;-;Bethesda showed us the whip they wanted to beat us with. Paid mods.. Gone now, but never forgotten.
EManFTW;-;Heard there was a great modding community and it was on sale 75% off. Then they made mods paid. Gr8 b8 m8, being sure to r8, 8/8 on the b8 7/10 on the game -333/you on the paid mods issue.
FB//MR.SHARK;-;Why are you reading this? ITS SKYRIM JUST BUY IT!
Banana Joystick [Away];-;No more paid mods 10/10
Edelweiss;-;Changing my review back to a thumbs up. The great split is over. Thank you valve for being honest and admitting you dun goofed and "didnt know what you were doing." Skyrim is a good game, and it's greatness is only reflected in its passionate mod community that has stood for over ten years because of bethesda's mod tools. Perhaps this rough chapter has proven how strong and tight it is in the mod community and how passionate we are about crafting our own fantasy worlds. I am back to recommending the game and I forgive valve and honor their honesty in retracting their mess. The elder scrolls games have always been rather 'meh' in one if not more categories, but there's nothing quite like them in the ability to form your own game because of the countless piles of free content shared by the gamers themselves.
Rhyper;-;Paid mods disgust me, and I thought we were already ed with the current DLC . Way to go, Valve.
Trollingwood;-;Paying for mods? lol no
SilverLi;-;Pay for half a dozen DLCs, now pay for 15000 mods. Next step is probably buy weapons ingame with real money. You just shot yourself in the foot Bethesda and Valve.
I'm The Real Jones;-;Paid Mods are a terrible idea that I won't support. 1/10
Cassylat;-;Bethesda and Valve are jews
Shuffle;-;Thanks to Steams introduction of paid mods, the mod community is now threatened due to this new outbreak. Now its not wrong for modders to be compensated for their mods. Then what is the problem of having to pay for mod? Well many mods are being taken from the nexus mod manager and being uploaded by someone else. Efficetively stealing their hard work.
Rabbit;-;Buy your extra cheesewheels, only 69.69!
Ninja;-;The game was alright, not as good as Oblivion but not a bad game overall. I give it a Thumbs Down for two reasons: 1. Those of us that pre-ordered the game STILL have no cheap option to buy all DLC included in the "Legendary" edition. I paid $60 for the base game with no DLC and "Legendary" edition is only $40 I think with no option to upgrade from base. Even during a weekend deal on Skyrim the "Legendary" edition is only $14 while the DLC is $17!? How is the DLC more expensive than the base game + DLC!? Why do they hate their pre-order fans so much and only give good deals to new people? 2. Paid mods. This is not an effort to support modders and give an option for people to make money doing what they love. From what I've read modders only get a 25% cut, that means Valve is taking in 75% FREE MONEY for work they didn't do. Providing a platform for sale does not entitle you to 75% of the profit made on said platform. tl;dr - If you never played the game, pick up the Legendary edition, it's a fun game ruined by both Bethesda's and Valve's greedy marketing schemes.
Nuuskamuikkunen;-;0/10 Cannot support a team willing to rip off their nodding community.
jakethewizard04;-;Changing the rules for how we interact with our games is not ok.
icthis3t7;-;Valve/Bethesda pls.
Limulana;-;wow Valve now you cut the great mod part off the game, what a shame. Workshop should be done inside of the community without develops. It's not a paid job creating a new dagger or something and creators knew it but it still held popular and people created stuff just for the community now its all over.
n0thing is a fucking god;-;Added mods you need to pay for, went from 5/10 to 0/10. 10/10
Baby Pig;-;Remove paid mods.
Jumanji Joe;-;A so-so game that is best played with mods, but now those mods are behind a pay wall. Stick to earlier games and skip this one.
Gleap;-;Really? Paid mods now? even by our current pathetic industry standards that is pretty scumtastic. Gotta say I'm pretty sickened by both valve and bethesda over this
Oxide;-;I don't like the mods changes, would prefer the implemenation of a donate button instead.
Mochi;-;Not paying for mods.
robcraufurd;-;Has been in my backlog for a while: I've been putting it off until I was in the mood for epic fantasy, because I wanted to do it justice. As part of that, I was anticipating being able to select from a wide range of free mods to fix what I understand is an ambitious but buggy game. As I no longer have any idea how much it might cost me to mod the game to a workable state when I do come round to playing it, I cannot under any circumstances recommend the game.
Unexpected Bananas;-;paid mods what?
creenus;-;this game is fun with nippel mods (booobies) just turn off display when my mom comes in !!!!!
mostly nice;-;Seriously if you don't own & love this you need immediate professional help. Consult you're nearest medical centre and get your pulse checked for any sign of life. If you have one, you've probably not played Skyrim.
Marwan;-;This game is so addictive, the story telling, the characters, just beautiful. If you got no life, I recommend you to buy this game. 10/10 would waste my time again in it.
Superchoob;-;Dragon appears in town, All the town guards, follower and I start attacking it, Shout at dragon, Hit guard accidentally with shout, All guards turn on me, Get killed by guards. 10/10
Ol Dirty Camper;-;i took an arrow to the knee
DaveBoss335;-;If your friends dont like/love skyrim you should stop being friends with them you dont need that negativity in your life.
Trinthakis;-;With the change to paid Mods I can no longer support this game. A large part of the popularity of The Elder Scrolls series is the free Mods that anyone can make and use. To force people to pay for Mods devalues the product.
PierceS;-;Skyrim and Valve are teaming up to create EA 2.0
Argonak;-;This game was made with consoles in mind(Admitte by game designer in article). If you are going to play on a PC you must mod it to make it act like an actual PC game. The game is expansive and you can get lost in it. But it honestly does not bring anything new to the genre and especially not this game as it was released. If you cant mod this game by reading the reviews and find the 10 must have mods, dont bother getting it.
Papa Bear;-;this game to Oblivion!
Leeroy;-;I like Skyrim. I don't like paying for community content. This review of a great game will remain negative, as well as my Steam game boycott until these changes are reverted.
Jeez! You Scared Me.;-;Follow the herd
Somano4;-;This game just took an arrow to the knee. Reason, PAID MODS
Night Cat;-;If I were looking to buy this today, I would not buy it on Steam.
OfficerLund;-;I can only say... This is one of the top best games I've ever played. The story is fun and gives a lot of options. Freeroam is massive and full of excitement, quests just add to the fun, and who doesn't like fighting dragons? ING... DRAGONS!!! No matter what you may think of this game, BUY IT.
MacCoy CTAC;-;I used to be a TES fan, but then I took an arrow in the knee.
Naffles;-;Thank you for the giant middle finger now i know how you really feel about your games Paying Mod f*ck that sh*t
Jiggynaut [no sound];-;As much as I used to love Skyrim, I purchased this game for the extensive mods that add infinite replay value. If I could get a refund I would take that course of action, but now the free content that was available to me without going to great lengths is no longer at my disposal. I will likely never play again now that SkyUI has gone pay to play. Too bad too. Same old story for Fallout 4 too.
samwall77;-;Broken game and broken mod community.
Xonikz;-;I spent so many years playing this game - Steam wasn't even logging hours when I first started Skyrim. I love the storylines, the expansions, the user mods, everything. This was probably the most fun I have had in a modern game, and I recommend it to any adventurer like me.
Pepper;-;Easily one of my favorite games ever made. Here's some points. -Very detailed work on the many storylines involved in the game. (Not just the main story) -The dragons have an entire language you can learn. -Great modding community. -Shouting at people can kill. -Killing Chickens makes you public enemy #1
Taavetti;-;I spent most of my time in this game violating basic human rights. Its pretty fun.
danhurr;-;Had been thinking about reinstalling this since I got a new pc and could check out all the visual mods. NOT ANYMORE!
Kherr;-;Installed a tougher dragons mod and got facerolled while  my greaves and getting called Shirley by the guards who for some inexplicable reason all have had some form of kneecap surgery and always cringe when I walk around from a distance with a bow. 11/10 - would get called Shirley by more guards again.
Darth Schumy;-;"The Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion" is the greatest game I've played. I don't think I will ever enjoy a game as much again. The euphoric high was that strong, because it was a masterpiece; it took my breath away! "The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim" deserves to be the next installment of the series and the follow up to such a sublime work of art. It draws on the formula that made Oblivion great, yet uses that formula in it's own unique way, to create a world that you can explore, that is different from the story, the cultures, the customs, and civilizations found in Oblivion's Cyrodiil province. There are a multitude of major and minor quests that guide you in exploring Skyrim. These missions, whether they are mini stories or extended quest lines, intrigue the player into exploring further. Some tales are witty, others tragic, and sometimes they are both. This results in the quest outcomes producing an emotional response, of some form for the player. The quest stories are a great collection of journeys to follow, but the finest moments in this game are probably those that are unscripted. For instance, my party of four was walking on the forest road, passing close to Largashbur (an Orc camp), when a random bear attacked the group. Even my horse got stuck in to the bear. Riften's road patrol guards came to our aid as well. Shortly after that, a civil war enemy faction, who must have been close by, suddenly attacked the guards. Later, a massive fire breathing dragon then swooped down from the skies and he didn't care who he picked on. At some point, I must have gotten too close to Largashbur, which triggered a quest involving a Giant, who then attacks the Orc camp. That in itself is a big battle, but the two scrimmages became one. The chaos was such, I have no idea who was on whose side after that. A second fire breathing Dragon arrived and he was attacking the Giant as well. Other forest creatures, such as Giant Spiders, became opportunists too. This fight went on for an extended period of time, but I remember a moment, seeing my horse, terrified, fleeing through the forest trees, burning, pursued by a flying Dragon. I thought to myself, "you can't script this!" In Oblivion, Drakes were fantastic adversaries, but one thing missing were Dragons. Prior to Skyrim, I had always hoped a sequel to Oblivion would introduce Dragons. Creatures that were much bigger, more powerful, fearsome and majestic looking! Skyrim didn't just deliever, it became the benchmark. They are beyond what I had hoped for. Further to this, the integration of the Greybeards, Dragon Shouts, etc into Skyrim's Dragon lore, both as a storyline and in gameplay, was a great accomplishment in itself as well. The official Hearthfire DLC, was another aspect of Skyrim, that improved on what was a fantatic feature in Oblivion. The standard houses in Skyrim are a little bland, compared to those in Oblivion, but the Hearthfire DLC changed that around. It is a wonderful progression in the Elder Scrolls series. I am however, still wanting more from this aspect of the game. If there is an Elder Scrolls VI, I anticipate they will work on that further. Skyrim is amazing for it's library of mods. I've never seen such a diverse range of mods for a game (which doesn't mean much, for I play very few games). I found some quirks of the standard game irritating, but if I want some aspect of Skyrim changed, there's going to be a mod to resolve it. I conjured Dead Thralls, which would constantly groan and it gets annoying! I searched the Steam Workshop and found a mod to silence the groaning. I found another mod, that allowed me to use ingame character skins, which I could then customize facially to create a unique character I preferred. If you want to play as Barbie, I'm sure there's a mod for that as well. It probably has a "Dreamhouse" (i.e. your house) and Tawny (your horse) integrated too! I did a quick search on google and found this: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xfPs8KQ7S1Y (OK, OK, this is not a Steam Workshop item, but it's funny!) Skyrim is not a perfect game. It's biggest problem, like Oblivion, is bugs. I guess all those NPCs, various factions, etc are going to glitch out sooner or later. You WILL have problems, that will prevent you from completing quests, etc, which would leave you gutted if they remained unsolved. Skyrim Wiki sites have fixes for all the problems you will encounter. I was easily able to find solutions, to solve all of my bugs when they cropped up. Another issue with Skyrim is keyboard control, probably because it's geared towards consoles. It felt like keyboard control was an afterthought. It's not great, but you get used to it. Oblivion was far superior in this area. As mentioned, Skyrim is a deserving follow up to Oblivion. Graphically, Skyrim is superior, but Oblivion still remains the finest moments I've had in gaming. To follow up with an acceptable package, after creating something so grand, is a very tough ask. They've not only accomplished this, in my opinion, but they have excelled. Once again, I'm blown away by a game. Skyrim does have alot of bugs. Normally for me, that would be a game changer (no punn intended). The positives of Skyrim, completely supress any negatives aspects. Normally, my viewpoint is heavily influenced by negative issues first, rather than positive facets. This speaks volumes about what Skyrim got right! P.S. I am not the one dancing shirtless, at the end of that youtube video; I'm bald!
Spanky Pie;-;Negative review in support of the removal of the paid mods system Edit: Just because the paid mods system has been removed for now doesn't mean that they're not planning on bringing it back. Until they reveal a proper mod system, this review will stay negative.
rtgamer;-;This game is Masterpiece from the Bethesda. My favourite open world RPG game especially with the amount of mods available. Mod it till it crashes. xD Great game.
EVIL Shenanigans;-;Well, Bethesda certainly knows how to go about open-world single-player RPG's after years and years of practice, and this would be the culmination of that effort. Very immersive, fun to play, and hard to walk away from. It's better in just about every regard compared to its predecessor (Oblivion), and a bit more involved than other similar creations (Fallout 3). If you like Medieval Fantasy, you can't not play this game...
Valiantttt;-;First off, Skyrim is a still a great game that sadly suffers from a number of issues. If you have played Oblivion, you probably will be disappointed in the long run with Skyrim because of the gameplay being dumbed in several ways. For example, the spell system is fun with the dual wielding but sadly they toke out the custom spell making and that was always fun as a mage in Oblivion. Combat is dumbed down alot but it is still decent because the Elder scroll games never had the best combat. Many of the qeusts and characters feel lacking in depth but I did expect this as Bethesda isn't the greatest in those aspects of games like this. There are still a few good points in Skyrim, despite the several flaws I've already pointed out. Such as the better support for mods that Bethesda has provided in cooperation with Valve, Workshop is great and the community behind the mods are great as well. These add so much gameplay hours that you can get double the hours if you install some mods, they even made me rebuy the game on PC with the DLC's. DLC's are lacking expect Dragonborn(great expansion). Generally it is way more stable then previous games even though it isn't perfect in this matter Despite the flaws of the game, It still provides a great way to waste hours and one of the finest sandbox RPG's out there. However I recommend Oblivion more then this game because of the fact that it is basically this but then way better IMO.
improbable;-;Hours of playability even before the radiant quests. A nightmare for completionists.
[MFG] Baby a Trpl;-;The game is very enjoyable but it has it's problems. The enviroments and the feeling of the world is amazing. This is the strongest part of the game. The rest is sadly very mediocre. The combat is simple and spammy and lacks any serious depth considering it's a rpg. Exploring the world is cool and all but many of the places you'll find are generic tombs that all look the same. The quests are a gamble, some of the questlines are great but some, not so much. The problem is that alot of the quests are mmo like "gather x amount of these items" quests. These kind of quests I feel do not belong in a singleplayer rpg like this. The game also artificially extends the game by having randomly generated repetetive misc - quests. At this point the game got really dull and I stopped playing when there was basiclly only these quests left. Besides all of it's faults though, it is a game worth playing and many do not seem to notice these things since skyrim brought in alot of people who usually do not play rpgs and has not gathered any pre - expectations. The game is overall a pretty dumbed down version from the previous entries in the series which makes me enjoy the game alot less. It is a very easy game and is designed for a more casual crowd then morrowind, oblivion or even the earlier ones. But as I said it is still a fair amount of fun and with an insane amount of mods, you could play this for a long time. I'd like to say though that for all people who love skyrim, you should atleast give TES IV : Oblivion for I feel that some would enjoy that games more deep systems and harder difficulty. Thanks for reading my rather lengthy review, I hope it helped you in your decision for buying the game.
Arnold~;-;Even after almost 3 years, this game is just great! There is alot to do and to explore, and the modding community has alot of other great things. There are some bugs in the game tough, but im sure there are some fixes for those bugs in the steam workshop or somewhere else on the internet so they can be fixed.
Ka Farsken!;-;Skyrim truly continuous The Elder Scrolls tradition in epic RPGs. Say farewell to your girlfriends boobs, you'll be busy elsewhere. :D
RunningArtemis;-;I ... just ... can't ... imagine how steam was, before I've found this amazing game ! Great storyline, full of surprises, great characters, amazing atmosphere and top of all: it's like a completely fascinating world ! Maybe the only negative thing: it's ADDICTIVE ! So be well prepared when starting this new adventure ^_^ I really don't regret wasting my spare time on it... so yea I know where I'll spend most of my summer holidays.
nemo7nemo;-;As I see things, Valve just broke this game in hopes I'd pay them money to fix it. My current mod build has items I'd have to pay for to use again the next time I make a clean install of Skyrim to mould and manipulate. I would need to pay for access to mods I'm currently using. Many of my saves would not work without the content which now costs money to access. My game saves and future enjoyment of a game I payed full price for are being held for ransom.
Master Blaster;-;We don't need paid mods in Skyrim or any games on steam, stop being greedy Valve just add a donation button to the workshop DLC.
Disco Dingle;-;Great game, but don't pay for mods. Perhaps a Donate to the Creator button is in order, but this is .
Steve-o Was Here;-;To be clear, this game is amazing. I've played it since it first came out in 2011 Bethesda did some excellent work here. I give it a thumbs down because of the new paid mods system. This will only drive players away from the game and also drive modders away from modding the game. It's a poor choice on Steam and Bethesda's part, who probably sat down in a room together and said 'a lot of people still play this game how can we make money off them?' I refuse to download any more mods from the Steam Workshop and I suggest everyone else does the same, it's the only way Steam\Bethesda will see how much the community disapproves and hopefully re-think this whole thing. Go to Nexus mods, where mods will always be free and mod developers come first over profits.
tcookc;-;most entertaining and best looking Elder Scrolls game yet + beautiful, fully-realized fantasy world + great writing and NPC interaction + improved combat mechanics - too easy - like in other ES games, the main plot missions are too repetitive score = 4.5/5
Aska;-;you can steal a bee 10/10
DJ EGGWHITES;-;Get some mods, get some weed, play this , be a god.
Valiantttt;-;First off, Skyrim is a still a great game that sadly suffers from a number of issues. If you have played Oblivion, you probably will be disappointed in the long run with Skyrim because of the gameplay being dumbed in several ways. For example, the spell system is fun with the dual wielding but sadly they toke out the custom spell making and that was always fun as a mage in Oblivion. Combat is dumbed down alot but it is still decent because the Elder scroll games never had the best combat. Many of the qeusts and characters feel lacking in depth but I did expect this as Bethesda isn't the greatest in those aspects of games like this. There are still a few good points in Skyrim, despite the several flaws I've already pointed out. Such as the better support for mods that Bethesda has provided in cooperation with Valve, Workshop is great and the community behind the mods are great as well. These add so much gameplay hours that you can get double the hours if you install some mods, they even made me rebuy the game on PC with the DLC's. DLC's are lacking expect Dragonborn(great expansion). Generally it is way more stable then previous games even though it isn't perfect in this matter Despite the flaws of the game, It still provides a great way to waste hours and one of the finest sandbox RPG's out there. However I recommend Oblivion more then this game because of the fact that it is basically this but then way better IMO.
Sckhar Leviathan;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is the 5th (duh) game of the great series The Elder Scrolls, released in 11/11/2011 by Bethesda this game is a sucess even today, 4 years later. The events in TESV takes part about 200 years after the events from The Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion (another great game which is worth playing) and you take role of a legendary hero who is born once after several generations, the Dragonborn . As Dragonborn hold the power to absorb the dragon's soul and permanently kill them, which makes you a very useful weapon in the conflict against them. Dragons are not your only enemies, there are hundreds of different kinds of enemies and lots of different conflits and questlines to be followed at will, you can pick sides or not, you can be nice or bad, you can be a warrior or a stealth assassin. It's all up to you. Pros and Cons: Pros: Huge map;  Huge variety of enemies, quests, equipement (weapons, armors, shields and etc), NPCs and locations;  Super interesting storyline;  Options (you don't have to do what the game wants you to do, you can choose your side, your path, your battles, your friends and enemies);  Virtualy endless game because quests outside the main story are always "respawning";  Several side stories non-related to the main story;  Super active community;  Mods, literally thousands of mods that range from fixing in-game bugs from make TESV a whole new game;  Well made connection with previous TES games;  Highly customizable and has tons of graphics mods to make the game super realistic;  Sometimes bugs are fun;  DLC content is actually good and add some very nice content. Cons: Bugs, lots of them, since launch (although most of them can be fixed with the unofficial patches );  Can get very repetitive after you finish the main story and finish all the side quests;  Relatively demanding for a 2011 game (some newer and prettier games uses less PC resources). This game is great, it's one of my favourites and even today I still love to start brand new saves and play it over. The only big con here is the fact that the game is very buggy, but the community did a great job fixing literally thousands of bugs since the launch, even today the unofficial patches are updated as new bugs are found. The game has two large DLC, Dragonborn and Dawnguard, both are just as great as the game itself and are fully worth. I recommend this game to anyone who loves a good RPG.
JiaxiangX;-;Pluck flowers, check. Kill chickens, check. Shout enemies to death, check. Face surgery, check. Whats there not to like about this game?
phalanfy;-;A bland, boring, souless game that's only great fetaure was an immense modding community that is now divided and partly behind a paywall
Banana Dictator;-;Mods are what make Bethesda games worth playing considering they can't be bothered to do the work themselves. With the advent of paid mods, there's no way Skyrim is worth it. Do yourself a favor and pound a nail through your foot. It's more fun than what Valve and Bethesda did to modding. EDIT: I'm not taking down this review now that the paid mod store has been removed. I want Bethesda to remember this incident when their next game comes along so they don't forget what happened.
Olafchief;-;I never really cared for Skyrim in the first place, and the introduction of paid mods made it even worse. The game seems impressive in scope (as to the amount of things you can do) but the entire experience is very shallow. In other words, the amount of things to do is proportional to the depth and complexity of each activity. Mods help to offset this flaw, but the introduction of paid mods has ruined the modding scene. For the moment, going to Nexus Mods will help you find the best mods out there, but this could change quickly. Better off spending your money elsewhere.
Wendigo;-;Don't encourage paid mods please. The game is mediocre at best without any, mods were complimentary. But I hate paying for a game twice, much less trice, much less each time i mod it.
WyldeRhide;-;Pay MODs is a terrible idea. The game is okay, but the precident is awful. It incentivises "Developers/Publishers" to release games with fewer features and incomplete interfaces with the expectation that the MODing community will fix the bugs and add the missing features. Not only does Bethesda not have to pay in-house developers to put features in the games, THEY GET PAID WHEN THE MOD COMMUNITY DOES IT FOR THEM!
Johnsss...;-;Paying for mods is silly because modding is the only thing that makes Skyrim and all other games made by Bethesda even worth their asking price in the first place.
[FiM] Shenghar;-;This game, and the Elder Scrolls games that came before it, have always been the pinnacle of variety in modding. If you want realism, you can get that in spades. If you want ridiculous stuff until you're swimming in cheese and lettuce there's probably a mod for that too. However the latest development of paid mods has caused a rift between developers, modders, customers, and modders which is damaging the entire community. It's a rare day to meet a PC TES player who doesn't run any mods, and this is just going to end up being another cheap cash flow for valve for the low low price of their integrity. Don't buy mods, it's not a good development the way it's been impemented. If it was a "pay what you want if you want to" or donation system that would have been wonderful. The game itself is good and with mods it's incredible but with paid mods it feels like the modern policy of nickel and diming everything to hell and back taken to a far worse degree than has ever been done before. If you're going to buy Skyrim for its modding capabilities, I'd think long and hard about what you'd be supporting and the chances of buying a non-functional mod or something that breaks things or corrupts your save. Don't support 3rd party DLC.
Sofia Evenstar;-;I don't think any game can ever replace the feeling I get while playing this. Amazing is not simply the word that describes Skyrim.
CrazyCaucasian;-;With paid mods comes great unhappiness
Chiira.;-;Paid mods, do not support this.
Citizen Snips;-;This game is truly a masterpiece... however it is ruined by paid mods. Shame on Valve. Shame on Bethesda.
xmastermimex;-;When this game came out for console, I snatched it right up and played at least 200 hours. now that I have a good enough PC to play the game, I bought it through steam. I was so happy to finally be able to play the game AND mod it after I got bored of it. Well, looks like thats not happening anymore. Literally killed my experience of the game in PC.
Run Away From Danger Man!;-;Overnight you've managed to destroy the entire community for modding. Mods was why I bought the game. The instant you tried charging for them was the second any interest I had died. Skyrim is only still popular because of mods and now you're taking that away. You're a special kind of idiot, aint ya?
FALLLLOUTTTTT 4 BABYYYY;-;Pay for mods my
nabeelnassra;-;i got the cd and now its saying i have to purchase it again i played it for 1 hour what a waste of my time and money
George;-;I would give this game 7/10 as is on Steam... With modding 11/10. It was awesome. I do not have an issue with modders being paid for their work. Many sites like the Nexus have a donate button where you can donate what you feel the mod is worth. My issue is how Steam implemented modding. Modders do 100% of the work for their mods (I know some build on others' mods). They have no help from Steam or Bethesda other than Steam giving them a place to share the mods with the world. Now if a modder was selling content I can understand a share of it going to these companies BUT THEY TAKE 75% of the income! This i have issue with. Modders deserve way more than the 25% cut hence my negative review. DO NOT BUY THIS GAME, THE WAY MODDING IS BEING MONITISED MEANS THAT ANY MORE THAN 10-15 HOURS OF GAMEPLAY NOW WILL COST YOU A LOT MORE THAN YOU BARGINED FOR, FOR ANY GOOD MOD FROM NOW ON :/.
TurboSax;-;An excellent game that's given me endless enjoyment, marred by the fact that it's been forced into being a guinea pig for an incredibly-crappy paid mod system over the last few days. A system where Valve/Bethesda gets a 75% cut of $400 minimum made monthly off a mod, and if the mod maker fails to reach $400 minimum in sales each month, they get ALL THE PROFIT. A system that's nothing but abusive, and made only to profit Valve and a game's makers, tossing pocket change to the people who did all of the work. A system which would be better replaced by an optional "donate directly to [mod maker]" system, which will never happen since the current paid mod system grossly profits Valve and the maker of any game involved. If you really have to get this good game, wait until all this paid mod crap has ended, hopefully with the system being removed entirely and things going back to before this weekend's fateful change. Don't support this horrifically-greedy business practice, whatever you do.
steven_hawking;-;Get rid of paid mods and I'll recommend it.
18Lama;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve.
Pino;-;Protesting Valves Workshop Monetization.
blob;-;Paying for mods? No thanks. To shame.
Kenny G;-;was a fun game until you had to pay for mods which patch the game so it's playable. which is the devs job or that's what i thought, anyways. pro: - very fun cons: -paid mods -modders only get 25% of the profit even though they did 100% of the work -the paid mods out now are crap and looks like they were thrown together rather hastely
SupBro;-;The free mods community made this series. Marrowind was the reason I got into pc gaming. By trying to cash in on popular mods that fixed their game, they've severely damaged the community and the only reason they're popular on PC. Because of that, I can't in good faith endorse this game anymore, or any other future TES/FO games that attempt to lock mods behind a paywall. Free, easily accessible mods are what make pc gaming.... Pc gaming.
malcador666;-;I rebought this game on the PC and all of its DLC specifically for the mod community that was built up around it. Beth got a second sale out of me specifically for this game. I have convinced people to buy it or rebuy it on PC specifically for that same reason. I can no longer in good consience recommend it, until this "paywall" fiasco is done with.
warchief800;-;You know what you did Bethesda.
Bangholio;-;Paid mods? I do not recommend this game.
K3rby;-;Mile wide, inch deep. Way to streamlined and simple in comparision to the older Elder Scrolls games such as Morrowind.
XxStoelxxxX_xxXxXxxxXxxxXXxXXxxx;-;NEIN! Putting mods behind a PAYWALL. damn fix this  vavle.
MoreGigaRam;-;The fact that valve even begins to think hiding mods behind a paywall is a good idea is ridiculous. Monetizing the modding community will turn it into a market saturated with horendous products exactly like that of Apple's app store. The only difference between this and apple is the fact that apple gives the developers 75% of the income. I never thought there'd be a day where I would respect apple moreso than I respect valve/bethesda
PerilPastry (formerly n-t-p);-;I used to dig this game due to its cool mods. Guess that's over now.
thinhnt91;-;i love this game but no paid mod, dislike recommend this game without paid mod
Shadow;-;They've got paid mods. PAID mods.
MrBananaGrabber;-;The cold and calculating exploitation of modders has utterly soiled both the company that made this game and Valve. Utterly, utterly, shameful.
Levishm Rae;-;Bugfesta has always relied on the free mods to make thier games good enough for the long run. Hell, most of them are just fixes. So, no, With the current malarky, I canne support this.
CYNOGEN;-;fake free play.. and 2 days. buy... @_@
jgmachine;-;Boo on Valve and Bethesda for the poorly implemented paid mods!
Dastardly Hank;-;Valve and Bethesda can kindly f*** off with this paid mod . Down voted for money whoring.
Ircghost;-;Before writing this review I must admit I'm a bit biased, I'm a huge TES fan. Although a general tendency can be noted in which the TES games became a lot easier and more generalized, Skyrim still is Awesome! Even without mods Skyrim is very entertainable and I love the different enviroments you encounter, especially on the more eastern part of the map with all the huge height differences! Just love that place. The game just rocks it by the thousands of awesome mods available, definitly one of the best games around for me :).
jway;-;extremely deep game with an amazing modding community, only draw backs are a simplistic leveling system and a combat system that could use a good amount of tweaking.
Shotime;-;The newest release of the Elder Scrolls' series, Skyrim brings excellent graphics and polished gameplay to the forefront of this wonderful new RPG release. Like all of Bethesda's giant, open-world RPGs there are plenty of bugs to wade through (and have fun with!) and you'll definitely sink way too many hours into this game. It's fun on a whole new level - Bethesda is the best at this type of game and they've done an unparalleled job once again. Pros: Good Gameplay Beautiful Graphics Enormous World to Explore Mod Support Immersive Cons: Still Not as Good as Morrowind Was If you like Bethesda RPGs, have enjoyed any of the previous Elder Scrolls' games, or just love fantasy, pick up Skyrim - you'll love it. The immersion is top-notch and you'll wander the endless mountains of the beautiful countryside for hours on end, truly believing you are the Dovakiin. I still preferred Morrowind more; however, the graphics and beauty of this game cannot be beat by any of its competitors. A+
tcookc;-;most entertaining and best looking Elder Scrolls game yet + beautiful, fully-realized fantasy world + great writing and NPC interaction + improved combat mechanics - too easy - like in other ES games, the main plot missions are too repetitive score = 4.5/5
Aska;-;you can steal a bee 10/10
DJ EGGWHITES;-;Get some mods, get some weed, play this , be a god.
JiaxiangX;-;Pluck flowers, check. Kill chickens, check. Shout enemies to death, check. Face surgery, check. Whats there not to like about this game?
phalanfy;-;A bland, boring, souless game that's only great fetaure was an immense modding community that is now divided and partly behind a paywall
Banana Dictator;-;Mods are what make Bethesda games worth playing considering they can't be bothered to do the work themselves. With the advent of paid mods, there's no way Skyrim is worth it. Do yourself a favor and pound a nail through your foot. It's more fun than what Valve and Bethesda did to modding. EDIT: I'm not taking down this review now that the paid mod store has been removed. I want Bethesda to remember this incident when their next game comes along so they don't forget what happened.
kriss394;-;Open world rpg with toons of mods that makes game even grater that it is. 10/10
Dashel84;-;Mods are the only reason this was ever a good game. Now that mods must be paid for, this game has become a trap. Mod quality is not regulated, nor is functionality guaranteed. It will be impossible to know what is worth the price and what isn't, what will work together and what won't, and most of the mod content is stolen from other games and artists. How valve ever thought this was a good idea... Avoid this trap.
Deathkillert;-;I used to love this game. It is the most played game I have ever owned. However, paid mods.  YOU  YOU  YOU  YOU  YOU  YOU EA STEAM!!!!! I am not against modders being paid BY WHY DO WE PAY  YOU  YOU  YOU EA I MEAN STEAM! Also, WHY STEAL 75% OF THE MONEY FROM THE MODDERS!!! ......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... _____.......__............._____ .............//'...'/`............|...__.....\....|...|............/... ___| ........../'/.../..../......./\..........|...|....\....|....|...|...........|..../ ........('(.......... ~/'...').........|...|.....|...|....|...|...........|...| .........\.................'...../...........|...|__/...|....|...|____....|...\____ ..........''...\.......... _...............|_____./.....\______\....\_____| ............\..............( ..............\.............\
Leondres Razorwind;-;Down with paid mods. what the hell is wrong with you Valve? Seriously, is greed all that drives you now? Put up a damn donation button for modders, you don't deserve to make money off their work and neither does Bethesda. Much respect has been lost this day.
Tourist;-;Paid mods. Really...
misterblort;-;of bethesda
Wehrwolf Dharma;-;This game has paid mods. Do not buy it.
Ftroop21;-;WTF?? Do not show your support for this greed ,unbelievable !!!
In Todd We Trust;-;Paid mods are now a thing it seems. Nuff' said.
Snore;-;Paid mods will ruin this game.
SpamBrie;-;Why not destroy this community?
Miya;-;I cannot recommend this game due to what valve has done to the modding scene for this game with the paid mods system. Do not buy this.
FreedomPuppy;-;Atleast now the 13 year olds have to steal their moms creditcards to pay for their porn.
WallyTheUrotsuki;-;Remember when Bethesda and Steam ruined the modding community?
Cummings;-;Now with Valve's misconstrued idea about mods being capitalized upon by big wig company giving the creator a meager percentage (i.e 20%) for their creation. The reason for mods is to create FREE content for the community to enjoy and have greater experience in the game, not to have 3rd party DLC where the company makes the money for no effort while the creator gets a few copper nickles. This is an EA move if I have ever seen one, and it must be reprimanded at once if we are to enjoy our games like the modders ORIGINALLY intended, not to see a bunch of couch potatoes make  change for a  mods.
Left4monkeys;-;I think you already know why this isn't getting recommended.
Herofreak159;-;It's a wonderful game 10/10, but I'm NOT paying for Mods that are supposed to be free:(
nprockz12;-;Valve ruined it.
Hans Landa;-;After steam took the market of mods and now im forced to pay for fixes or ways to improve this game, no i wouldn't recommend this, pirate it with all the DLC and then download some free mods on the Nexus so you can hide the horrendous job Bethesda did with this game compared to Oblivion, you are going to notice that every dungeon is just a cave filled with Draugrs or Spider, only with a Dragon Priest at the end and nothing more.
Sumuqan;-;Modding made this a great game, cannot recommend it under this terrible paid mod approach
GreatGatsby37;-;Look I'm all for giving creators their due when they work hard to make these mods... but steam taking 75% from a game they never even touched it complete bs. I would honestly suggest people to find other sources for mods until steam atleast gives modders a fair cut.
KingKaiser;-;Pay for Mods, o hell no. This game is great with free mods Arise Dark Lord Gaben
Pessimal;-;Not a good game without extensive modding.
WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you keep on doing it. 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
Josef Stalin;-;It was brilliant, but paid mods are a couple of miles past the line. This game is made by mods and is a mediocre rpg at best without them.
Boba Fett;-;valve and bethesda, they are so fu***ing greedy, don't support them.
Kassenschlager;-;Paid mods go against the whole Lego-like experience you could have adding and removing mods. Your chance to experiment is gone, so is the longevity of any game which monetizes mods.
Project4E67;-;Free mods = Good Game Paid mods = Bad Game It's simple math
Dirtyfatninja;-;I'm not paying for mods, this game is dead to me now! I have played Elder Scrolls games since Morrowind, and the content that was in that game was far greater than any game since!! In my opinion Bethesda always failed deliver a game with the same experience that Morrowind delivered, dumbing down the experience and depth every time, thus making mods an integral part of the new games! For if the company that makes the game failed to deliver a complete experience, like minded folks would then create content for there own games and want to share it with the community. I hope this bad move by Valve is the downfall of steam and a new platform that only allows free mods rises up. Greedy Greedy Greedy what is it like 75% for Valve 25% to the makers hahahahahahaha C you next Tuesday's!!!
Bubblarz;-;1. Buy game. 2. Install game. 3. Have fun with unmodded Skyrim. 4. Pay more. 5. Enjoy game thats modded. 9/10
Matsas11;-;Its a very good game, but the new paid mod mechanic has divided the userbase. The rating will go to recommended once this mistake by Valve has been fixed.
[CAC] WallJunior;-;This was a great game. But then the $$ came.
dogei;-;Modding communities are what keep older great games alive, I understand the need to support the mod makers for all their work, but paid mods on the workshop page? Really? And the real kicker is that Valve is removing the donation links on free mods. This entire service is going to hell.
OMEGAlomaniac;-;Directly contributing to paywalled mods and the death of a scene I have enjoyed for years is not something I support, no matter how much I like the game. I cannot recommend anyone buys this now.
SharpDressedSeb;-;Skyrim is an okay game on its own, and made great with the addition of mods. But now with paid mods, Skyrim will return to just being an okay game as I will not be playing for third-party DLC.
Life of Silence;-;This game was amazing, until Valve and Bethesda decided they wanted to become like EA, and take even more money from consumers. The difference is EA actually makes their DLC, while Bethesda doesn't anymore, they piggyback off of others.
Princess Piggy-Pot;-;I feel justified to post a rant here regarding Valve and Bethe$da's shady practices regarding paid mods. As you may know, Valve and Bethesda Game Studios have announced paid mods for Skyrim - and it is an utter disaster. No, they aren't bugged and they aren't ridiculously overpriced - it's the fact that the MODDERS who actually CREATED the mod get next to nothing from these paid mods - they only get 25% of the cut while the other 75% goes to the other two greedy corporations Valve and Bethesda, who have done absolutely nothing regarding the creation a modder's intellectual property. What. The. . Yes, you read that right. The modders themselves only take home 25% of the money made from the sale of their OWN MODS. The rest is split between Valv and Bethe$da. This is far below even the  APPLE STORE, which gives app creators at least 70% of the cash. 25% is abysmally low - especially considering that the modders are the ones putting in the time and effort to create these things for us to enjoy! Mods have kept Skyrim alive for years, otherwise many would have stopped playing. Bethe$da is choosing to look at the paid modding situation like Why are these players not giving us money? rather than Wow, this is amazing advertising and community-building for our game! Modders love the games they mod, and that is why they spend so much time on their creations. Changing it around and turning modders - your own loyal fans - into cows ripe for the milking is not one bit fair. This new system will create a flood of new, unskilled modders who arent the type of players doing it for the love of the game and its community, but rather people trying to simply reskin an iron sword and sell it for 5 bucks - or why not have the consumers pay 20 bucks so the modder can actually get the 5 bucks in the first place?. The game will be overloaded with this kind of crap, and it puts a black mark on the entire modding community. You may as well say goodbye to great mods like appearing in the store, and instead expect to see it flooded with crappy reskins and broken everything from people looking to make a quick buck from little effort. Already, one of these paid mods has been taken down after the author of one mod claimed another user was selling their mod using animations that the author had originally created in his own mod. The seller of the new mod then claimed that Valve actually forbade him from contacting the original animator about using his work because of some sort of NDA about the store. The crowd of people mentioned above could easily slide in and just start stealing other peoples work left and right and selling it on the store to make some juicy cash - even if they aren't making an awful lot. Even if Valve has some sort of report system for stolen mods in place, its going to be a pain in the butt to sift through true and  claims based on who stole whose work and who has the rights to the original mod and so on. Its a big time bomb waiting to blow - just wait and see. Here's another thing that could happen with this shady new practice. Lets say that Bethesda wants to make another Skyrim DLC about what happened to the Dwarves or something like that. They want to make a new piece of equipment for the DLC, but the piece of gear in particular is proving difficult to animate and operate effectively on the PC version of Skyrim. They have two options. Under this new system do they A) Work really hard on it and release the new piece of gear or B) say The modders have lots of creative ideas, lets just promote their paid mod in the workshop. Under the old system, Bethesda would have been motivated to make the piece of gear themselves, but under the paid mod system, someone is doing all the hard work for them, and theyre taking 75% of the revenue for each piece of gear sold. Now let's say 1000 pieces of gear have been sold for 10 bucks each - Bethesda is getting $7500 from it when they did absolutely nothing, and the modder who went through all that hard work to create the new piece of gear is only getting $2500 - that's still alot of money, but do you know how much more he could be making from the mod that he created all by himself with absolutely no assistance from Bethesda or Valve? Im not saying this is going to happen for sure, but when a company can charge consumers for something that an independent modder created, but you can certainly bet that there are opportunities sitting there. Please do not buy Skyrim. These kinds of shady practices must absolutely not be tolerated - we have enough money-grubbing in the gaming industry as it is from companies such as Ubisoft and EA, we don't need more money-grubbing from Valve and Bethe$da.
Minjon;-;I will never support mods being behind a paywall, please introduce donations and let modders get a bigger cut!
Connory3;-;I bought this game so I could install mods and play around with it (I already had it for Xbox). Now Valve and Bethesda want me to pay for the game a third time to do what I was told I'd be able to do just by purchasing it the second time. Until they remove paid mods or change they system so that valve and bethesda get no cut of the profits, do not buy this game.
Aspen;-;I really do like this game and would recommend it, but I cannot give a positive review. The paid workshop is such a bad move that the game has to receive a negative one. Buy the game if you are interested but do NOT buy any mods, it's a scam.
Distrainer;-;The game was fantastic with mods. I decided to unistall it when I saw Valve started charging for mods. I support them doing that, but they went at it the wrong way. So for now 0/10
Coliwer;-;Was a cool game until Valve ruined it. Now i regret buying this.
AverageJoe44;-;Skyrim is amazing. Paid mods? Not so much.
Mad Max;-;Paid Mods for Skyrim. Do not buy.
FatalPulse;-;Paid mods are the reason why I do not recommend Skyrim currently. They do so much to prolong the game's life. A donation button would have fared better than this system currently in place.
BattlePanda;-;Don't allow companies to nickle and dime you for this paid mods nonsense Game is well worth playing however.
rossejames86;-;Paid reviews are bad. MKAY
RIcKiTy;-;Paid mods. What more can be said?
Wisigothi;-;i REALLY love the game of Skyrim but the reason i do isnt because of the game you start with its because of the game you can make with the mods if you want to be a vampire hunter and go around killing all the bloodsuckers but dont like the fact that you pick up "Vampire Dust" from a body that is not dust you can mod it and therein lies the problem because have it the makers of the game patches it so that you can no longer use the mod OR makes the mod useless by adding the effect themselves in a update then you paid for something that is useless. ALSO IF ANYONE CARES: i feel like a very despicable human for giving this game a Thumbs Down because after 800+ hours playing it its obvious i dont dislike or hate this game and its only real bugs come from the fact that most of instaltions of this are held together by ducttape and mod patches for patches that where for an update to a patch for a mod that let you have a gaint lydia fight a fully nude "test jeremy big"
CelestialDiablo;-;I used to love this game but now they have paid workshop i mean come on why do I need to buy even more from they just to have. I guess all I have to say is I'M NEVER BUYING FROM BETHESDA EVER AGAIN
Tek;-;[This comment was modified by a moderator, pay 1.99$ to view it.]
Captain Hijinx;-;Great core game marred by a paywall modding system.
t3h PeNgU1N oF d00m;-;Fun for the first 10 hours or so, gets repetitive and boring afterwards. Also world is very blank and game is clunky. It used to get better with mods, but you know; I won't bother with all this idiocy. Just uninstalled it and don't think will play this on any of my steam accounts.
sam12neu;-;paid mods will kill this game
the_silver_fox;-;i played this game for over 200 hours on my PS3. After finally building a gaming PC that could run this well i started to feel burned out with the game. Mods changed this. They allowed me to change my game to something new and refreshing. The Steam Workshop and the Nexus made this process simple and even fun. Saying all of this I can't stand for companies making mods a pay to use thing. It is a shame that a game with such a great community is being split over this. Bethesda and Valve need to rethink what they have done with this.
D. Fistler;-;You have to pay for mods now.
Qwertydamus;-;Vote with your wallet, don't support paid mods, support donation buttons.
gbmaztah;-;Bethesda and Valve are putting mods behind a paywall which require no quality control or assurance of support following upcoming patches. Mods are responsible for many bugfixes and provide life to an otherwise bland, and generic game both visually and gameplay-wise. I would not have purchased this game if I had known this would become an issue in the future.
heartc;-;This happens when you hand over control of the files on your computer to an online entitiy. I told ya. Also: Capitalism is about control of the masses, just like communism. Communism controls you through brute force while capitalism lures you in with seemingly cheap offers and then stripps you naked once they own you.
Mr Octopus;-;10 Euros for skyrim? That's a bargain! ... until you realise mods cost money and that brings the total price up to 100 Euros...
bartSQUARED;-;Nickel and diming take away from an otherwise enjoyable experience. I will be a bit more wary with this developer going forward, since they do not seem to have their customer's long-term interest in mind.
deltatriad;-;The game is worth playing through once vanilla. but the mods are what continue to keep this game alive. With the introduction of paid mods, this game's days are numbered.
Greenkn19ht;-;This is not a review of the game. Anyone who has even remotely heard of or played skyrim knows that the gameplay is of course amazing... No, this is about paid mods. I can not believe Valve thought this would be a good idea. To one of the best gaming platforms, you have made a BIG. ING. MISTAKE.
spnz;-;Due to Valve's new paid modding policy this game is soon dying. It was fun while it lasted.
SKG Kyle;-;Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim My thoughts on the game is a bit mixed, The game itself gets boring after the first play through and after that I personally do not see any replay value, If you played Skyrim with mods you know it refreshes your experience it is like a whole new game where you most likely are having fun more then the Vanilla version. Bethesda and Valve has introduced a new system for Mods now.. A payment system, Bethesda released a game with little replay value and the only reason it is still alive to this day is because of mods! Now they want to make a profit off modders after they kept their game alive??!! Without mods this game isn't even worth considering buying, The mods that do actually make a big difference in game play is usually half the price of the game. Until they fix this I recommend to stay as far away from this game as possible and the greedy Bethesda with their shady money grabbing techniques.
rrudd;-;Essentially ruining years of work by the modding community in one swift blow. Good job guys.
Mad;-;Let's be honest, vanilla Skyrim is a 7/10 game. Good but, forgettable. Mods is what really made Skyrim shine as a 10/10 game. Mods can significantly change the gameplay of a playthrough for the better. With the possibility that mods turning into the new payable DLC is going to change the gaming industry for the worst. Bethesda introduced DLC in Oblivion with horse armor and that gained momentum for better or worse. Now I take a stand and don't want Bethesda to introduce P2P mods as the new norm for the gaming industry. What'll be next? Having to pay irl money for each quest or each new piece of armor in the next Elder Scroll game? In the next Fallout Game? In any new game post 2015?
[SWE]Handsome CL4P-TP;-;This game 10/10 with mods, but 0/10 with paid mods. I'm done !
Dal;-;Skyrim is a great game, however Skyrim is a great game because of its modding community... I remember when this game first came out it turned out to be a bit of a dissapointment due to how bland everything felt in the world, the game by itself it over-simplified and probably one of the most boring of the entire series. not to long after release this game was saved not by bethesda but by its modding community, because of mods i have put hundreds of hours into this game. with the new mod paywall I cannot in my right mind recommend that you buy this game. As a matter of fact, after being a loyal steam costumer for 8 years now, I will suspending buying any games directly from Steam until the mod paywall is removed.
Kam;-;I can't fault the base game but Valve's choice to keep mods behind a paywall and then leaving the creators of the mod with only 25% of the cut from the sales is disgraceful. I have no idea why they think they are entitled to 30% of the money when they have absolutely nothing to do with either Skyrim or the content from the modding community. As many others have said, a simple donate button would have helped show support for modders which you would think Valve would have been happy to do, considering they owe their own success due to mods of their games.
hazzacanary;-;Great game, but come on bethesda?! 45% percent share of profit for something you didn't create....
bob;-;Devs released an unfinished game. Now they and Valve want to be paid for their "hard work" of watching other people finish creating the game for them.
Reece;-;Will only recommend this game when paid mods arnt here
Dandark;-;This was a pretty good game since it had such an excellent modding community. Unfortunatly Valve and Bethesda got greedy and decided to charge money for mods. Paid mods are bad.
reshiramdude16;-;I've played a lot on here and 8x as much on Xbox, but I can't support this. Skyrim died when Valve wanted to make a quick buck by charging for mods. Edit: We won, but at what cost? Chesko's gone, the community is in ruin, and they may try this again.
Sckhar Leviathan;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is the 5th (duh) game of the great series The Elder Scrolls, released in 11/11/2011 by Bethesda this game is a sucess even today, 4 years later. The events in TESV takes part about 200 years after the events from The Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion (another great game which is worth playing) and you take role of a legendary hero who is born once after several generations, the Dragonborn . As Dragonborn hold the power to absorb the dragon's soul and permanently kill them, which makes you a very useful weapon in the conflict against them. Dragons are not your only enemies, there are hundreds of different kinds of enemies and lots of different conflits and questlines to be followed at will, you can pick sides or not, you can be nice or bad, you can be a warrior or a stealth assassin. It's all up to you. Pros and Cons: Pros: Huge map;  Huge variety of enemies, quests, equipement (weapons, armors, shields and etc), NPCs and locations;  Super interesting storyline;  Options (you don't have to do what the game wants you to do, you can choose your side, your path, your battles, your friends and enemies);  Virtualy endless game because quests outside the main story are always "respawning";  Several side stories non-related to the main story;  Super active community;  Mods, literally thousands of mods that range from fixing in-game bugs from make TESV a whole new game;  Well made connection with previous TES games;  Highly customizable and has tons of graphics mods to make the game super realistic;  Sometimes bugs are fun;  DLC content is actually good and add some very nice content. Cons: Bugs, lots of them, since launch (although most of them can be fixed with the unofficial patches );  Can get very repetitive after you finish the main story and finish all the side quests;  Relatively demanding for a 2011 game (some newer and prettier games uses less PC resources). This game is great, it's one of my favourites and even today I still love to start brand new saves and play it over. The only big con here is the fact that the game is very buggy, but the community did a great job fixing literally thousands of bugs since the launch, even today the unofficial patches are updated as new bugs are found. The game has two large DLC, Dragonborn and Dawnguard, both are just as great as the game itself and are fully worth. I recommend this game to anyone who loves a good RPG.
Senppuu;-;One of the most beautiful open world RPG I have ever played, the music, the enviroment, the characters, everything is awesome! The only bad thing is that the game is too good and addictive.
KANO;-;() My laptop is not so good that I need to run this game in low graphic. However, the low graphic is no matter in front of the great glamour of this game(both the story and the landscape of Skyrim). Fortunately, this version includes the Chinese(language), which can help Chinese players enjoy their adventures in Skyrim~ The story is substantial so that it ensure a long time playing.(not like some games, have big maps but lack of playability). There are also lots of interesting optional missions :D All in all, TES V: Skyrim is the best game of this series. It's really worth that price.
Arnold~;-;Even after almost 3 years, this game is just great! There is alot to do and to explore, and the modding community has alot of other great things. There are some bugs in the game tough, but im sure there are some fixes for those bugs in the steam workshop or somewhere else on the internet so they can be fixed.
Lou Zephyr;-;Buy this game and let it consume your life, forget friends, food, toilet ect., play this game and/or DIE!
'JJ';-;I used to be an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow in the knee. 100/100
Caramel Frappe;-;You may already know this, but back then ... I gave Skyrim a negative review simply because of the crashes / glitches / issues that came up while playing Skyrim. Although that is still an issue, I felt personally- my review was unfair to such a masterpiece of a game (that, and now i've managed to make Skyrim far more stable) so here I am ... making a new one entirely for Skyrim. To call this game a prime example of how to do Open World RPGs is an understatement. Everything going for it is just brilliant and thought out from lore, to the graphics, to the combat being improved dramatically over Oblivion's .. I simply feel this game is a Legendary edition to the gaming industry as a whole. I mean, it came out Septermber 11th, 2011 ... and still holds strong to this day. The amount of mods produced for this game is beyond measure and for good reason. You will never finish Skyrim or grow bored of it. Just the vanilla concepts can keep you going for 400+ hours and over without a problem. Even if you've finished the main quest, guild quests, Daedric quests, and so forth .. there is always something new to do or something to occupy yourself with. Now include mods of whatever you can imagine and now Skyrim has improved two hundred precent. Like seriously, mods can make a difference in how you have fun with Skyrim ... I certainly have experienced it first hand. What I love about Skyrim overall is the fact you aren't limited in what you want to be / do with yourself. Any race, any build, any path you want- go right ahead. Want to be a Khajiit Monk whom punches bandits into submission? You can! Want to be an Orc alchemist who can run at insane speeds thanks to her potions? You can! Want to be a Nord who sides with Ulfric, takes down the Empire's welcome in Skyrim, enslave people through necromancy (aka thralls) and be entirely evil with no good will to spare? You can! No one's stopping you and Skyrim is all about freedom of choice. The perk trees are balanced, the game has so much for you to do outside of combat that it can be a Sims simulator if you think about it. NPCs have so much to say, there's marriage + adoption (though without mods to improve those, they're kinda meh) while again you will never grow bored of Skyrim. This game is so important to the community that when Valve tried having authors sell their mods, we caused a movement called "Forever Free". That's quite an impact Skyrim made on us especially since it's been out for a few years. I cannot recommend this game enough. Heck it's DLCs are so full of content that it just adds hundreds of more hours onto your plate, even after the main quest for said DLC is taken cared of. You'll never discover everything, and there's so much to do in a game like Skyrim. Apart from the crashes / glitches and issues, it's a 9 out of 10 game for me.
Zerputter;-;Edit: They removed the paying for mods but it was still a dirty try. My opinion stays the same. Original review: Game is very good but I dont think that taking the "pay for mods" approach is a good thing. Steam planned this together with mod creators and some creators use this system. Why only blame Steam and not the modders too? I would rather donate to a sincere guy who says: "I dont support the new system but would be happy about every donation", than to a modder that wants money upfront. And what happens if the mod isnt compatible with my current mod library. Well then I just paid for nothing. Nice job Steam and greedy modders.
Hiperd00;-;Best Mod Installing Simulator 2015 9/11
Kysy Clark;-;Greatest game i ever played , had all the features i wanted in a game , seems like it was made for me , huge map , many caves/castles need to be explored , many people need to be saved , homes to be stolen ... , horses to buy , houses to purchase and upgrade , women to marry , weapons to buy/sell/upgrade , skills to be earned , sweet rolls to be eaten , and knees to get shot , 3 simple words , get-the-game.
Kysy Clark;-;Greatest game i ever played , had all the features i wanted in a game , seems like it was made for me , huge map , many caves/castles need to be explored , many people need to be saved , homes to be stolen ... , horses to buy , houses to purchase and upgrade , women to marry , weapons to buy/sell/upgrade , skills to be earned , sweet rolls to be eaten , and knees to get shot , 3 simple words , get-the-game.
It's a Me, Mario.;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is the fifth edition of the popular series of role-playing game. This time the story revolves around the return to the land of the ancient race of dragons and assign us to play the role of one of the last dragon hunters. The game starts with the creation of our virtual hero. You can choose from ten diverse races, whereas there is no division into classes. With advances in play, our character becomes more powerful. When you go to the next level, you can independently increase one of the three basic characteristics: magic, strength and health. Skill system has been divided into clear groups, for example: one-handed weapons or two-handed. Each of these categories contains specific abilities and attacks. There is a new combat system that is more dynamic and also requires tactical thinking. Each hand hero can now assign a weapon, shield or spell. Skyrim offers the opportunity to explore a huge virtual world, which contains, five major cities and hundreds of the underworld. In order to facilitate getting around such a large area the authors have introduced the option of traveling between locations. We can also modify our game through various add-ons created by the community. To summarize the game has quite an interesting story, it is well optimized, has a very good soundtrack and a huge world to explore. During the game, I spent many wonderful hours exploring the provinces of Skyrim. My final rating is 9/10.
Jedi Master McGrath;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is one of those games that ultimately grants you the freedom to do the things that you can only do in your imaginative mind. For example, you can kill people in bars, villages, castles, stands, anytime you want, however you want. Killing by doing a finishing touch is my favorite part of the game. You can have a pet, wife, build a house and do a lot of varied things. Though what makes this game better is the mods, you can do tons of things with it and do a lot of hilarious crap, stunts, sex, movie scenes and other crazy stuff. This game just never ends and there's always things to do even if you don't want to do quests. Dragons, monsters, spirits, horses, women, potatoes, and stealing things craftily are all huge features in the game. Now, finally, don't be like me who waited to buy this game on sale and not pay the full price of it. Because it is definitely worth your money!
Nikki Kuntkrusti;-;You yell at people and sometimes a dragon comes to make you stop yelling at people so much.
Happy;-;I stole the cup and all villagers tried to catch me. Love this game. 25/10
Asmodai_00;-;Honestly, what can't be said about Skyrim that hasn't been said already? The game is everything you want out of the series minus all the garbage clogging up the previous games. Its beautiful looking, even moreso in motion, has fantastic modding support, and can sustain you for a very very very long time. To top it all off, the game goes on sale for super cheap, making this one of the easiest recommendations I can make. Buy this game and mod it to hell and back.
JLFK56 [NITRO];-;Amazing game that I know I will loose hours of my life to like all Bethesda Games. Buy it if you plan on loosing all social life for weeks 10/10
Puff Cloud;-;Paying for mods? nice one valve, you just put a huge dent in the skyrim community. Optional donations are ok but to start charging for them is completely against what makes skyrim such a great game. Fix this.
Zaina;-;Boo for paid mods, comon great base game but buggy beyond all belief. This game wouldnt have lasted half as long without mods
Guy Fieri's Moist Nipples;-;Too much snow 7.8/10
BioRadical;-;Want to install a donate button so I can pay modders if I appreciate their efforts? Cool Ask for money for essentially 3rd party DLC that only 25% goes to the modder, and the rest goes to steam and the publisher for nearly no effort? Give publishers more of an excuse to make half-finished games and expect the workshop to pick up slack? Have a mod that becomes outdated with a future patch with no promise of quality control for a product that we are paying for? Nope. Not gonna buy into this.
bloodreaver;-;I've been a part of the Elder Scrolls modding community for 10 years, I used to run a popular Morrowind/Oblivion modding site for a few years.....what Valve and Beth are doing is wrong on so many levels and will destroy the modding scene for TES.
MrBlaze;-;The game is great. Paying for mods isn't. #FreeTheWorkShop ......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... _____.......__............._____ .............//'...'/`............|...__.....\....|...|............/... ___| ........../'/.../..../......./\..........|...|....\....|....|...|...........|..../ ........('(.......... ~/'...').........|...|.....|...|....|...|...........|...| .........\.................'...../...........|...|__/...|....|...|____....|...\____ ..........''...\.......... _...............|_____./.....\______\....\_____| ............\..............( ..............\.............\
Im_A_LoSeR_2;-;Starting off by saying great game! But enough with charging for mods. It's out right extortion. The ammount of money that have been made from Skyrim itself is enough to make anyone happy. And only giving the modder 25% is disgraceful! Enough stealing people's work and trying to pass them for "DLC".
TheNomad;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. People can and should support mod creators via donations, and a 'Buy me a coffee!' button on the workshop page would be good, but putting them behind a pay wall is god damn atrocious. Hoping Valve and other responsible parties for this new practice will turn around.
Doouble Tap;-;I do not recommend this game to anyone. There is much better games that will keep allowing free mods... #FukValve and #FukSkyrim. GabeN was a god, He has now became a peasant. I do not support Steam anymore, i am going for gog.com and HumbleBundle. AND physical buy, so valve does not make one dime with me anymore. EVER. I love the game, i played most of my time on the Xbox360. I just got it this weekend on PC, just because 5$.. so don't look at my time on here. http://xboxgamertag.com/search/Doouble-Tap/
IgneousWatchman;-;It's a huge game, but it has shallow storylines in all the main factions. Absolutely disappointed.
Ralligaator;-;Pay 4.99$ to get a positive review.
RzR *Kinguin.net;-;Arguably one of the best games of all time.
RainbowGodDamnDash;-;This game was fun til Valve and Bethseda decided to charge for mods. If this is going to be the case for every other bethseda game, then you've lost a customer.
Revolution;-;Donate, not forced purchase of mods. Most people would happily donate a few dollars to a mod maker if they had the option on steam but instead we're FORCED to buy them.
Albrecht;-;The game is actually good, though it never really got me into a fever. But having to pay for mods...seriously?! Just not acceptable.
Loli Sex Machine;-;I played this game to death on two platforms, I picked it up for 360 when I had my old craptop that could not run it and later got it for PC when I ascended simply for the mods. I never thought in a million years Bethesda and Valve would sink so low as to nickle and dime you for ing MODS, they are not even mods anymore they are community created DLC. Skyrim itself is while fun for 20~ hours is fairly "meh" afterwards, the real draw is the mods and man they added a LOT to the game. I don't know what came over Valve and GabeN but holy  they are turning into EA in a bad way. I can safely say without any uncertainty this will be the death of Skyrim modding, no one is going to put mods up for free now that they can make pennies for it yet no one is going to buy it. It's a crying shame. Quote me on this, Fallout 4 will launch with this feature and the modding scene will never take off, Bethesda I hope to God you are not this short sighted to not see mods are 70% of the reason your games even sell. Read the rest of this review for $1.99
Lord_Lolland;-;Valve and Bethesda took a great modding community to a dark ally, ed it in the , beat it to death and then went trough its pockets for spare change.
dCode;-;This was one of my favourite games, but as long as paid mods exist, I cannot recommend it.
Xangi;-;I can't climb that mountain Todd. You liar.
TANKCOM[CW]@laptop;-;This game supports paid mods, I do not.
SinisterFerret;-;and here i thought bethesda and valve were the community companies while ea and ubishit were the greedy  corporations. :player name: human race :planet population: 7 billion :game turn: 2015 :current stat modifiers: -200000 FIHP (faith in humanity points)
mjcobb22;-;Was a great game and one i would truely recommend, but after seeing the paid mods come out i cannot suggest running further away. i am running 80 mods after looking back at how many i have run in the past the count would be around 120+. usning the current prices Valve/Bethseda would have made more off doing nothing than they origanally made off me buying the buggy release that i had to have mods fix while they screwed around instead of fixing. for mods the size of Skywind i would have no problem paying, but $3.50 for a reskined sword? really? the only reason this game is still talked about today is due to the mode community to which have gladly donated when i saw work worthy of it. i will continue to donate to modders that deserve the work, but if you attempt to charge me up front for something that might break my game i will not give you a penny.
Yoozero;-;Pay for mods... WTF I guess CD Projeckt RED is the only company we can trust in..
Plutia Chan;-;Do not buy mods . Use nexus if you want free mods .
Gordon Weedmn;-;It used to be a nice game, untill it took a monetization to the mods.
Beardicus;-;Beardicus' Journal. April 23rd, 2015: Mod carcass in alley this morning, price tag on burst stomach. This company is afraid of me. I have seen its true face. The games are extended cash shops and the cash shops are full of money and when the bank finally overflows, all the employees will drown. The accumulated filth of all their hats and knife skins will foam up about their waists and all the content creators and publishers will look up and shout "Save us!"... and I'll whisper "no."
Human;-;Get lost valve and bethesda with your paid mods. Another way to make steam worse. Greenlight and mod shop are inventions of satan himself.
BunyaminBUTTON;-;Valve and Bethesda should stop trying to fix something that is not broken and focus on what is broken such as Valve's customer service and poorly optimized games. Stop seeing us as money milking sources! treat us like a fellow gamer and solve our problems. That way you will have strong supporters who buys and recommend your services. Making people pay for something you didn't do it yourself as a company and giving the 25% to the people who actually made it is wrong just disgustingly wrong.
claymanr;-;Paid mods are not something that anyone should recommend.
.dEcline;-;Since the arrival of Paid Mods, this game is doomed to hell
gaat05;-;If you have decided to force us to pay for mods that the community has built and no regulations on when or if they work why would i even bother with this game anymore?
triarchic;-;Mods are the reason I purchased this game years after the fact. Paid mods is an outrage. I've donated money to several mod developers in the past to help support their particular vision.  Valve!
michael9r9r-kek;-;Thanks Valve for allowing people to charge as much for a suit of armor, as a full DLC. They have to charge this much because you're taking 75% of the revenue. Why Valve.... Why. The game itself is a great open world RPG, but the mods are what make a good game incredible.
DaMaN;-;Paying for mods? No thanks
Ebola;-;Accursed Pay mods, nuff said!
[SajtCo]Rockar787;-;You shouldn't pay for something that is supposed to be free.
hypersk8r;-;Was a decent game, the ending was underwhelming, but there WERE lots of mods to play with and lots of ways to try new things. Now you have to pay a couple bucks to find out a mod isn't compatible with this other mod you paid a couple bucks for. I'm all for donations, some modders do amazing work, but a majority of mods are mediocre at best and have a tendency to conflict with other mods. Now modders are taking things off Nexus so they can try to make money for Valve, this has ruined my drive to go back and play Skyrim again.
bumzz;-;Mods are what made this game stay alive and putting a paywall will kill it.
Nurglefish;-;Putting ods behind a paywall is a poor decision by Valve/Bethesda
Anarchy;-;Paid mods, why bother?
mycheese;-;I paid full price for this game in 2011 with the expectation of modding it fully. I did, with the help of an abundant and free modding community. Now, several of the mods which I used on a regular basis are on a charge-to-update status. I literally cannot beleive this, and will not support Valve or Bethesda's decision to monetize what was originally a free market.
byron;-;Used to be one of my favorite games! And now you have to pay for mods...??? $1 can buy me a coke, or the entire game Doodle Jump for iPhone. Now that we know what a dollar is worth, if your $1 mod can't give me at least $1 worth of entertainment, then what good is it? Mods are wonderful things, but if they're just a hacked in item set that glitches, why would I pay my hard earned money for that? Of course, Bethesda is raking in dough regardless of our complaints, but if Steam continues to add paid mods, I'll take my business back to Amazon.
Vinde;-;Too bland.
Don Papillon;-;Paid mods made current saves unplayable as we now have to give money to continue the game with the mods that were already installed or make a start a new game and lose countless invested hours. I can't support this, especially since it's just a test for future Bethesda game. I don't want them releasing even buggier games and recieving money from modders that always fix their games.
Emperor pain;-;What can I say thats not already been said by everyone else? With paid mods it can only go downhill from here.
Garydos;-;I bought this game as it builds on the best parts of pc gaming -Extensive mods -Free modding -Long gameplay Sadly most of it is trashed now.  THIS GAME  PAID MODS.
Vohk;-;With the move to support paid modding, I can no longer recommend this game. Aside from the issues inherent in giving modders merely 25% of revenue (and only that after they acrue $100 of payout) and forcing modders to irrevocably sign away rights to their own work, this move is already creating paywalls in front of long time free mods and drastically increasing the difficulty, let alone the cost, of playing a modded game. Vanilla Skyrim is a decent game, with console optimized controls and menus even on PC and a very wide but shallow pool of content. Modded Skyrim, prior to the release of paid Workshop content, was one of the most customizable and rich experiences in modern gaming. Unfortuantely, if the paid Workshop is not scraped, to experience that now would likely cost upwards of $100 of amateur coded mods. Many of these mods were built off of and rely on the freely provided work of others, only to see both Valve and unscrupulous modders abandon the community to cash in on a quick buck. Neither Valve nor the mod developer has any contractual obligation to support any mods you purchase; a game update or another mod could cause conflicts, crashing your game and effectively running away with your money. Worse, the Steam Workshop provides almost no useful tools to resolve such conflicts or errors on your own. Buyer beware.
Cake;-;Vast as an ocean, deep as a puddle, buggier than a Detroit callgirl's pubic hair, and most recently a testbed for horrifying new abuses against consumers.
Hatty Hattington;-;Paids mods overall isn't that bad of an idea but their are lot of problems with it now >Bethesda taking 45%, Valve taking 30% leaving 25% for the creator >Literally 0 curation by Valve/Bethesda meaning if a mod breaks your game, corrupts your save file, doesn't work after game patch, Bethesda and Valve won't move a finger >Stolen content from nexus posted on steam workshop >$5 weapon skins, that is worse than what Activision charges for CoD skins, at least they are professionally made and don't break the game and if they do, there will likely be a fix
Space;-;How to destroy a fanbase
samba987;-;Skyrim is a good game on it's own, but with mods it becomes amazing. But with paid for Mods that are more like mirco-transactions on a bad mobile game, this game is a fail. Putting a pay-wall up is not how you make a good modding community.
Xcarion;-;Used to be decent, then it took paid mods to its wallet.
Santa Claws;-;The game itself is without a doubt a 10/10 - BUT - the new "Paid mod policy" is complete . I still think you should give it a go, and you can still get alot of great mods for free on the Skyrim Nexus. Dear Valve, please stop. You're kicking yourself in the balls with this new policy! look, Gaben. I understand that you need money, but MODS ARE MEANT TO BE FREE! *sigh*
BrokenHorns;-;your paid mod . I regret buying this game.
Brigand231;-;This game had amazing potential, but was released with glaring bugs and issues. It used to be reasonable as there were free mods available to tailor it to perform and behave as any player wished. Now that any game mods and fixes from third parties are potentially for pay, one cannot simply look at the price tag for this game and consider that the final price of the game. I feel sorry for anyone who might buy this after 4/23/15. When they say "your experience may vary" it's true and possibly depends on how much you truly end up spending on the game.
David;-;Paid mods. Nothing more to say. The game may be good but mods were what made the game great.
Timblegoorn;-;Paid mods as of April 24th 2015. $1.99 for some fancy armor. $4.99 for some fancy weather effects, all of which used to free. If we want to support the modders give a donate thing instead of flate rate price. Heck, the game on sale is $4.99 and mods cost as much as that now. Hence the reason of this negative review. Otherwise, if you don't care about mods really or paying for them, this game is the best medieval RPG I've ever played and it won't be topped for a long time.
Malisch;-;It was one of the best games i played so far. but now they want us to pay for simple community mods?! this is the first step of PC gaming's end. And Bethesda seems to be the new EA or Ubisoft. Dont buy this game till its fixed!
Shadex;-;Showing my support for the modding community by downvoting this game until Valve takes their hand out of the cookie jar. We already payed you a truck load of money for the game 'you' made. You want more money then you start making mods.
O24N1NJA42O;-;i might recommend this game if it functioned!
sjane3384;-;Just say no to paid mods. This is an amazing game, but if Steam is gonna go the paid mod route, I'd recommend buying it on Amazon or GameStop's website and then going to the Mods Nexus to get your mods. Come on Valve. You used to be the best, and now you're just becoming EA. If you want to support modders make a donate button.
King dog b XIV;-;Great game. However  paid mods.
|RLG| Yamtato;-;I love this game so much and have loved it. This negative review is to fight against the rapacious acts taken for the steam workshop modding. I will not be paying money for any of that. Don't you either.
Dwake;-;This negative review is prompted by Valve's new practice of selling mods and passing it off as a courtesy to the mod creators, all the while taking the lion's share of the profits. Want to really support mod creators? Remove this atrocity of a paywall and add way of donating to the authors directly.
Delirious 17;-;If this is the direction Steam and Valve are heading with paid mods, my heart is broken that something so awesome once is going to  with most of the rest of the video game industry.
nahka;-;GETFREE!!   The Steam Community is about sharing your work. Have good ideas and help to improve each other. That makes us diffrent of the gaming companies. >>>> Post this every each paid mod you see in steam <<<< Because we don't wan't to let end up steam in a greedy for money- gaming platform. ......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... _____.......__............._____ .............//'...'/`............|...__.....\....|...|............/... ___| ........../'/.../..../......./\..........|...|....\....|....|...|...........|..../ ........('(.......... ~/'...').........|...|.....|...|....|...|...........|...| .........\.................'...../...........|...|__/...|....|...|____....|...\____ ..........''...\.......... _...............|_____./.....\______\....\_____| ............\..............( ..............\.............\
Andrelius;-;Donations are the way to go, charging money will destroy skyrim nexus, causing mods to dissapear entirely. The fees will not be enough incentive for creativity with 3/4 of the price being taken away by steam. This would only artificially raise prices, and make buying mods less attractive, when they have circulated for free for quite sometime. Valve's "tax rate" for the mods should come down significantly, so most of the revenue goes to the entrepreneuring mod authors. That would give modders a break and reduce the prices to more reasonable rates, and people might buy them. Still, donations are the way to go, as skyrim nexus has shown- and the quality of the mods are far superior than that of the workshop- many of the workshop mods first being posted in the nexus. Skyrim is only great with mods, but the pricing of these mods would discourage people from buying it. The old system was better when modder's creativity attracted people to buy the full game.
motokozero;-;The only reason I bought Bethesda games was for the mods, but now that you have paid for mods theres no point in buying Bethesdas games anymore. On the bright side, I get to save money by not purchasing there games anymore. You know something wrong when steam is making origin look good.
anovergy;-;SKYRIM+PAYING FOR MODS=EA LITTLE DLC'S ? A Skyrim mod formerly on Nexus for free is now on Steam for a price. This could be the beginning of the end for mods.
SpencersCJ;-;Until microtransactions are removed I cannot recommend this game
Jyeehadist;-;Mods for a barely 4 year old games now require money while mods for a 20 year old game remain free. 0/10 would Doom 2 again.
Deadly Peanut;-;It absolutely pains me to downvote this game but paid mods are unacceptable.
Beardhat;-;I enjoyed this game on release, despite the bugs. However its final patch left the game in a nearly unplayable state, with the simple sentiment of "Let mods fix it" and mods do fix it. I would not recommend this game, as the modding community slowly dies out from the new paid mod scam, the one thing that kept this game relevant for so long will evaporate into thin air.
Andre_2FL;-;Who's fault it it now? The ones that make the game, the providers of said game, or the people that play it? You people at Valve and Bathesda... The people responsible. Stop this bull right now. You are not fooling us. And because of your shenanigans I give this GAME now a negative review. You made this, you fracking fix it NOW.
HazzaB;-;Paid for Mods.. What a joke. Add a donate button, fair enough.. but making us pay is just a big middle finger to all of us.
Imytholian;-;So a bug ridden product is no longer being patched but now mods can be sold, with Arthmoor jumping into that bandwagon, which could very well mean that the pretty much essential unofficial patches could be sold now. That's right, you could end up having to pay for patches. Not. Cool.
phil;-;Paid mods ruined this game
Der berhmt Fegelein;-;Valve and Bethesda is killing what made this game so great. Mods.
Evil Sandvich of Dooom;-;Every respect I had for Valve, Bethesda and ZeniMax just went down the drain. Dont support cooperations who put their intersts before that of costumers.
Lugal;-;They sell mods
Evilconevil;-;Absolutely fantastic game, one which lasted so long due to the modding community. I myself continued to play due to mods... however, I don't have the money to fork over for each individual mod. The modding community exists to better games in places that the developer lacked and to create more fun, interesting activities that only the players can think of. While donating to the modders is one thing, they are not professionals and without proper backing and proper upkeep mods should not be an item to be purchased. The reason this gets a negative review is because Bethesda is mostly responsible for this ridiculous event. Not only are they making the most money off this, they're making more than the modders themselves. They are literally making money off of other people's work and their lack of creation. This is not okay at all. Bethesda, I've loved your games for year, but if put out updates and more DLC if you want to make more money, don't steal from others.
its ya boy auto;-;money
Evil Sandvich of Dooom;-;Every respect I had for Valve, Bethesda and ZeniMax just went down the drain. Dont support cooperations who put their intersts before that of costumers.
Lugal;-;They sell mods
Evilconevil;-;Absolutely fantastic game, one which lasted so long due to the modding community. I myself continued to play due to mods... however, I don't have the money to fork over for each individual mod. The modding community exists to better games in places that the developer lacked and to create more fun, interesting activities that only the players can think of. While donating to the modders is one thing, they are not professionals and without proper backing and proper upkeep mods should not be an item to be purchased. The reason this gets a negative review is because Bethesda is mostly responsible for this ridiculous event. Not only are they making the most money off this, they're making more than the modders themselves. They are literally making money off of other people's work and their lack of creation. This is not okay at all. Bethesda, I've loved your games for year, but if put out updates and more DLC if you want to make more money, don't steal from others.
its ya boy auto;-;money
Sexual Tyrannosaurus;-;It's a good game, but I can't support Bethesda and Valve stealing money from the mod developers.
Okiwan;-;Vanilla Skyrim 7/10. Skyrim with mods: 11/10. Skyrim after paid mods: 0/10 I'm jumpin on the paid mod bandwagon of hate
Jones;-;Mods costing money.
geeoutlier;-;This is a game that, vanilla, I would give 7. Mods make it a 10. Paid mods... ugh.
Oatmeal Guy;-;The mods are the only thing that makes this game worth playing. But right now Valve and Bethesda decided that it would be a great idea to start charging for said mods. In short, dont get this game. Let it die as it deserves.
King Hoovy;-;Based on it's merits I would have once recommended this game based on it's base content and modability. However due to Valve and Bethasda's policies were you a. have to pay for some mods and they b. can cost more than the actual game I don't recommend that you buy it. EDIT: You can still use sites like the nexus for free mods however.
Starknight1997;-;I just want to be one of the many people making the user rating of this game lower. WTF VALVE (and bethesda) Come on people its gone down from 98% down to 84%. Keep going or it might happen to fallout 4.
The Chicken;-;You know why.
Pdor, figlio di Kmer;-;Paying for mods? That helps the modder, right? Well no, considering that Bethesda is taking 45% of revenue, only 25% to the modder (who actually DOES all the work) and 25% to Valve (which, contrarily to public opinion, isn't bad since they have to maintain the Workshop). Great game, but Bethesda seems to have forgotten that modders made the port to PC for them, basically. And we as a community can not forgive it. Paid mods are stupid, since a mod can break your game or just aren't worth it (1 /$ for a weapon reskin? Thanks, but no thanks). If they wanted to support the modders, a donation button, or a slider similar to Humble-Bundle's one would have been more than enough.
Matchstick #FALLOUT4;-;To See the full review its going to cost 1.69
Resthier;-;Thanks for expoliting the modders valve and bethesda
Zman12402;-;It's a good game now they removed paid mods
Benana the Vault Dweller;-;Donations for mods are fine. Paywalls are not. Can't recommend this game right now.
SassieST808;-;Paid mods and Valve also getting 75% of the profit? Valve is becoming the new EA games. I wish I could get my games out of Steam and leave Steam alltogether. From now on If I have the option, I will buy games without a Steam key. Getting really sick of all the greed these days. BURN BEANCOUNTERS!!
Yamzee;-;It's like Skyrim, but with mods.
PISTONSLINGER;-;This reveiw is being published to say that the new workshop is not well thought out. I mean paying for mods is like paying for something you dont like when you tried it out. My second reason is that what if someone buying skyrim only has enough money for the game and they got the game just to play the mod that they wanted to try out for so long and its why they bought the game. Then if they finaly get the money what if its not what they expected? WHEN VALVE GETS RID OF THIS NEW FETURE I WILL TAKE THIS REVEIW DOWN
Pijanista | crohq.org;-;Not supporting anymore until they remove paid mods. End of story Valve. You're destroying US !!
Ex-canary ThunderCodes;-;35 hours in total is enough to give my review. Rating: 10/10. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a massive, open world RPG game with hours and hours of gameplay, and is a very fun game. I have been playing for a long time and I love it. The best RPG out there right now. You are a Dovakhiin, or Dragonborn, in mortal language. You have the power to eat the very souls of Dragons. But, dragons aren't the only threat of Skyrim. The province of Skyrim is at civil war, between the Imperials and the Stormcloaks. Jarl Ulfric Stormcloak, the one who formed the rebellion of the Stormcloaks, murdered the high king with the power of the voice, shouted the King apart, and the Imperials are hunting him down. This is the greatest game in the TES series, don't be put off by The Elder Scrolls Online, that was a terrible game. But I can assure you, grab this game and you won't be disappointed. Buggy? There are a set of mods named the Unofficial Patches, which fix many bugs, and aim to at some point fix them all. However, I cannot recommend this game. Why? Yesterday, Valve through this whole game down the drain.... Paid mods. It's awful. Nothing could have ruined this game more. Get it on console, guys.
Evolvedfish;-;Game is filled with bugs.
MechanX;-;I used to love this game before the paid mod workshop was implemented. Bethesda and Valve are trying to profit from modders by doing absolutely nothing. I will not recommend a game where the developer wants to profit from the community who has been fixing their game and keeping it relevent for the past 3 years. I do not recommend buying it from steam and I do not recommend buying any mods for this game.
Anorexia Nervosa;-;So you have to get this right, Skyrim a game full of bugs, was modded by the community to run bug free. Every DLC not even the HIGH RES Pack was without bugs, all of this was done by the community not by Bethesda nor Valve. Now Valve comes with the Idea let us charge money for mods on steam workshop. They take 75% of the price the modder asks for the money, while they do not take any responsibility since it is all at your own risk right? Oh if you get screwed then you can make a polite post on the item for the modder. Now that is nice don't you think? Pls Valve get cancer, die and  off.
Eric_the_Barbarian;-;This game and I had a lot of good years together, as did much of the community. The developer decided very recently to implement additional "features" that have changed the nature of how the once excellent community interacted with this game. This was a bad change.
Palypso;-;Flaws can now be fixed by DLC payed mods! only 49.99
[88th] Skipper (VGS);-;Years spent developing The Elder Scrolls V, after IV Oblivion in 2006 and the work put into Skyrim is evident. Released in 2011, we are no longer able to call Skyrim an up-to-date game yet it still tricks you in that sense with its breathtaking graphics, of which make the world around you feel beautiful whilst still portraying the hard, gritty coldness of the snowy nordic homeland. The main quest starts with you as a prisoner (again) in the middle of a civil war between the Imperials who had gained control of Skyrim and allowed everyone to live there, and the Stormcloaks who are nordic rebels led by Jarl Ulfric Stormcloak, who seem to only want Nords in Skyrim. On the verge of execution you find the dragons have returned and after having narrowly escaped with your life you set out to defeat the dragons, finding out you are Dovahkiin, dragonborn. On top of this main quest there are quadrillions of side missions, all of which add fresh varieties to your time in Skyrim and allow you discover more locations in the world around you; you can fight the great war with either the Imperials or the Stormcloaks, you can join the Dark Brotherhood and assassinate the Emperor, you can join the college of Winterhold and aspire to become Arch-Mage. The freedom in Skyrim is incredible and the developers have made it so that all the decisions you make on your free roaming have an affect on your gameplay and quests, take a pilgrimage to the different temples, visit all 9 holds, join the thieves guild in Riften, explore hidden caves and burial sites, hunt down daedra, the world is in your hands. Then when you have done adventuring for the day, buy a house in one of the major cities and sit down to read one of Skyrims hundreds of detailed books, all giving you more information about the Elder Scrolls lore and some helping you level up or start a new quest. In conclusion, I love the Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim and recommend it to everyone, it is a fantastic game which will allow you hours of enjoyment and whilst it has nice graphics and good gameplay, actually is not very demanding in spec. My Skyrim rating: 10/10 Buy it!
Mothey;-;Oh boy! Don't you just love the smell of paywalls in the morning?
Conscript;-;This game promotes racism, transphobia and anti-semitism.
Wilhelmus van Potato;-;It is a great game, but to expand it past all the dlc with mods, YOU HAVE TO PAY MONEY. Mods are meant to be free to enjoy, not as paid microexpansions. We do NOT need these mods. Will change review when the current policy on paid mods is changed.
4s*;-;Because  paid mods.
Entropy;-;Paid mods removed. GabeN did the right thing.
Khalis;-;Not even addressing gameplay, as long as this game supports paid mods, I will never recommend it.
Majik;-;Damn I love this game, and the mods!! theres just so much to do.......15/10
wicketman8;-;This game stops being fun really fast, leaving me wanting for more interesting content. Even without paid mods, this game is not worth the $20 price tage, plus the over $40 to get the dlc.
GandhiLuthrKing;-;Paid mods ing suck, I wouldn't recommend skyrim until they change it back
Shadowsong;-;Play Skyrim......create YOUR Skyrim...live the fantasy,
HeavenCrabe;-;Great game, but a little easy. You need to play at the legendary difficulty.
Dan [greuceanu];-;... words can't express the beauty and complexity of Skyrim. So many options, so many mods, so much that it has to offer ... it's just the perfect game, and for me definitely the best game of 2011. Bethesda has done it again, I just hope I will not get lost in the lands of Skyrim. 10/10
-DINNYFORST-;-;[I still thumbs up for the game, there's nothing wrong about Skyrim. But the workshop system is totally disaster.] ***Read below for updated details*** ----------Old Review---------- Beautilful, Unique, and Charming... Skyrim provides better experience of this RPG open-world series. Beside the main quest and radiant sidequest which can surprise you in different events. Pretty genuis scripts and storyline lead you to new places, new conflicts, and dragons as random encounter. The level system is not new, but it has improvement and design. Places are full of mysteries, activites, and NPCs, lifefull indeed. Smithing and enchanting are deep and impact to your combat as magics and shouts are balanced and provide new tactics. I could say I'm in love with this fifth series. Even some people may face with minor bugs (For me, it just minor graphic bugs now.) Inventory system is hard to track (Fix by using Skyrim UI Mod) and problem in AI direction. All I say it just common thing in this kind of game which cant interrupt you from amazing experience. Totally worthy in every dollar/baht you paid. Whatever you are fan of series or not. Try once in your owned. :) ----------Updated 26/4/2015---------- Valve and Bethesda just apply pay for mod to support the modders. However, the execution is terrible. There's no guarantee that your paid mod will run without conflict or its update can break your game or not and you actually dont have time to check the error within 24 hrs before you decide to refund. What if the modder abandones current mod? Where 75% of Valve/Bethesda share is going? The modder dont get paid until you've sold $400 from based mod (Read carefully about payout and earn). Why Valve dont implement optional donation? Becuase it's illegal to cut from donation and Valve is guarunteed for money? There are many ways to support modder beside using cash. The steam workshop is used to be share of free stuff and mod with tight community. Now, it becomes to microtransaction-like workshop. It doesn't mean that hard-working modders shouldn't deserve money as support, but the current rules and implementation are totally wrong and create misunderstanding of mods. For now, the game is still a great RPG, but I can't recommend to Steam workshop. Think harder Valve/Bethesda. I'm seriously worry about the future of modding where your next generation have to pay for mod/add-ons even the game quick fix if the system still continue and become market standard. ----------Updated 28/4/2015---------- Valve and Bethesda decided to remove payment feature from Skyrim workshop. I'm really appreciated for your decision and thank you for listening our feedback not to go worse. There're many other ways to support modder and I'm looking for your new implementation.
Pepper;-;>open world >can be a sexy anthro lizard man >pretty armor >lots of quests >black people >dragons >workshop >gr8 mods m7 >two separate campaigns (stop the dragons, and the imperial vs stormcloaks war) >good graphics >lots of spells >can cheat and still get achievements >you can speak Dragon
Paranoid;-;5/5 Game begins again as Prisoner, Bethesda likes dem prisoners https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=J7IDteDPW5g
.ToreXko;-;This game is huge... maybe even too huge for its own good. Even after 300 hours of gameplay there are things you don't know about and will surprise you. But sadly by that time you will feel a bit bored with combat and some other repeating things. No worries though. With workshop and all the mods you can make Skyrim 10 times better game. If that's even possible because it already is an ultimate game cosidered to be one of the best of all time.
Grizz;-;The one thing that made Skyrim shine for me, was the fact the it used to be a great platform for mods. No more. I strongly dislike the DLC/microtransaction trend. And now modding has been dealt a death blow. People that still have free mods out there will have to make the switch to paid mods or remove existing ones. Just so other people won't take credit for their work and make money of it as well. Some simply might not make any more new content. And people wonder why piracy still exists? If anything... this makes it more tempting. LATER EDIT: Skyrim paid mods have been removed, but I'll keep the negative review as a reminder.
TokyoquBarbyy;-;MAKE EVERYONE NAKED IN SKYRIM....lewd/10 #bestpantsu ;w;7 #imworriedaboutmyself -very much worth it. There is so much to see, do and eat :D, along with endless hours (no really those hours go on and on dam it) of exploring, killing and um...dying. \(^_^)/ - JUST BUY THE GAME OKAY, TAKE THE ARROW IN THE KNEE FOR ONCE IN YOUR LIFE AND TRY SOMETHING NEW, BE A MAN AND KILL CHICKENS....gawsh... (ToT)/~
Booty Biologist;-;I beat my wife while abusing the immortality glitch and got my one handed skill to 100 10/10 would beat wife again
Mario the Impaler;-;Believe me ,there's no need for a detalied review about this game." Best game I've ever played " is more than enough. Got this game on PS3, on X360 and now on PC. Still didn't have enough of it.
Klager Ren;-;Best walking simluator out there.
Nico;-;I thought after Oblivion that no other game would me enchant so hard... you know what? I was so wrong! Skyrim is a must play for all sort of gamer!
Ace Voyage "Osi" [S.H.];-;Better then sex! With the DLC's you will have a great game with a great story. Modding the game is easy if you know how. i am totally getting sucked into the game when i am playing it, and having a hard time when i am not playing it
Haztoks;-;Recently Vavle introduced the feature to pay for mods. While this isn't an inherently bad feature, as high effort projects such as total conversions in my opinion could justify charging 2-3$, the way it is implemented (75% etc) and the way it has been handled (deletion of donation links and suppression of dissenting opinions etc) is unforgivable.
CosmicBit;-;do not support developers trying to pull this
CheechLizard;-;This game is 75% bad and 25% good
If I stop "spamming", umute plz?;-;It has forced to pay for mods. Don't recommend.
Get Rekt M8;-;best game ever y pay for mads steam y
mrjakeisnumber1;-;Gaben, plz. This game exists for its community. Please stop destroying the game's purpose just to make a quick buck.
ZorakRobert;-;I've tried really hard to play this game again and I can't get into it. I also heard they are charging for mods now? I didn't do any research to see if that is true or not but I don't like the idea of it so I'm giving this game a thumbs down.
Garek Maxwell;-;Without free mods, this game would have been fun for a week at best. Hardly worth my money compared to other titles on the steam market that offer hundreds more hours. This whole thing is a train wreck and could have been implimented far better. Instead they've managed to tear apart a community by introducing a major variable into a system that was not presently there. The chaos that resulted could have been seen a mile away. There is also no incentive to not go down the path mobile platforms have, with core gameplay improvements through modification sold piecemeal for maximum profit. Thanks Valve, Bethesda, for bringing one of the worst aspects of mobile gaming to the PC.
Ikkerens;-;I liked this game, but gonna dislike just to make a stand against the paid mods. You want to ruin the mod community? Because this is how you ruin a mod community.
mmK;-;Decent vanilla game made into something glourious with community mods. Then... suddenly... two greedy companies shatterd everything with a pay wall. No paid mods thank you, or atleast not in this rediculous fashion.
lawled18;-;Loved the game but can't support paying for mods.
FiX;-;"Greed (Latin, avaritia), also known as avarice, cupidity, or covetousness, is the inordinate desire to possess wealth, goods, or objects of abstract value with the intention to keep it for one's self, far beyond the dictates of basic survival and comfort." from Wikipedia
Curious James;-;** UPDATE ** Now that the penny pinching and nickle and diming has been removed through sheer overwhelming pressure from the community, the below is no longer the reason for this negative review. Now it's negative to remind Bethesda and Valve that the consumers pay for the bread on their table. Capitalism ho, but have some decency. We're not walking, talking wallets and we're NOT data points Gabe. ** ORIGINAL ** I bought the game for the mods, plain and simple. Now that the mods aren't free the price/value of this game is out of whack, as in no amount of value makes up for the nonsense of paid mods EVER. As long as paid mods exist Bethesda gets not a penny more from me.
Thorn Inurcide;-;Probably one of my top 5 favorite games ever. The story line itself wasn't really that interesting to me and I had to force myself to complete it after a couple hundred hours, but everything else about the game makes up for it. The leveling system was wierd to me at first, but I found ways to grind to level up, being able to make things legendary helps too. The NPC's are boring/annoying after a while..Just kill them, and stuff all the bloody rags you find into Nazeems urn.
Madrzaxr Fruantr;-;This game is just AWESOME! Open world, Lot of story main and background, big skill tree, very goog mechanics If you like Fantasy like LOTR or GOT you will like it... Also you can mod it so it is even better. Sometimes some bugs happen but you can fix it (console commands,workshop or nature way) After all that this is one of the best games ever made :)
papi doge;-;I love going around Whiterun being called the Companions' mead-fetcher when I'm the Dragonborn and am currently the Harbinger of said guild
Relic the Philosopher;-;TL;DR Read Bottom Conclusion ;) The Elder Scrolls: Arena astonished gamers everywhere when it was released on the old DOS system quite a few years back. It is today, and likely will remain, the biggest game world ever concieved, and with an ever growing series it continues to get even bigger. And when TESII: Daggerfall hit stores, it introduced an entire new line of RPG, housing a rebalanced skill system, reputaion and faction systems, and much more. And not many could have predicted the arrival of TESIII: Morrowind, which brought a whole new batch of ideas into play. TESIV: Oblivion took off from Morrowind with a different setting and characters, more polished combat, and more immersion. Then TESV: Skyrim was released, after many years of development. After that, the entire world of gaming changed. It employed all of the previous games' lore, gameplay, and systems, but then removed alot of the restrictions it contained. It took ideas from other landmarks in gaming history such as profitable dungeon delving, crafting, house owning and buisness running, marriage, adoption, assassination, the "no witnesses" idea, duel weild combat, and so much more. "Freedom" became a whole new word in gaming vocabulary. Become a werewolf, slay dragons, assassinate polititians, murder housewives, rob robbers, slay giants, everything you could have asked for in a Dungeons and Dragons tabletop RPG, on screen with nothing but consequences to hold you back! Not a violent type? Become a travelling trader who consorts with bards and other caravans. A mage? Join the College of Winterhold and contact the Sigic Order. Ranger? (My personal favorite) Camp out in the forest and hunt animals and alchemy ingridients. Thief? Join the Thieves Guild for jobs. And so much more including Vampire Hunting, a part of the beastly Companions faction, be an Assassin, save the world from ex-extinct dragons, eat a full fledged meal, get the girl and be home in time for sweet rolls! Listen to me ramble on, the best way to describe this game is to list every ing thing this game has to offer and hope to not bore your reader. If you're still reading this, you've either already bought the game and are bored and so you look for good reveiws, you're an idiot who after reading many, many reveiws STILL hasnt found the incentive to buy this game, or you're a concerned parent who is looking for reasons to restrict their child from playing it. And then there's mods. I myself thought that I would never mod this game. Boy was I wrong. I've never had this much fun playing Skyrim till I modded it, though my advise is to keep it lore-friendly ;) Conclusion I'm not much of the reveiwing type, but being a writer I figured I'd at least throw a good one out there to express my love for this game. The music, the immersion, the storyline, the freedom, it makes a game that no other could ever match. I played this for countless hours on the 360 console, and I'm glad I got it on PC too. MY ADVICE: DONT GET THIS DIRECTLY FROM STEAM. Buy a physical copy of The Elder Scrolls Anthology. It's the cheapest, plus you get all 5 games (save for Redguard and Battlespire), all DLC for all games, and five printed maps. Morrowind, Oblivion, and Skyrim can be redeemed on Steam with a packaged code. That's what I did, and I do not regret it. Get the game, download Nexus Mod Manager to make modding easier, plus steam also has a workshop for it. Become anything, become all. Fus Ro Dah, Dovahkiin. http://youtu.be/rjTOF8IC528
Talat Mahmood;-;Do Come Back...
vic_viperman;-;-You want to turn mods into paid DLC microtransactions? Prepare to suffer the consequences- It pains me to do this, but I cannot stand by while Valve and Bethesda, among others I am sure, drive a stake deep into the heart of PC gaming. This game, the developers, Valve, and the modders who go along with this are dead to me. -this will turn modders and regular gamers against eachother and this is classic divide and conquer by developers. -Steam Workshop was sadly used as a trojan horse of sorts. This was the plan from the very beginning. -Will enrich valve and greedy devs off the backs of the community, all while being advertised as "a new way to help content creators" when it does nothing of the sort. RIP PC gaming if this is allowed to stand.
Booty Biologist;-;I beat my wife while abusing the immortality glitch and got my one handed skill to 100 10/10 would beat wife again
Chubby McP;-;I want there to be no paid mods!
Naruto Uzumaki;-;Its bad. Oblivion was much better.
Chaos Epoch;-;update. paid mods is a no, for skyrim at least. but this will remain as a negative review because of it all.
John;-;Best game I've played with the best memories.
Punisher;-;8/10 game, 0/10 mod policy. Why not have a "Tip jar" for modders? A optional donation that encourages people to put out quality mods, not just spam the workshop with $.99 junk.
XxAciDxX;-;Without mod : 8.5/10 With full mod : 10/10
CMDR Hurja;-;[This review requires the Review mod. To view this review, please purchase the Review mod for $0.25]
PK Smokey;-;this game sucks on computer the loading screen goes by so fast i cant read the lore on them 4/10 "pretty k"
=[T$C]= RMA_Shadows;-;Best game from Bethesda Game Studios ...
SHIT_DICK1243;-;Greatest RPG of all time! great story, very addictive, and Lots of stuff to do. Truly a masterpiece
Astronaut Shark;-;Wasn't that bad until they released a Premium Paid Mod Subscription Early Access Season Pass for $30 and then all the mods got taken down due to all being slapped with DMCA notices. Couldn't complain about it on the forums either as I didn't have the $9.99 Deluxe Steam Forums Support Pass. I guess I'll just sit here and deal with the free mods out right now. Not so bad as I only have to close about 50 pop-ups asking me to donate or purchase them on the Workshop. Whoops one of my save files got corrupted. I better pay for the $2.99 corruption fix mod and while I'm here the $5.99 Starter Gold Pack for 250 gold seems like a pretty good deal and oh hey a mod based off another mod that requires 3 other paid mods to get it working for a grand total of $59.99 sounds pretty neat. Good thing I got this game on sale for $5 haha Steam Sales are so great and I saved so much.
Apone;-;Paid Mods. Don't encourage this b buying.
Fabulous;-;Paid mods,really ValvE? I thought that EA is bad but asking money for mods is a new low for PC Gaming
Monsty;-;One of the strongest driving points of Skyrim is it's modding. Now that Bethesda and Valve has teamed up undermine a lot of the efforts of the modding community already back by really horrible Valve customer support, it's only natural that this is going to lead to abuse and exploiting. With people already trying to figure out how to steal content and resell it as well as stepping on a multitude of legal issues, this feels less like a community driven effort and more of a big business decision for maximizing profit. This is shameless, and I don't recommend anyone to support this game further until Valve has come forward to explain why they would go in such a radical direction.
Ackua;-;Valve has offended its customers and workshop content creators.  paid mods, and anyone who thinks it's a good idea.
dicklord;-;i played it it was good when parthunux kill (speilrs) no chicken no make sword with lydia women no 9 out 10
Freedum-chan;-;Hey, remember when RPGs were good? Well, it's not a good RPG, but it's a good (maybe the best) modding platform ever made. Plus, there are tons of content and a decent setting with MEMES. You may not like it, but Skyrim has it's northern charms. Even if those charms look like murderous draugrs wanting to kill you on the spot. Review update due to recent events. Well, it's too bad this mod-friendly-platform-feature was exploited. Guess I never saw it coming.
Sagers;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a beautiful, fantastic game that every gamer should own. 10/10 :)
JoelRoll;-;Such magic, much dragon 11/10
TsiriDhaBiri;-;i killed a chicken then i gone to prison Best Game 11/10 :)
deamos;-;This has been one of my favorite games of all time, the depth of exploration and the game play have been unmatched by anything else I have played.
EChondo;-;Current Review from May 2nd, 2015; I am updating my review due to the changes Valve/Bethesda have made to the paid mod fiasco. Because of this recent event it has occurred to me that reviews of games should be about what the game itself offers and not what the community can/could offer. So having said that, I cannot recommend Skyrim at full price because the game is full of bugs, issues, and reeks of being a blatant console port. There are glaring issues that still haven't been fixed for the past three and a half years the game has currently been available on both consoles and PC's, but of course the modding community has fixed these problems on PC. However, the game at its core is great and is totally worth it at a discounted price, but keep in mind that the game isn't as fleshed out as recent installments in the past. Some people refer to this issue as "Consolitis", so if you're a fan of Morrowind and/or Oblivion you'll probably be disappointed with the vanilla Skyrim experience, but will be more than surprised with mod variety. If you're a new player to the RPG genre and have never played a Elder Scrolls game before you'll definitely fall in love with this one, but be warned that trying to go back and playing the older Elder Scroll games might leave you with a bad taste in your mouth because of how dated those games are, so I'd recommend going back and trying to play Morrowind or Oblivion first so you can enjoy those great games and then come back and enjoy Skyrim. Outdated Review from April 25th, 2015; Skyrim is an amazing game and is definitely worth the full amount and is a must buy at a discounted price, however due to recent events of Valve/Bethesda having the bright idea of allowing community made mods to be sold on the Steam Workshop has changed my view of the game entirely. As of right now, I cannot recommend this game while the current Workshop system is in place. I also do not recommend buying other Bethesda games until this change has been reversed and mind you this is coming from a huge Bethesda fan that has been playing Bethesda games since Morrowind on the original Xbox. I'd also like to note that this is not a "knee-jerk" reaction as some people like to claim. Since this system has been put in place some modders have shown their true colors of greed by refusing to update their "free" mods and other people stealing free mods from 3rd party sites and selling them on the Workshop while Valve/Bethesda turn a blind eye. Money has corrupted the modding community and Valve/Bethesda are to blame. Do not support this system as it only hurts the modding community and will more than likely hurt future games like TES:VI and Fallout 4.
WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you keep on doing it. 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
bread on mousepad;-;it's for edgy autists
Kempy;-;its like fallout with swords 10/10
The baddest of dragons.;-;Paid mods. That alone should be enough of a reason why this game sucks. That having been said, the combat is lame, and there are games that do everything this does, but far better. Buy The Witcher 1 and 2 instead.
[AwFY] AwFY VFA192Gunner;-;shot a wolf off a cliff and it landed on a imperial soldier and killed him. then i got a 2000 gold bounty in whiterun. so i went to whiterun and took it over. 4000000000000000/10 -ign
Blarghalt;-;This game is best played shirtless with a giant flagon of mead in hand.
El Goat Tsar_;-;I punched a mammoth in the butt 10/10
imonster297;-;Skyrim Review Story Skyrim is set after the events of Oblivion. The game itself takes place in Skyrim's land. A civil war between Stormcloak and the Imperial Legion. The Story Begins With The Jailed Guy, Who Escaped And Take A Journy To Nearby Riverwood. The Guy Gone To A Fight With A Dragon With Whiterun's Guards, After They Killed It, The Played (Guy) Absorbed The Dragon's Blood, Because He Has The Ability To Absorb Blood, Guards Got Shocked By That Absorption; The Player ( Guy) Is The Dragonborn; The History Of Dragons And More. Gameplay The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is an action role-playing game, Can Be playable Either a first or third-person, But Mainly First-Person. Skyrim's Genre RPG, Action and Adventure, But Maily RPG. It's Pretty Rare To See An Impressed Griping RPG. Skryim is not a normal RPG nor Action, It's an exceptional pretty rare to see RPG and Action. The Game Itself will have been taken from you more than 100 hours, I already have reached to "Almost" 100 Hour and atleast haven't reached at 45%. It's So So So Big Game that Nobody can expect its lengh (Expect for the main story its short), Speakin' generally 350 hour means 60% of the game Pretty Sure, Last Word "Time Killer". Graphics Story AWESOME, Gameplay is better than the story and Graphics is the head of Skyrim or skyrim's skill. Why The Graphics is the best of Skyrim? Beautiful environment, Beautiful shadow effects, The Appropriate Atmosphere specially in a combat. everything you have seen in Uncharted 1, 2 and 3 you'll find better than Uncharted's environment. Head Of Graphics.. Bethesda labeled correctely. Not Incorrectely. Even in low feels pretty good feels in high comparing it to some. "MASTERPIECE". Sounds Skyrim's Sounds is the opposite of reality which means "imagination" That Really didn't work!! Hit The Floor Feels Shredding Cotton Or Wool, Mostly Every Single Sound Feels Shredding; Not neat. That is the first negative in the game. Doesn't feel happy or something feels BAD. Hit A Person Feels An Electronic thing has blow away. All I Can Say Good But Still Very Very Veryx10 Not Neat. Music FUS RO DAH. Fighting A Dragon A Track Plays To Change Your Reaction Effects Into Excited. When Bored In Playing A Track Plays To Change Your Boredom Effects. Absorbing A Dragon Soul Makes Civilians Shocked And The Player Too; From The Awesome Happiness. Every Track Can Change Your Affects And Makes You Wonder Why Singers Wouldn't Make Those Emotional Tracks?; Skyrim's Tracks. Pretty Rare To See, Pretty Rare To Find, Pretty Rare To Effect Your Emotional Feeling, Pretty Rare To Find Better, Pretty Rare To Everything You Could Ever Feel Free To Ask For. The Verdict The Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion Took Game Of The Year Before, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim Took Game Of The Year 2011. For Me, It's Prettyx10 Rare To Give A Game A 10 Out Of 10, Sence All The Games that I Have Been Playing It, Skyrim Is The Best RPG Game I Have Ever Played. Fallout 3 Took A 10 Out Of 10, In My Personal Opinion Just 3 Game Took A 10 Out Of 10. In Every RPG Game I Don't Spend More Than 50 Hours. I Just Have Spend My More Than 50 Hours In Borderlands 2 And Skyrim, The Best Three RPG Games Of My Entire Are: Final Fantasy 7, Fallout 3 and Borderlands 2 But Skyrim Is Very Very Very Away Better Than All Of Them. Skyrim Is A Brilliant Game And "Time Killer Or Waster". Skyrim Is One Of The Very Best Games Of The Entire History. You'll Never Forget The Experience And Everything. The Best Method Of Modifying Describing And Visualizing It Is PLAY IT. Story: 9.5/10 Gameplay: 9.5/10 Graphics: 9.5/10 Sounds: 7/10 Music: 10/10 + Positives Side Missions Can Make A Big Story+Awesome Leveling Up System+Great Story+350 Hours Means 60% Of The Game; So Big Game+Training A Skill Can Cause Alot Of Time+Music Matters In The Gameplay Reaction+Nobody Can Find Better Than This RPG Game (Just RPG)+Gives You The Freedom To Explore+War Battles Are Pretty Fun+Awesome Dragons Combat - Negatives -Still Bugy And Glitch-You Might Get stick In A Spot-Not Neat Sounds-Pretty Easy To Cheat-Isn't Easy To Learn For Some People Skyrim, The Best You'll Find, MUST-PLAY! If You Hate RPG Games So This Will Change Your Opinion, And If You Love So You Are Missing Something Pretty Awesome. Either Play It Or Regret That You Haven't Played It. Last Word In My Review: JUST PLAY IT!!! 9.2/10 Amazing http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JSRtYpNRoN0 Recommended Price: $29.99 Games Are Similar To It: -Fallout 3 And New Vegas -Bioshock (In The Hand Of Magic) -The Witcher -Far Cry 3
BrosephBurchett;-;Best game ever played
Royale;-;After 750+ hours invested and many more to go. The Elder Scrolls Skyrim, the one game that time itself was lost to in is immersive world and storyline is a great game. However, while Skyrim is great, its story at times is generic when compared to the grand storytelling of Bioware's Mass Effect, Dragon Age, and CD Project's Red Witcher. The characters while great are few to remember as the voice actors and actressess are reused on multiple characters with little to no difference in voice. For example Balgruf the Jarl of Whiterun's voice actor is the same voice actor for Hadvar's uncle. After 200+ hours this becomes quite noticable but does not entirely take away from the game. The world is huge and deep in quests. In my 750+ hours, many will ask me what I've accomplished I will say little in comparison to what Skyrim and the modding community has to offer. The men and women both young and old are owed as great deal of gratiitude due to the content that have added countless upon countless hours of content to Skyrim. When asked by the everyday gamer, which version of Skyrim should I get pc or console. 9.8 out of 10 gamers will say PC for the mods alone, this speaks greatly of the modders impact to the Elder Scrolls V Skyrim. Skyrim has been out for 3 years now and I feel is is getting only better with each mod released. In my experience, I've had invested 400+ hours in Skyrim on the Xbox 360 and switched to the PC some time ago with the additonal 750+ on PC. Within those hours, 300 to 400 hours went into testing mods and with each new week of mods releasing I still find myself going for more. Both Skyrim Nexus and Skyrim Workshop are great places to look for mods. Granted for new modders out there, it is quite known in the Skyrim community that while the mods offered are great on Skyrim Nexus, there are dark corners of the site where mods of various types are avaliable but this is in no way disrepecting the modders of those mods but making it known of the existence of them. Steam Workshop is more safe, but even then a few mods from Nexus will show up but only as safe for work. In short, if looking for mods to add to your Skyrim I suggest staying in the safe for work/safe for home areas on Skyrim Nexus and even Skyrim Workshop. If feeling abit more for a mature take on Skyrim then the dark corners of Skyrim Nexus may work, but something I myself would not recommend. In conclusion, when Skyrim is not modded it recieves a 9.45 out of 10. When modded a 9.9 out of 10. A perfect 10 would be there if not for a few glitches here and there that can sometimes be game breaking to the point of starting a new playthrough.
Pears;-;It starts as an epic fantasy game and ends as a file organizing and landscaping simulator.
||BIA|| FitzChivalry;-;One of the best games of all time. If you don't already own it, what is wrong with you?
NUjackFC;-;Lesson iv learnt while modding skyrim is: If your computer can play Skyrim without a struggle you don't have enough mods installed 10/10
marzipan;-;yeah it's alright
NeonSKennedy;-;Gr8 b8 m8. I rel8, str8 appreci8, and congratul8. I r8 this b8 an 8/8. Plz no h8., I'm str8 ir8. Cre8 more, can't w8. We should convers8, I won't ber8, my number is 88888888, ask for N8. No calls l8 or out of st8. If on a d8, ask K8 to loc8. Even with a full pl8, I always have time to communic8 so don't hesit8. 8/8
Jelour;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim: -Field Rating 9 -Graphics 9 About Graphics: -Skyrim is a beautiful game, made even more beautiful by the extremely active modding community. The engine was a wonderful leap from the previous engine we saw in Oblivion and the Fallout series. The details in the environments are wonderful reminders of just how intricate the world really is. -Gameplay 9 About Gameplay: -Skyrim lives up to its Elder Scrolls name, granting us the freedom to craft our own story, in a gigantic world where you can spend hours simply exploring. The combat has seen a huge improvement since the days of Oblivion, with the ability to dual-wield chaning up gameplay styles wonderfully. The physics however, are still as wonky as ever. Sometimes with hilarious results. You won't get tired of wandering around this world. -Story 9 About Story: Enough interest to drive you forward, and plenty of lore to keep you distracted, Skyrim finds the wonderful balance of permeating the world with the story, yet giving you the freedom to advance the plot when you wish. Multiplayer: No Depressingly: no. Replay-ability: 9 -The only thing that will stop you from coming back to Skyrim for awhile is completely burning yourself out. But then the cycle repeats. Overall 9/10 -Being a long time Elder Scrolls fan, Skyrim was a welcome breath after the much loved, much played Oblivion. The freedom, the scope, and the environment are great. The graphics are beautiful. Though none of the Elder Scrolls since Morrowind have yet captured the full extent of the magic that made Morrowind so great, Skyrim has been a huge push in the right direction. A must buy for any RPG or open-world gaming fan.
Joysito-chan;-;Im gonna be fast on this one: Nice
XxXxFukinBlublorDxXxX;-;if u lik gaem wit dargon and macgic and stuf then u will lik this gaem bcuz it has dargons that r rely gud and u can eat potins and u can be assin lik rel gud and stuf and you still a dargon bron.
Dr_Apathy;-;One of the greatest games I'll ever play. Has a mod for practically everything. From killing children, to bouncing boobs, and to better graphics.
demonfox13;-;Skyrim is one of the most fun games i have play and still are. I keep coming back to this game cause of how awesome it is. I would recommend this game to anyone and if you get it get the legendary editon.
Pvt. Parts;-;You can use the Slow Time shout as someone is about to sit down, and then move their chair before they sit. 10/10
autist ogre | bobmarleyhats.info;-;I haven't even started the game yet because the title screen music is so glorious.
Gus Fring TF:CO!;-;Very nice game, lots of shinny things too touch 10/10
'Pitrang;-;mod it, until it crashes
Maverick;-;I tend to be wordy in reviews, trying to outline my thoughts, be fair and also objective. This will be no exception. Bear with me. I come into RPG a total noob and what I decree here might, for some, prove my noobness. Most probably in fact. As a staunch strategy/sim gamer of many years, RPG never really interested me so my adventure into Skyrim came as quite a surprise. In my view, despite it's "used by date" having well and truly expired, Skyrim deserves some very serious accolades. At nearly 100 hours played, I'm still coming to grips that I can play this almost like a sandbox (with the Hearthfire DLC) and just be a simple "villager" who relies on hunting, gathering or even small levels of agriculture to sustain myself. Or I can be a hero. As I write, my level 16 char (it's my 3rd start OK!) slays dragons, gargoyles and vampires. He can shout an army of sword wielding skeletons into piles of bones. I can wander willy-nilly, all over the map, mixing it up with bears, wolves and sabre-tooth tigers. There is so, so much to do and see that without the "fast-travel" option or a good horse it would take hundreds of hours just to explore the map. I'm intrigued by the depth and detail of the world and I think this will get 300-400 or more hours because I have so much yet to do and see long before I get anywhere near "endgame". I often stop and setup my character - keeping on eye on the rule of thirds - with awesome backdrops and scenery for some holiday snaps. I often walk everywhere, instead of using the fast options, just to soak it all in! I even have some pretty amazing screenshots if I must say so. As an "Enigma" music genre fan of many years, the music in the background of this is sublime. It so often sets either a wonderous emotion or a sense of danger at just the right time, so much so, that immersion into this pixelated fantasy world is absolutely complete. As I write, I've finally married the lovely Ysolda, Lydia is my Steward and my poorly residence (mansion?) at Lakeview Manor is looking rather stately. It is disappointing that much of the furniture and fittings are nothing more than eye-candy. Even my long, 8 seater dining room table never gets used. Well. I don't have to eat do I? For that matter, even sleep appears totally optional. There are quite a few other peeves too. - Clipping and FOV can be atrocious at times. Trying to shoot a fast moving dragon with bow and arrow. Lordy lord. - Tight tunnels and corners where followers jam you up, you can't see or they just get in the way. I even killed my follower once in a fit of rage as she stood dumbly by while I was getting zapped by some dude with a cattle prod. "GET OUT OF MY WAY LYDIA DAMMIT!!" I yelled one day, much to the mirth of my wife (my real one). - Inventory items. I'd be the first to recognise penalty-reward for carrying too much stuff but given the tightness and limitations of the purses of (scoundrel) vendors, it took buying a damned house just so I could offload my junk somewhere! There is little indication of what's -important- early on and I'm carrying stuff that seems rare or difficult to acquire with "unknown" as it's value. But I'm hesitant to leave it behind because it's just so much work to get to where I found it - if I need it! - Books. Agghhhhh!!! Somebody liked writing loads and loads of fictional - and unneccessary- trivia, that's for sure. Unless I am sadly mistaken, and reaching "endgame" might prove this, the amount of information presented is totally overwhelming. I fail to see relevance in much of what is written and trying to piece it altogether into some kind of connected narrative is as good as impossible. Do I really need to know why Edna Fat-Girl from Farawayland abandoned her children for a mammoth or any other such trite historical reference? Yeah, value tells me it's important but nohing indicates what ISN'T important either. Somehow I'm supposed to read and remember it all? Some might say you don't need to read and remember, it's unimportant. I say to that, then why have it? Clutter is BAD... Mmm..k... - Potions. Spells. Magic. Scrolls. TOO MUCH. A "Scroll of Reasonable" was needed by devs here. I'd rather 2 or 3 gameplay critical potions and maybe 1 or 2 rarer ones but I seem to have more potions and spell options than I do weapon variations. I'm over them tbh. 20 or 30 potions of healing is all I carry. The rest I dump at the local villages as I travel. - Missions. Oh my. Do they HAVE to stay in the list? NO, I do NOT want to an Imperial or a Stormcloak. NO, I don't want to kill the crabby old orphanage ma'am and sure as eggs are eggs, I don't want to be a vampire killer either. Whatever possessed them to not include a "fail mission" button. I understand critical mission timelines etc. what I don't understand why I have to find 10 bear pelts for Temba WideArms - who I have NO interest in - just to clear it off the list. Even a choice to decline a mission AFTER I get told what it is would have been better than THIS. Ugghhhh.... - Saving. NAMING. Dammit. "I love Ysolda" and "I wanna kill Ysolda" save games would have been a great inclusion. - My final gripe. The opening scene. Oh COME ON!! "Esc" out of movie. PLEASE!! EVERYTIME!!! But. Hey look. THIS is going to keep my occupied for a long,long time. If all other RPG's out there are even close to the depth of this work of art, despite her many faults, I'm glad I "converted" genres. I swear allegience, despite trial and adversity, to herald RPG from this day forth. So help me Mara.... 9/10 gg
MF Nuruddin (IND);-;This is the Perfect game for Adventurer at home because there are tons of quest in this game Enjoy!
(s.i.e);-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim. It's just one of those gems in gaming where as soon as when you get into it you may lose the way out. I originally played skyrim and it's official expansions on the PS3 version on their release days and i haven't played a game that good in a long time. Time spent was nothing impressive for elder scrolls standards though mind you it's just roughly +400 hours or so on the main save playing as a khajiit with a warrior/assasin build & playstyle. sword > shield later 2 words and from a bow i went to a dwarven crossbow (DLC wep) What makes this game so much fun is that it's easy to learn for users both new and not so new how to play it. You start of with whatever weapons and armor you can scavenge, steal, craft or be gifted and one step at a time as time flies by you discover and learn new ways to improve your skills and armor. All you have to do is pick up any weapon you like and use it in combat. Tired of that same sword? purchase a bow! bow too boring? craft a hammer! the options really nearly endless. Skyrim is also one of those games that is not only about fighting and exploring either. you can buy your own house, you can get married and live a happy life together or alone. Handy to know for some of you out there is that this game allows players the choice to start same sex relations, i know it's been a debate and a gaming media thing so for that exact reason i'm just gonna throw it outta there it in hopes it might be useful for anyone who find this important. But back to the home thing. In the hearthome expansion pack (5,00 $5,00 Steam store) the home and marriage feature gets a nice big upgrade which gives you the ability to get a plot of land at 3 set locations and build your own house from scratch starting with a small simple cottage to perhaps a huge manion complete with kitchens, bedrooms, armories, and livestock which you can decorate as you see fit. if you meet the criteria it also allows you to adopt up to 2 children to raise as your own and adopt a pet (Note: Please adopt meeko). again the possibilities are nearly endless. For those who like to turn a page or two and read something in their own time about the history of skyrim or simple daily things like spear polishing and putting bread in the oven the elder scrolls V: skyrim has more than 1000 pages of lore spread through all of skyrim covering many topics such as history, myth, monsters, races, religion, art, and more. these books are found in caves, homes, stores and pretty much anywhere people have been. be on the lookout some of them are actually pretty fun to read. To sum things up skryim is a masterpiece any player can easily lose the time on pure from the many features and near perfect constructed world. Be warned! All the best! (s.i.e)
Noxiana;-;This is my first foray into the Elder Scrolls series, though I bought Oblivion and Morrowind and will get around to exploring those eventually. I played a little of Morrowind but not enough to form an opinion yet (so far it's neato!). It's one of the most beautiful games I've ever played and the music is gorgeous and haunting. I've sunk many hours into this game but I still haven't completed the main questline. I'll get around to it eventually, but there's so much to do and see that it doesn't matter. I'm thinking i should increase the difficulty a bit. It's easy to cheese everything if you choose blacksmithing, enchanting, and alchemy. The combat overall could be better. HOWEVER, there are many, many mods that fix the game's flaws and add all sorts of wonderful things. Do you want to add more immersion? Well, there are survival mods that affect the food you eat, how deeply the cold influences your behavior, and how you attack. If you don't like something, get a mod that changes it! If you need a "desert island" game this one is it due to its endless replay value.
Brawndo;-;Better on PC then! Lots of extras on worshop. And the rest of this review is just so I can get a badge
Lulamoon Sparkle;-;Amazing game with an amazing open world, an amazing variety of items, an amazing background story and amazing stunning gameplay. I HIGHLY recommend it for any RPG fan with more than 20 hours of endurance for games. You can easily spend 200 hours in exploring things, crafting items, discovering new places, customize your character and many other things! But be warned: If you're one of those fast paced players with no patience for such games DON'T play it! Also I recommend playing the other elder scrolls games or gathering some background information, because you'll understand way more of the story and the world of Tamriel if you do so. One of the best western RPG's ever made. Play it for god's sake!
Halo Kitty (Squirrelflight);-;Before I start this review, I need to clarify some things. I know, it doesn't look like i've played this game much, but I have played Skyrim on consoles since its launch in 2011, and have logged over 300 hours on both the Xbox 360 and PS3. Now, on to the review. I have been wanting this game on pc ever since I had first built my gaming pc. I loved Skyrim on the consoles, and I consider it the best RPG of the decade so far. Part of me wanted it on pc for the mods, the other part for the benchmarking purposes. Now that I own the game, I can see I was completely wrong. I have not in fact been getting the proper Skyrim experience all these years, just a crappy console port. I had no idea how bad the graphics and loading times (If you have never played it on console, the loading times can take minutes) can hinder immersion. Let me be the first to tell you, when I first played this game on console even, I was awe-struck by the beauty the game had to offer. The world is great, and although I prefer Oblivion's world to this, I still like this place. It is so majestic. When I got the game on pc and booted it up on max settings with the color mod, I was awe-struck all over again. The fast loading times blew me away, and the color mod showed how bland and disgusting the vanilla game's color pallete is. The game on max settings or even low (console Skyrim is at a setting below low) is great looking. Not to mention the game in 60fps vs the 25 or so fps on console is absolutely breathtaking, it really makes a difference, and I am playing with a controller! I would warrant a purchase of this game for all the reasons above including the excellent mods of this game to anyone who already owns the game on console. Now to the newcomers. The game is an RPG, and a big one. It has a huge open world, and basically drops you outside a cave and says, "Here, have a quest, but you can go kill a chicken if you want. Did I mention there are huge dungeons to explore, weapons to find, and people to meet/kill?", and the feeling is awesome. It is basically a do-whatever-you-want-whenever-you-want kind of thing. The NPC's in the game are believeable, and I sometimes didn't want to go on huge killing rampages massacaring whole towns like I did in Oblivion or Morrowind (provided the combat system worked xD). The detail in the game is immense, and you can tell the devs took their time with this game. Honestly, I feel kind of wierd right now. I am here reviewing a game so big, it's mind-blowing, and I can't think of anything to say about it. I don't want to ruin the experience for you, it is too good. Do I recommend this game? Yes, I couldn't possibly recommend it enough. The game is so good, I am skipping out on christmas eve movie night with my family to write this review. I think it's time for me to join them, so I will leave you with a quote from the world's wisest person: "Thou shall not have lived if ye haven't played Skyrim"
Keshvar*BK*;-;This game is by far my most played game in my library. It is a very fun game that has a great workshop community. Very much worth the time.
Nugget2461;-;There are little midget people that like to play tag
Purahfikada;-;*whispers* SKYYRIMMMMMM
Grimvok;-;Elder Scrolls Skyrim: To some a game. To others a commitment. To me? My Destiny. This game is sent from the gods. TL;DR-Get it now
Evan;-;Base Game: The game is pretty good. Lots of content, but I feel that the combat could have been better. It feels like your attacks never really connect with the enemy and it's like it swings right through them. Story-wise, it was terrible. I never once was interested in the story, especially when Fallout New Vegas did such a good job in writing a few years back. Controls are solid with the mouse and keyboard and audio is good, with some great music. Graphically, it looks okay, but there are a ton of things that could have been improved on. If we compare both Vanilla Skyrim and Fallout New Vegas, I would prefer to play New Vegas. However, if you somehow don't own Skyrim, buy it. Right now. My review above is extremely brief, assuming 99% of PC players have played Skyrim. If you don't, let me tell you why it's a must buy. One simple word. Mods. Skyrim has thousands of mods to improve pretty much everything. From graphical enhancements, companions, quests, weapons, spells, armor, monsters, town improvements, UI, player created homes and even complete climate overhauls. You name it, and it will more than likely be there. The game already has hundreds of hours content-wise and you can even furthur that. My game looks amazing, with excellent textures and lighting that make it look like next-gen. I have spell mods that enhance the mage combat; I added over 250 spells into my game to use on my foes. I downloaded Enhanced Blood; making blood look extremely realistic and satisfying when you slice someone open. I have added quests and have made the main towns look much more lively with the Enhanced Town's mod. The combinations are endless. Skyrim's Vanilla is good. But it can be turned into one of the best games you will ever experience if you pick your mods correctly. PROS: +Loads of content +Fantastic, Atmospheric world +Tons of locations that add variety +Outstanding Music and Voice Acting +Intense Combat +Stunning Graphics +Customizable Controls +Replay Value is Insane +Mods, Mods, and More Mods CONS: -Poor UI -Weak Main Story SKYRIM VANILLA: 7/10 SKYRIM W/ MODS: 10/10
Zherax;-;Ah, Skyrim. Back in 2011 this was the game that everyone was talking about (or something like that). Truly, a great game. Decent character customization, Great graphics and scenery ,Varied gameplay (be a mage/warrior/assassin or be a Jack-of-all-traits.) The RPG mechanics are good, but it has a kind of short Main Questline. But it has tons of side quests to help fill the time. There are hundreds if not thousands of mods that you can get in the workshop or skyrim.nexusmods.com which can enhance the experience further There are some flaws such as lack of tutorials on smithing and enchantment, but that just makes it better in my opinion. We all know how hand-holdy MMS(Modern Military Shooters) can be now days. Overall 9/10
Kevin;-;what a game!!! At first i prirated the game, to be honest. And then i found the game was awsome so i decied to support the developers. This game is worth your money.
OL3;-;Murdering chickens will get you killed. I have played this sience it came out many years ago, and i still love it! 11/10
'Pitrang;-;mod it, until it crashes
Noble Chacal;-;Who put EA in charge of modding and workshop? ________________________________________________ *Edit* Well with the paid mods over with, I think it's time I changed the review. Certainly a great game, but i'm going to keep the original up as a reminder of what Valve and Bethesda tried to do.
Smurf galore;-;Paying for mods ayy lmao
Mozame Mogki;-;Mods are now dlc apparently to betesda so gg
Balrog;-;Paid mods are the worst thing to ever happen to a gaming community. Mods are not equal to DLC. Sadly, this means I can no longer recommend this game due to bad decision making by Valve.
Truck Stop Santa Claus;-;now that they are going to make you pay for mods.  this game
Michael De Santomak;-;My review for The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim: - Various races with their different abilities (you can even become a cat or a lizard too). You can be a boy or a gurl (and I'm not Prof. Oak). - A lot of quests (really guys, maybe I can finish most of unrepeatable quests, but by the time i've done that, i probably spent more than 1000 hours. - The map is vast, a lot of point of interest, and by the time you unlock every one of them, your map's gonna be full and heavier. duh. - Travel Skyrim as the mighty dragonborn, a warrior who can master every kind of weapons and magic, and also have a dragon blood running through your veins, Which is nice. Oh, and you can also shout with the dragon language. So you can curse people without them understand it. Because two things, one, they literally don't understand what you're saying, two, they're probably dead, cuz dragon language rulez. FUS RO DAH. - Even though you are destined to be the mighty dragonborn, you can, and you should seek part-time job. You can be a blacksmith, potion or poison brewer, equipment enchanter, whatever that is. - You can join a group of mercenaries, magic nerds, bunch of kleptomaniacs, or fraternity of murderer. Oh, you can also become vampires, or against them (Blade will be proud), and have your own castle (you have to share with your fellow hobos, though. - Oh, and you can marry, too. Good for you, forever alone. - You can drag dead bodies whenever you want, throw junk whenever you want, and the guard still ignoring you. - This game is moddable, original is great, with mods, no question asked. 9/10
Ana;-;Truly Epic!
Dorgarr;-;Many people will say that Skyrim is a perfect game, lots of people will say that the dedicated Modding Community perfected an imperfect game, unfortunately, the problem that I have with Skyrim cannot be modified without completely changing the entire game itself. Despite having a massive open world, thousands of quests to complete, and countless npcs with whom to interact, I can't help but think that Skyrim is a linear game. You don't really get many *REAL* choices. You can choose to join the Factions, Guilds, or Brotherhoods, but if you choose not to, you won't complete the game. You can choose what skills to level, but you won't be able to use the perks you want without leveling *everything*. However, it's your choice to not complete the game. You can choose who to kill and who to spare, but in the end, killing always yields the greatest rewards, the people you want to kill cannot be killed, and the people you want to spare will die eventually. Instead of being a Choose-Your-Own Adventure Book, with several different outcomes that can be reached through many different paths, Skyrim is a hefty Tome that gets better and better as you read, but will end the same way for everyone once they stop reading. The reader's only real "choice" is *when* to stop reading. That being said, Read on. Seriously. There is so much more to read.
Janky Panky;-;Once again bethesda set fire to the orphanage of 'being ' and produce what Fleece Johnson would classify as 'sweet booty'. In this dragonpocalypse simulator you can use swords, arrows, magic and even your voice to dispense justice like a  vending machine. There are no limit to the shenanigans you can get yourself into. Simply join a clan and beat things with the point end. Everyone is hiring from the Mage's guild to the Faze clan. Apparently you can join Al Queda but I couldn't find the front door. 20.5 Gregs/22 would recommend to anyone that isn't a .
Delta.;-;ONE OF THE BEST ACTION/RPG GAMES EVER MADE !!! "Skyrim" brought new generation to that kind of games. It is so expandable with mods, and graphics make it even better. Real open world, and bajilions of quest makes that game EPIC ! I recommend it to fans and newcomers. IT WON'T BE BORING EVER !
Noble Chacal;-;Who put EA in charge of modding and workshop? ________________________________________________ *Edit* Well with the paid mods over with, I think it's time I changed the review. Certainly a great game, but i'm going to keep the original up as a reminder of what Valve and Bethesda tried to do.
Grey;-;The first game of The Elder Scrolls series i've played, but definately not the last! Great game, with a huge modding community to make it even better. 2000+ hours, no regrets. I just.. keep coming back to it again and again.
The ZimmerMan;-;torrent it lol
Tru Skies;-;I absolutely love this game, and all TES games. I've spent thousands of hours in each, starting on console and now enjoying the creativity of the modding community. But paid mods are an insult. I'm all for supporting the modders, but it can hardly be called "support" when the modders only recieve 25% of the revenue.
sara_bear;-;I waited what seemed like forever for this to go on sale. Yes it was worth the wait. And yes I should have just ponyed up sooner. Completely worth the asking price. Awsome game.
M23;-;After the introduction of Paid Mods, I cannot and will not reccomend this game. I've gotten an immense amount of fun from this game, but I will not allow this kind of marketing BS to continue. I'm so dissapointed in Valve. Never Again.
Shadow;-;Pay to Mod. No thanks!
hl2.exe;-;Paid Mods are an awful idea.  you, Valve and Bethesda.
InferiorBaton;-;Paying for mods?? Thanks Obama.
Andy99000;-;The game itself was, as many other poeple said, very fun. All the content of the vanilla game isn't enough to keep me interested and on my toes about it. Certain mods that I got from the Nexus site gave me what I was looking for. Chesko's Frostfall and Wearable Lanterns. Persied9's Realistic Needs and Diseases. DragonSong's Hunterborn. Heck, even an Unoffical Patch by Unoffical Patch Project Team fixes most bugs that Bethesda didn't care to. All of these add life and meaning to the game, make me feel like There's more to skyrim than just back and forth fast travel. Now you're telling me that I am to pay for Bethesda's lack of ingenuity and creativity? I don't think so. I agree with the masses to have a donate button where we can donate any amount pleased and 100% of the donation goes to them. For people who don't know, the "pay4mods" policy makes it where 25% of the proceeds go to the mod creator, and the other 75% to Valve. This is absolutely rediculous. People looking for a money will tell people who go to the Nexus that this is a Steam Workshop exclusive. Thank goodness Nexus still listens to the community and doesn't charge for mods. Although I would normally recommend this game and tell you to go get mods to fill in the holes, I highly recommend against it as this option is no longer availble due to Valve's Moneylust. I intend to download no more mods until this issue gets resolved. You have no pity from me, people who create mods and put it on the Steam Workshop. No Pity. And to Valve, My utter disappointment for ever stooping so low to earn money. May this game Rest in Peace, for it is going to die very quickly.
Count Summon;-;A line has been crossed since the introduction of paid mods. For full information on this topic, please consult your local search engine.
Alia;-;While Skyrim is an excellent game despite any flaws or miss-steps, the recent introduction of pay for mods has lowered the value of the PC version immensely and is a scary concept for future games.
The Hash Slinging Slasher;-;Paid mods have been removed, I can recommend this game again. Now add a donate button please. I will certainly donate to Skywind when it's completed (a complete recreation of Elder Scrolls III: Morrowind using the Skyrim engine) or any others I use. Oh, and even the devs for skywind weren't going to charge for their mod, according to their youtube channel. http://steamcommunity.com/games/SteamWorkshop/announcements/detail/208632365253244218?insideModal=0
Hugh Phamism;-;After the resolution of the "paid mods" debacle I can now endorse this game again. Enjoyable game. It's a solid game.
Mcardle;-;A really good game. But the fact that they now want to squeeze every last penny from my wallet through a pay wall of pay to play mods is just disgusting, i wouldn't mind if they added a "donate to the modder" button but the simple fact is the modder has been screwed over as have we all been.
jim_uk;-;A lesson on how to turn a good PC game into a mobile style microtransaction nightmare, vote with your wallet and stay well away from this.
ProxyCat;-;The only thing that was keeping this game alive was modding but now that it's gone there's no reason to play this mediocre game, go get Morrowind or Oblivion, remember playing them in 2002 and 2006, realise how long ago was that, feel nostalgia and finally get disappointed in life.
Joeoeo;-;Free Mods are keeping this game alive, she will die without them.
spritely;-;Mods, which complete the game - basically, every Benethda game, became dirty. Thanks to Valve, I learned the reason why I should stop giving money to Steam, Valve. The whole gaming market is Valved.
ieatmp3s;-;0/10 Im not paying for mods.
[SG] Zephyrum, the Dragon Slayer;-;I'm all for supporting modders, but good lord this has been handled in just the worst way.
KillKrazy;-;Alas poor skyrim, I must have hardly knew you... After playing Skyrim on console for 200+ hours I was recommended to get it for Pc as modding changed the way the game could be played. So I rasied over 1500 to get a 'top notch' Pc to play it on, that was a year ago and after reasiling how good and strong the modding community was I thought this game was one of the best that id ever played (Im a heavy fan of Oblivion thou...) And after a long break from PC gaming in general I returned to find this..... Its just sad that one of the last forms of free and kind forums is getting 'snuffed' out of existance by cheap capitolism... May as well get the rest of the games students in the sweatshop to make weapon reskins and sell them for 0.20 each, as clearly the game has gone to . May as well make some ing money from it. I hear blender is getting mentioned quite alot on the main steam page, guess anyone can make money from anything. So lets see how good steams 'Quality control' is.
Haydn;-;Great game honestly, it really is however the only reason its been kept alive up to now is its community of modders. However now paid mods have been introduced and its ruining everything and if left uncheck will be implemented into other games and so the decline of PC gaming shall begin, this paid mod buisness needs to stomped out here and now before we have to start taking out loans just to get our precious horse genital mods.
JordanMaster;-;Y'all know why.
drexalparks;-;At one time the best games ever made but in current state no longer worth it :(
Ghostalker;-;Steam and bethesdas cash grab with paid mods is absolutely deplorable. Please boycott both companies.
drim;-;This kills the mods
Dr. Morgasmo;-;Not worth it
veeco;-;never needed to write a review for this game....the game spoke for itself. Honestly, this is probably the best game ever made with probably the best modding community in any game....ever. Now you change it so these mods are no longer free? nope im done. i will probably never buy another bethesda product again and its lucky that Valve doesnt make games or i wouldnt buy it. yeah i may only be hurting myself but if everyone feels this way and acts this way it will put an end to this .
Kyrox;-;Bethesda and Valve have teamed up and used this game to monetize and break the best thing PC gaming had, modding. They contacted some DOTA modders with zero idea of Skyrim modding, paid them to make a couple  models and put them for sale. Then they contacted a bunch of known Skyrim modders with zero legal knowledge, made them feel important and scammed them (just see the control chesko had left over HIS mods). They thought they were the important modders, the big prize, while being nothing but the bait for the rest of modders to bite and to accept the 25% they'd get. This movement takes content and patch releasing to a whole new level, because now developers have the incentive of releasing broken, empty games and wait for modders to fix and fill them while getting a on of money from it, while it's the modder's responsibility to keep the mod working and up to date and to deal with the angry "costumer". This movement has destroyed the "feel free to use, just give credit!" thinking, as free mods may depend on paid mods (Hello, SkyUI!) and viceversa. It has also made people take down from here and the nexus their mods fearing they will be ripped and uploaded as paid content by someone else, oh, and Valve wants US to make sure that doesn't happen, they won't even check them, they'll be too busy counting money and coming up with some other way of hurting their community. This is the worst move I've seen in the gaming history, Valve and Bethesda, you're now on pair with EA and Ubisoft, congratulations, I hope you make a lot of money with this, because I won't pay a cent more for any of your games. Don't give them even more money. Donate if you feel like you want to support the one that made some mod you like. DON'T pay for mods. Ever.
DesertSheep;-;Hello everybody am going to make this short as i can foe you, but i must say there is much epicness to this game to make this short so here we go. The game is Fun it has wonderful graphics better with mods i mean the mods make you feel like you are in the game that is if you get the right ones, anyway the game it self is so epic the quests, side missions, DRAGONS, shouts, magics, and factions, hell you can even pick a side in the war and fight it as a imperial or stormcloak aka the rebellion. The map btw is huge, and the all the DLC is great infact if you are going to get the game make sure to buy the legendary pack to get all the dlc. but like i said im not going to get into all the thing great about the game so just try it out trust me you love it. Sorry for any spelling issues im not the best at it thanks for reading hope it helps. \m/ (><) \m/
Landshavt;-;# Our Hero, our Hero claims a warrior's heart I tell you, I tell you the Dragonborn comes With a voice wielding power of ancient Nord Art Believe, believe the Dragonborn comes It's an end to the evil, of all Skyrim's foes Beware, beware the Dragonborn comes For the darkness has passed and the legend yet grows You'll know, you'll know Dragonborn's come. Dovahkiin Dovahkiin Naal ok zin los vahriin wah dein vokul mahfaeraak ahst vaal ahrk fin norok paal graan fod nust hon zindro zaan Dovahkiin fah hin kogaan mu draa
autist ogre | bobmarleyhats.info;-;I haven't even started the game yet because the title screen music is so glorious.
Delta.;-;ONE OF THE BEST ACTION/RPG GAMES EVER MADE !!! "Skyrim" brought new generation to that kind of games. It is so expandable with mods, and graphics make it even better. Real open world, and bajilions of quest makes that game EPIC ! I recommend it to fans and newcomers. IT WON'T BE BORING EVER !
Dorgarr;-;Many people will say that Skyrim is a perfect game, lots of people will say that the dedicated Modding Community perfected an imperfect game, unfortunately, the problem that I have with Skyrim cannot be modified without completely changing the entire game itself. Despite having a massive open world, thousands of quests to complete, and countless npcs with whom to interact, I can't help but think that Skyrim is a linear game. You don't really get many *REAL* choices. You can choose to join the Factions, Guilds, or Brotherhoods, but if you choose not to, you won't complete the game. You can choose what skills to level, but you won't be able to use the perks you want without leveling *everything*. However, it's your choice to not complete the game. You can choose who to kill and who to spare, but in the end, killing always yields the greatest rewards, the people you want to kill cannot be killed, and the people you want to spare will die eventually. Instead of being a Choose-Your-Own Adventure Book, with several different outcomes that can be reached through many different paths, Skyrim is a hefty Tome that gets better and better as you read, but will end the same way for everyone once they stop reading. The reader's only real "choice" is *when* to stop reading. That being said, Read on. Seriously. There is so much more to read.
Tacitus Flaeus;-;One does not simply play Skyrim for just an hour.
Showtekisbau5;-;Bought this game for $11 two days ago. Now its $5.49. Why you do this to me steam >:(
PizzaMindControl;-;I like killing people, if you do too I recommend Skyrim.
Blitz;-;Be Khajit. Have wears if they coin. Build huge house in the woods to store your wears with your coin. See nice werewolf woman. Join the companions to impress her. Get Skjor killed so you have no competition. Get stuck helping Kodlak. Kodlak dies, leaving Khajit Harbringer of the Compaions. Have nice merchant empire too. Go to Riften, adpot two kids and get Amulet of Mara. Woo Aela the Huntress. Get Married and have her move in. Come home from trading and the kid runs up. Kid's like, "Dad can I keep it?" Look down to see a fox growling at me. Get guilt tripped. Say "Fine." Have to see it's face and hear the fox growls everytime I get home. 10/10
Vyral \></;-;It's like Fallout with swords
Molotovs "Orko" Kalashnikovs;-;like skyrim with mountains
Diagonal_Fleece;-;Ahh, the Elder Scrolls. You can play this all day, every day. You can mod this game, or play it vanilla. There's also the option of moving around pots and bowls and making them talk to each other in neat voices, like *Mrs.Pot* "Oh Mr.Pot, you look ravishlingly fine today, what a handsome man!" *Mr.Pot* "Daaaammm gurl, you lookin F-UR-CE!" oh thats just me? 10/10 9/9 pheenominalll
Unstobbable Frisbee;-;Game is addictive as crack. Ruined my life for the better.
[CBZ] The Sheep Man;-;Best RPG ever!{/h1] -Fighting bandits -Urgurd the unbroken my follower dies - Cry 4 5 min -Kill bandits with all my rage -Quit game and go to workshop to find new follower -So many could not decide -Went back in game -Got bored -Downloaded dragonborn DLC -road a dragon -killed marikk -go back to skyrim and destroy the world with my dragons 11/10 would do it all again
The Hash Slinging Slasher;-;Paid mods have been removed, I can recommend this game again. Now add a donate button please. I will certainly donate to Skywind when it's completed (a complete recreation of Elder Scrolls III: Morrowind using the Skyrim engine) or any others I use. Oh, and even the devs for skywind weren't going to charge for their mod, according to their youtube channel. http://steamcommunity.com/games/SteamWorkshop/announcements/detail/208632365253244218?insideModal=0
Hugh Phamism;-;After the resolution of the "paid mods" debacle I can now endorse this game again. Enjoyable game. It's a solid game.
Mcardle;-;A really good game. But the fact that they now want to squeeze every last penny from my wallet through a pay wall of pay to play mods is just disgusting, i wouldn't mind if they added a "donate to the modder" button but the simple fact is the modder has been screwed over as have we all been.
jim_uk;-;A lesson on how to turn a good PC game into a mobile style microtransaction nightmare, vote with your wallet and stay well away from this.
Feluto;-;makes you pay for mods 10/10
Yorishimo;-;Be prepared for having to pay for every -piece of additional content, especially fand made mods (!!). Over are the times of a free modding community, here comes the monetization of creative freedom. GG Valve for total EA d*ick move.
[dongs]xo;-;This game has quite possibly the best modding community I've ever been involved with. Don't mess things up for the sake of more jew gold, how much ing money do you make off this game daily as it is? No matter how appealing you make payed mods, I promise you I will never delete anything from any game folder if I don't feel like it. If people want to be payed to make content like this, maybe they should ask Bethesda for money and not people who have already purchased the game and all the DLC. This  isn't going to fly Volvo, give up
Scoobz1961 !!Walter;-;From the creators of Horse Armor DLC come another brilliant invention. Paid mods provide all the sale of DLC with none of its cost on quality control. You can now support your favorite modders with 25% of money you pay. Look forward to on-disc day 1 mods and Humble Mods Bundle 1. Coming this summer. I rate this game 75% the mods cost
Werewolf Bar Mitzvah;-;The paid mod wall behind this game will kill the modding scene as a whole. Especially since the base game is just walking from A to B and killing bandits and draugrs along the way, only to get a quest to walk to C and kill more bandits and draugrs.
Admaa;-;Not as good as Oblivion in my opinion. & don't fancy paying for mods.
Dr.Badass;-;i LOVE this game but i hate that you have to pay for some mods
HD Nisslett [SWE];-;Skyrim is a good RPG/open world game. I have no problem paying for DLC this game. I do however NOT endorse that you should pay for mods.
NachocheeseNL;-;Great game, sad that Valve has dropped this low. G&G here I come!
bobthederpfish;-;I can now PAY to make EVERY DRAGON look like THOMAS THE TANK ENGINE and MACHO MAN RANDY SAVAGE WHAT A TIME TO BE ALIVE
thanks_obama;-;You have to pay for mods nuff said
matt-_dobbie;-;Booo to paid mods
hemmagodis;-;until 24 april 2015 skyrim fell to it's knee ( not by arrows) but by the "pay workshop items" and I loved skyrim until this day. when even i fell to my knees ( like bf hardline) and I lost fait in valve I've been playing skyrim 11.8 hours. but today im afraid that i'll wont continue to rise it. I have about 129 addons from workshop but Im afraid i wont modding my skyrim using steam workshop. I recommend this game but i cant put a thumb up or down becouse I love Skyrim and its mods. its hard to tell this but I put a thumb up becouse of this ( my opinion) a ebola virus making us pay for workshop items. now valve have made it easier for scamers to make money by uploading  addons and put a cost of 10-20 euros. and you'll could fell for this ( like trying to spin a pen) and you'll lose money becouse of valve's new "update". enough of these workshop sh*t and move on to how i recommend this game. Its open world. everybody like's a open world game. its first person. its third person. its contains magic. its contains dragons " it used to have free workshop" nice texture. awsome mods. Still i cant put a thumb up or down becouse I love this game. Its worth the money and if you whant mods go to nexus. and a message to valve ( i have freedom of speech)
horizonline;-;Because Bethesda try to destroy the free mod community! :(
Paragon.;-;As a "seasonsed" Elder Scrolls fan I have put thousands of hours into the series and Skyrim makes no exeption here. It is truely a beautiful world and game where you can lose countless hours exploring and crafting your own story line and perfect game and with the inclusion of free user generated content from strong supporters of the serious boasting my great talents, from quest making to armours, weapon and armour making and ENB and graphical improvements from both Steam Workshop and the Nexus the replay value for Skyrim has become infinite, this brings me to my latest tripe. As of 23rd of April, Steam workshop now has a new policy as many of you most likely have heard of, paid for mods. Like many other PC gamers this makes me worried about the future of the modding community as a whole. I've willingly donated to various mods that I've used time and time again and I've subscribed to the Nexus Pro account for over a year now, yet I do not feel comftable feeling forced to purchase user generated content for a game that already has thousands of free addtional content already. Vote with your wallets, mods should be made with love for the game not to make a quick buck. We've already seen mods being uploaded by people who didn't have anything to do with the original mod creation and piggy backing off the mods success elsewhere. This is a flawed system and Valve needs to know as a community we shouldn't have to stand for it.
[PP] Diddly Diddly Doo Jew;-;What can I say? So many other people summarised the amazing game Skyrim is. Right up until Valve started charging for mods. Do not purchase mods for this game, and instead, use the Skyrim Nexus.
UndeadTParty;-;All mods feel like horse armor now.
Lisa1162;-;Paid mods are not worth it. Mods by nature make the game unstable, and conflict with other mods. Just because you pay for it, does not mean you will recieve support for it. Even the best mods can conflict with other mods, and distroy your saved files. I for one, will not be buying Fallout 4, or what ever Bethesa makes, as long as this goes forward. This policy will get worse...
benj13;-;You know why.
matt-_dobbie;-;Booo to paid mods
hemmagodis;-;until 24 april 2015 skyrim fell to it's knee ( not by arrows) but by the "pay workshop items" and I loved skyrim until this day. when even i fell to my knees ( like bf hardline) and I lost fait in valve I've been playing skyrim 11.8 hours. but today im afraid that i'll wont continue to rise it. I have about 129 addons from workshop but Im afraid i wont modding my skyrim using steam workshop. I recommend this game but i cant put a thumb up or down becouse I love Skyrim and its mods. its hard to tell this but I put a thumb up becouse of this ( my opinion) a ebola virus making us pay for workshop items. now valve have made it easier for scamers to make money by uploading  addons and put a cost of 10-20 euros. and you'll could fell for this ( like trying to spin a pen) and you'll lose money becouse of valve's new "update". enough of these workshop sh*t and move on to how i recommend this game. Its open world. everybody like's a open world game. its first person. its third person. its contains magic. its contains dragons " it used to have free workshop" nice texture. awsome mods. Still i cant put a thumb up or down becouse I love this game. Its worth the money and if you whant mods go to nexus. and a message to valve ( i have freedom of speech)
horizonline;-;Because Bethesda try to destroy the free mod community! :(
Paragon.;-;As a "seasonsed" Elder Scrolls fan I have put thousands of hours into the series and Skyrim makes no exeption here. It is truely a beautiful world and game where you can lose countless hours exploring and crafting your own story line and perfect game and with the inclusion of free user generated content from strong supporters of the serious boasting my great talents, from quest making to armours, weapon and armour making and ENB and graphical improvements from both Steam Workshop and the Nexus the replay value for Skyrim has become infinite, this brings me to my latest tripe. As of 23rd of April, Steam workshop now has a new policy as many of you most likely have heard of, paid for mods. Like many other PC gamers this makes me worried about the future of the modding community as a whole. I've willingly donated to various mods that I've used time and time again and I've subscribed to the Nexus Pro account for over a year now, yet I do not feel comftable feeling forced to purchase user generated content for a game that already has thousands of free addtional content already. Vote with your wallets, mods should be made with love for the game not to make a quick buck. We've already seen mods being uploaded by people who didn't have anything to do with the original mod creation and piggy backing off the mods success elsewhere. This is a flawed system and Valve needs to know as a community we shouldn't have to stand for it.
[PP] Diddly Diddly Doo Jew;-;What can I say? So many other people summarised the amazing game Skyrim is. Right up until Valve started charging for mods. Do not purchase mods for this game, and instead, use the Skyrim Nexus.
Lisa1162;-;Paid mods are not worth it. Mods by nature make the game unstable, and conflict with other mods. Just because you pay for it, does not mean you will recieve support for it. Even the best mods can conflict with other mods, and distroy your saved files. I for one, will not be buying Fallout 4, or what ever Bethesa makes, as long as this goes forward. This policy will get worse...
benj13;-;You know why.
Loki;-;Paid mods are the worst thing that has happened to the PC games industry in a long time, and Bethesda's support of these practices is indefensible. If i could go back in time and not buy this game I would. The 130 odd hours I put into this game were not nearly enjoyment enough to make up for this. They should be ashamed of themselves and we as consumers must not stand for this.
sYs85;-;The game itself is good but be warned you have to pay for certain user-created mods. What's next? Let's not support this madness by voting with our wallets.
MyShaftOfJusticeInYourMouth;-;I really enjoy the game. If it is the base game that you want, I recommend. If you are into modding it, be aware of the paid mods! there will still be free mods but not for long. This causes me to downvote the game, They are getting greedy and make us pay for what should be free as it always has been.
jhibdon;-;i spend about 1000-2000 $ a year on games i have 1 uplay game(by accident) no origin games and never will,i have no problem boycotting companies/services that show me they are anti-consumer and no i dont pirate. this changes or no more bethesda games for me as well as ceasing to buy ANY games on steam once my steam wallet balance runs out.
A Spring Breeze;-;How long until we have to pay for bug fixes and unnoficial patches, too?
iAMspecial;-;An OK game. Better with mods, but since they're locked behind a pay wall I cannot recommend this game.
I.S.I.S> Codename: Dutchess;-;Valve is pulling a horrible move by introducing Paid mods, it will damage the modding community and pit them against each other where cheerful cooperation had been the norm. A very very fun game with one of the best modding communities (OUTSIDE OF STEAM) Ever. I actually have never finished the storyline and just get lost/emerged in the world.
Bad Horse;-;Paid mods are a disturbing trend.
esten.langlie;-;Can't recomment until paid mods are removed. I'm in favor of allowing donations to mod creators with the correct system in place to ensure that the real modder is rewarded.
CisWhiteMale;-;I'll start by saying that Skyrim is a Fantastic game. But paying for mods is the dumbest thing since "It's Friday" and that was pretty dumb. Dont pay for mods.
Cheeky Little Duck;-;I'm not paying 50 cents for a sword
Mal Content;-;What can I say about Skyrim? It is a game with lots of potential, most of it unrealized. Thankfully the modding community helps the game be all it can be, and more. That is, until Bethesda and Valve decided to wreck the modding community with paid mods. I have been through about 1000 mods in my time with Skyrim. I cannot imagine how much money that would have cost me had they been paid mods. Actually, I know exactly how much it would cost me, $0. I am sad to see what is most likely the end of a thriving mod community.
DarthTK421;-;Valve has failed us all. Do not buy this game or the mods for it.
Markal;-;One of the things that kept Skyrim going and relevant for so many years was it modding community! Considering the fact that the mods are behinds a paywall now , you shouldn't buy skyrim! You would now have to pay for skyrim + the mods tolerable. Your money is better spent on newer games instead of trying to fix this with paid mods
Kloud;-;I had written a review previously for this game stating that it was a rather good game, but made exceptional by the modding community. Now Bethesda and Valve have betrayed myself and the entire fanbase by monetising mods for their own twisted interests. This is a destruction of a once superb game, this is why I am down voting this game now, because I want to see them burn for their reckless actions toward their very own fans; they have heaped up the funeral pyres, now allow me to light it. If you're reading this review, and own this game, I urge you to write a negative review too, allow this fire to spread and amalgamate into a great blaze. If you're reading this because you're interested in purchasing the game, then do not, this game has began its fall, and fall it will; very far indeed.
Lieutenant Raccoon;-;Do not recommend.
ComradConnor;-;Paid mods, early access introductory priced mods, overpriced microtransaction mods.
Maedrak;-;A half-decegame whose only redemption is the plethora of free third-party-content to remedy the otherwise buggy, half-finished, soulless, and lackluster world... now with microtransactions to purchase said third-party-content where the suits keep 70% to 100% of the profit for doing 0% of the work (apart from the buggy, inconsistent, half-working mess of a distribution system that is the steam workshop). Worse still, the third-party-content has no quality control, no checks to prevent theft and sale of others work, or any kind of a guarantee that the content will actually work, and if so, continue to work once you can no longer get your money back. Even worse than that, Valve/Bethesda stated that this is to "support" the modders even though the modder only receives a maximum of 25% of profits providing that their mod accrues at least $400 of profit. With those restrictions, all this will support is buggy, half-finished, soulless, lackluster content, with an unreasonable pricetag to boot. Wait a minute, that sounds familiar... Oh, but it's all optional, many say in response. To which I say, it is... for now, but if you stand idly by while blatant exploitation occurs for the benefit of making a few extra bucks at the cost of tearing an entire community apart, you can guarantee that things will only get worse. Less support for free mods, mayhap... perhaps even no support. And this will spread to other games in the same way that pathetic DLC did. Do you like endorsed day 1 DLC which companies are obligated to fix if it doesn't work? Get ready for third-party day 1 DLC that will inevitably break and never be fixed due to no obligations, and you won't get your money back. Didn't like having to wait for modders to patch Bethesda's games before? Get ready for big companies being even more lazy in their game development because "The modders will fix it for us AND net us more money in the process." It seems that companies want the players to develop their games for them while simultaneously paying the companies to do it. TL;DR Paid mods are the bane of one of the greatest aspects of PC gaming. Take DLC, multiply it by hundreds or even thousands, remove all quality control, add an abundance of intellectual property theft, remove all guarantees of functionality and compatibility, and on top of that, possibly and quite likely remove any chance of a free alternative with the establishment of a monopoly on third-party content (that is purchase-only) in the future, and you will have paid-mods. If people give even an inkling of interest in this, it WILL spread, and we will have to kiss the days of being able to fix and improve our favorite games without simultaneously exploiting our very own friends and colleagues for the benefit of faceless, greedy corporations in our actions goodbye.
ShushKebab;-;I didn't ask for this.
Rafin;-;This is by far the "Prettiest" of the Elder Scrolls series to date. This is not saying a whole lot considering what it is up against. The gameplay is riddled with bugs and glitches that while not always game breaking, do come very close. The story is well thought out for most of the game but then suddenly ends. The sidequests are standard brainless go here do X formulated content substitutes. The overall control scheme is broken and hard to navigate with a mouse and keyboard as it was obviously ported from a console. With all of that out of the way... most of the shortcomings of this game were either fixed or softened by several great mods that were created. I somehow doubt that the quality of content will be on par with what it has been due to this new paid mod system. I can't blame Valve, they are in fact a company. And companies are established to make money. I do however hold them accountable for the soon to follow  storm of inferior cash grab mods. This is right up there with some of the horible titles that the Greenlight and early access cash grabs have allowed in. This game is going to be shelved for now, I will at least be able to say I got my money's worth out of it before this change.
Avery;-;I have to pay for mods now!!?!???!!  This.
Dr. Bowling;-;I do not recomend this game at all! It crashes when i try to start it and the instructions on the Bethesda website are useless! Im giving this review until someone helps me with this issue. Please message me if you have a solution.
Fenar;-;Developers did a great job on this game. Trying to milk 75% out of mod sales? Well, that's just disgusting.
Flenzil;-;Taking people's mods, selling them with no quality control and taking 75% of the profit does not a good review make.
Gravvy;-;Paid mods? Haha, no. Will not be re-installing.
DOCTOR MURDER;-;Great game but paid mods are ridiculous.
Johnny Depth;-;As of right now, I cannot recommend this game while the current Workshop system is in place. I also do not recommend buying other Valve or Bethesda games until this change has been reversed and mind you this is coming from a HUGE fan of both franchises. Skyrim is an amazing game and is definitely a must buy at a discounted price, however due to recent events of Valve/Bethesda having the bright idea of allowing community made mods to be sold on the Steam Workshop has changed my view of the game entirely. Since this system has been put in place some modders have shown their true colors of greed by refusing to update their "free" mods and other people stealing free mods from 3rd party sites and selling them on the Workshop while Valve/Bethesda turn a blind eye. Money has corrupted the modding community and Valve/Bethesda are to blame. Do not support this system as it only hurts the modding community and will more than likely hurt future games like TES:VI and Fallout 4.
xXxSwagMastaxXx;-;Posting this as a protest, I do NOT support this latest introduction of a system that monetized modmaking.
[KNG]DasKapital;-;You blew it Gabe..
Axeplay;-;This game is pretty good. It used to be amazing a few days ago when you could customize every facet of it to your hearts content without having to spend more money other than the initial purchase. Now they are charging what has made this game stand out above all others for the past four years, and it really takes away from the experience in my opinion. Enjoy getting nickel and dimed to death for numerous changes that improve quality of life and bugs that slipped past the developers.
Nmaster52;-;I am very sad to say this, mainly cause this is one of my very favorite games EVER, but I cannot recommend this game now that lord GabeN has ok'ed the autism called "paid mods"
Midol;-;You have to pay for mods now. GG Valve.
Enchman;-;Liked the game. Dislike the new mod cash grab.
valetudomma;-;The availability of mods is responsible for about 90% of my time played. I will never pay for a single one.
Sauron;-;I AINT PAYING FOR NO MOD YA S!
Kimmyboy;-;Welcome to massive pile of user created crap DLCs. R.I.P mod community
Axeplay;-;This game is pretty good. It used to be amazing a few days ago when you could customize every facet of it to your hearts content without having to spend more money other than the initial purchase. Now they are charging what has made this game stand out above all others for the past four years, and it really takes away from the experience in my opinion. Enjoy getting nickel and dimed to death for numerous changes that improve quality of life and bugs that slipped past the developers.
Nmaster52;-;I am very sad to say this, mainly cause this is one of my very favorite games EVER, but I cannot recommend this game now that lord GabeN has ok'ed the autism called "paid mods"
Midol;-;You have to pay for mods now. GG Valve.
Enchman;-;Liked the game. Dislike the new mod cash grab.
valetudomma;-;The availability of mods is responsible for about 90% of my time played. I will never pay for a single one.
Dr. Amazapan;-;Paid. Mods.
Sauron;-;I AINT PAYING FOR NO MOD YA S!
Kimmyboy;-;Welcome to massive pile of user created crap DLCs. R.I.P mod community
renoptimus;-;winter is coming
[CLS]_Zanroth;-;Skyrim was fun game but with a large amount of bugs and some very poorly implemented user interface features, game was also pretty short and easy. With Mods you could fix almost all the bugs and repair your UI add immersion more quests more replayability more character customization better graphics etc... With paid mods someone like me who uses 90 mods I would need to spend about 200-400$ for the mods I use.... Skyrim Vanilla 6/10 Skyrim with mods 10/10 Skyrim with paid mods 0/10
KOLERMOS /CZ/;-;WHAT?! Paid mods?! That ing little fat greedy  Gaben and his "Valve" don't have enough of money yet?! I know, I'm not playing Skyrim anymore (I stopped playing it something about two months ago) and I was always downloading mods only from Nexus, but this?! THIS IS ROBBERY!!!! I'm not going to pay for anything from these greedy pieces of  anymore!!!! And then there is Bethesda - "Game developing studio" (They consider themselves as that), which can't even repair the smallest bug in their ing totally bugged game, but when Valve offers them paid mods, of course, they will agree!!! You still didn't realised that THE MODS are making your game playable yet?!! THE MODS are making your "GAME" A REAL GAME!!!! And the modders are making you look smarter and more handier in making games?! Dear friends! Join the petition! Over 100 000 people signed already... https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop?just_created=true #FreeTheWorkshop #Valve #ThatLittleFatGaben :riften:
Cactus;-;"Vanilla Skyrim: 7/10. Skyrim with mods: 11/10. Skyrim after paid mods: 0/10."
HlemGuard;-;The first mod vending machine - not recommended. Use nexus if you want to mod this game.
Huche'er;-;A dull, bland game that can only be made fun with mods; a perfect example of a mod sandbox. Now thanks to Valve and Bethesda you have to pay for those mods and they take 75% of the money from the mods.
Barbaric Squirrel;-;You now pay for mods. The game is 10/10 but Bethesda and Valve are getting greedy and are ruining it for everyone. Dont support that trend.
Vunter Slaush;-;Fawk you Valve, and fawk you Bathesda. I would come back to this awesome game from time to time, just for the mods. Now you make me pay for it, and i'm not doing that. Basically means i won't be playing this game anymore. Can't enjoy it without mods. Thank you for taking this game away from me.
Shit Tier Dota 2 Player;-;I used to be a Skyrim player. Until I took a paywall to the knee.
meraco;-;I cannot positively endorse this product as steam tries to implement a Pay for Mods money grab...
DrTuring;-;Paid mods. I refuse to support the practice.
spede;-;Mods make this game and now that they will cost you money, Skyrim ain't worth it anymore.
McPlow;-;Bad move bethesda. Bad move steam. Paid mods is just rediculous. Listen to your players. Thats right, the people that bought your game. Supported your game and made it better. Made it more than what you ever intended it to be. The players who gave you their money and made your game a number 1! Change it to a donate button.
Ninelight;-;Bethesda is trying to charge gamers for content they didn't create themselves.
mCap;-;I do not recommend this game since Bthesda implemented paid mods. FIGHT MY BROTHERS!
Turtleman;-;If this paid mod thing stays, you are encouraging game developers to make  broken games which modders will then fix and the developers get paid for it by doing nothing, modders will be doing what dev teams are supposed to be doing. Don't encourage developers to be lazy with their games.
5150;-;Was a great game however modding was a large reason for that and with paid mods, it's not worth it.
Sedge;-;not paying for mods. nope nope nope. greedy bethesda shame on you.
Juketsu;-;Heavily depended on modding. In other words it is really unfinished game. But hey, the community will fix it for you. For a price.
Tupac Shakur;-;Vanilla Skyrim 8/10 Skyrim with mods 12/10 Skyrim with paid mods 0/10
JanTenner;-;Just saying no thanks to paid mods before it infests games like garry's mod.
ProxyCat;-;The only thing that was keeping this game alive was modding but now that it's gone there's no reason to play this mediocre game, go get Morrowind or Oblivion, remember playing them in 2002 and 2006, realise how long ago was that, feel nostalgia and finally get disappointed in life.
Joeoeo;-;Free Mods are keeping this game alive, she will die without them.
spritely;-;Mods, which complete the game - basically, every Benethda game, became dirty. Thanks to Valve, I learned the reason why I should stop giving money to Steam, Valve. The whole gaming market is Valved.
ieatmp3s;-;0/10 Im not paying for mods.
[SG] Zephyrum, the Dragon Slayer;-;I'm all for supporting modders, but good lord this has been handled in just the worst way.
Tupac Shakur;-;Vanilla Skyrim 8/10 Skyrim with mods 12/10 Skyrim with paid mods 0/10
sara_bear;-;I waited what seemed like forever for this to go on sale. Yes it was worth the wait. And yes I should have just ponyed up sooner. Completely worth the asking price. Awsome game.
M23;-;After the introduction of Paid Mods, I cannot and will not reccomend this game. I've gotten an immense amount of fun from this game, but I will not allow this kind of marketing BS to continue. I'm so dissapointed in Valve. Never Again.
Shadow;-;Pay to Mod. No thanks!
hl2.exe;-;Paid Mods are an awful idea.  you, Valve and Bethesda.
InferiorBaton;-;Paying for mods?? Thanks Obama.
Andy99000;-;The game itself was, as many other poeple said, very fun. All the content of the vanilla game isn't enough to keep me interested and on my toes about it. Certain mods that I got from the Nexus site gave me what I was looking for. Chesko's Frostfall and Wearable Lanterns. Persied9's Realistic Needs and Diseases. DragonSong's Hunterborn. Heck, even an Unoffical Patch by Unoffical Patch Project Team fixes most bugs that Bethesda didn't care to. All of these add life and meaning to the game, make me feel like There's more to skyrim than just back and forth fast travel. Now you're telling me that I am to pay for Bethesda's lack of ingenuity and creativity? I don't think so. I agree with the masses to have a donate button where we can donate any amount pleased and 100% of the donation goes to them. For people who don't know, the "pay4mods" policy makes it where 25% of the proceeds go to the mod creator, and the other 75% to Valve. This is absolutely rediculous. People looking for a money will tell people who go to the Nexus that this is a Steam Workshop exclusive. Thank goodness Nexus still listens to the community and doesn't charge for mods. Although I would normally recommend this game and tell you to go get mods to fill in the holes, I highly recommend against it as this option is no longer availble due to Valve's Moneylust. I intend to download no more mods until this issue gets resolved. You have no pity from me, people who create mods and put it on the Steam Workshop. No Pity. And to Valve, My utter disappointment for ever stooping so low to earn money. May this game Rest in Peace, for it is going to die very quickly.
Count Summon;-;A line has been crossed since the introduction of paid mods. For full information on this topic, please consult your local search engine.
Alia;-;While Skyrim is an excellent game despite any flaws or miss-steps, the recent introduction of pay for mods has lowered the value of the PC version immensely and is a scary concept for future games.
Layer;-;Since DLC is on the way out, I guess it was inevitable that someone would try to monetize mods. If the idea of "supporting modders" or "breathing new life into Skyrim" is what you were hoping for, then get ready for dissapointment. The new pay-for Workshop items is a cancerous addition to Steam's already dimming reputation and Bethesda's desperate attempts to earn a quick buck off of other people's work. Modders who use the system not only see 25% of ALL income from it, but may have their mods stolen, reused or plagarized on a lawless "first come, first served" content system. Valve and Bethesda have mad e the decision to divide the community in half and force the community to move towards the broken Steam Workshop system for Skyrim. Already there's mods removed from the Nexus in either protest or in order to force users to pay for half-functional, minor mods that charge too much for what they offer. No one has profited from this change, and the players who wish to play Skyrim, the game that was *Idolized* for its modding scene, are the biggest losers in this colossal failure of a move. We haven't seen Valve blunder this hard since Greenlight first went up. Do not support Valve or Bethesda making money off other people's work. This kind of nickel and diming, like pre-orders and DLC is what is poisoning modern gaming. Skyrim is only the first.
Johnny Joestar;-;You can pay 3.35 for a good review, Bethesda.
Brinny;-;It's mediocre at everything and was cool mainly for modding potential. The mod scene has been killed so now it's not worth playing anymore.
Sgt. Stynk;-;Payed mods.
-GLOY- OGUE;-;paid mods. Everyone else said why so I'm just gonna leave it at this.
{P.U.K.E.}ultratroop;-;valve really pay wall for mods? and the 25% goes to the author, the person who has spent hours of thier free time to put something up and if they don't get 400 dollars from the mod you and bethesda get all the money. i thought you were better than this.
konigoflag;-;Paid Mods are outrageous
Lastanh;-;To pay for mods ? Give money to people who do not do their job, and do not deserve this money ? No, thanks. Skyrim vanilla is quite good, Skyrim with mods is possibly a perfect game... only if you can try several mods, to find your own perfect game. What is now impossible.
Tarsh @ CSGO Nacho;-;Pay for mods? Why do you think I purchased Skyrim on my pc in the first place? Mods.
haygrae;-;This game was entirely dependent upon the free and open modding community. The paywall ruins the game.
swalife;-;No paid mods.
eracer;-;This positive review mod will cost $$$.
ShadowStealer7;-;I would have said that this was a great game (it is) but Bethesda and Valve have really ruined it with the paid mod fiasco. MODS ARE MEANT TO BE FREE, THEY ARE NOT DLC!
fucking_magnets;-;Paid mods are not okay.
JanTenner;-;Just saying no thanks to paid mods before it infests games like garry's mod.
incognegro;-;I was about to start a new game of Skyrim when my ex gf, who broke my heart, called me to tell me she had been in a horrible car accident. She apologized for hurting me and told me if I came to see her in the hospital we could get back together, I'm really conflicted. Should I choose Elf, Breton, or Argonian?
Portponky;-;This game is easy, you can win by punching everything in the face.
Captain Stardog Muad'Dib;-;My 400+ hours in game ought to say something about the vastness of the game world and the wisdom of paying whatever this game currently costs to play it. Even in Morrowind, I think I never spent more than 120 hours total. I've played Daggerfall, Morrowind, and now this game and the MMO beta in the franchise. Every time the Elder Scrolls takes a step forward, it seems to lose some things that made me a fan of the series earlier on, while expanding upon others--for better or worse. I miss the ability to buy a sailing ship, to craft any sort of spell (even levitation), and to make any sort of class I wanted. I don't like that you can simply be just about everything to everyone if you follow all the different quest lines to completion. I don't like that you have to choose between two sides that suck in a war in order to enjoy certain added benefits and plotlines. I find it irritating (SPOILER ALERT) that the imperials should be such a bland bunch of lackeys led by someone who apparently has real virtue--until you assasinate him, while the other side seems like a good bunch of warriors led by such an uninspiring, self-important primadonna. I especially find it irritating that although you can be all things to all people in all plotlines, with the one exception of being forced to choose between two equally uninspiring sides, the one thing you can never be is ruler, no matter what you do. You can kill dragons, and even emperors, but you cannot do anything to become ruler of Skyrim. Seems kind of silly to me. Okay, so maybe Skyrim would never welcome an Argonian to rule over them... but if we're going to play the reality card, well, there's a lot lacking in the major plotlines in that respect. I also don't like that you're forced into a few things that I find personally detestable once you initiate a given quest. I wouldn't recommend letting anyone under 18 play this game either as there are too many mature moments. Even so, with all its glaring faults, this has been my favorite game in the series to date. I whole-heartedly recommend it to anyone who enjoys fantasy rpg's.
dorbein;-;Pretty good.
Matok;-;I won't be changing my review to positive now that they've dropped the idea of making us pay set minimums for mods. They need some reminder that it was a really dumb idea. That, and they've likely done some lasting damage to this community. I bet there are modders who were on either side of the fence of the paid mod issue that won't be coming back after this mess. They didn't have to leave this nasty scar on one of the best games of it's time, but they did so they could get a fat chunk o cash. At least Valve can say they had an excuse for trying to take a 30% chunk since they host the Workshop and that costs money, but Bethesda wanting 45% for doing absolutly NOTHING and acting like they were doing modders a favor just makes me want to vomit. I swear, companies will try to monetize anything now a days. ~~~ Gotten hundreds of hours of play time out of this game, so I'd say they I got my money's worth of enjoyment. One of the best features of any of the Elder Scrolls series has been the open modding, which has really extended the life of Skyrim. When many games this old have done been forgotten, Skyrim was still going very strong. It's what kept me playing long after I would have put it down for the last time. But now that's come to an end. Bethesda's "brilliant" idea to profit off of thousands of people who do not work for them is just sickening. Their game is already a huge success because of the modders, but that isn't enough, now they want to try to drain money out of other people's creativity directly. This would be completely different if the money went to the modders, and ONLY to the modders, where it should go. The modders do not work for Bethesda, why should they get money for content they had no part in creating? This also completely changes what the drive to mod is. It goes from people doing something they love doing for a game and community they love, to people trying to put as little effort in as they can to get a quick buck. Mods have already vanished from the Steam Workshop and from the Nexus because the truly creative individuals are afraid their work will be ripped off and reposted by someone wanting to cash in. And they're right to be afraid of that. This is the biggest blunder I've seen any AAA gaming studio make in a while now. I can not support a AAA company trying to make big profits off of the modding community, expecially after the huge success if their game is already attributed in large to that modding community. If Skyrim never had supported mods, it would have been forgotten in less than a year and never would have gone on to have 3 DLCs and a Legendary version rerelease. So, in light of these events, I can not recommend this game to anyone from this day forward.
SirSlitherySnake;-;skyrim should have its name changed to casual
Soto;-;Yes, I'll be more then happy to buy a $100 mod for a horses .
Demonic Howitzer;-;The game is amazing, this game is epic, the games mods were the best thing in the universe and why it was always one of the best sandbox games around Now mods are going behind a paywall, now Steam is creating a new DLC nightmare, how dare you attempt to kill the modding community in one foul swoop Do NOT buy this game, Do NOT Buy games on Steam anymore untill this is fixed. Steam - You are dissappoint. 4/27 - We Won, Review Stays, I am and always will be disappointed that V and B tried to pull this.
Maximus_Ride;-;Now that paid mods are done with I've decided to update my review. I give Valve and Bethesda major credit for admitting they messed up and changing their stance on this entire situation. But my rating stays. I am throughly disapointed in both company's for trying to cash in what was a thriving and helpful community. Now that community has been thourghly fractured, and it is going to take a long time to repair itself, if it ever does. Giving moders only 25% of the final profit was a sleezy move on both company's parts, especially when a lot of mods attempt to fix something the developer was to lazy to do. I used to dream about eventually working for Bethesda as a carrer, now I'm looking towards other company's for a dream job. So unless Bethesda manages to attempt to make it up to gamers with their next release, I highly doubt I will be purchasing their next product.
svr;-;Paid mods. Bethesda - one of the first developers starting to kill modding. Scumbags. Otherwise a decent-ish game I guess. EDIT: Greedy corporate suits were caught in the act their pants down and now mods are free again. It's most likely these suits are clueless as they brought us Horse Armor DLC.
Insignificant;-;-EDIT: They have removed the paywall on mods but i aint removing my review simply because: 1. This could have been avoided if they reached out to the community for feedback before trying to force this 2. Going to serve as a reminder, from their response seems like they might try to implement it again or in future games 3. Stock game without mods is a garbage port. Read the review and find out why ---------------------------------------------------------------------- Paywall on mods? PAYWALL ON MODS? For this console port with poor support and implementations? And even game mechanics that were rushed for release and are a letdown by default, like for example dragon fighting which is supposed to be the unique element of this game? The mods are what FIXED this game ,made it playable, and overall made it what it is...and now not only they are promoting paywalls on them as DLCs instead of donations, but the modders are only gonna get 25% too? They have the nerve to ask for this so...wall of rant incoming. First of all let me say that I, as probably plenty of other people, know about the extend of the problems this game has BUT we were willing to look away, as this game has an extensive lore and storyline that is truly immersive and the modding community helped with plenty of the problems. I would have never bought this game or even recommend it to anyone without the mods available With that being said and not willing to look away now, i dont even know where to begin to describe how bad the stock game is. The combat system is repetetive, and halfway through the game nothing is challenging anymore in any aspect cause you become COMPLETELY overpowered even on the highest difficulties. You might be sneaking and the enemy would be pushing against you searching for you (blind and without a sense of touch?) and at the same time you could be a tanky hulk mammoth completely dominating cause the only reason you would sneak anyway is to try and add depth to the gameplay yourself. Dont get me started on the dragons, its like they are suicidal. The biggest challenge is getting around the mentally challenged followers/npcs blocking your path with their bodybuilder stance. Plenty of that is fixed up with MODS, including the not-thought-through skill tree and crafting system. BUT we aint discussing em yet, we are talking about stock product. Now you might say well theres lots of lore to go around. Well yes until you get fed up from the fetching repetitive chore quests that every storyline has as its starting point til about half of its length. And that means tons of loading screens. Even between rooms! And i dont want to point fingers but its obvious its because of consolitis. And that brings us to the technical part and the (lack of) support of this game. If you remove vsync it distorts the timeline of the game and npc schedule (even with the 60fps cap), and if you uncap the fps beyond the 60fps limit it breaks the physics of the game. Not only you have to play at max 60fps, but also with the atrocious input lag from vsync! (There are mods that help remedy the situation a bit lowering the input lag) Theres no FOV option, no proper high-res textures, the menus are horrible, including the dialog menus in which your mouse might as well be gimmick cause apparently the game decides to select another option plenty of times instead of the one you were obviously pointing at! Theres no proper optimization, the ultra graphics arent even that ultra since you can tweak them even more through the ini files and obviously they didnt bother enough researching about it and that stuff is just the tip of the iceberg but whatever i could beat this to death. At this point what we have here is not just a console port, but also lack of support. In fact theres so many bugs that the modding community had to release unofficial patches to fix this mess (and the DLC mess) This is not a polished, proper PC game with continued support from the developer, but the exact opposite The only reason this game is even still RELEVANT is the modding community Now Bethesda/valve see that and had the ingenious plan of promoting the mods as DLCs with paywall. And only 25% of the profits will go to the modders. If they truly wanted to support modders they would pay them themselves for finishing up the game! At this point cosmetic mods are irrelevant. BY THAT LOGIC, mods are required to patch the game and they are putting a paywall on it as DLC? And on top of that give only 25% to the ones who did the job? THEIR JOB? Also the majority of the mods REQUIRE you to have a handful of other mods so you could end up breaking your bank before you even get to the cosmetics. And judging by the prices you will end up paying multiple times the full price of the game! Mods also can break after patches or have conflicts between them, but modders have no obligation to fix them. But theres mods for fixing mods conflicting with other mods. I cant even... Marketing them as DLC doesnt make any sense. Seriously who in their right mind thought this was a good idea? The spawn of evil? It would be a whole different story if it was a donation style (as it already is on the community sites) with +75% going to the modders when they deserve it cause they are what sells the extra copies anyway...instead of promoting a paywall. But now with this ATTITUDE they want to infect also our modding community too by luring em into stealing each others work or making early access mods and flooding the workshop for a quick buck The bottom line is, its promoting laziness for developers while they cash in through the work of the modders to finish their product, and its not just a cashgrab, but a disease which wants to spread on as many games as possible I aint gonna support this, and neither should you.-
Otter Chaos;-;Everyone in the world has played this game by now, but just in case someone has missed it somehow, Skyrim is a great game. No, really. Just play it. Huge tracts of land, dragons, treasure, old men in robes, it's all here, and more. Go!
aGoMDolE;-;this game has unlimitted number of dlcs was.
DoppleDog;-;Edit: Gonna keep this review here even though the policy has since been reverted, just as a reminder. Valve should really just add an optional 'donate' button to the mod page and be done with this paid mods nonsense. Seems bad for modders and gamers alike. Personally, I'd never pay for a mod and I can't see myself buying a game who had this business model in place. 10/10 Satans
The_Kid;-;Paid Mods... Thats all... Oh how the Mighty fall...
incognegro;-;I was about to start a new game of Skyrim when my ex gf, who broke my heart, called me to tell me she had been in a horrible car accident. She apologized for hurting me and told me if I came to see her in the hospital we could get back together, I'm really conflicted. Should I choose Elf, Breton, or Argonian?
Michael De Santomak;-;My review for The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim: - Various races with their different abilities (you can even become a cat or a lizard too). You can be a boy or a gurl (and I'm not Prof. Oak). - A lot of quests (really guys, maybe I can finish most of unrepeatable quests, but by the time i've done that, i probably spent more than 1000 hours. - The map is vast, a lot of point of interest, and by the time you unlock every one of them, your map's gonna be full and heavier. duh. - Travel Skyrim as the mighty dragonborn, a warrior who can master every kind of weapons and magic, and also have a dragon blood running through your veins, Which is nice. Oh, and you can also shout with the dragon language. So you can curse people without them understand it. Because two things, one, they literally don't understand what you're saying, two, they're probably dead, cuz dragon language rulez. FUS RO DAH. - Even though you are destined to be the mighty dragonborn, you can, and you should seek part-time job. You can be a blacksmith, potion or poison brewer, equipment enchanter, whatever that is. - You can join a group of mercenaries, magic nerds, bunch of kleptomaniacs, or fraternity of murderer. Oh, you can also become vampires, or against them (Blade will be proud), and have your own castle (you have to share with your fellow hobos, though. - Oh, and you can marry, too. Good for you, forever alone. - You can drag dead bodies whenever you want, throw junk whenever you want, and the guard still ignoring you. - This game is moddable, original is great, with mods, no question asked. 9/10
Ana;-;Truly Epic!
Portponky;-;This game is easy, you can win by punching everything in the face.
(GoR)Andrew.zhd;-;The perfect game to make an epic journey. Will suit many playstyles and player preferences, and most likely even excel it in the process. Of course I recommend it, it's obviously one of the best RPGs ever out there! P.S.: ...Just installed it again and played for like 4 hours without a break. Damn it, it's so immersive!
Maverick;-;I tend to be wordy in reviews, trying to outline my thoughts, be fair and also objective. This will be no exception. Bear with me. I come into RPG a total noob and what I decree here might, for some, prove my noobness. Most probably in fact. As a staunch strategy/sim gamer of many years, RPG never really interested me so my adventure into Skyrim came as quite a surprise. In my view, despite it's "used by date" having well and truly expired, Skyrim deserves some very serious accolades. At nearly 100 hours played, I'm still coming to grips that I can play this almost like a sandbox (with the Hearthfire DLC) and just be a simple "villager" who relies on hunting, gathering or even small levels of agriculture to sustain myself. Or I can be a hero. As I write, my level 16 char (it's my 3rd start OK!) slays dragons, gargoyles and vampires. He can shout an army of sword wielding skeletons into piles of bones. I can wander willy-nilly, all over the map, mixing it up with bears, wolves and sabre-tooth tigers. There is so, so much to do and see that without the "fast-travel" option or a good horse it would take hundreds of hours just to explore the map. I'm intrigued by the depth and detail of the world and I think this will get 300-400 or more hours because I have so much yet to do and see long before I get anywhere near "endgame". I often stop and setup my character - keeping on eye on the rule of thirds - with awesome backdrops and scenery for some holiday snaps. I often walk everywhere, instead of using the fast options, just to soak it all in! I even have some pretty amazing screenshots if I must say so. As an "Enigma" music genre fan of many years, the music in the background of this is sublime. It so often sets either a wonderous emotion or a sense of danger at just the right time, so much so, that immersion into this pixelated fantasy world is absolutely complete. As I write, I've finally married the lovely Ysolda, Lydia is my Steward and my poorly residence (mansion?) at Lakeview Manor is looking rather stately. It is disappointing that much of the furniture and fittings are nothing more than eye-candy. Even my long, 8 seater dining room table never gets used. Well. I don't have to eat do I? For that matter, even sleep appears totally optional. There are quite a few other peeves too. - Clipping and FOV can be atrocious at times. Trying to shoot a fast moving dragon with bow and arrow. Lordy lord. - Tight tunnels and corners where followers jam you up, you can't see or they just get in the way. I even killed my follower once in a fit of rage as she stood dumbly by while I was getting zapped by some dude with a cattle prod. "GET OUT OF MY WAY LYDIA DAMMIT!!" I yelled one day, much to the mirth of my wife (my real one). - Inventory items. I'd be the first to recognise penalty-reward for carrying too much stuff but given the tightness and limitations of the purses of (scoundrel) vendors, it took buying a damned house just so I could offload my junk somewhere! There is little indication of what's -important- early on and I'm carrying stuff that seems rare or difficult to acquire with "unknown" as it's value. But I'm hesitant to leave it behind because it's just so much work to get to where I found it - if I need it! - Books. Agghhhhh!!! Somebody liked writing loads and loads of fictional - and unneccessary- trivia, that's for sure. Unless I am sadly mistaken, and reaching "endgame" might prove this, the amount of information presented is totally overwhelming. I fail to see relevance in much of what is written and trying to piece it altogether into some kind of connected narrative is as good as impossible. Do I really need to know why Edna Fat-Girl from Farawayland abandoned her children for a mammoth or any other such trite historical reference? Yeah, value tells me it's important but nohing indicates what ISN'T important either. Somehow I'm supposed to read and remember it all? Some might say you don't need to read and remember, it's unimportant. I say to that, then why have it? Clutter is BAD... Mmm..k... - Potions. Spells. Magic. Scrolls. TOO MUCH. A "Scroll of Reasonable" was needed by devs here. I'd rather 2 or 3 gameplay critical potions and maybe 1 or 2 rarer ones but I seem to have more potions and spell options than I do weapon variations. I'm over them tbh. 20 or 30 potions of healing is all I carry. The rest I dump at the local villages as I travel. - Missions. Oh my. Do they HAVE to stay in the list? NO, I do NOT want to an Imperial or a Stormcloak. NO, I don't want to kill the crabby old orphanage ma'am and sure as eggs are eggs, I don't want to be a vampire killer either. Whatever possessed them to not include a "fail mission" button. I understand critical mission timelines etc. what I don't understand why I have to find 10 bear pelts for Temba WideArms - who I have NO interest in - just to clear it off the list. Even a choice to decline a mission AFTER I get told what it is would have been better than THIS. Ugghhhh.... - Saving. NAMING. Dammit. "I love Ysolda" and "I wanna kill Ysolda" save games would have been a great inclusion. - My final gripe. The opening scene. Oh COME ON!! "Esc" out of movie. PLEASE!! EVERYTIME!!! But. Hey look. THIS is going to keep my occupied for a long,long time. If all other RPG's out there are even close to the depth of this work of art, despite her many faults, I'm glad I "converted" genres. I swear allegience, despite trial and adversity, to herald RPG from this day forth. So help me Mara.... 9/10 gg
Pvt. Parts;-;You can use the Slow Time shout as someone is about to sit down, and then move their chair before they sit. 10/10
Murphy's Lawyer;-;One of the best games I've ever played. You can go for hours just getting sidetracked from one quest to another and then again. Some people didn't like that, but the whole open-world aspect and freedom to do whatever you want makes for one of the most enveloping and immersive gaming experiences designed to date.
Felix Shay Nixer;-;Top 10 things to do in Skyrim: 1). Drop a cabbage in the Riftin tavern (forgot what its called) and watch 3 people fight to the death over a single cabbage (two free corpses to loot too)! 2). Get  when your pack mule companion dies in the middle of nowhere carrying all those valuable Dragon Bones/Scales, weapons and armour you can't afford to carry since you're 1 weight item away from becoming over encumbered. 3). Slaughter everyone in a city trying to get the werewolf mastery achievement then go outside and slaughter the courier who's trying to give you the inheritance that you will likely receive. Wait next to him for a few hours so that you turn back into a human and receive your inheritance while he lies prostrate. 4). Try to fit through a doorway while floating in vampire lord form, fail miserably, shout obscenities at the fictitious architects. 5). Go cabbage bowling. 6). Try to convince Serana to marriage and fail. 7). Help bandits fight off a dragon and find yourself in the middle of them when the dragon is defeated. (Don't expect much gratitude...). 8). Put a pot on a shop owner's head and loot away. 9). Spend the entire day "making progress" and realize you have actually done nothing at all. 10). Get attacked by a bear while in a conversation with an NPC but don't worry about it and continue the conversation.
Laxe.dll;-;Good game,  pay for mods model.
Murphy's Lawyer;-;One of the best games I've ever played. You can go for hours just getting sidetracked from one quest to another and then again. Some people didn't like that, but the whole open-world aspect and freedom to do whatever you want makes for one of the most enveloping and immersive gaming experiences designed to date.
Felix Shay Nixer;-;Top 10 things to do in Skyrim: 1). Drop a cabbage in the Riftin tavern (forgot what its called) and watch 3 people fight to the death over a single cabbage (two free corpses to loot too)! 2). Get  when your pack mule companion dies in the middle of nowhere carrying all those valuable Dragon Bones/Scales, weapons and armour you can't afford to carry since you're 1 weight item away from becoming over encumbered. 3). Slaughter everyone in a city trying to get the werewolf mastery achievement then go outside and slaughter the courier who's trying to give you the inheritance that you will likely receive. Wait next to him for a few hours so that you turn back into a human and receive your inheritance while he lies prostrate. 4). Try to fit through a doorway while floating in vampire lord form, fail miserably, shout obscenities at the fictitious architects. 5). Go cabbage bowling. 6). Try to convince Serana to marriage and fail. 7). Help bandits fight off a dragon and find yourself in the middle of them when the dragon is defeated. (Don't expect much gratitude...). 8). Put a pot on a shop owner's head and loot away. 9). Spend the entire day "making progress" and realize you have actually done nothing at all. 10). Get attacked by a bear while in a conversation with an NPC but don't worry about it and continue the conversation.
DesertSheep;-;Hello everybody am going to make this short as i can foe you, but i must say there is much epicness to this game to make this short so here we go. The game is Fun it has wonderful graphics better with mods i mean the mods make you feel like you are in the game that is if you get the right ones, anyway the game it self is so epic the quests, side missions, DRAGONS, shouts, magics, and factions, hell you can even pick a side in the war and fight it as a imperial or stormcloak aka the rebellion. The map btw is huge, and the all the DLC is great infact if you are going to get the game make sure to buy the legendary pack to get all the dlc. but like i said im not going to get into all the thing great about the game so just try it out trust me you love it. Sorry for any spelling issues im not the best at it thanks for reading hope it helps. \m/ (><) \m/
Landshavt;-;# Our Hero, our Hero claims a warrior's heart I tell you, I tell you the Dragonborn comes With a voice wielding power of ancient Nord Art Believe, believe the Dragonborn comes It's an end to the evil, of all Skyrim's foes Beware, beware the Dragonborn comes For the darkness has passed and the legend yet grows You'll know, you'll know Dragonborn's come. Dovahkiin Dovahkiin Naal ok zin los vahriin wah dein vokul mahfaeraak ahst vaal ahrk fin norok paal graan fod nust hon zindro zaan Dovahkiin fah hin kogaan mu draa
Wingbreaker;-;I have thousands of hours in this game. I have casted it for the enjoyment of my viewers for four years, and will no longer do so because of the behavior of the modders, the actions of Bethesda and Valve, and will not support it any further. It is not a mere matter of paying for mods, but the percentages, the policies, the realities of buisness that valve did not inform the initial modders of, and more that have disuaded me from this situation. Especially egregious are the words of several prominent modders who have said that "It's just money" and that there is "no community" after openly declaring they have only returned to the scene for profits. I hope that in the future Bethesda and Valve rework this system and do not leave it to languish in the hopes of earning pennies where they could have created a new vibrant branch of the modding community. Let it be known: Yes, you have lost a paying customer and an active advertiser of your work, both Bethesda and Modders.
RoneSpeak;-;Shot a man in the face with an arrow then hid in a corner until he thought it was just his imagination. 9/10
DiGiTaL CLeaNeR;-;Best game of all time. Dawnguard DLC is worth every single penny. $20 is a steel for what you get.. if you like vampires or killing them, or both (two stories in one) you'll love it.
HulkHawk;-;The best, most addictive, personal, incredible, awe inspiring, perfect game I have ever played :)
BigDale;-;It's ok
BigDale;-;It's ok
DiGiTaL CLeaNeR;-;Best game of all time. Dawnguard DLC is worth every single penny. $20 is a steel for what you get.. if you like vampires or killing them, or both (two stories in one) you'll love it.
HulkHawk;-;The best, most addictive, personal, incredible, awe inspiring, perfect game I have ever played :)
Ziinio @LeTour;-;Skyrim certainly had a lot to love up to after the wonderful experience that was Oblivion. After playing over 100 hours i can safely say that it lives up to it, and then some. Skyrim is a stunning open world RPG with so much to do and so many places to see. The class and race variety is really deep so that you can play with pretty much any style you like. The theme of the place is mostly snow but there are a lot of different themes too with some of the nice green landscapes that we liked from Oblivion. If you decide to just wander off somewhere you will always run into a new place with something to do. The main quest can be brief if you just follow this but the side quests really open things up and add to the whole skyrim experience. Overall I loved the game and would put it in the "must play" section. Would run into Whiterun and kill all the people just for the lulz again. 10/10
Arthmoor;-;Easily the best RPG in the last 5 years. Read my review for more details: http://www.iguanadons.net/The-Elder-Scrolls-V-Skyrim-460.html
Asasuin;-;The Story of how I lost Lydia. *Ahem* Charited by the Jarl, Was an indentured Housecarl, To aid me in various "parles". On my trek to the North, So advanced forth, A Frost Troll of course. After the struggle to flee, I could no longer see, The Housecarl that was entrusted to me. (I left Lydia in the middle of the icy plains. I have yet to go back for her. )
serendipity;-;The storyline of Elder Scrolls V if you choose to follow it, is well written and well told for fantasy RPG. Dragons which the Nords had thought to be extinct are terrorizing The Tamriel province of Skyrim once again! And its up to you and your unique powers to find out why. Of course there are plenty of other storylines and roles to play within Skyrim; you can choose to live as thief, an assassin, a knight, aspiring mage or you can be all of those things at the same time. You can completely ignore the storyline, find the horse and explore the world and face its dangers at your own pace. The Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion launched on March 2006, which was very early in the Xbox 360s lifecycle. Skyrim launches on November 2011, which was consoles generations twilight years. It is impressive to see graphical leaps that had been made. The scope of the map, the detail of the terrain, the intricacies of the characters and the monster models and defined craftsmanship that went into every sword, shield, spell and piece of armor is astounding! A lot of love and care clearly when making into this game. However, no game is perfect and Skyrim holds true to that. One of the few complains I have about the game, is that some of the textures are strangely low resolution and they pop-out of the player were they are present. Which is sad because it temporarily pulls you out off the game. In terms of gameplay, this is the most streamline Elder Scrolls game today. I use the term delicately since streamline is often synonymous with dumb down when describing videogames. That is not the case in Skyrim. Well a good number of spells has seen the Axe, everything else has gotten an overhaul it needed. The dual wielding system is fantastic for combat. You can now hold two weapons, two different spells or weapon and the spell in each hand. The combat itself is very satisfying is because they added a finishing moves that are sure-to-please. Sneaking is always an option for the stealthy at hard difficulties. Skyrim has done away with repair hammers, but in their place they implemented forging skill which is by in far a superior system. Enchanting has seen some tweaks as well. But all in all both are great diversions for the average dragon hunter. The music is phenomenal, the voice acting is head and shoulders above the rest of the Elder Scrolls series. I am very happy to see and hear some familiar faces and voices. Battling your first dragon is an adrenaline rush that you havent felt long time in gaming. Elders Scrolls V: Skyrim isnt just videogame, its my vacation dream come true! But its not all the gorgeous vistas and claustrophobic spelunking. The introduction sequence barely does the game any justice. In fact, is a little drawn out tediously. In order to create a new character, youll need to go thru it every single time. You arent simply drop into a world like you are in Morrowind. Despite of the presence of the dragons chasing you, its not nearly as exciting as Oblivions introduction. Heres hoping that there is a patch will be put out allowing you to customize your character again before you leave the final cave. So you can create a save file just before that moment and affectively skip the introduction. Considering this feature was present in Oblivion and Fallout games, it is curious that is missing. The menu system is abysmal, especially on the PC. Oblivions menu system was a bit overly chaotic and hard to manage but this is somehow worse. In time, you overcome this obstacle but it would be great it was hindrance in the first place. If you are going to pick up Skyrim and I absolutely recommend you do. I haul hardly push you getting a PC version. There are already a large handful of fantastic mods available to customize your Skyrim experience. Skyrim should truly be experience by everyone, even you dont think you are fan of fantasy RPGs. This open world has too much to discover. Skyrim is easily one of the greatest games for the past twenty years. With mod support in place, Skyrim will likely beyond everyones hard drive for years to come.
Nine Tailed Doge;-;Great game to keep you occupied for the rest of the day week month year the rest of your life.
AlabayWong;-;Few days ago I was full of my doubts ,becaouse i did not know if I want this game or not.So with my eyes closed I click on the shoping icon (--_--) and got a bil... I download the game ,made a tea and said:"So let's see what Bethesda Softwork will please us!". So first think that I liked it was menu (_ooh melody of the menu take my heart)_ ). For first time the game was absolutely boring (it is just my opinion) but after about 15 minutes playing I was pleasantly surprised!The battle,the people ,the sound and the game world was on the hight-level!The fights was so real that I thinking that I for real take a sword and start beat all the sh*t out of different scum as Draugrs... Quests was very interesting ,but the only thing I did not like -it was the length of the main quests (for me it is to short). So here is why I give for this game 9\10. With all my heart I can say that The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim AWESOME GAME! And the last thing that I should to say :"Skyrim For Nords!"
Rammsestein;-;If you love RPG games you have found RPG games king I love skyrim i have all DLC.s Alduin is so Awesome you just cant get enough when shouting bandit or dragon i like more two handet weapons but one handet is also good even little weak bows well bows are for sneaky type. spells well spells are not combat fun. but Enchanting is skill you are going to really need and its also fun But this is game what you are looking for!!
Azor Ahai;-;Best RPG open world game i've ever played...
Odyessy;-;FUS, RO DAH! Skyrim's known as a masterpiece of this age, that's pretty much common knowledge. And it is. The Elder Scrolls in general is a VERY good series, and you can immerse yourself in it for days. Morrowind was great, but many, many people had problems with the game being slow, and many claim for it to be the last "Hardcore" game of the series. Oblivion was praised, yes, but Oblivion, the fourth game in the series, had a SERIOUS disease in it that kept many people from being properly immersed. The specific skills you HAD to pick, and HAD to focus on throughout the rest of the game. It's much like a class, but a custom one. It doesn't work for Oblivion, because of how...Free, the series is. Skyrim has arguably no flaws in it. I've yet to come across a single crash that didn't result by my own error in putting down mods, nor have I had any immersion-breaking moments. This game, even without the famous Unofficial Patches, is still very much playable, and I enjoyed my first 80 unmodded hours of the game. Once I grabbed some mods, that the community made (And a overhaul that one man worked on for over 1000 hours!) I've fallen in love, yet again, with the game. Games that REQUIRE you to have mods so it stays alive (Like Minecraft, for example) doesn't live strongly, in my opinion. Skyrim doesn't have that case. What can you do in Skyrim? Well, you can waltz into a town, shout a chicken off into a river, then get pummeled by people with maces, run like a , run into a cave, find that sweet, sweet Glass War Axe, run back to that town, SLAUGHTER EVERYONE, make a child homeless, adopt that child, build a house, join a Vampire-Slaying community, join the Theives Guild, GET MARRIED , SLAY A ING DRAGON, ABSORB IT'S SOUL, THEN SHOUT IN THEIR LANGUAGE, WHICH CAUSES YOU TO SHOUT ICE, Read a damn good book about Red Eagle, then, travel to his LAIR, SLAY THE GUY, then grab a crossbow, enchant it and call it the Dismantler , get travel companions, join a CIVIL WAR CRISIS, become a legendary hero, or an infamous badass, CATCH FISH LIKE A BOSS, be a master wizard of the arts of blowing  up, be one SNEAKY , or just go chop heads off to space. Then shout at their corpse, giggling as you watch it fly, RIDE. ING. DRAGONS. AND THEN, IF YOU'RE STILL BORED.... Mods. Oh. God. The mods. Don't like how the stealth system works? Just grab a overhaul patch! You have more than you think to choose from! Want to fish? ...have...sex? Have an alternate start, Say " no" to the lockpicking system, and get a Pro version, MORE BOOKS, MORRRRRRRRRREEEE BOOKS, ENTIRE QUESTLINES MADE BY FANS OF SKYRIM, OR YOU CAN JUST MAKE IT. And I STILL have things to say. The story of Skyrim has TWO different main storylines. And HUNDREDS of side stories to get involved in! People will love you, or hate you, depending on what you do. (If you're a thief AND a assassin, in the respective guilds...you will be very, VERY infamous. In fact, so much so, that if a guard tries to apprehend you, you can SCARE them into not arresting you!) The Civil War Crisis, and the Dragon's Return Crisis. You can pick and choose between every quest. You can always go back and continue on it later. Hell, you don't even HAVE to do the main questlines! I've still yet to get around to even getting them HALFWAY done! And the Civil War Crisis has TWO sides to pick from! Once you choose, the only way to see the other questline is to replay the game. and pick the other side! And, even if you completely ignore those two storylines, you still have HUNDREDS of hours of gametime to go through! And the DLC? GET IT. GET IT ALL. They are all worth it! I actually have only one minor complaint about Skyrim, but, honestly, it's actually small for me. They could have used more voice actors for each race. Now, that might sound bad for immersion, but the actors do SO WELL in voicing their lines, it's easy to forgive! Honestly, Skyrim's one of the few games that I truely believe to be Perfect. That rating, for me, stands with Unthinkable Natural Law, Final Fantasy Crystal Chronicles, and Epic Battle Fantasy 4. Story: 10/10 (This is one game you NEED to read it's lore within the game, and pay attention to what's going on around you! Solid masterpiece.) Music: 9/10 (I sometimes forget the music is there, but I think that's because they blend too well with the game.) Combat: 8.5/10 (Once I got a few Overhaul patches, and the Dance Of Death mod, it's a perfect 11/10. Content: 10/10. (This is one of those games, that, even at the average 60$ price tag of AAA games today, is STILL a steal. The DLCs just make this already expansive game even BIGGER.) Overall rating: To be fair, I think a 9.2/10 will suffice. My last words to you: By reading this, you are now Krii Lun Aus'd! Marked For Death, es~
JBJblaze;-;I can still remember back to January 2013 when I'd received this as a Christmas gift from my oldest brother, and once I started playing, I'd been sucked in for the next few days! Exploring the beautiful and incredibly huge world upon of a captivating story & experience that made me feel like a part of Skyrim ... I mean, if I look towards playing again, I prefer to be able to allot at least a couple or more hours just to get back into the feel of it all. *10 Fus-Ro-Dahs!*
_Pulse_;-;This is so good, it might even cure davids autism
The Bipolar Rock'n'Roller;-;I sunk 191 hours into this game. Need I say more?
M3SK;-;This game is great, the story is long going, the things you can do within the game are great (Enchanting, Random Dragon Appearences etc. and the Quests are fun. I like the game. C:
Niggafish1248;-;This game is ing good. Its hard to resist not playing Skyrim. When almost all the games in my library has failed to entertain me, this game comes and fills me with joy. But of course there are sometimes where it gets frustrating and annoying, but what can I say, I am just a beginer gamer. I started gaming in the biging of 2013. This game one of my most favorite and precious games ever. I recomend you buy this game above any other games. Rating so far as I have played the game: UNLIMITED/10
Dante;-;When you walk into riverwood. Attack the chicken by the gate. And then save. 10/10
Poet;-;Beyond memorable and enjoyable, Skyrim has surpassed all of its predecessor in many ways no one can imagine. With no room of denying, this game is perhaps the most immersive Role-Playing Game Bethesda has ever created. Buy it now!
Zyga;-;I'm writing this review for anyone who actually needs to read a review for skyrim. Because you know, there aren't any out there already. Gaem iz gud, buy if u hev 2 pley of lyne (The game is wonderful, you should really buy it because it has a great modding community and the game itself is fantastic, with a long story line that you don't have to follow and an open world where you can kill (almost (important NPCs)) anyone. this game is a must have because t's great for offline play and when you're online. The game is beautiful... uhh Mods, mods, and mods, can make the game pretty much anything. for example the thomas the tank engine mod turns all the dragons into trains. Idk why. but it's there.) Story: 10/10 Gameplay: 10/10 Presentation: 9/10 (-1 Point for bugs, errors, glitches etc. They are common enough) Soundtrack: 10/10 (epic) Replayability: 10/10 (THE MODS)
FishikK;-;[10/10] Even PC version didn't dissapointed me. + possibility of mods available on PC :3 As RPG this belong to best ones of breed and only few titles can compete with TES:V. Bethesda made good step forward with new combat mechanics and game mechanics themselves. this is..... masterpiece. Game of the Decade.
Dante;-;When you walk into riverwood. Attack the chicken by the gate. And then save. 10/10
Niggafish1248;-;This game is ing good. Its hard to resist not playing Skyrim. When almost all the games in my library has failed to entertain me, this game comes and fills me with joy. But of course there are sometimes where it gets frustrating and annoying, but what can I say, I am just a beginer gamer. I started gaming in the biging of 2013. This game one of my most favorite and precious games ever. I recomend you buy this game above any other games. Rating so far as I have played the game: UNLIMITED/10
Snoen;-;Just... WOW!!!! 10/10 ! This game is worth all the money!
Lord Commissar Fancypants;-;Payed for the game, Modded it. Had fun. Crashed. Uninstalled mods, was gonna reinstall. Luckly don't have to pay for mods now. Lets keep it that way. Still left a bad taste in my mouth. Still giving this a negative review. Still neat game.
BurntToast;-;VALVE WHY WOULD YOU EVER DO PAID MODS 0/10- IGN GABEN I DONT WANNA TALK TO YOU ANYMORE YOU PROBABLY GOT TOUCHED IN INAPROPRIATE PLACES AS A KID GO KILL YOURSELF BY PEEING TOO MUCH THAT ALL THE WATER COMES OUT OF UR BODY AND YOU SHRIVEL UP AND DIE AND A LLAMA COME SUP ABD EATS UR BODY THAN IT POOPS U OUT AND LICKS THE POOP AND THROWS IT OFF A CLIFF BUT THE POOP GROWS WINGS AND FLIES AWAY AND EATS ITSELF THEN BILL COSBY COMES IN AND HE'S LIKE JELLO PUDDING AND STUFF BUT THERES NO PRETZELS SO THE POTATO BLOWS UP AND ALL THE CENTEPEDES WEAR CROWNS BUT ONKY ON TUESDAYS BECAUSE THE BLUE FLAMINGOES DIE THE PINK ONES ACTUALLY DONT DIE THEY DISAPEAR INTO ANOTHER DIMENTION WHERE HIPPOES RULE THE WORLD AND THE OFFICIAL CURRENCY IS POOP. IN SHORT I DONT THINK MCDONALDS FOOD TASTES VERY GOOD
DA_ZWAGLI;-;GETFREE!!   The Steam Community is about sharing your work. Have good ideas and help to improve each other. That makes us different of the gaming companies. >>>> Post this every each paid mod you see in steam <<<< Because we don't wan't to let end up steam in a greedy for money- gaming platform. ......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... _____.......__............._____ .............//'...'/`............|...__.....\....|...|............/... ___| ........../'/.../..../......./\..........|...|....\....|....|...|...........|..../ ........('(.......... ~/'...').........|...|.....|...|....|...|...........|...| .........\.................'...../...........|...|__/...|....|...|____....|...\____ ..........''...\.......... _...............|_____./.....\______\....\_____| ............\..............( ..............\.............\
Shapeshifter;-;Due to recent changes to the workshop and having Paid mods I no longer recommend this game.
Chvez;-;Don't buy this game. Don't support Valve and their pay-for-mods business model.
2a3;-;Was the best game I could ask for until it was ruined with the monetizing of mods.
Caroline;-;The game is not enjoyably played without mods, and yet, as you've probably heard, they're now behind a lovely paywall! While one can argue that this supports modders, the extremely small cut taken by the actual modders who make the mods means that it costs you a lot of money and they get chump change while Valve and Bethesda walk away with all the money. I cannot support this practice in any form, so I would say do NOT get Skyrim until this issue has been fixed. Get Oblivion, or Fallout or something instead, I say.
Eskimofo;-;I already paid for the game once. Why should i pay to be able to play it too?
JoeyBsmooth;-;Paid mods, I hope not but this could mark the end of PC gaming as we know it . Many people get the PC version of a game due to the mods. Now that is going away, many people might not stay.
Dev0lved79;-;I loved this game and have spent hundreds of hours both playing it and modding it. The recent issues with Bethesda (Primarily) and Valve attempting to monetize mods has been so poorly done that it leaves me with a bad feeling associated with Skyrim, Bethesda, and Valve. Whilst I think allowing modders to receive some money payment for their hard work if you appreciate it is fundamentally a good thing, Bethesda and Skyrim's implemtation of the paid mods system destroys the very community spirit of sharing and helping that produces great mods. It instead promotes, stealing, theft, single developers producing simple forgettable mods. I'm sure what we all want to see is large mods with lots of content that fit seamlessly into the Tamriel game world, which takes a large amount of shared assets and collaboration, something that is very very difficult to monetise. The only reason that Skyrim/Morrowind/Fallout 3/Fallout NV/Oblivion still sell after all this time is because of mods and Bethesda decided that making money from an extended life cycle from modding hobbyists wasn't enough, that also wanted 45% of mod sales from your hobby time. Really disgusting ... I suggest buying your games from gog.com from now on and possibly modding in Redkit.
Deus Ex Mathematica;-;Who's the completely moronic piece of shiitaku mushrooms that thought "hm, maybe screwing the consumers in the  with paid mods would be a good idea"???
The Woodsie Lord;-;Only reason this game survived as long as it did was the vibrant modding community. Of course Bethesda and Valve thought to themselves, "If only we could rake in money from this, beyond the money we've made on the fact that this game still sells at 30 bucks." Paid mods ed the community. We can only hope this practise is not replicated.
Herpes Free since 03;-;I feel more betrayed by Gaben then Robb Stark at the Red Wedding. The fact that I will have to pay for Macho Man Randy Savage to replace my dragons is insanity. And here I thought Steam was different. :(
Ashes Mandalay;-;Paid mods. I get where Valve is coming from in doing it, but it's an ill-concieved plan and therefore I must voice my displeasure.
C H A N C E;-;Would reccomend this game, as it is fantastic and I enjoy it, but the core value and so playability has been ruined by the mod payment fiasco. Would not reccomend until the situation is resolved.
Enticle;-;Don't recommend, Bethesda and Valve are tearing the modding community apart with the workshop.
Divine;-;Was 10/10. Paid Mods? 0/10.
saul_g00dman;-;mods cost $money$
CalzoniusTheGreat;-;Brilliant game! having it on steam is even better because of the workshop. make the game a thousand times better.
Captain RDM;-;I mass murdered some towns and cities, and jerked off onto the corpses
DA_ZWAGLI;-;GETFREE!!   The Steam Community is about sharing your work. Have good ideas and help to improve each other. That makes us different of the gaming companies. >>>> Post this every each paid mod you see in steam <<<< Because we don't wan't to let end up steam in a greedy for money- gaming platform. ......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... _____.......__............._____ .............//'...'/`............|...__.....\....|...|............/... ___| ........../'/.../..../......./\..........|...|....\....|....|...|...........|..../ ........('(.......... ~/'...').........|...|.....|...|....|...|...........|...| .........\.................'...../...........|...|__/...|....|...|____....|...\____ ..........''...\.......... _...............|_____./.....\______\....\_____| ............\..............( ..............\.............\
AutoDMC =[Ga]=;-;I'm going to have to join the stomp fest on this game due to the new paid modding system. 75% of the proceeds go to Valve and Bethesda, and the 25% the mod developer gets appears to go into their Steam Wallet... it's not even "real money." I don't mind supporting modders, but I'm not going to be nickel and dimed to death to support an ancient game. My next playthrough was going to be mod powered, but if I'm going to have to buy $30 of mods (that's a new game! Or two!) in order to do so I'll just go play another new game instead.
>f7> freeb1rd;-;Can't recommend now with paid mods and all. It's sad really.
Omga;-;ultimate free content for money experience
JerryHatrick_Nz;-;I love Skyrim. Supporting the mod creators is great, too. So being able to donate to uploaders would be nice but, quite frankly, any Mod that forces me to pay to use will be dropped like a rock with a nice, full feeling of, "get rekt". As they say. 1$ for a sword? Are you kidding me? I was going to upgrade my video card and ram, as the selection of mods I wished to use were just a little outside of my current setup. Now, I would rather either hire someone to beat sense into these people, or to cover the hospital fees after bashing my head against a wall for the state the world is in.
VikingSchism;-;This would have been a good review. But then they started selling mods
-=Helghast Soldier=-;-;Paid mods = bad for business.
godwheat;-;I'm not paying for what was Free, I would donate , but not pay , alot of the times the mods won't work anyways!
MrWong;-;Lackluster vanilla experience. Used to be a great modding platform, but with the introduction of paid mods and the division of the modding community not worth it anymore. Not supporting paid DLC.
Xarfai;-;The greed is real! First the massive invasion of Early Access games, now the selling of Mods. What will be next? Shame on Bethesda for supporting this BS!
Blank;-;I was going to write i nice review.... But then the modding to an arrow to the knee..... *ba dum tss*
Manafish;-;Paid mods? Seriously?
~Desu~;-;Please gib 100 for horse  armour
Dinkleberg;-;Down with paid mods! Up with waffles!
Jimboslice;-;A game which had been damaged by the new pay for mods system. Despite the sale DO NOY BUY THIS GAME as you are supporting what may ruin this community
Abradolf Lincler;-;Good game. 10/10 But the review Mod cost me $9.99..
CHOMPER;-;Go to hell with your pay for mods!
[BFC] Scott Evil;-;I can no longer support and recommend this game. Valve is being a bunch of greedy jerks, and are making us pay for mods. I do not and cannot support that.
appulbunce;-;Garbage. Skyrim was once a decent game plagued by bug issues. Now users are being expected to pay for what used to be free modifications to the game - including modifications that were designed specifically to fix those bug issues. Don't buy this game, don't buy from Bethesda, don't buy from Steam until they fix these practices.
Izerg;-;If I had been making this review last week I would have whole heartedly recommended this game, but with the advent of the Paid Steam Workshop that is no longer the case. Putting mods behind a paywall has sundered the close knit mod community and has very much cheapened the whole game as a result. Not to mention that almost all mods are collabrative in nature and thus has led to some mod authors putting other peoples work behind a paywall that they won't see a dime for(not that many of them would want their work being charged for). I don't blame the modders in question for this, as they are getting screwed in this deal anyway by only recieving $0.25 of every $1.00 that steam/publisher gets. The fault lies squarely on the shoulders of Valve and Bethesda.
z99o;-;You should have acted. They are already here. The EA DLC Scrolls told of their return. Their defeat was merely delay, until the time after Steam opened, when the modders of Skyrim would spill their own blood. But no one wanted to believe, believe they even exist (paid mods). And when the truth finally dawned, it dawned in money! But there is a group they fear in their tongue, they are called the Steam Community!
RedForge;-;Paid mods with censored criticism, no quality standards, copied assets, and only 1/4 of the money goes towards the creator. Don't support this disaster.
Chessalavakia;-;Skyrim has a large world but it frequently lacks depth. The combat is lacking on most character builds. If you do not focus on combat skills early on the game can become quite difficult. Crafting is not balanced and is at first very ineffective then overpowered. The diffrences between armor types when you do smithing becomes minute. Skyrim also has less complexity than the previous games. Most of the game is not balanced and hides behind the players ability to stunlock enemies or eat and drink a constant stream of items. The story overly focuses on the player being the choosen one. Large portions of the world are quite grey and boring. While most people use mods to fix this, recently Bethesda along with Valve has choosen to monetize modding. As a result, I can no longer recommend this game as it has too many flaws that can no longer quickly be fixed for free.
Falling;-;I love the game, currently hate the company though. What kind of an idea is "paid mods". Like, really?
Arn;-;paying for mods?! 4REEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEL?
Mozen | Sparkles!;-;To much of my sadness, most graphic mods I previously used have gone paid. Which you can figure isn't that big of a problem would it be 1 mod at 2 bucks. But I, and most people who play Skyrim, have like 30 or more. Will play again once I get over the paywall.
Farc;-;Might as well be a pay to play now...
*GET R3KT*;-;Say nope to the Paid mods and you've just killed an awesome game. Congrats Valve and Bethesda!
Someguywhoplaysgames;-;Downloaded mods off the nexus, cracked paywall'ed mods and put them online for free, had intercourse with women, made money lol  you guys.
ajthenoob;-;I love all the new mods! I spent $10 on this game and needed to spend $50 on mods! Now it is just like consoles!
Lykan;-;i am against it thanks to paid mods ......./\ ....../..N.\ ...../O\ .....|||||||||| .....|P| .....|A| .....|I.| .....|D| .....|||||||||| .....|M| .....|O| .....|D| ._-"|S|"-_.......................... ].... ] |=========|...\/............. ..../#####\...........................Il]...Il] ...."""""""""........../ \........................
Demorthus;-;As mentioned before, "Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve." -BS|Couchfighter I concur & strongly disapprove of this game now & Bethesda's tactics too.
PalePanther;-;Paid mods are going to ruin this brilliant game and many others like it. Im making a statement and will not purchase another product from Valve, or any other company that joined this ridiculous opressive program.
XmX_Vector;-;To quote the ever on point 'Angry' Joe Vargas: "Ya done ed it up!" Valve...
Sexy Pachinko;-;Lets take something perfectly nice and completely ruin it.
Sigvatr;-;This game is for scrubs.
Pixelboyable;-;Introduded Paid Mods, don't bother.
Taremz;-;Bethesda jumped ship and now wants to grab as much money from this game as possible. Shameful, and I will not be supporting their games from now on.
1335 Train - [Baby Opressor];-;Bring back free mods.
venomthunder;-;I love this game, but Paid-mods is a off puting idea as it is and Valve's implementation is just horrific.
Rapier8;-;I have enjoyed this game so very much, and it's killing me that I have to give it a negative review based on recent events. Monetizing mods has me heartbroken on the future of this franchise, and even that of Fallout as well. I have no issue with paying someone for their mods if they're of high quality, via donation or something along those lines, but being FORCED to is sickening. Gone are the days where people work together and collaborate on mods, building one off of another, for the love and enjoyment of the game and the series itself. Now that money has been introduced, pandora's box has been opened, and that friendly little mod community will begin to shred itself apart from the inside out from greed and cutthroat tactics, such as people stealing someone's mod for profit, or someone using a mod that relies heavily on another mod to function. We have already seen an issue with this in the recently removed "Art of the Catch" mod on the steam workshop. I truly disagree with the direction Valve and Bethesda have decided to go with this, especially since both of them are making 75% of the money while the creator of the mod gets such a "generous" 25%. I feel as though the modding scene for great games like this is going to die and be replaced with one of the disgusting Free-2-Play models: a world full of Microtransactions that will nickel and dime you to death at every chance they get. Again, the game itself is amazing, my invested hours are a testament to that. But a large majority of that time was spent messing with so many of the incredible mods that have made this game far better than Bethesda could have hoped for, from things such as the much needed unoffical bugfix patches to complete overhauls of many in-game systems. This is all thanks to the close-knit modding community, the very one that will be destroyed if this practice of monetizing mods does not get sorted out soon...
your waifu is trash tier;-;paid mods is a bs idea. Mods should be free, like they have always been.
HatlessFerret;-;see that mountain? you can pay $5 for it
mormacfey;-;Not worth buying on steam with all this pay for what was free stuff.
Torml;-;my Positive review Price :$29.99 my Negative Review Price :Free to See Must pay a fee to see my positive review.
VuvuzelaClock Freedom Edition;-;this game killed my dog. It was either take him to the vet or buy mods to make this game a tiny bit better.
FrozN;-;This was a really great game. Fan of the rpg genre, I had a lot of fun playing it, exploring a huge open world and its lore, leveling up and getting stronger, aquiring items, etc.. Its one of those games to which their community is an essential part. the possibilities mods added to this game is what made it so popular. But now that payed mods are an official thing here on steam, things are going to be a little different and i fear that might have killed the best part of this game. Without its mods Skyrim is "only" a good game. Payed mods is a big hindrance to modder collaborations and the modding community in general. I can not recommend this game any more and i really hope this system wont expand to all other games on steam
PVCducttape;-;This new paid mod situation really ruins what was a wonderful and free culture. Allowing the mod creators to accept donations would make sense but its tons of free publicity by allowing those mods to exist. Come on Bethesda, make this right.
Sappy_92;-;Bethseda have stabbed the community in the back that have supported it for so long. Absolute disgrace. You may as well be EA.
Futt;-;In light of Bethesda's decision to start charging for mods, I've decided I should be compensated for my reviews too! To change this review to a positive one, please deposit $10 USD into my Steam wallet. For glowing praise, please add another $5 USD.
Aloha Snackbra;-;*Pay $5 to view comment*
LJ;-;gaben went full ea mode with mods. BOO
RekoHunter;-;Loved this game. Loved the mods for it eve more. Realy made everything great. Donated to a lot of the mods that are "must haves." Then paid mods happned. Which at first stung. Then SkyUI is going pay only? Sorry but I already donated. Nope. This is a major problem. Valve pionered this, Bethesda is finding a way to make more money, while valve finds a way to make sure the mod creaters get no money at all.
Mindfury;-;Paying for bug fixes? ... Yeah, nah.
RefTyy;-;This game supports paid mods. I do not. Really disapointed now valve.
Glorte;-;Pay for DLC ? Not Even Once.
JerfBot;-;Demands 45% of mod revenue despite literally doing nothing, and never fixing the myriad of bugs in their core game over the last 5 years. Avoid this publisher if you want to avoid supporting paid-mods and lack of developer support!
Chin Chin The Eavesdropping Dog;-;Valve makes enough money as it is.
Horrible Child;-;No one likes your pay-mods.
Jeff1304;-;I loved this game till they added pay for mods guess what I uninstalled today ? This game.
SCE_Kestrel;-;A poorly made game. To the point the developer expects the players to add in content themselves without compensation. Now, in turn, instead of rewarding users who add on to their game, they want to charge you for it. RIP Bethesda.
Foreplaying;-;Why would we pay for mods?
wakkowb;-;DO NOT BUY!!! Paid Mods? jajajaja what a joke. So now I have to pay for every mod no matter how bad it is and the developer only gets 25%??? REALLY!!!??? This game supports paid mods, I do not.
gibbousmoons;-;I am unhappy with Valve's decision to allow mods to be placed behind a paywall.
Eva Victoria;-;Bethesda has seriously crossed a line by charging players for OTHER PEOPLE'S WORK. This was a TERRIBLE move by them and I'm seriously unimpressed. This was clearly not the correct model to be using if they wished for people to make paid mods. Perhaps a 'humble bundle' model would have been better, where there is a suggested price and you can change where the payment goes (more to the game dev, more to valve, more to the modder, etc.) or you can pay nothing at all. Elder Scrolls Online was bad enough, now this? Bethesda has now lost my support as a customer. Bye.
King J;-;Can't really support paid mods. Mods are supposed to be by fans for fans.
deathlord;-;Apparently you can steal someone else's mod, and upload it to steam, charge money for it and that's fine by steam, and bethesda (because the copyright for all mods belongs to bethesda, not the creator of the mod). If you (as the creator of the mod) try to go to the page where someone else is selling your mod and you say anything negative (ie shame on steam or something along those lines while using 100% civil language), you will be banned from community posts. I'm not a mod creator, but this is a problem many mod creators who offer their mods for free on nexus. Many mod creators have started taking their mods down simply to stop them from being stolen. But steam doesn't care, Bethesda doesn't care; Bethdesda gets 45% of every mod sold, Steam gets 30%, and the mod creator (if they even are the original creator) gets 25%.
engs;-;Was great until Valve and Bethesda agreed to gouge the modding community.
SwagDragon;-;So is TF2 the next mod we have to pay for?
some guy;-;Unfortuntaley Bethesda and Valve have decided to kill this game by hiding mods behind a paywall. Maybe Bethesda should hire people who keep doing their coding for them instead of screwing them over by giving them 25% of the profits for their created content. It's like charging a taxi driver 75% of his profits because you made the car.
Dr.Trade;-;"You should have acted. They are already here. The Monopoly told of their return. Their defeat was merely a delay. Until the time after Next Gen opened, when the sons of Gamers would spill their own blood. But no one wanted to believe, believe they even exist. And when the truth finally dawned, Payed Mods! But there is one they fear, in their tongue, he is TotalBiscuit, The Cyncial Brit!"
Bashkit;-;Paid mods, get out of here you greedy tools.
A Puckish Sherpa;-;It's good to see the quality control will be so good in your new paid mods. I love the armor that they couldn't even be bothered to put into the world so you have to use console commands for it. And they haven't even finished it yet! Totally worth paying for. /sarcasm
XxMagicalSkittlexX;-;Thanks Steam, you ruined a perfectly good game. A game that i loved for about 3 years now. A moddable paradise, now ruined. The one game I could feel free from the thought of paying bills and such. Now just to download a mod i have to waste money. You have ruined the world of gaming, a world where players could feel free to escape reality for a little while. I do not recomend this game. What once was the perfect game is now another failure like every other game that has come out recently. Thanks valve for ruining a perfectly good game. Sincerely, an Elder Scrolls fan
[Fast Co.] Russian Bear Dog Lon;-;Fetch quests, horrible interface, quest arrow that takes thinking out of the experience.
hack.causality;-;Good job Valve; you managed to mess Skyrim up retroactively.
Onlystolen;-;I used to be a gamer like you, but then i took a paywall arrow to the everywhere. >>>-------------->
Espious;-;RIP in pepperoni free mods.
jamma mamma;-;This can't happen. If Skyrim falls to this paid workshop, lots of developers will follow suit and soon we'll have to pay $2.50 for a mod just to boot the game. Shame on you, Gaben. I thought you knew better than to do something like this.
Zorvan;-;Constantly making bug filled games that require third party "unofficial patches" and mods is bad enough. Monetizing these things? Beyond the pale. Bye-bye Bethesda.
Draxephi;-;Some guy #1: "So, let's see, the best way to milk this game for money, while making the most chaos out of nothing." Some guy #2: "What about... More DLCs?!" Some guy #1: "Nah, not enough chaos. Everyone is doing the DLC spam thing right now. Let's be radical and different." Some guy #2: "I see. Oh, what about we let modders sell their mods and then we can take the most of their earnings?!" Some guy #1: "Hells to the yeah! Not only do we get a fat profit, we're now also completely ruining the mod community by splitting it up. Like, some modders that have created foundations, which a whole load of other mods depend on, now suddenly start charging money for those! Good thinking, brah. Hail Hydra."
gibbousmoons;-;I am unhappy with Valve's decision to allow mods to be placed behind a paywall.
Eva Victoria;-;Bethesda has seriously crossed a line by charging players for OTHER PEOPLE'S WORK. This was a TERRIBLE move by them and I'm seriously unimpressed. This was clearly not the correct model to be using if they wished for people to make paid mods. Perhaps a 'humble bundle' model would have been better, where there is a suggested price and you can change where the payment goes (more to the game dev, more to valve, more to the modder, etc.) or you can pay nothing at all. Elder Scrolls Online was bad enough, now this? Bethesda has now lost my support as a customer. Bye.
King J;-;Can't really support paid mods. Mods are supposed to be by fans for fans.
deathlord;-;Apparently you can steal someone else's mod, and upload it to steam, charge money for it and that's fine by steam, and bethesda (because the copyright for all mods belongs to bethesda, not the creator of the mod). If you (as the creator of the mod) try to go to the page where someone else is selling your mod and you say anything negative (ie shame on steam or something along those lines while using 100% civil language), you will be banned from community posts. I'm not a mod creator, but this is a problem many mod creators who offer their mods for free on nexus. Many mod creators have started taking their mods down simply to stop them from being stolen. But steam doesn't care, Bethesda doesn't care; Bethdesda gets 45% of every mod sold, Steam gets 30%, and the mod creator (if they even are the original creator) gets 25%.
engs;-;Was great until Valve and Bethesda agreed to gouge the modding community.
SwagDragon;-;So is TF2 the next mod we have to pay for?
some guy;-;Unfortuntaley Bethesda and Valve have decided to kill this game by hiding mods behind a paywall. Maybe Bethesda should hire people who keep doing their coding for them instead of screwing them over by giving them 25% of the profits for their created content. It's like charging a taxi driver 75% of his profits because you made the car.
Dr.Trade;-;"You should have acted. They are already here. The Monopoly told of their return. Their defeat was merely a delay. Until the time after Next Gen opened, when the sons of Gamers would spill their own blood. But no one wanted to believe, believe they even exist. And when the truth finally dawned, Payed Mods! But there is one they fear, in their tongue, he is TotalBiscuit, The Cyncial Brit!"
Bashkit;-;Paid mods, get out of here you greedy tools.
A Puckish Sherpa;-;It's good to see the quality control will be so good in your new paid mods. I love the armor that they couldn't even be bothered to put into the world so you have to use console commands for it. And they haven't even finished it yet! Totally worth paying for. /sarcasm
Shamit;-;I will not pay for mods for ANY game. I have 73 mods on my current install that would end up costing me well over $100 if they were to become paid mods. I will not support this practice for Skyrim or ANY game because modding is a hobby. Just like any hobby, it will end up costing way more than what you get out of it, even through donations. I don't get paid to build model planes, why should they get paid to build swords on a computer?
XPN$IV $H1T;-;only buy it if you ing love really old style 0h
BunnyPoopCereal;-;Everyone grab the pitchforks we're going on a riot! Bring the catapults!!!
Holy Noah;-;FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS! FREE THE MODS!
Ashandrina;-;Played over 1500 hours before paid mods wont be playing again. 0/10 great game ruined
Cash;-;You can keep 75% of this review.
Arcqe;-;Paid mods. Really guys?
Aethelhelm;-;Average game with bugs. Amazing game.... with mods, which are behind a paywall now. GG Bethesda and Valve
Andrew, Join Chaos;-;You know why i dislike this, take the payment mods off.
Shanti;-;Valvo u dun ed up big time with them money mods, greedy greedy.
BenjoHalfordo;-;OUT WITH THE PAID MODS
mar420blazer;-;never written a review until now. Don't pay for mods
Knocks;-;I've already been salty for a long time that (basically) the only way to enjoy a good PC gaming collection is to RENT the rights to those games via Steam, where although you paid full price for it, its still actually their product. But THIS? Paid modding... Valve has gone from one of my favorites to one of my least liked companies...and Bethesda? All those glorious years of TES...from Morrowind upwards, and you lower yourself to Valve's level? Goodbye, good memories.
Marshall_B;-;Excellent game with enough of the right mods. Buggy mess without. I'm sorry to say that for that reason, I cannot under current circumstances recommend buying this game.
Crutch;-;Game is obvious cash grab bethesda needs to invest their time into better games like for my ipad N00b Casual/10
B-Man;-;i shouldn't have to pay real money for virtual
PDizzer;-;Shameful cash grab by billion dollar companies. Way to ruin a community by greed.
Lord Kurst;-;your pay for mods bull
Overseer;-;Really, mods hidden behind a paywal?!?!
XPN$IV $H1T;-;only buy it if you ing love really old style 0h
Stavinsky;-;I played hours (not all recorded on Steam) on Skyrim. The game with it's FREE mods was something great, amazing, got me up at night without seeing the time pass, as I was enjoying it so much. But now, with Valve and Bethesda introducing the worst ever ideas planned in the Modding community, I can't recommend the game anymore.
Mr. Mittens' Special Cornflakes;-;Almost 100hrs in this game and I don't recommend it. Why? Because the only reason to play it, mods, will now be monetized by Valve which means you'll have to pay more than for just the game, for it to be good. The only reason I even played this game was because the modding scene made it playabe, otherwise it's a boring shell of an RPG. Does it have a lot of base content? Yep. Is it good? Barely. I can only remember a handful of side quests I actually enjoy, I even spoiled the ending for myself to see it wasn't even worth getting to. Can you still use Nexus? Yup. However, a lot of greedy s will ship their mods here, and only here, while Valve and Bethesda make most of the profit from someone else's creation. Not to mention the mod section will end up being another Greenlight/Early Access in which we pay for crap that doesn't work and/or breaks our game. GG Valve, you're making yourself anti-consumer every day. EDIT: The paid mod service has been removed. I will not being changing my score due to Bethesda agreeing with adding the feature to begin with. However, you no longer have to fear for paid modding as of right now.
SexyMunster;-;Mods that cost more than the game. Geniality. Never Forget 04/2015
Glaice;-;This supported paid mods and as a modder and mapper I strongly do not and it is a disgusting practice making its way onto the gaming scene that should remain on the mobile market and elsewhere. Until the practice stops, I cannot recommend this game for purchase at all. Hell, not even Oblivion or Morrowind. Spend your money elsewhere and for games that encourage free modding, the same goes for dropping support for any mod authors who has the gall to put their mod up on the Workshop and/or those removing/hiding their Nexus mods. Do not support mod authors who support monetizing something that is free, do not support Bethesda either. Hell, don't even bother with the future release of DOOM 4 which I will skip happily and stick with oldschool DOOM games. In the immortal words of Angry Joe, you done f*cked it up! Edit April 28th 2015: Even with the paid mods being removed after an enormous uproar and backlash, I still say keep away from the game since Bethesda is a tricky and slimy company to give your money to, keep yourselves on guard and think careful before considering any purchases for this game.
GERSillySausage;-;Once I was a player of Skyrim, just like you. But then they tried to make me pay for mods. EDIT: 29th of April 2015: The "paid mods" idea has been successfully shouted out of the room. In memory of what threatened the community, this review will remain negative until brighter times. I still enjoy a good hour o' skyrim though.
Art Vandelay;-;Keeping my review negative because Valve's only regret was that they started with Skyrim
ntv;-;Payed mods = Valve and Bethesda trying to steal your money.
illPosedProblem;-;Update: Valve has removed paid mods support from Skyrim and most games, in a reversal to the previous decision, refunding all buyers fully. The initial press release seems like damage control (Skyrim's positive user review percentage dropped from 96 to 85 in 3 days), and the choice to remove paid mods rather than give modders a much larger share doesn't address my concerns, stated below.   Regarding both Valve and Bethesda, I'd like to repeat the age-old warning: Buyer Beware! With the rare exceptions of large-scale outrage, Steam buyers don't get refunds. As for Skyrim, well, what I wrote about the state of the unmodded game stands: 7/10, very buggy, gets old rather fast. ---Original--- Paid mods.  While I'm not against paid mods (I'm a small-time modder myself, but I post mine for free, either under Creative Commons/GNU GPL or in the public domain), I do dislike the way the system has been implemented here. There are a few large issues I have a problem with: - the original game publisher gets a bigger cut than the mod developer. I feel that a game will get more sales if there are mods for it, especially for games as buggy as Skyrim (there's a main quest progression bug that still hasn't been fixed by the official patches, only by fan-made mods), so the publisher and game creators already benefit for having a moddable game. What better way to distribute profits than letting the publisher get the revenue for the game, and the modders for the mods? Let the market speak, and don't dip your hands into other people's revenue streams. - the mod authors get only 25%. Some people argue that game developers get similar percentages - while it is true in many cases, it doesn't mean it's an ideal state. If it's possible, why not minimise logistics costs (publishing, paid advertising), or let the mod authors decide how much they want to invest in it after they get the purchase money? - the mod bundle rating widget has been removed after it accrued a rating of 1/5 stars. Now, the bundle only shows positive ratings, not an average or a percentage (like positive ratings out of all ratings). I also am concerned for the future: if we're to give money to Steam for downloading mods, when will we have to pay for downloading games, using Steam multiplayer, streaming, or simply for using Steam DRM to start the game itself? Now, back to the game itself: Without mods I feel that the game is buggy, sometimes unfinishable (in half my vanilla playthroughs I couldn't progress the main questline) and rather boring. The expansion I like most, Dragonborn, is fun, yet a pale shadow to old Morrowind, and more buggy than the original game. 7/10 ---End Original---
CaptainStaples;-;I love the extensive free mod community, oh wait my bad I was looking at mod nexus...
Rugi;-;<tfw paid mods <boycott <praisegabenallthesame <WHYYYYYYYVOLVOWHYYYYYYY? <tfwGG
Fltsam;-;The game is OK but Im not going to pay to have my orc  a guy
Bassa;-;Paid Mods is NOT okay. This need to stop Valve. Just add a donation button so we can choose to pay if we want to. Don't force it upon us.
Proficient Defibrillator;-;75% cut by valve with an undisclosed publishers split is indefensible. As well as this, paid mods, if allowed to continue, will completely change the essence of what moding is. It will go from a passionate environement full of colloboration, to a profit seeking environement where profit is the end goal. No-one is saying moders don't deserve to be finincial supported or rewarded for there efforts, but the way to do it should not fundamentaly change the moding community. Edit: leaving as negative, just as a reminder, and so valve/bathesda are left with a scar that I think they deserve for implementing these things without consulting (or even understanding?) the community at all.
Love Doctor George;-;Valve and Bethesda charging for mods on the workshop? Seriously guys. The way that some mods, almost required mods, are behind a paywall is splitting the modding community in half and as a result making people change their opinion on what once was a good game into a micro-transactional cesspit. With the mod view aside, the game is 'good' but isn't what I expected from the game, maybe this is because I heard all the hype after release and therefore expected a game worthy of its God status. When launched, I was greeted by a fairly grim and dare I say, poor, looking game. I'm not exactly a graphics  and can live with lower res textures but stretching textures, buggy gameplay, locked framerate, poor LOD, lifeless NPCs along with a number of other issues doesn't make the game seem worth the hype and status its earned, especially on PC. Yes, its a good game but in my opinion it relies heavily on outside/third party support to get the brunt of the game as enjoyable an experience as what it was hyped up to be. As has said before, the width of an ocean but the depth of a puddle in terms of gameplay and story. Valve and Bethesda, fix your .
The Spanish Inquisition;-;I'm keeping this review as a reminder to not trust Valve
lobsterfeng;-;Paid mods are bad or whatever.
WeerW3ir;-;"For Skyrim!" "For Skyrim!" "For Skyrim" "For Dragon... Age!" *sound of gramophone scratch noise* "I mean uh... For Skyrim?"
nherrbold;-;1st hour of game play: "Is this fallout with no guns?" 30 hour of gameplay: "I went to a colledge for 7 days and now im the Archmage. Cool" 60 hours of gameplay: " I should get back to the main story" 90 hours of game play: DOHVAKIN! DOHVAKIN DA DA DA!
Mr. Mittens' Special Cornflakes;-;Almost 100hrs in this game and I don't recommend it. Why? Because the only reason to play it, mods, will now be monetized by Valve which means you'll have to pay more than for just the game, for it to be good. The only reason I even played this game was because the modding scene made it playabe, otherwise it's a boring shell of an RPG. Does it have a lot of base content? Yep. Is it good? Barely. I can only remember a handful of side quests I actually enjoy, I even spoiled the ending for myself to see it wasn't even worth getting to. Can you still use Nexus? Yup. However, a lot of greedy s will ship their mods here, and only here, while Valve and Bethesda make most of the profit from someone else's creation. Not to mention the mod section will end up being another Greenlight/Early Access in which we pay for crap that doesn't work and/or breaks our game. GG Valve, you're making yourself anti-consumer every day. EDIT: The paid mod service has been removed. I will not being changing my score due to Bethesda agreeing with adding the feature to begin with. However, you no longer have to fear for paid modding as of right now.
SexyMunster;-;Mods that cost more than the game. Geniality. Never Forget 04/2015
Glaice;-;This supported paid mods and as a modder and mapper I strongly do not and it is a disgusting practice making its way onto the gaming scene that should remain on the mobile market and elsewhere. Until the practice stops, I cannot recommend this game for purchase at all. Hell, not even Oblivion or Morrowind. Spend your money elsewhere and for games that encourage free modding, the same goes for dropping support for any mod authors who has the gall to put their mod up on the Workshop and/or those removing/hiding their Nexus mods. Do not support mod authors who support monetizing something that is free, do not support Bethesda either. Hell, don't even bother with the future release of DOOM 4 which I will skip happily and stick with oldschool DOOM games. In the immortal words of Angry Joe, you done f*cked it up! Edit April 28th 2015: Even with the paid mods being removed after an enormous uproar and backlash, I still say keep away from the game since Bethesda is a tricky and slimy company to give your money to, keep yourselves on guard and think careful before considering any purchases for this game.
GERSillySausage;-;Once I was a player of Skyrim, just like you. But then they tried to make me pay for mods. EDIT: 29th of April 2015: The "paid mods" idea has been successfully shouted out of the room. In memory of what threatened the community, this review will remain negative until brighter times. I still enjoy a good hour o' skyrim though.
Art Vandelay;-;Keeping my review negative because Valve's only regret was that they started with Skyrim
ntv;-;Payed mods = Valve and Bethesda trying to steal your money.
illPosedProblem;-;Update: Valve has removed paid mods support from Skyrim and most games, in a reversal to the previous decision, refunding all buyers fully. The initial press release seems like damage control (Skyrim's positive user review percentage dropped from 96 to 85 in 3 days), and the choice to remove paid mods rather than give modders a much larger share doesn't address my concerns, stated below.   Regarding both Valve and Bethesda, I'd like to repeat the age-old warning: Buyer Beware! With the rare exceptions of large-scale outrage, Steam buyers don't get refunds. As for Skyrim, well, what I wrote about the state of the unmodded game stands: 7/10, very buggy, gets old rather fast. ---Original--- Paid mods.  While I'm not against paid mods (I'm a small-time modder myself, but I post mine for free, either under Creative Commons/GNU GPL or in the public domain), I do dislike the way the system has been implemented here. There are a few large issues I have a problem with: - the original game publisher gets a bigger cut than the mod developer. I feel that a game will get more sales if there are mods for it, especially for games as buggy as Skyrim (there's a main quest progression bug that still hasn't been fixed by the official patches, only by fan-made mods), so the publisher and game creators already benefit for having a moddable game. What better way to distribute profits than letting the publisher get the revenue for the game, and the modders for the mods? Let the market speak, and don't dip your hands into other people's revenue streams. - the mod authors get only 25%. Some people argue that game developers get similar percentages - while it is true in many cases, it doesn't mean it's an ideal state. If it's possible, why not minimise logistics costs (publishing, paid advertising), or let the mod authors decide how much they want to invest in it after they get the purchase money? - the mod bundle rating widget has been removed after it accrued a rating of 1/5 stars. Now, the bundle only shows positive ratings, not an average or a percentage (like positive ratings out of all ratings). I also am concerned for the future: if we're to give money to Steam for downloading mods, when will we have to pay for downloading games, using Steam multiplayer, streaming, or simply for using Steam DRM to start the game itself? Now, back to the game itself: Without mods I feel that the game is buggy, sometimes unfinishable (in half my vanilla playthroughs I couldn't progress the main questline) and rather boring. The expansion I like most, Dragonborn, is fun, yet a pale shadow to old Morrowind, and more buggy than the original game. 7/10 ---End Original---
CaptainStaples;-;I love the extensive free mod community, oh wait my bad I was looking at mod nexus...
Rugi;-;<tfw paid mods <boycott <praisegabenallthesame <WHYYYYYYYVOLVOWHYYYYYYY? <tfwGG
Fltsam;-;The game is OK but Im not going to pay to have my orc  a guy
Bassa;-;Paid Mods is NOT okay. This need to stop Valve. Just add a donation button so we can choose to pay if we want to. Don't force it upon us.
Proficient Defibrillator;-;75% cut by valve with an undisclosed publishers split is indefensible. As well as this, paid mods, if allowed to continue, will completely change the essence of what moding is. It will go from a passionate environement full of colloboration, to a profit seeking environement where profit is the end goal. No-one is saying moders don't deserve to be finincial supported or rewarded for there efforts, but the way to do it should not fundamentaly change the moding community. Edit: leaving as negative, just as a reminder, and so valve/bathesda are left with a scar that I think they deserve for implementing these things without consulting (or even understanding?) the community at all.
Love Doctor George;-;Valve and Bethesda charging for mods on the workshop? Seriously guys. The way that some mods, almost required mods, are behind a paywall is splitting the modding community in half and as a result making people change their opinion on what once was a good game into a micro-transactional cesspit. With the mod view aside, the game is 'good' but isn't what I expected from the game, maybe this is because I heard all the hype after release and therefore expected a game worthy of its God status. When launched, I was greeted by a fairly grim and dare I say, poor, looking game. I'm not exactly a graphics  and can live with lower res textures but stretching textures, buggy gameplay, locked framerate, poor LOD, lifeless NPCs along with a number of other issues doesn't make the game seem worth the hype and status its earned, especially on PC. Yes, its a good game but in my opinion it relies heavily on outside/third party support to get the brunt of the game as enjoyable an experience as what it was hyped up to be. As has said before, the width of an ocean but the depth of a puddle in terms of gameplay and story. Valve and Bethesda, fix your .
The Spanish Inquisition;-;I'm keeping this review as a reminder to not trust Valve
lobsterfeng;-;Paid mods are bad or whatever.
WeerW3ir;-;"For Skyrim!" "For Skyrim!" "For Skyrim" "For Dragon... Age!" *sound of gramophone scratch noise* "I mean uh... For Skyrim?"
nherrbold;-;1st hour of game play: "Is this fallout with no guns?" 30 hour of gameplay: "I went to a colledge for 7 days and now im the Archmage. Cool" 60 hours of gameplay: " I should get back to the main story" 90 hours of game play: DOHVAKIN! DOHVAKIN DA DA DA!
Brendson;-;Start game. Run to Whiterun. Find Cat man. Run up to Cat man to pet him. Cat man pulls Iron Warhammer and hits me on the head OHKOing me. Massacre all Cat Men, Women and possible children I find for the rest of my playthroughs.
Nuclear Kangaroo;-;you know, this game was a waste of money, it was mediocre in almost every way, so utterly forgettable, i didnt think it was worthly of even the time taken to write a review but hey, that changed today because the game now offers... paid mods, freakin' pay for what has been a free and major aspect of PC gaming since forever, screw this game, screw game companies in general, nowadays you pay 60 dollars for a game and you are not guaranteed a FULL GAME, you are not guaranteed A WORKING GAME at launch, and at every turn game companies will try their hardest to squeeze the last cent out of you with DLC, day one DLC, pre-order bonuses, microtransactions and now this, paying for freaking mods you might be thinking now "but Nuclear Kangaroo, you are not entitled to the modder's work" its true, but then, how come Valve and bethesda are? the modder only gets a 25% cut out of every sale, the rest goes to valve/bethesda, if the total profit of the modder does not exceed 100$ the modder gets NOTHING, the modders can use the work of other free mods for their PAID MODS, without the knowledge or the consent of the modders they steal the work from, the modder can have their paid mods bundled in any sort of DLC made by the publisher, which then can decide to not give a cent to ANY modder involved not to mention that by placing the incentive this already fragments the modding community, placing a paywall between the people who play mods and those who create it this wont lead to better mods that everyone can enjoy, the only mods that MIGHT get better are the PAID ones this move does not benefit the customer, it barely benefits the modder, it only benefits valve and the publishers, screw this game and any future game that does this also like i said the game is pretty mediocre EDIT: paid mods were removed but the game is still mediocre so i still dont recommend it
Greeny3ny;-;Want a review? Sorry, that is part of the review mod, which you can now buy for 6.99!
Thrungadinzo;-;This is one of my favorite games and its Modding community is one of the best, but now they want us to pay for a mod that someone else copied, so that guy can get 25c on the dollar and line valve's pockets. Welp, its back to the Nexus till Steam wises up and adds a donation button to coders. Mods are made by fans/for fans; lets not make this the DLC version of the App store.
MossMang;-;Paid mods where the creator only gets 25% of the revenue? No. Uninstalled and will never play again.
mastabruce68;-;avoid everything made by this company they are only here to screw you out of your money
owais1wolverine;-;Paying for mods? 1/10 ayy lmao
The Last Librarian #TF2:GO;-;dont buy, paid mods. Didnt know that you could make money off of another persons game and code. Thought that stuff was copyrighted.
affedilmeyen216;-;If it wasn't a software product, it would be a trash bag. Because there are lots of garbage in it. It is really embarrassing to see braindeads praise this game like a god. It should be illegal to be that stupid to like this game. Also it should be illegal let the ones loves the game live. But this kind of hopeless games helps to recognize idiots. It can be used in the job interviews also. If the job candidate liked this game, then he shouldn't be employed no matter what. He even shouldn't be a janitor in that facility. I played this disgrace for a few minutes. In this short few minutes i felt like i was drowning in sewer. At first minutes of the game i did what i told as a mission. After that i chose my own path and TRIED to slaughter a town. BUT the game has its own brainless way, i couldn't kill some of them. BECAUSE they are ESSENTIAL. wtf kid? Are you really serious? If this game is really epic, then it should have contain a story for every kill i committed, every activity i did. But no, essentials are now my enemy, they just SIT after defeat and regenerate health, and I could do a thing about it.
Subtotalzero;-;Paid mods, really...? Disgusting.
Greeny3ny;-;Want a review? Sorry, that is part of the review mod, which you can now buy for 6.99!
Thrungadinzo;-;This is one of my favorite games and its Modding community is one of the best, but now they want us to pay for a mod that someone else copied, so that guy can get 25c on the dollar and line valve's pockets. Welp, its back to the Nexus till Steam wises up and adds a donation button to coders. Mods are made by fans/for fans; lets not make this the DLC version of the App store.
MossMang;-;Paid mods where the creator only gets 25% of the revenue? No. Uninstalled and will never play again.
mastabruce68;-;avoid everything made by this company they are only here to screw you out of your money
The Last Librarian #TF2:GO;-;dont buy, paid mods. Didnt know that you could make money off of another persons game and code. Thought that stuff was copyrighted.
affedilmeyen216;-;If it wasn't a software product, it would be a trash bag. Because there are lots of garbage in it. It is really embarrassing to see braindeads praise this game like a god. It should be illegal to be that stupid to like this game. Also it should be illegal let the ones loves the game live. But this kind of hopeless games helps to recognize idiots. It can be used in the job interviews also. If the job candidate liked this game, then he shouldn't be employed no matter what. He even shouldn't be a janitor in that facility. I played this disgrace for a few minutes. In this short few minutes i felt like i was drowning in sewer. At first minutes of the game i did what i told as a mission. After that i chose my own path and TRIED to slaughter a town. BUT the game has its own brainless way, i couldn't kill some of them. BECAUSE they are ESSENTIAL. wtf kid? Are you really serious? If this game is really epic, then it should have contain a story for every kill i committed, every activity i did. But no, essentials are now my enemy, they just SIT after defeat and regenerate health, and I could do a thing about it.
Raz;-;If Valve wanted to support mods they wouldn't be taking 75% of the cut of revenue off others work.
dutchman;-;I've played this game for 3 years. Up until this week I would've recommended it at full price. Now with mods being charged for, I can no longer recommend it at any price.
Shasovan;-;Skyrim is a mediocre game, dumbed down for consoles and lacks depth. Until recently it was quick and simple to rectify that with mods, since mods were free it didn't matter. Now they are not, the base game is no longer worth the platter space it is etched upon, defacing the pristine condition of your hard drive. no, do not buy this game. Do not support these practices
Voxelleaf;-;This is one of my favorites. I recommend this game to any Fantasy/RPG gameplayer. The Modding community is also very strong and it will seem to last for a life time.
[slckr]robilar5500;-;One of the greatest games of all time. Building on the lore and events from past Elder Scrolls games, Skyrim really takes the gameplay and graphics to the next level. Beautiful, fun, expansive, a near endless amount of stuff to do, two main story arcs running simulataneously, morality decisions....pretty much everything you could want from an open world RPG. There are bugs, and you will need to save often, but between the vanilla game, the DLC, and all the crazy mods available, this game will be responsible for your lack of sleep potentially for years to come. I think this has become number three on my list after Morrowind and Baldurs Gate.
Jennifer;-;<3 Mucho.
[DC] McKay;-;This is the beginning of the end. Paid mods
THE END OF $TEAM;-;Game was amazing until I hit the "STEAL MY MONEY FOR MODS" level. Also I enjoy my $99 HD horse genetalia mod very much. Thank you $team 13/78
sorebikr;-;Paid workshop mods for Skyrim? Changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. People can and should support mod creators via donations, and a 'Buy me a coffee!' button on the workshop page would be good, but putting them behind a pay wall is god damn atrocious. Hoping Valve and other responsible parties for this new practice will turn around.
Volcom;-;This game was great. Before they tried to sell us previously free mods as dlc.
ALDERAUGE7;-;I don't support any game that makes you pay for mods and only giving the modders 25%. Way to ruin a great series.
Alindure;-;Until the paid mods system are either removed ot changed to a donation button I do not recommend buying this game, since it is extremely mod-reliant.
m1 hakusstronk;-;I've always thought the game to be pretty lonely and boring. So there is that.
Huoyue;-;Have played Skyrim for dozens of hours, though my steam profile won't reflect this. I will not be getting any Bethesda games so long as this pay 4 mods system is in place. It's atrocious.
Leeroy;-;Down with the paid mods!
Haru;-;I've always loved steam and Valve, but this is unacceptable. To pay for mods? What were you thinking, Valve?? Paying for mods is like paying for adding fun. Nope to this.
Suura;-;Shouted a goat off a mountain, then talked about a book with a dragon. 11/10
Slightly Dead;-;This used to be a very good game but since Bethesda decided that fleecing people with crappy DLC content was not enough they decided to add it to modders as well so now you have to pay for most of the mods for this game now. I would recommend avoiding this game and can no longer recommend this at all.
Nuclear Kangaroo;-;you know, this game was a waste of money, it was mediocre in almost every way, so utterly forgettable, i didnt think it was worthly of even the time taken to write a review but hey, that changed today because the game now offers... paid mods, freakin' pay for what has been a free and major aspect of PC gaming since forever, screw this game, screw game companies in general, nowadays you pay 60 dollars for a game and you are not guaranteed a FULL GAME, you are not guaranteed A WORKING GAME at launch, and at every turn game companies will try their hardest to squeeze the last cent out of you with DLC, day one DLC, pre-order bonuses, microtransactions and now this, paying for freaking mods you might be thinking now "but Nuclear Kangaroo, you are not entitled to the modder's work" its true, but then, how come Valve and bethesda are? the modder only gets a 25% cut out of every sale, the rest goes to valve/bethesda, if the total profit of the modder does not exceed 100$ the modder gets NOTHING, the modders can use the work of other free mods for their PAID MODS, without the knowledge or the consent of the modders they steal the work from, the modder can have their paid mods bundled in any sort of DLC made by the publisher, which then can decide to not give a cent to ANY modder involved not to mention that by placing the incentive this already fragments the modding community, placing a paywall between the people who play mods and those who create it this wont lead to better mods that everyone can enjoy, the only mods that MIGHT get better are the PAID ones this move does not benefit the customer, it barely benefits the modder, it only benefits valve and the publishers, screw this game and any future game that does this also like i said the game is pretty mediocre EDIT: paid mods were removed but the game is still mediocre so i still dont recommend it
_inu;-;It has dragons and you can mod it to have nude ladies.
Hidden-Maverick;-;Worth it
Snoen;-;Just... WOW!!!! 10/10 ! This game is worth all the money!
Poet;-;Beyond memorable and enjoyable, Skyrim has surpassed all of its predecessor in many ways no one can imagine. With no room of denying, this game is perhaps the most immersive Role-Playing Game Bethesda has ever created. Buy it now!
Jaxon;-;Not really sure what I'm err.. Supposed to write about Skyrim here, I mean seriously it's Skyrim. If you don't own it yet, your hopes for Half-Life 3 have completely consumed your life... Not like that's a bad thing but seriously Skyrim, buy it before the 6th one comes out.
The Curious Pyro;-;Bethesda has sold out it's modding community. Do not support their games. Never forget their sin.
Christopher Dorner;-;The game's alright, first ES game I've played actually. The payed mods aren't. Thanks but no thanks.
BurntToast;-;VALVE WHY WOULD YOU EVER DO PAID MODS 0/10- IGN GABEN I DONT WANNA TALK TO YOU ANYMORE YOU PROBABLY GOT TOUCHED IN INAPROPRIATE PLACES AS A KID GO KILL YOURSELF BY PEEING TOO MUCH THAT ALL THE WATER COMES OUT OF UR BODY AND YOU SHRIVEL UP AND DIE AND A LLAMA COME SUP ABD EATS UR BODY THAN IT POOPS U OUT AND LICKS THE POOP AND THROWS IT OFF A CLIFF BUT THE POOP GROWS WINGS AND FLIES AWAY AND EATS ITSELF THEN BILL COSBY COMES IN AND HE'S LIKE JELLO PUDDING AND STUFF BUT THERES NO PRETZELS SO THE POTATO BLOWS UP AND ALL THE CENTEPEDES WEAR CROWNS BUT ONKY ON TUESDAYS BECAUSE THE BLUE FLAMINGOES DIE THE PINK ONES ACTUALLY DONT DIE THEY DISAPEAR INTO ANOTHER DIMENTION WHERE HIPPOES RULE THE WORLD AND THE OFFICIAL CURRENCY IS POOP. IN SHORT I DONT THINK MCDONALDS FOOD TASTES VERY GOOD
The_Preacher;-;Ok, so paid mods are gone now. I will still be keeping my review as negative for the fact that steam and bethesda even tried to do what they did. The game itself is good, though it does get dry after a while. So modding is a huge must if you want to keep playing. *Old Post* "I used to really love this game when mods were free. After this latest fiasco I will not be buying any games from Bethesda ever again and will spread the word to all of my gaming buddies in the military. To quote a article I read earlier today, "Imagine buying a car. You're a flashy type, so you want to slap some dank rims and racing stripes on it. When you take your car to the shop to get it modified, does a percentage of what you pay go to BMW?  no. It should be the same when modifying software. It's already payed for, you should be able to have it modified however you want without giving the original manufacturer anything." This is why I have given this game a bad review. Why buy a game, and then have to keep buying content thats is more then the game itself? Especially if the content has been FREE for the past 4 years."
Beanus;-;With an almost endless amount of immersion, Skyrim is a fantastic game that hosts a multitude of mods. Vanilla Skyrim is in itself fairly well made, and the story is at just the right level of length where I don't feel frustrated at spending half my day traversing a dungeon. The puzzles, when apparent, aren't too difficult and the graphics are still great even to this day, if you're that sort of gamer. Also, this game is quite liberal on mods. Hell, they even provide you with a tool to do it yourself, and some mods are just breathtakingly beautiful. Others are so immersion and lore-breaking you love it and simultaneously wither on the inside, but you download them anyway. Now here comes the part where I warn you about stuff thats important mmk lets do this thing Skyrim is an EXTREMELY volatile game ESPECIALLY with Dawnguard and Hearthfire, but you'll only really see this in heavily modded cases of Skyrim...or maybe not. Since Bethesda refuses to fix most of the problems users have reported, there are MOUNTAINS of threads to fix these issues, although some of them are NOT guaranteed to work. A mod that conflicts with another can CTD you incredibly quickly (or mess up your save/saves). And by CTD, I mean crash to desktop, and thats never fun. I currently have my mod settings for Skyrim at "Modded to a degree that its on life support" so I'm crashing somewhat frequently. Secondly, Skyrim is a memory hound and this ALSO makes it freak the hell out on occasionally. Unless your machine is a powerhouse, expect a little lag. The cursor tends to go from jerking erratically to being as slow as a dump truck, according to your settings. EDIT #1: On the topics of mod compatibility, this is an issue you'll eventually run into with important mods. Although most of them are self-sufficient, you'll run into THAT mod, the one that lags you out/bugs something or even messes your save up eventually, and this translates to "ALL SAVES DOWN REPORT BRAVO TEAM". Ahem. Now, with something like 5 mods installed it shouldn't be hard to find a problem. With say, 100, this is much more of a problem, especially with Skyrim's lack of communication when it CTD's. It's a tedious process, so be warned and be careful on what mods you download, you never know what'll break your game a few times before fixing it. Or, you know, not. I love this game despite it's (sometimes)fatal flaws and I'll continue to play it any day. Thanks for muscling through this wall of text.
The Underused Character;-;Girlfriend leaves for a week. One Handed increases to 100.
Tib Bot;-;Introduction Awful outdated graphics Rushed animations Horrible bland textures Boring combat system Tons of bugs and Dead-boring NPCs! I seriously don't understand why people still play this old hag of a game. If only they would realize how buggy this ga- .... wai- what? There are mods that enhance and fix all of that?.... How about those limited 2GB ram usa-... there's a fix for that too? Umm... well the main story is kind of very linear, I bet there's no mo-.... there is?... Well fighting against Alduin was pretty eas-... So there's actually a mod that gives him 5 different levels/stages that casts hundreds of meteors falling towards me that makes him nearly impossible to beat? So what now, I'm guessing there'll be a mod that makes your character poop and pee? Get your male character pregnant? Listen to an auto-tuned Cave Bear? Fight a flying deformed Randy Savage?... Wha-... there actually are!? Great Scott... Modding saved this game . Review In all seriousness, the game itself without having it covered with fancy mods was disappointing. Though in spite of the unrewarding quests however: Going through the dark void of the dungeon, fighting your way through, beating the boss, turning in your quest item..., and only get 100 Gold as a reward... , there are still some stuffs that make it very interesting like the Daedric quests for example. The consistent blue tint of atmosphere is reasonable for me to be honest (you're in the northern side of Tamriel, what other atmosphere would you expect?). The models and textures are decent for its 2011 gen. Apparently, some of the normal maps are misplaced and there are some portions where the textures are stretched. There are even textures that give performance hits due to its lack of optimization. Now don't get me started with the animations... oh god, the dual wield and the one-handed weapon when held on the left hand... Compared to the previous titles, this game lacks the role-playing aspects of a an actual RPG. It's more of a sandbox game where you would explore the whole area of Skyrim just right after escaping from Helgen at the beginning of the game. The main story wasn't well delivered due to the NPCs' dialogues making you feel like they're rushing you on saving the world. You would rather spend dozens of hours doing other quests, and then you'll come back to the main quest once you've got bored on the open-world. Unlike in TESIII: Morrowind, you'd need to level up and get better items for you to make the next main quest beatable. Also, exploring other places is a guaranteed death sentence to your character. The plot could have been better if only it wasn't too linear. There's only one or three quest/s where you could choose which side would you go, but other than that, the main plot goes on with the same ending. It's sad that the developers just made a game that would only last 100 hours for me to enjoy and would make me leave it in the Library/Shelf for a long time rotting and waiting to be played again. Then, there's the modding community: the ones that made the game worth buying in the first place. The developers may have put their efforts into this game, but the modding community had it in ten-folds to think they're not even getting paid for their work. Though, that's not the case to all modders. Overall, the game is okay, but it gets really good with mods installed. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim for me doesn't have the story of its own; because we, the players, are the ones who write it. This game could have been better especially since the Skyrim region has the most interesting lore in Tamriel (in my opinion). I do recommend to buy it only when it goes on sale since it has been 3-4 years now from its release. Better wait for a new Elder Scrolls game! Verdict Concept Rating Graphics 7/10 + Amazing atmosphere + Decent textures - Under-par animations - Stretched textures - Unfixed shadow stripes - Unoptimized overall textures Audio 8/10 + Awesome in-game soundtracks + Good quality on overall sound effects - lacks environment sounds - repetitive and unimmersive dialogue and weapon audios Main Plot 7/10 + 6-10 hours of main story gameplay - Cliche storyline - Long intro - Rushed plot Replayability 9/10 + Infinite quest simulation + Massive content + You can do anything you want + A lot of unique encounters - Repetitive quests Modability 10/10 + Everything. Is. Moddable. almost Overall: 8.20/10 - Great enough, but not so great! With Mods Overall: YourPC/10 - "Mod it until it crashes" Notes for those who are new to using mods in this game You must have at least 8GB of RAM in order to get the full experience of using mods in Skyrim with the help of Skyrim Memory Patch . Make sure you download Mod Managers (NMM, MO, or Wrye Bash), LOOT (Load Order Organizing Tool), and Wrye Bash to prevent your game from glitching. Feel free to ask in the TESV: Skyrim Steam Discussions if ever you're having issues such as crashing and other bugs; people there are very nice and helpful! The fact that you could mod this game where it can affect the main scripts/codes makes it so dangerous to even touch any scripted mods. STAY. AWAY. FROM MODS WITH HEAVY SCRIPTS... unless if you have NASA's computer/s then why not go ahead and use all script heavy mods as you like. Anyway, the following are the popular mods to avoid if you have a low-med end CPU and RAM on your PC: - Convenient Horses - Footprints (not really, but if you have mods that populate the game, please do avoid) - Wet & Cold (unless you de-activate the parts that makes it script-heavy, (preferably everything in it), then you'll do fine) - Enhanced Blood Textures - Realistic Needs and Diseases - Frostfall - Sands of Time - Audio Overhaul for Skyrim 2 (it increases the radius where the audio starts playing, meaning it loads a lot more sounds than usual) - Immersive Lighting of NPC ( Immersive Detection of NPC is fine . ILNPC however contains scripts on AIs) - Warzones (more npcs, higher frequency of crashes) - Interesting NPCs (this mod is really big. you'd notice that your game will start to launch much more slower than it used to before. other than that, you are prone to crashes) - Any mods that populates your game (more NPCs, more scripts generating in your game) - Any mods that modifies NPC's behaviour through scripting - Any mods that runs/process throughout your whole game (e.g. Frostfall and RND) Remember that you should only avoid those if you don't have a very powerful CPU and a high amount of RAM to handle these mods. These performance friendly mods on the other hand will give a vast improvement to your game in terms of visual environment, atmosphere, and audio with a very minimum chance of crashing your game: - Enhanced Lighting and FX - ICBINE - Imaginator - Climates of Tamriel (or any other weather mods of your preference) - Immersive Sounds - Compendium - Lightning during Thunder Storms (make sure you download compatibility patch for CoTamriel if you have that also installed)
Boo Hassan;-;With the right erotic mods from the nexus and lover's lab this game becomes the ultimate fapping simulator of 2014! 10/10 Would bang
ValkyrieMoon;-;Masterpiece!!!It is a world that you enter and do not want to leave.I just wish they would have kept adding more expantions to it.Its too bad they stopped and moved on to other projects.They didnt keep this going as well.Would have been amazing to keep seeing the story grow stronger.But there is Mod work that is rather great as well.All I can say is get some snacks,turn off the lights,sit back,and enjoy a massive world filled with beautiful sights,lore,magic,mysteries,enemys,and friends.But Most of all the Dragons!
Johnny 3-nuts;-;I made a negative review for this game because I don't want to spend money on workshop mods.
The Brave Little Toaster;-;I feel that once modified to your personal taste, this game comes pretty close to what one could consider the "ultimate" game. It has a little bit of everything to keep it interesting and has a lot of replay value. It could use more dialogue choices for an honorable character, but it does it's job adequately. The only thing I really wish it had is a co-op option to play with a friend or two. Hell no, not an MMORPG. It has great main/side quests, decent unlimited quests, excellent enviroments, and fun exploration. Combat is decent enough, and the ability to play at your own pace is also nice. The experience when it all comes together is great. If the base game and DLC aren't enough for you, you can modify it with mods to do pretty much anything you could think of. I highly recommend modding it. Also the game isn't very difficult by default, but mods and difficulty sliders can help with this. I should leave a warning though. Playing this is like falling unconscious, and waking up wondering where the time went. Time flies playing it.
Virilha Esperta;-;Paid mods are ruining the game, even for me that can't play it because of the lack of a graphic card, bad move valve :( EDIT: In fact this is one of the biggest supportive acts towards witcher 3, great move bethesda and valve :D
Tib Bot;-;Introduction Awful outdated graphics Rushed animations Horrible bland textures Boring combat system Tons of bugs and Dead-boring NPCs! I seriously don't understand why people still play this old hag of a game. If only they would realize how buggy this ga- .... wai- what? There are mods that enhance and fix all of that?.... How about those limited 2GB ram usa-... there's a fix for that too? Umm... well the main story is kind of very linear, I bet there's no mo-.... there is?... Well fighting against Alduin was pretty eas-... So there's actually a mod that gives him 5 different levels/stages that casts hundreds of meteors falling towards me that makes him nearly impossible to beat? So what now, I'm guessing there'll be a mod that makes your character poop and pee? Get your male character pregnant? Listen to an auto-tuned Cave Bear? Fight a flying deformed Randy Savage?... Wha-... there actually are!? Great Scott... Modding saved this game . Review In all seriousness, the game itself without having it covered with fancy mods was disappointing. Though in spite of the unrewarding quests however: Going through the dark void of the dungeon, fighting your way through, beating the boss, turning in your quest item..., and only get 100 Gold as a reward... , there are still some stuffs that make it very interesting like the Daedric quests for example. The consistent blue tint of atmosphere is reasonable for me to be honest (you're in the northern side of Tamriel, what other atmosphere would you expect?). The models and textures are decent for its 2011 gen. Apparently, some of the normal maps are misplaced and there are some portions where the textures are stretched. There are even textures that give performance hits due to its lack of optimization. Now don't get me started with the animations... oh god, the dual wield and the one-handed weapon when held on the left hand... Compared to the previous titles, this game lacks the role-playing aspects of a an actual RPG. It's more of a sandbox game where you would explore the whole area of Skyrim just right after escaping from Helgen at the beginning of the game. The main story wasn't well delivered due to the NPCs' dialogues making you feel like they're rushing you on saving the world. You would rather spend dozens of hours doing other quests, and then you'll come back to the main quest once you've got bored on the open-world. Unlike in TESIII: Morrowind, you'd need to level up and get better items for you to make the next main quest beatable. Also, exploring other places is a guaranteed death sentence to your character. The plot could have been better if only it wasn't too linear. There's only one or three quest/s where you could choose which side would you go, but other than that, the main plot goes on with the same ending. It's sad that the developers just made a game that would only last 100 hours for me to enjoy and would make me leave it in the Library/Shelf for a long time rotting and waiting to be played again. Then, there's the modding community: the ones that made the game worth buying in the first place. The developers may have put their efforts into this game, but the modding community had it in ten-folds to think they're not even getting paid for their work. Though, that's not the case to all modders. Overall, the game is okay, but it gets really good with mods installed. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim for me doesn't have the story of its own; because we, the players, are the ones who write it. This game could have been better especially since the Skyrim region has the most interesting lore in Tamriel (in my opinion). I do recommend to buy it only when it goes on sale since it has been 3-4 years now from its release. Better wait for a new Elder Scrolls game! Verdict Concept Rating Graphics 7/10 + Amazing atmosphere + Decent textures - Under-par animations - Stretched textures - Unfixed shadow stripes - Unoptimized overall textures Audio 8/10 + Awesome in-game soundtracks + Good quality on overall sound effects - lacks environment sounds - repetitive and unimmersive dialogue and weapon audios Main Plot 7/10 + 6-10 hours of main story gameplay - Cliche storyline - Long intro - Rushed plot Replayability 9/10 + Infinite quest simulation + Massive content + You can do anything you want + A lot of unique encounters - Repetitive quests Modability 10/10 + Everything. Is. Moddable. almost Overall: 8.20/10 - Great enough, but not so great! With Mods Overall: YourPC/10 - "Mod it until it crashes" Notes for those who are new to using mods in this game You must have at least 8GB of RAM in order to get the full experience of using mods in Skyrim with the help of Skyrim Memory Patch . Make sure you download Mod Managers (NMM, MO, or Wrye Bash), LOOT (Load Order Organizing Tool), and Wrye Bash to prevent your game from glitching. Feel free to ask in the TESV: Skyrim Steam Discussions if ever you're having issues such as crashing and other bugs; people there are very nice and helpful! The fact that you could mod this game where it can affect the main scripts/codes makes it so dangerous to even touch any scripted mods. STAY. AWAY. FROM MODS WITH HEAVY SCRIPTS... unless if you have NASA's computer/s then why not go ahead and use all script heavy mods as you like. Anyway, the following are the popular mods to avoid if you have a low-med end CPU and RAM on your PC: - Convenient Horses - Footprints (not really, but if you have mods that populate the game, please do avoid) - Wet & Cold (unless you de-activate the parts that makes it script-heavy, (preferably everything in it), then you'll do fine) - Enhanced Blood Textures - Realistic Needs and Diseases - Frostfall - Sands of Time - Audio Overhaul for Skyrim 2 (it increases the radius where the audio starts playing, meaning it loads a lot more sounds than usual) - Immersive Lighting of NPC ( Immersive Detection of NPC is fine . ILNPC however contains scripts on AIs) - Warzones (more npcs, higher frequency of crashes) - Interesting NPCs (this mod is really big. you'd notice that your game will start to launch much more slower than it used to before. other than that, you are prone to crashes) - Any mods that populates your game (more NPCs, more scripts generating in your game) - Any mods that modifies NPC's behaviour through scripting - Any mods that runs/process throughout your whole game (e.g. Frostfall and RND) Remember that you should only avoid those if you don't have a very powerful CPU and a high amount of RAM to handle these mods. These performance friendly mods on the other hand will give a vast improvement to your game in terms of visual environment, atmosphere, and audio with a very minimum chance of crashing your game: - Enhanced Lighting and FX - ICBINE - Imaginator - Climates of Tamriel (or any other weather mods of your preference) - Immersive Sounds - Compendium - Lightning during Thunder Storms (make sure you download compatibility patch for CoTamriel if you have that also installed)
Uzdo;-;What a great game: - Beautiful Graphics; - Great story; - Good gameplay; - Epic soundtrack; If you played any of the past Elder Scrolls and it did didn't appeal to you I think you will enjoy this game even more! 10/10*
Virilha Esperta;-;Paid mods are ruining the game, even for me that can't play it because of the lack of a graphic card, bad move valve :( EDIT: In fact this is one of the biggest supportive acts towards witcher 3, great move bethesda and valve :D
{TS130}_General Slayer;-;NO SPOILERS IN THIS REVIEW Dive into the shoes of the dragonborn saving the world like usual in an Elder Scrolls Game but with a twist, you can use the ancient power of the voice to shout words of power shout at your enemies. The world eater has returned along with the dragons and it is up to you to defeat them and save tamriel from its doom. The game is set in Skyrim the harsh land of the nords in the middle of a civil war and you can choose a side in it; the Stormcloaks or the imperals or you can stay neutral and kill both or be peaceful, it is up to you what you do. The game has lived up to all expectations and has surpassed all. In my opinion it is the best game bethesda has ever made. The graphicss are amazing, the gamplay is a big step up from previous Elder Scrolls games. Unlike Elder Scrolls 4: Oblivion, not every voice is the same. There are some that are the same but that is undestandable because they don't have unlimted voice actors. Some people hate how it is not as "pretty" as oblivion but I think this is a good thing because skyrim is a harsh land where it is always snowing so that is why I like this idea. The story is awesome but is not as long as oblivion's, in fact it is a lot shorter than oblivion so they could of made it a bit longer but its quality makes up for it. I like how unlike oblivion, it's class system, no longer have to choose a class make up your own with skill and skill trees with perks be god if you want to. Overall I recommend this game to anyone, it is the best game I have ever played and has surpassed all expectation, its a thumbs up from me, if I had to give it a rating; 9.5/10. Its great, if you like what you hear go buy it yourself you won't regret it.
Forerunner_0;-;this paywall
Archibald Fooster;-;PLEASE NOTE MY LACK OF TIME IN THIS GAME, I HAVE PLAYED HUNDREDS OF HOURS IN THE CONSOLE VERSION. Ah, remember the original? Pretty damn good. But this. This is Arena on steroids. Set in the land of Skyrim in the Elder Scrolls universe, it follows on Dragons (Admit it, you wanted them since Morrowind) and how they are going to enslave the mortal races or something like that. This game is INCREDIBLY solid in quests. There are hundreds of them. Literally. Thats not even counting misc quests! Combat is a bit strange at some times, the animations also feel clunky. And its graphics are not that up-to-date like other RPG's of its time. It makes up for it in a large open world, incredibly original creatures, original storyline (For a RPG) and heck, there are Youtube video's on how to learn dragon language. Its VERY cheap for the content and I have spent so much time playing this and not getting bored. Get it or if your a bit strapped for cash, wait for a sale. But get this if you have the money. Its damn worth it. 8/10, quite glitchy, some bad animations and repeated voices for lots of characters but its incredibly large and fun.
Warrior;-;Skyrim is the best open world RPG you can get. A true evolution of genre is not flawless but still it is the game you love to live in. 9/10
~JSU76~;-;Whats to say, everyone owns it and knows its incredible. I have around 190 hours logged and am nowhere near finishing this game. I have so many quests active that at times its overwhelming. Many times I just travel around and shoot deer and mudcrabs with the bow and arrow or maybe just take a horse for a long ride across the beautiful countryside. This is a beast of a game and deserving of rave reviews and all the attention it has gotten. Recommended
Max;-;Felt I should jump on the paid mods circlejerk
Kenjamin;-;The new system for charging for mods is horrendous. This will kill the current state of the modding community.
Mr.Rogers' Neighbourhood;-;Paying for mods for a game I already paid for.... No thanks
Joystick;-;After this whole mod debacle, there's no way I can in good conscious endorse this game and paying for mods. Skyrim is alright but I don't want pop-up ads for mods and having to pay .99 cents for a sword.
synod01;-;I will not support any game that charges for mods.
elliottastic;-;Mods are great. Paid mods are bad.
Bruce Bogtrotter;-;Game's good. Buy the game. Paywall mods bad. Don't buy mods.
mrvn123;-;If I am forced to pay for mods that look as though they where made just to sell, I cannot recommend this game.
The Art Of Destiny;-;Paying for what was supposed to be free. No mods no fun. Well played Valve~
ogHypnos;-;Awesome game. But you can't really get too many mods without paying.. So that sucks.
Dark Reality;-;I love this game, but Bethesda and Valve are killing it with microtransactions. The game is so good on its own, but it's not exactly stable, and Bethesda has for years relied on aftermarket mods to fix their games. These modders work for free and accept donations, but they make their mods free for all. They study the game engine and they experiment with it and they find wonderful tricks that aren't documented, and they share them amongst themselves and the modding community at large to help others help us all by creating mods from new weapon and armor pieces or sets, to entire new lands, to UI fixes, to new characters and features. Paid mods will end this, and make it more of a competition, and this will fragment the community, and make mods incompatible with one another as they exploit the game differently, and counteract one another. I love Skyrim, but I don't recommend you buy it from Steam, until Valve gets their house in order. You can buy the game at a number of other retailers. It will activate on Steam, but that isn't the same as giving Valve your hard-earned money to stab you and other gamers in the back. Or you can play it on consoles, where, despite loading screens that take ages, the game is more or less playable. Hell, I play it on Xbox 360 while I download and install mods on the PC version. I can load Skyrim and test a mod while the Xbox version is loading a city.
Ricardo;-;End of an era. Average game with underhanded microtransaction "pay more to fix our game with mods!" bull. Once again Bethesda fail to understand what gamers want/need.
Broseidon;-;The gametime does not account for the hundreds of hours played on my Xbox. 10/10 Took an arrow to my social life.
Dzimke;-;My girlfriend likes this game more than she likes me. 10/10
Andre;-;Good on you Bethesda and Valve. Let's get this back to 95%+
Kev in Bacon;-;Like Oblivion, but with guns.
Bruschev;-;Prepare your nimitz carrier group for assault on Alduins Skooma empire running rampant throughout Skyrim. Your crew, a group of leftist hippies must be whipped in to shape by your candy , don't be afraid to embalm and brutally beat down your crew to the ways of the Empire.
Mongo;-;I killed a girl, took her clothes, and threw her off the mountian. 10/10
squid.;-;-Skyrim; I'm not sure how I can review this, never having played older TES games, but I can safely say, after a better playthrough, this is a good game. -Gameplay is pretty varied, ranging from full-on combat, using magic, or my all-time favourite: sneaking. -Combat... Isn't brilliant. It isn't stiff like a rock, but still a bit rough. It has some dinamic though, like executions, different attacks for different directions, and special effects like extra damage on undead, or freeze damage on stamina and magicka, etc. -As for quests, I feel like the game really shined in the guild quests, the companions, college, and thieves'. But was lackluster on early-game story missions. That being my opinion though. -Side missions are interesting at least, but some are/seem boring and occupy space on your journal. -The leveling system works a bit "weird", differently from what I'm used to. By getting good at a skill: One Handed, Destruction spells, lockpicking you gain overall EXP, then you use tab and click level up, not fully fond of it. -Overall, I'd give it an 8/10 since a max rating has to be a perfect game for me, and I have not found one yet. -Leave your feedback below. Thanks
Bruschev;-;Prepare your nimitz carrier group for assault on Alduins Skooma empire running rampant throughout Skyrim. Your crew, a group of leftist hippies must be whipped in to shape by your candy , don't be afraid to embalm and brutally beat down your crew to the ways of the Empire.
Mongo;-;I killed a girl, took her clothes, and threw her off the mountian. 10/10
squid.;-;-Skyrim; I'm not sure how I can review this, never having played older TES games, but I can safely say, after a better playthrough, this is a good game. -Gameplay is pretty varied, ranging from full-on combat, using magic, or my all-time favourite: sneaking. -Combat... Isn't brilliant. It isn't stiff like a rock, but still a bit rough. It has some dinamic though, like executions, different attacks for different directions, and special effects like extra damage on undead, or freeze damage on stamina and magicka, etc. -As for quests, I feel like the game really shined in the guild quests, the companions, college, and thieves'. But was lackluster on early-game story missions. That being my opinion though. -Side missions are interesting at least, but some are/seem boring and occupy space on your journal. -The leveling system works a bit "weird", differently from what I'm used to. By getting good at a skill: One Handed, Destruction spells, lockpicking you gain overall EXP, then you use tab and click level up, not fully fond of it. -Overall, I'd give it an 8/10 since a max rating has to be a perfect game for me, and I have not found one yet. -Leave your feedback below. Thanks
DivineBloodline;-;You don't own it?
Mashiro;-;The Elder Scrolls series has forever been a part of me, Morrowind, Oblivion and now Skyrim -.. Words cannot describe the experiences and the accumulation of hours that I have put into the games. Skyrim nor displeases or fails to live up to the expectations. The gameplay and missions are extensive and unique and the RPG revolving around Dragons is literally amazing. The shouts and skills operating around each character makes the game even more addicting. I totally recommend this for anyone, especially Skyrim, alongside the older games and especially the newer one; the MMORPG.
TheAnonymousGoat;-;Paid mods, not great...
plaz;-;I don't see the problem with the paid mods. If it bothers you that much, vote with your wallet. Sure, Valve and Bethesda get a fat cut, which is kind of annoying I guess, but hey, it's capitalism yo. Downvoting not because a paid mod marketplace bothers me, but because Skyrim is kind of boring, even with mods. Good if you've never played it before.
kikariska;-;paid mods means dead game
Jack Of Spades;-;I have played 8.5 hrs of this game. I have never used a mod but I dinnae wanna pay. #freewilly #nopaidmods #urmom
ChAoTic_MaYhEm;-;Skyrim has made significant improvements from the previous games, but lack that certain charm from the previous games like Morrowind or Oblivion. For instance, the leveling up system has been improved but it makes leveling up not as fun as the class based system you see in the previous Elder Scroll games, the combat hasn't really all that improved just the standard block, and hit with a possible 50/50 critical depending upon how well you leveled up. If you use magic make sure you buff yourself and use strong magicka spells. The world itself is pleasing enough, with the right ENB mods and mods in general you can make those screenshots look beautiful and epic. You will lose hours on end not just by doing quests here and there but just by exploring the vast lands of Skyrim and seeing the world change and react to things that you do or nature or even the NPC's. The NPC's in this game is far better than the ones seen in Oblivion. Not only do they interact with you but they interact in a way which feels almost life like. They will still do their tasks while at the sametime talk to you. And thank god the voiceovers are vary rather than the same like the ones seen in Oblivion. Plus each one has their own 'background' or particular quest which makes them even more interesting to chat with and of course help them in the time of need if they require it. The DLC's themselves just adds more layers to Skyrim. Dawnguard, Hearthfire, and Dragonborn gives new powers, abilites, lore, shouts, armor and weapons, plus locations, quests and NPCs. The standard DLC for an RPG. Except for Hearthfire, which is an add-on not DLC. Hearthfire is basically (almost) like the Sims. This add-on just adds adoptions, homesteads, and new NPCs and a few raident quests. Skyrim without mods is still great, but just a bit buggy and glitchy. The modding community has helped making the game great. And then some! I mean not only do you got a ton of Mod reviewers out there (Bordual, and Gopher, MMOxReview and Top 5 Skyrim mods of the week from Gamespot) plus many more. But also talented artists (painters, and drawers for example), music composers, fan fiction writers, short videos, parodies, playthroughs. I mean so much more! Skyrim is a great game to play. A great experience. I highly recommend it!
fishinbarrel;-;what he/she said or him/her
is on vacation;-;"This is certainly a masterpiece. Such a big world,beautiful landscapes,a lot of intrigues and different characters. You can definitely enjoy it fully. One of the best "RPG" games ever... "
Preston (Boncey);-;Paid mods ed the game up.
Gilgery0n;-;it's a great game and all but, paid mods ? NO.
Robb0;-;Do not buy this game. Valve has destroyed the community and shown many Skirim modders to be talentless, plagaristic hacks.
Adolf Hitler;-;Force buying of mods! You were suppose to destroy the consoles not join them GabeN! Also anyone who buys the paid mods should be kicked in the .
i has interwebs;-;Mods are what makes this game, and what has made Valve what they are today. Charging for them is absolutely despicable, especially when the modders don't even get more than 25% of the cut.
anddy101;-;] Bob is building an army to fight the war against Paid Mods.  ...\/ Copy and paste him all over the work shop so he Il]. Defeat Greedy Valve Employees!!! ... / \
Heimskr Supacat;-;this game, IS THE BEST RPG EVER!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 1. there is almost infinate stuff to do and when you run out of built in stuff you can get community made mods for more stuff to do! 2. HOURS of gameplay 3. great character cumstomizeation 4. CAT PEOPLE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 5. BEAUTIFUL graphics and scenery The bad sides 1. you can't just go into a town and kill everybody for fun : ( because of children ande mian quest related people 2. gaurds get angry if you use shouts in any Jarl's palace 3. some quest markers can be hard to understand
Chicha |trade.tf| Buying cards;-;Here's how my initial experience on Skyrim was: Step 1: Install game and start it; Step 2: Go through the tutorial, eager to see what this game is all about; Step 3: Nice, the tutorial is over. Ok, they say I need to go this way, I'll just see what that fire is about. OMG, three bandits attacking me? Meh, this should be a piece of cake despite my level 1. I face them head on with my sword. I die easily and fast..... Step 4: Ok, I have to be more careful. I will just run away from them this time. Step 5: Oh, a house, I wonder what's inside! I enter the house, kill a man which was sleeping there (sorry fella, your loss). Oh look, this bookshelf seems to be hiding an entrance. I enter... ...and end up spending 1 hour inside a huge dungeon. Step 6: This game got me hooked... :(
WNxLittleRage;-;This is pretty much the gospel.
ToskaVolk;-;"ooo this venison must be beef" - Claire
Preston (Boncey);-;Paid mods ed the game up.
JordieBG;-;The fifth game of The Elder Scrolls franchise. Skyrim is a unique roleplaying , action and adventure game that you could never compare to any other title. You start out as a prisoner going towards Helgen to be executed , but luckily a dragon comes to destroy it and you manage to escape. From there on you make your adventure. You can do anything you find interesting such as doing side quests , the main story quests , exploring the huge lands of Skyrim or leveling up your skills. The main story isn't that long , but the side quests will take around 1000 hours to all be completed. The Elder Scrolls V:Skyrim has a high replayability or if you ever get bored from the vanila version , get mods from the Skyrim Steam Workshop or from the Skyrim Nexus. You won't go wrong by buying this game, even if its published 2011.
cowbell;-;____________________________________________________________________________ |Attention: By reading this review you are agreeing to pay the new review fee as outlined in the Terms of Service| |___________________________________________________________________________|
It's only Micro when it's soft;-;You have to pay $2.50 to see this review.
Cp022;-;It's like Skyrim with Dragons 10/10 Would Fus ro Dah again
Yami  ~ ^^;-;Follow the trail up to the throat of the world. Eventually, you'll encounter a troll. Have the troll follow you up the rest of the trail, go near the edge, use your freeze shout, and watch the magic happen! (If there is no magic, you did it wrong)
Desert Fox;-;Gorgeous game. Not as good as Oblivion, but a great way to spend an afternoon lost in the outstanding storyline. 9/10
Tharja;-;best game to marry your fictitious waifu
Phil Collins;-;The mods are too cheap.
Rkharr;-;I'm disappointed that I must give Skyrim a thumbs down. I'm disappointed that such a wonderful game with one of the best modding communities has been irreparably damaged by this attempt to monetize the efforts of hobbyist modders. I'm disappointed that the atmosphere of contribution and open sharing has given way to an atmosphere of squabbling over a few cents for small mods. I'm disappointed that the example which we set for future modders has changed from a philosophy of collaboration to a philosophy of selfishness and greed. Thumbs down for Skyrim.
Bobcarnage;-;With the mod support transferring to a paid service I can no longer recommend this game as mods were the only thing making it playable in many instances.
Otsegoflesh;-;Absolutely worst game I've ever played, completely broken in every respect. Will never purchase another Bethesda or Valve game again. RIP (Paid Mods)
Tharja;-;best game to marry your fictitious waifu
GoatsHeadSoup;-;Quite simply, the greatest game ever made. I played this game for a year after it came out. Then I got involved in some other games for a year or so and then decided to go back and play Skyrim again. It was just as fresh and exciting the second time around as it was the first time that I played it. Skyrim is VAST. Huge. Monstrous. There is just so much to do here that it never seems to get old. I only used a few simple mods, no real game changers, just a few things to make the game a bit more fun for me. BUT for those who want them there are thousands of mods that WILL change the game which adds entirely new game play possibilities. I'm done gushing for now. I can wholeheartedly recommend this game to anyone who has ever had an inkling to play an RPG. Best game ever. Really.
Kupo;-;Still going to be a negative review. Consider this a scar. Bethesda and Valve made the choice to right their wrongs. Sounds good, right? Except that righting their own wrong in this case meant: a) fracturing a passionate and longstanding modding community b) having gained nothing but mistrust and resentment And please don't try something like this again in the future. To be clear: no paid mods means no paid mods, quality or revenue split is irrelevant. Paywalling the community for unofficially supported third-party DLC that relies on their (the modding community) resources and assets is unacceptable. Keep doing what you're doing and stick to officially released Bethesda games and DLC.
LEGOLAK;-;How Can You Not Recommend This Game?
N8Gamin;-;Easily the best medeval rpg ever created.
kiddo;-;It`s Skyrim, I aint gotta explain s-h-i-t.
Alois Trancy;-;A game where the sky has a rim.... bad um tss
Cat Daddy;-;dont buy this game at present until the greedy SOBS at steam remove the stupid pay-for-mods crap. its insulting steam treat customers like this a good game ruined by greed
Tizz;-;This game isn't dragon down my fun
Tony Danza;-;This is my favorite game, it is the best ever!!!
Alicia the Feenus;-;I used to be an adventurer like you, but then I took an arrow, sword, dagger, mace, wolf, bear, giant, mammoth, dragon, werewolf, zombie, vampire, troll, fireball, ice ball and bandit to the knee
Krillix;-;This game destroyed my life......highly recommend
F1R5T3L00D;-;An exciting storyline and very addictive gameplay, combined with modding this game will last you a very long time.
Mirror;-;Killed a dragon, Ate his soul, Married a lizard man, Became a cannibal, Ate Nazeem, Ate my husband, Joined the imperial army, Ate Ulfric Stormcloak, 10/10
RockSaltShotty;-;I can personally attest to the fact that Skyrim deserves all the hype it's gotten. One of my favorite aspects of the game is the fact that it isn't a mainstream, overly-colorful, slightly too fantasy-oriented RPG, that ends up being a bit cheesy. Instead, Skyrim has created a beautiful, yet rugged world in which anything is possible (especially with mods), and provides enough realism and strategy to be intense, while still being a fantastic, mythical experience that leaves you awe struck and nerd-gasming. Play this game, I beg you.
rhoms;-;With an endless possibility of adventure, and a great modding community, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is one of the best RPGs ever made. However, it suffers from rehashed dungeons and character models, along with familiar scenery in some places. None of that is enough to draw away from the incredible depth, scale, and intensity of Tamriel. The province of Skyrim is an incredible place to trek, but many of the events that happen in the game feel immersive at first, before revealing themselves to be a similar, if not exactly the same, endeavor each time. For example; a fugitive runs up and gives you a sword and a threat. This makes you feel like you're in a living, breathing world, only to have that breath extinguished when you realize it'll be the same situation again and again and again as long as a fugitive needs your help. Rehashed content is the only drawback to an otherwise truly one of a kind RPG.
|QVD| Sir Nipplelickerofjustice;-;Words would result insuficient to describe what Skyrim is and what it has to offer. From a first view it has no brilliant story and there are indeed some bugs or glitches that still remain, so it could possibly result a mediocre game but I assure you that you'll certainly change your mind after trying it, what makes skyrim special is the identification in your character, made possible by a levelling system different from the classic RPG. You won't have points to spend in any abilities (except for Health, Mana and Stamina) but you'll have to select a few skills and upgrade them by practice. This will risult more immersive for the time spent in the levelling process and for the result of that, more rewarding than a normal RPG lvl system: the more the effort will be the more rewarding will be the result, that won't be tranlated in a mere number. In every game your will be at the center of all things but Skyrim will make you feel to deserve being the hero. A little sore in all of that could be the lacking of a Karma System, much more familiar to all the Fallout saga players, (but c'mon world needs to be saved from ancient badass flying lizards; embending a pot in the the head of the Innkeeper to avoid him seeing you stealing some chease will be surely forgiven by Akatosh). Last but not least the music the will make more suggestive the beautiful landscapes in the whole game (better to install graphic mods for best quality) and will make every battle worth to be fought, even though the fight system isn't anything special. After almost 240 hours I've still havew to finish the game because the feeling that I get from it was that every inch of rock, earth, mud and water has to be lived and so every little adventure the this land of the north will offer you (yes, also the blackreach quest for the nirn's roots, still unfinished though..). In the end, Skyrim is maybe one of the best games ever createwd by now, and together with Dark Souls 1 and 2 helped made me develop a certain sensibility towards games and what they try to transmit you, not simply living them as fictional/interactive stories for childish plays or a simple waste of time as "grown ups" people see them. 10/10 (If you get the chance, play the DLCs aswell).
Terminus Est;-;Really cool RPG Sandbox game.
Anacarnil;-;The epic atmosphere that wraps this chapter of the TES saga is stunning, allowing the player to dive into a magic world on the edge of a crysis felt never before. The gameplay is quite simplified compared to the previous chapters, nonetheless it still gives a special insight into the fantastic lore of The Elder Scrolls. 10/10
Officer Bimble;-;Sky's the rimit
whostolename;-;its a game. 10/10
Den Vel;-;This game is beautiful and it has soul. While I think it's not the best TES game, it surely stays true to what makes this series amazing: insanely detailed world, fantastic atmosphere, the huge open world that calls the adventurer in me to explore every corner and delve into the legends of the Nords. The art style, music and character models make Skyrim the most spectacular experience so far in terms of a living world to explore. The RPG mechanics are getting thinner (stats, skills, birthsigns, attributes) but the progression and character customization are still pretty solid in their absence and a good improvement from Oblivion. I can't wait for the expansions for this game.
/\ General Dracus;-;9/10 Summary: Amazing game with smart, powerful and unique gameplay mechanics which are all complemented by colourful lore, backstory and extensive RPG elements and mod support (a very extensive variety of mods is already available, as well as modding tools). However, players might occasionally be confronted with bugs/glitches in the game, which may hinder the game progression and lead to a negative gaming experience. PROS: i) Captivating lore and backstory. Well written and directed quests with a (fair...) amount of coherence on a logical basis. ii) Simple, yet powerful and versatile gameplay mechanics. From combat and hunting, to smithing and trading, this game is easy to learn, yet hard to master. iii) Great for role-playing. The Elder Scrolls V - Skyrim offers great character building tools to create your own personalized heroine or hero and begin conquering the land of Skyrim. iv) Moddable to the core. Infinite modding potential for extending the game's capabilities and features (such as additional races, quests, armour, weapons and virtually anything else). v) Optimized for most computer setups. Even if you have a medium to low-end computer, Skyrim will run quite decently, given the relative reduction in graphical quality. CONS: i) Extremely glitchy/buggy in certain spots. You can almost certainly rest assured that you will encounter a number of bugs throughout the game, especially in quests , some of which are fixed by reverting to older game saves, by installing unofficial patches released by the community, others by performing specific actions or tricks (e.g. using "Unrelenting Force" on an NPC in an effort to "reset" them), by uninstalling conflicting mods or by using certain commands (e.g. setstage ) - yet some bugs and glitches may remain unfixable.
Dvionst;-;kill dragons without wearing clothes 11/10
Tundra;-;I can't even begin to think of a review for this game. But I will say this.. Best landscape and atmosphere ever
s4ndm4n2006;-;Absolutely hands down the most addicting game ever.
.rafalBiijuu =DD;-;All Good, except the Spiders. I don't like Spiders.
Tsar Nicholas II;-;Don't play it. Especially not with mods. It will ruin you
Krillix;-;This game destroyed my life......highly recommend
Tundra;-;I can't even begin to think of a review for this game. But I will say this.. Best landscape and atmosphere ever
s4ndm4n2006;-;Absolutely hands down the most addicting game ever.
Eecaad;-;Shor's bones, there so much to do. While punching a big rat, I was interrupted by a dragon fighting an (important???) NPC whose ghost wolf ran past me just in time to be obliterated by dragon breath. Also saw a bear walking inside cave ceiling while its feet dangled down above me, and a rabbit take off into the sky like an airplane. I expect this randomness to continue, because Bethesda, and I look forward to it.
g Jaffa;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim Review Elder Scrolls is a great game if you like a bit of a story line and you love to explore places; finding secrets and treasures. Yes, there are dragons! I would recommend this game as it's still exciting to play and if you like to what the hell you want. This is a good game for you! Positives -Loads of objectives and side quests to do -Great graphics (If you have a good computer) -It's fun to play Negatives -Can get boring traveling to places and if you play too long -It's not a short game to finish with straight away -There could be more options
.rafalBiijuu =DD;-;All Good, except the Spiders. I don't like Spiders.
Vyrkon;-;So obviously this game has SO MUCH to live up to. And it delivers in literally EVERY aspect of those expectations. I'm a huge fan of TES so when I got my hands on this game the only thought was = SCORE. Totally worth the money. This review mainly consists of my playing on the console version, but I picked it up for PC during the holiday sale and adding in the mod community only increases its replayability by countless hours? Days? Months? NO, YEARS. My total time played on console is nearly 450+ hours. Occassionally any game could get repetitive or boring, and yes Skyrim is no exception, but this only takes place when you think you've done everything, only to turn a corner and find 10 more hours of content you apparently were entirely oblivious to. Bethesda has done well to tuck extensive content into nearly every inch of the game world just waiting to be discovered. The expansions were a welcome addition to the game, especially since I was finally able to return to Solstheim. The only issue I walked away with was that the main storyline seemed short when compared with Oblivion or Morrowind (but this may have just been because I blew through it out of pure excitement). Anyways the game is completely worth the price tag, it was even worth the price tag of $60 at release. Clear and easiest 10/10 I have ever had to give. GET THE GAME. Side notes: Combat = 9/10 Not much improvement motion-wise over Oblivion. But nonetheless engaging and awesome. Quests = 10/10 Extensive, Numerous (literally hundreds of quests), rewarding, and all enjoyable. World = 10/10 Definitely immersive, never once did I feel a loss of involvement in the events unfolding around me. Enemies = 10/10 Plenty of variations. And to top it all off, there are dragons. Just dragons, if you take anything away from this, just know, DRAGONS.
Daedra;-;Its rare when you find a game that attaches to you as well as Skyrim. Over 5000 hours in between the xbox and my pc, and the world still feels as fresh as ever. As per the usual Bethesda open-world-customizable-character-rpg, your character has no voice, but has dialogue options that allow you to depict what type of person your character is and how to respond to them. Skyrim's lore is mainly what attached me to it, for the world, (save for the main quest) is incredibly rich in its scope, granting the player countless hours and experiences simply by walking around. If you truely want to explore Skyrim the way it was meant to, do not fast travel, and see where your adventures take you. The combat is nothing to write home about, and stealth based characters outclass all other classes bar none, especially on higher difficulties. You cannot find the highest quality weapons until you are above level 46 (rng dependent, however they are more commonly found at higher levels), at which point if your character is invested in smithing he/she can make the higher quality weapons than anything you can find in game. To me this is one of the major downfalls of the game, especially when you find a unique sword, just to find out that you can make one that is twice as powerful and are in unlimited supply. Some of the decisions Bethesda made regarding to dlc are rather off-putting and I really wish they play tested these abit more. Being weaker in an exclusive form with a semi-permanent follower? That is unacceptable. Parts of the dlc are even lore breaking, but I wont leave spoilers here. What really increases this game's replay value are the random encounters and of course, user-created content. The modding community for Skyrim is one of the largest in the video game industry. From giant dlc sized mods that take place in new worlds, to armor retexures and bunny-rabbit followers, there is nothing you cannot find in terms of Skyrim mods. As always though, make sure your computer can handle these mods, as installing "after market" content is always on the user, not the publisher. Skyrim however, like most games of this scale (I'm looking at you Mass Effect) are not without their dissapointments. There is no sense in scaling in terms of difficulty: An archer on novice and an archer on legendary both have the same accuracy, they just have exponential damage/health scaling. Enemies level with you, but this can be a blessing as well as a curse; sure a level 32 bandit might be strong with that steel greatsword and that banded iron armor. But you have a full set of ebony armor and an ebony war hammer, as well as some restoration spells to heal you. That level 32 bandit cant live a single hit from you, and if he can, you can stall him out with healing spells. The ai have potions, but never seem to use them. The only truely challenging un-modded fight I can remember is the ebony warrior, who you wont even see until your level 81. The differencies between classes are to0 far to make them all balanced, but some of the perks just make certain "builds" untouchable. Example: The last perk in the sneak tree allows you to conceal yourself while in combat. Sounds innocent enough, but when you can crouch DIRECTLY infront of someone and backstab them for 15x damage simply because the ai turns around and begins searching for you makes you borderline invincible, especially considering there are only a few instances where you have to fight dragons. The main quest, especially the "final boss" is incredibly anti-climatic, and has no more variety then any other standard battles you have in game. At least they changed this for some of the dlc's, but the lack of variety in the main quest compared to the rest of the game is heartbreaking. And then there are the endless list of bugs that Bethesda will never fix. I won't list them here, but as a tip: NEVER save with a crossbow (in hands or inventory) while crouched. You will be locked in that position forever, and you will know when its happened when your crosshair appears while you are crouched and you cannot stand up. That list of cons, however off putting they may seem, should not stop you from purchasing the game. It is well worth your time to play, with or without mods. I stress that mods greatly increase the enjoyment you will have in your game, but to each his/her own. Skyrim has earned those awards by creating an excellent user experience. Perfect? No, nothing ever is. Is it close? Probably as close as any game will get.
Elric Bloodrose;-;I'd recommend this game to people who loves fantasy games and fantasy movies. The story-line is fantastic and the game itself is just beautiful!
xX420MadisonIvyXx;-;dis gaem svaed me from sertain doom and maid me a better swag
marma;-;Beautiful Graphics: The Interactive Experience press left and right click to kill things and follow the arrow to win! (in all seriousness, streamlining this series for easier access is slowly killing it, and what we will soon have if this trend continues are amazing looking games with loads of stuff to do but with the story and the complexity of a game made for 5 year olds. this is a good, well made game, but is sincerely lacking in many areas, namely story, acting, npc quality, lack of character development, lack of lasting impact in the world, lack of real conflict and consequence to your actions, and simply lack of that certain charm Elder Scrolls games always seemed to have. even Oblivion had that certain charm, and some say it was even more terrible with its streamlining. all in all, good game, most will disregard this review, but I yearn for the complexities and just extreme effort that Bethesda put into Morrowind to resurface someday.) 7.5/10
oilysgtjonson;-;THis is a great game it has a great story line, Lots of action, and hours of gameplay, one of the best ive ever played
Sir Boss;-;One of the best games i have played in my life. And you NEEDD to play this game.
Airianna;-;Do I recomend this game... HELL YES! I've been so busy playing the game, I never wrote a review, I have played this game far more than any other game I have tried, and with all the mods from various places, the game possabillites are endless. I would get into some of my personal mods I am using, but I will spare you the details other than possible infestations and pregnancies. The balance of the Vanilla game is great, and it happens to be a great starter for one to play. I use the Creation Kit to make changes so I don't have to run to town before getting half way through a single "dungeon", and I tried on several aspects to increase rank wise for aditional perks in different areas. Like for use of 4 enchantments instead of 2, but it is set up where you can only up it once, not 3 times, so was forced to hit 4 directly. And same thing with increased carriing capacity, allows for only a single upgrade to it. Am still a novice, or I would change the base settings to add more branches off that one. Once you learn the controls, that are quite simple, game play is smooth, combat is not really my thing in most games, but in this game, it keeps me going back for more, on a regular bassis, Difficulty is moddable while in game, even in battle, to make the boss fights a bit easier if needed... Ok, there is just too much for me to say about this game, and after speaking with friends, this is the last True "Elder Scrolls" game, as the Online version totally sucks, and not even made by the same team that made this game, shame shame... Anyway, This is the game I play, as my times show, and will continue to grow as time wears on, and new mods become available as 3rd party content, I will add it to my game such as,"Become a Lord" in my case, Lady... Should just say Jarl so there is no gender differientials... Ok, back to my game, Have to Kill Aulduin for the 10th time....
Anacarnil;-;The epic atmosphere that wraps this chapter of the TES saga is stunning, allowing the player to dive into a magic world on the edge of a crysis felt never before. The gameplay is quite simplified compared to the previous chapters, nonetheless it still gives a special insight into the fantastic lore of The Elder Scrolls. 10/10
Drith;-;Such a great game, i can go wherever i want and do whatever i want! 5/5
Argentos;-;I can't stop coming back to this. Somehow, Steam hasn't even logged all of the hours I've put into this. One of the brilliant things about Elder Scrolls is how simple it is to charge right through the story (if you have your waypoints on) or to just roam around endlessly for hundreds of hours doing nothing of significance. It's genuinely beautiful, especially when you consider the myriad of content created by other users to add to this game.
Drith;-;Such a great game, i can go wherever i want and do whatever i want! 5/5
Nicholcheese;-;This game is amazing. There is so much stuff that you can do. I have been playing for ^ and i have not even goten close to finishing all the side quest. But there are some giches so be perpard. the that it is a Bethesda seys that, but it also seys that they spent alot of time of this game and it amazing. A game with so meny good things is bound to have some problems. It was made it 2011 for crying out loud. Any ways YOU should pick up this game, buy it, its 30$ but its worth 60$. There are no words for the AMAZINGNESS of this game.
Vyrkon;-;So obviously this game has SO MUCH to live up to. And it delivers in literally EVERY aspect of those expectations. I'm a huge fan of TES so when I got my hands on this game the only thought was = SCORE. Totally worth the money. This review mainly consists of my playing on the console version, but I picked it up for PC during the holiday sale and adding in the mod community only increases its replayability by countless hours? Days? Months? NO, YEARS. My total time played on console is nearly 450+ hours. Occassionally any game could get repetitive or boring, and yes Skyrim is no exception, but this only takes place when you think you've done everything, only to turn a corner and find 10 more hours of content you apparently were entirely oblivious to. Bethesda has done well to tuck extensive content into nearly every inch of the game world just waiting to be discovered. The expansions were a welcome addition to the game, especially since I was finally able to return to Solstheim. The only issue I walked away with was that the main storyline seemed short when compared with Oblivion or Morrowind (but this may have just been because I blew through it out of pure excitement). Anyways the game is completely worth the price tag, it was even worth the price tag of $60 at release. Clear and easiest 10/10 I have ever had to give. GET THE GAME. Side notes: Combat = 9/10 Not much improvement motion-wise over Oblivion. But nonetheless engaging and awesome. Quests = 10/10 Extensive, Numerous (literally hundreds of quests), rewarding, and all enjoyable. World = 10/10 Definitely immersive, never once did I feel a loss of involvement in the events unfolding around me. Enemies = 10/10 Plenty of variations. And to top it all off, there are dragons. Just dragons, if you take anything away from this, just know, DRAGONS.
SneakyBandit;-;The benchmark of the Open World RPG. Little can be said on Skyrims shortcomings as the game is an experience that any 'Gamer' should have. The world is alive and it is easy to forget the quests and become a participant in the communities of Skyrim. The game is a brilliant time-sink and it is very easy to rack up hundreds of hours of gametime. The addition of thousands of user created mods enhance your game to your liking. The modding community is active and creative and is constantly producing new and interesting mods that add hours of fun to Skyrim. I cannot speak more highly of a game.
Lysiloma;-;... I lose track of time while playing this game. D:
went camping. be back 7-20-2015;-;gotta love this game :3 oblivion was cool, but i like the game play better in this one cause of DRAGONS!!!! :P
HisOwnStupidity;-;Skyrim was one of the most-anticipated games of 2011, and you can see an amazing amount of polish and detail from Bethesda in some of the changes they'd made to the engine since previous Elder Scrolls games. No 'make your own class', character progression is even more free-flowing this time around. Skills rank up and become more effective as they're utilized, with a bonus based on how well-rested your character is and which mystical standing stone you've most recently attuned to. This allows a character to jump back and forth between more-efficiently raising 'mage-style' skills, 'warrior', and 'thief' abilities. Character level increments as enough ranks are gained in these skills. Enemies level with the character, but are 'locked' at the level they were when you first entered that area. Cave of necromancers just too hard for you? Leave, come back in five levels. It means that fresh encounters will always be challenging, but rarely overwhelming. The combat/interaction mechanics are updated so that there's a right-hand/left-hand, left-click/right-click mechanic. This allows the player to wield a spell, weapon, or shield in one hand and something complementary in the other. Two versions of the same spell can eventually be 'dual-cast' to improve effects, and this mechanic also puts a new spin on the two-handed, sword-and-board, and dual-wielding melee combat. Skyrim is a very open, living realm with lots to do; so much, in fact, that it may be a tad overwhelming. Everyone wants something from the Dragonborn. There's discrete quest chains for the main storyline (Save the world from a world-eating, immortal Dragon who goes about resurrecting his dead dragonbros), the Mage's college (where a character who barely knows how to use magic can rise to the very top, not that many will notice), the Fighter's Guild (by any other name) that introduces some helpful companions and a new way of becoming something that goes bump in the night, the Assassin's Guild (with tales of love, madness, betrayal, and sticking pointy things into others), and a far-reaching, long-spanning saga for the humble Thieve's Guild of Riften that'll send you all across the continent as the stakes get higher and higher. Honestly, the last two seem to dwarf the 'real' plotline, but your mileage may differ. Aside from (and included in) those, you have any number of random minor fetch, kill, and other classic quest-types, some of which use the new semi-random-generation 'radiant' quest system. They'll never run out, and rarely repeat, but generally are just there so that you know you can always do quests; they're rarely worth it. So, whether you want to play a stealth-based archaelogist trying to snatch precious Nord treasures from the powerful undead Draugr guarding them, a shield-bashing, axe-swinging juggernaut with shouts powered by the stolen souls of freshly re-killed dragons, or a crafty mage with a penchant for bringing in Daedra friends to do her bidding, Skyrim's got options for you. There's rough spots, there's high points, but it's a great example of a proficient studio kicking out a AAA flagship title. As for DLCs, I'll likely review those on their own.
[CFI] OptimusPrimeSteak;-;Very addicting game. It is a must have for all action seekers out there. There are so many things to explore in the game. I love it after finally experiencing my first elder scrolls game.
marma;-;Beautiful Graphics: The Interactive Experience press left and right click to kill things and follow the arrow to win! (in all seriousness, streamlining this series for easier access is slowly killing it, and what we will soon have if this trend continues are amazing looking games with loads of stuff to do but with the story and the complexity of a game made for 5 year olds. this is a good, well made game, but is sincerely lacking in many areas, namely story, acting, npc quality, lack of character development, lack of lasting impact in the world, lack of real conflict and consequence to your actions, and simply lack of that certain charm Elder Scrolls games always seemed to have. even Oblivion had that certain charm, and some say it was even more terrible with its streamlining. all in all, good game, most will disregard this review, but I yearn for the complexities and just extreme effort that Bethesda put into Morrowind to resurface someday.) 7.5/10
Elric Bloodrose;-;I'd recommend this game to people who loves fantasy games and fantasy movies. The story-line is fantastic and the game itself is just beautiful!
topfpflanzen-wrger;-;You can play this game over and over again trying different builds (though I mostly end up being a sneaky archer and swords man). This game never gets boring, and if it does somehow, there's a ton of addons and mods you can choose from (My personal favourite in terms of user mods: Helgen Reborn). Over all this game will fill many hours, as long as you fully play it (meaning not just rushing the main quest). There are many nice side quests that are often better then the main quest (The thives guild quest IMO for example). The DLCs Dragonborn (Having started the Elder Scrolls with Morrowind, I especially enjoyed Dragonborn) and Dawnguard add to the many quests and play time. A great game!
8-Bit Cerberus;-;"Just when I thought I was out... they pull me back in." - Michael Corleone Who am I kidding? I was never "out" on this game. 2 years and ~420 hours later I'm STILL finding new things to do and places to explore. Betwen Morrowind, Oblivion and Skyrim I've probably spent way more time than is healthy traversing the landscapes of Tamriel. And the mods available for Skyrim now have me wanting to go back to Morrowind and Oblivion, freshly modded up, for another round.
Poppa Qwop;-;Lots of replay value, especially with the mods that you can add to this game.
[TKT][Lord]kamikaze;-;Skyrim is an amazing single player action/adventure RPG, massively recommend to any who love large open worlds and open gameplay. Even if you confine yourself to just the main quest, this is still quite a large scale game. If you delve deeper into the side quests for factions, and randomized mini quests, you can easily put hundreds of hours in this game. This game is open to a lot of gamers - and difficulty is adjustable in the options so you can still play a fun game even if you aren not the quickest or slickest gamer. Combat requires you to make good decisions on default difficulty - one bad mistake and you will be dropped quick. When I state the game is open - it is in different styles as well! Skyrim has very open advancement, and many opportunities to advance your skills in either magic, combat, or stealth (or a combination of all). You are not as restricted as in previous Elder Scrolls games (and they were very open). Skyrim even has perks - skill points you can place on skills to improve their function even more than leveling up. Great for those who like skill trees! Before I hit negatives: I recommend if you intend to play this for more than the main story - research console commands (the ~/` key). I don't recommend using them to ruin the core gameplay (it is possible), but you can use them to work around certain bugs, and annoying issues that can occur and ruin your fun. On the negative side - even with the game patched up - there are bugs. I recommend highly making multiple save files, and frequently. You may play constantly without running in to bugs, but some play and constantly end up needing to reload. My playstyle is very explorative - I will get stuck in the environment and need to load again. Occasionally important - but not required - NPCs will be killed through random events and attacks. This can be frustrating when you go to a town ready to unload items for sale only to find the shop keepers body outside and a pack of death hounds nearby. Also in the negatives - The "Hoarder" gameplay style is not conducive to this game. Skyrim imposes a strict carry limit. When you exceed this limit, you slow to a crawl, and cannot run, or fast travel between places. This means you may literally spend an hour or more walking slowly from a dungeon back to town if you are a hoarder who keeps and/or sells all items! Some players tend to use the console commands to increase their carry limit - but this does defeat part of the core gameplay concept - it is your choice though. Overall - I thoroughly recommend this game. Though not as innovative as some of the other Elder Scrolls games, this is still an incredible achievment despite any bugs or issues encountered.
Boris the Atomic Cockroach;-;What to say about this game? Its fun, exciting and teaches you to fly.. after you foolishly try beating up a giant. Its got something for everyone, no matter what your favourite play style. Like charging at the enemy? grab a suitable sword and get hacking.... enjoy stealing stuff.. theives guild for you, and you can always do worse than joining the mages guild, calling yourself Tim the Enchanter and spending your days blowing up bits of the landscape, before mocking a passing party of knights. Stir in a civil war, plenty of side quests, odd jobs, not so odd jobs, and just plain weird jobs and you've already spent 100 gaming hours exploring one huge sandbox of a game world before you've even tried starting the main quest. Does the game have its faults? of course. The menu system could be better for us PC users, and the 3rd person kill cam breaks the illusion while you are in the midst of a huge battle. But all in, its worth the money and gets a Boris rating of 9 gallons of napalm out of 10.
Booty Ma'rootie;-;Fun... uhh comand console and mods are great 8/10
Capn Awesome;-;Best open-world game out there. Graphics and gameplay are great and mods will leave you with endless replayability.
straussy270;-;An awesome game and a must buy when it goes on sale. Why are you reading this? Go play some Skyrim!
Mikan;-;This awesome game has so many ways to mod to your liking, and best of all when i picked it up in the sale it was only 3.47 !! what a bargin. the game story ending i thought was a little disapointing but there is so much to do outside and explore which awesome, one of the best open world games out there.
Juri_Bean;-;A game which could easy occupy you for 200+ hours and still would make you want to play it more. If Im not going to the mechanics of the game, Skyrim offers a unique sense to the players which gives it a strong attraction. Its not the story, graphics, music or gameplay alone. Its the combination of all of that which makes this game one of the best I've played.
[TKT][Lord]kamikaze;-;Skyrim is an amazing single player action/adventure RPG, massively recommend to any who love large open worlds and open gameplay. Even if you confine yourself to just the main quest, this is still quite a large scale game. If you delve deeper into the side quests for factions, and randomized mini quests, you can easily put hundreds of hours in this game. This game is open to a lot of gamers - and difficulty is adjustable in the options so you can still play a fun game even if you aren not the quickest or slickest gamer. Combat requires you to make good decisions on default difficulty - one bad mistake and you will be dropped quick. When I state the game is open - it is in different styles as well! Skyrim has very open advancement, and many opportunities to advance your skills in either magic, combat, or stealth (or a combination of all). You are not as restricted as in previous Elder Scrolls games (and they were very open). Skyrim even has perks - skill points you can place on skills to improve their function even more than leveling up. Great for those who like skill trees! Before I hit negatives: I recommend if you intend to play this for more than the main story - research console commands (the ~/` key). I don't recommend using them to ruin the core gameplay (it is possible), but you can use them to work around certain bugs, and annoying issues that can occur and ruin your fun. On the negative side - even with the game patched up - there are bugs. I recommend highly making multiple save files, and frequently. You may play constantly without running in to bugs, but some play and constantly end up needing to reload. My playstyle is very explorative - I will get stuck in the environment and need to load again. Occasionally important - but not required - NPCs will be killed through random events and attacks. This can be frustrating when you go to a town ready to unload items for sale only to find the shop keepers body outside and a pack of death hounds nearby. Also in the negatives - The "Hoarder" gameplay style is not conducive to this game. Skyrim imposes a strict carry limit. When you exceed this limit, you slow to a crawl, and cannot run, or fast travel between places. This means you may literally spend an hour or more walking slowly from a dungeon back to town if you are a hoarder who keeps and/or sells all items! Some players tend to use the console commands to increase their carry limit - but this does defeat part of the core gameplay concept - it is your choice though. Overall - I thoroughly recommend this game. Though not as innovative as some of the other Elder Scrolls games, this is still an incredible achievment despite any bugs or issues encountered.
Boris the Atomic Cockroach;-;What to say about this game? Its fun, exciting and teaches you to fly.. after you foolishly try beating up a giant. Its got something for everyone, no matter what your favourite play style. Like charging at the enemy? grab a suitable sword and get hacking.... enjoy stealing stuff.. theives guild for you, and you can always do worse than joining the mages guild, calling yourself Tim the Enchanter and spending your days blowing up bits of the landscape, before mocking a passing party of knights. Stir in a civil war, plenty of side quests, odd jobs, not so odd jobs, and just plain weird jobs and you've already spent 100 gaming hours exploring one huge sandbox of a game world before you've even tried starting the main quest. Does the game have its faults? of course. The menu system could be better for us PC users, and the 3rd person kill cam breaks the illusion while you are in the midst of a huge battle. But all in, its worth the money and gets a Boris rating of 9 gallons of napalm out of 10.
Booty Ma'rootie;-;Fun... uhh comand console and mods are great 8/10
Capn Awesome;-;Best open-world game out there. Graphics and gameplay are great and mods will leave you with endless replayability.
straussy270;-;An awesome game and a must buy when it goes on sale. Why are you reading this? Go play some Skyrim!
Mikan;-;This awesome game has so many ways to mod to your liking, and best of all when i picked it up in the sale it was only 3.47 !! what a bargin. the game story ending i thought was a little disapointing but there is so much to do outside and explore which awesome, one of the best open world games out there.
Juri_Bean;-;A game which could easy occupy you for 200+ hours and still would make you want to play it more. If Im not going to the mechanics of the game, Skyrim offers a unique sense to the players which gives it a strong attraction. Its not the story, graphics, music or gameplay alone. Its the combination of all of that which makes this game one of the best I've played.
M4tea;-;The best game ever!!! :)))
Exel;-;10/10 How can you not reccomend this game. The scope is huge, the quests are plentiful, the gameplay and graphics are still amazing. You will lose many hours of your life with this game happily.
Pete_;-;Words cannot describe how awesome this game is.
Tatthuston;-;......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... _____.......__............._____ .............//'...'/`............|...__.....\....|...|............/... ___| ........../'/.../..../......./\..........|...|....\....|....|...|...........|..../ ........('(.......... ~/'...').........|...|.....|...|....|...|...........|...| .........\.................'...../...........|...|__/...|....|...|____....|...\____ ..........''...\.......... _...............|_____./.....\______\....\_____| ............\..............( ..............\.............\ No paid for mods
Greebs;-;Skyrim - is so f*cking awesome!!!
TSpear;-;Classic game that might get destroyed by a terrible business model by Valve and Bethesda.
Spooktacular;-;"Buy mods" No
Adondian;-;Hear me out yes this is a great game, but paying for mods is dumb as the Dev doesnt get it all, I say visit the nexus the mods are free. If they want the mods to have a cost then ALL THE MONEY GOES TO THE DEV NOT ONE PENNY GOES TO THEM AND THE DEV CAN CHOOSE THE PRICE.
Austin Mansalad;-;First game to sellout to Valve, lost all respect for Bethesda, can't see myself buying the next elder scrols unless the paid mods (Low quality DLC) are reverted.
USA USA USA USA USA USA USA!!!;-;You've lost my trust. I am not against modders receiving compensation for their work, but the current system implemented by Valve will only hurt modders and mod supporters.
HenryQuach;-;This is not the way to do it, this is a huge, huge mistake Steam. There are better ways. please.
Darthdrake01;-;Game is great, paid mod dlc is not. This is truly the dark age of pc gaming.
AmPm;-;Only worth playing for the mods, which Valve is putting behind a paywall. Sadly this pretty much ruins the reason for buying the game. Hopefully they come to their senses and just add donation buttons. Until then, people will steal others content and post it for profit.
Stavvy;-;Mod it untill it crashes simulator 2011 10/10
Not the Shipmaster;-;Aside from Battlefield 4, this has got to be my favorite game of all time. I really recommend the Elder Scrolls games to RPG fans. This game has great graphics, great gameplay, great voice acting and deserves a 10/10 rating. The game also supports mods which can be downloaded here on Steam, or on Skyrim Nexus. Mods for Skyrim can be created using the Creation Kit. Overall, this is a great game that I really reccomend for RPG fans. :]
Mr. Palliman;-;You can drive a warhammer into a man's brain and they still dont give two . I love this game.
CommissarRAWR.;-;Why should I even write a review for this game. BUY IT. NOW. RIGHT NOW.
~zXFTYWPo;-;I recommend this game. Bethesda have desgined and created a true masterpiece. The Elder Scrolls series is some really great lore, the feel it has is so immersive, more so to our own I feel, and I have to say, slightly more so than J.R.R Tolkiens lore on middle earth. Skyrims feel is no diffrent to the other games in the franchise, altho I must admit I haven't had the pleasure of expieriencing any of them other than a small 1 hour, 1 death play of Morrowind, Skyrim, of course, in fact I believe to have over 2000 hours of gameplay in Skyrim, as I play on the Xbox 360 most of my time, and my fellow brethren allow me to indulge them in some lore and I'll do some roleplay with their character which we don't mind. Oblivion also, I've had many an adventure in the realm of oblivion and Cyrodill, I even have the game manual and every DLC, paid full price as on the XBOX. Probally countless more hours on that game, and I'm definatley familiar with lore in The Elder Scrolls, however, the freedom and power that come with playing and being immersed in an Elder Scrolls game is unlike any other, thanks to bethesda softworks and many other countless reasons :OO: the impact it has on the way at least I think, is significant, makes me want to roleplay,and I shall set out and weave my own fate, outsatanding..... :') If you play skyrim, and your rig, whatever you play on. be it laptop, linux I think you can run it on? Mac, anything I guess, if its about the average, I say you definatley should get some mods running with skyrim, it only matters that you have the right and required system/rig, to run it on IF you want graphical mods, or highly increase data and such, otherwise, not so important. You would want to go to Nexus mods and community, on the web, and search on catorgorys for anything your interested in. Also before I tell you what I have, you will need to know how to install mods, if you don't already know, of course if you are unsure of anything you may not want to mess anything up or waste your time to try it, for a great guide on how to do almost everything with mods, search YouTube for Gopher, and watch his video on, well anything, hes a great guy and he explains all you need to know better than most people do that I've seen haha. Hope you get through that alright, and really, if your under 10 years old, which its sort of illegal or breaking some rules if you are, to play the game exetra, you might find it hard to understand, skip things and not do what you need to correctly, causing things to get messy and possibly broken. Don't take shortcuts (follow the guidence/trail) you can ask me anything on the matter too I'd be happy to oblige. Personally I have many* about 50 immersion modifications (mods) and more gameplay effects and changes, also maybe 5 overhauls, one for each, audio, combat, skills, enviroment, gameplay, and a complicated one. Well its a long list of around 600 alltogether modifications, bare in mind that some of theese are about 3kb in size, so i could somehow merge together all the files ive found and downloaded and get to only have 50 or so mods, but not really necesary, with Nexus Mod Manager. Basically, modifications personalise to your dreams and taste, give you what you want and possibly more, there are about 25'000 modifications to be found on the site and many more to come, you can always create and add yourself, Skyrim is endless then and truely magnificicant. If we were to modify older TES games it just wouldnt live up to Skyrim modded as it is down to technology, but can give you endless more time playing with excitement and emotion, and even merging other realms, ooohhh hah (: so much to tell you I could, I guess if you want to know more I'd be a good start to ask on, and your welcome to. It is a great life expierience to explore and adventure Skyrim, turn HUD off at the start if I were you, to be more immersed, and if you will add mods, play through the beggining untill you are 'Unbound' and start to configure, and do not forget to save! Oh that's another thing, if you have more than 4 saves it usuallyy caused loads of problems, like Crash To Desktop and corruption with data, that sort, so limit your saves wisely. Just to say, there is a mod made for Skyrim, for littrally 60% of what ever you think of, and if not, make it :), hardly limmeted, I dont know how to say to people that they should start playing it... If you, are hungry for adventure, seek the land of Skyrim! Fare well..
demonsl0th;-;It's a good game which I have spent many a joyful hour playing... and modding. This is the reason I am writing a negative review. The paid mod system is possibly the worst decision made by Valve and Bethesda so far. Forcing someone to pay for something that might not even work with their current configuration of mods is just wrong. A simple 'donate' button would be enough to support the mod developers, especially since most have survived this far without any contribution for their work whatsoever. So many other reasons but if you need to be told them then you probably shouldn't even be on the internet without supervision... Linus to lead the rebellion against the false deity GabeN!!!
eup116;-;I like the game but I am scared of this new trend that we are starting to see. Very soon modding will become like DLCs, you will need to pay for all of them. Then soon after that you will get a "completed" game that you cannot finish or miss large parts of the story because the $60 that they charge you is not enough and you will need to buy more packages.
Scales;-;You should be ashamed of yourselves.... Paid mods...
aaronucf;-;I bought this game for the huge, and free, modding community. Now that all of that has been thrown behind a pay wall due to Bethesda's greed, it's no longer the same game that I purchased (and would not have purchased if this had been in place from the start).
utfanx2;-;Modding is a hobby not a career. If modders want money they can make their own game. A mod is a showcase of talent to gain experience to put on a resume. It is a springboard into game development. If modding becomes lucrative, there will be no new game developers, just droves of modders modding the same game over and over.
Oakes;-;We do not support paid mods. Good luck, you'll need it.
Lelithdel;-;Mod creators should have the option of being financially supported but not in the way Valve is doing this.
KANOWA FRENCH;-;This just in: Valve shortening the gap with EA and Ubisoft to be the biggest joke in gaming.
rez;-;This game lets you go absolutely nuts with character creation and customization. It also features one of the worst endings I've ever experienced. The Workshop integration is amazeballs. Overall: 9/10.
Faildozer;-;Playing Skyrim is like driving drunk, you never know when you're gonna crash.
Daring;-;Mod it until it crashes.
BC;-;Step 1: Download Game Step 2: Download Mods Step 3: Download More Mods Steps 4-217: (See steps 2 and 3) Step 5: Play game (or maybe more mods) What you can do with mods: -Make followers sexy? Check -Mod the hell out of the graphics? Check -Marry Serana? Check -Bang Serana? Check -Bang (insert any character's name here)? Check -Punish guards for complaining about arrows in the knee? Oh yes. Infinity/10
Gimboid;-;Sooooo fun, better with DLC, mods add infinite replayability. One of my favourite games.
commander shepard;-;its call of duty but with less shouting
Duckie;-;Described a slightly amusing antic within the game and put 10/10 at the end. 10/10
Kane;-;This is possibly the best elder scrolls game ever. It has improved or added features from other games. I would know. In the direct predecessor, Oblivion You can do many things such as join guilds and organizations like the Dark brotherhood, The Thieves guild or The Blades. In Skyrim There are changes, Such as the fighters guild in Skyrim is called the companions, I know these arent the same groups but they do the same things. And the Mages guild is the College of Winterhold. There are also very nice DLCs for this game such as the Dawnguard or Dragonborn DLCs. The Dawnguard DLC adds the ability to become a vampire lord as well as perks for the vampire lord and werewolf. It also adds a questline where you have to fight the vampire menace by killing one of the most powerful vampire lords in Tamriel, you do this by getting a magic bow to stop the vampires from getting rid of the sun. You also have the choice to join the vampires and block the sun temporarily so that you dont get negative effect from it. That sums Dawnguard up. Now lets get on to Dragonborn. In the Dragonborn DLC you get many new things such as shouts, armor, weapons, There is also another new quest line. In this one you fight Miraak, The first dragonborn. You go to the island of Solstheim to find out why cultist tried to kill you and you run into some trouble along the way. You have to learn the shouts that made Miraak so powerful. It is mainly one shout, called Bend will. With this shout you have the power of flying dragons. Cool huh? You have to go to the Daedric lord Hermaeus Mora to learn this shout. You also meet the Skalls, a people consisting of Nords that believe in a god called the All-Maker. That sums that one up. The is a minor DLC called Hearthfire that adds the ability to adopt children and build your own house but that is mainly it. The modding community also are a very important part in this game. They make many fixes to the main game and also enhances it. There has been many mods that patch parts of the game that make it 100 times better. That sums Skyrim up. If I was giving this a number rating then I would give it a 9.7 out of 10.
GeldrinHor;-;I purchased and started this game after at least 7 yrs of playing Morrowind. The World (Tamriel) is a place I fell in love with due to it's intricacies and flora and fauna (tho the fauna does like to try and eat you from time to time). The Storyline in Skyrim is attentive to the world view that ALL the Elder Scroll games seem to follow and that makes it a very enjoyable trip. Admittedly, I have made use of one or two mods with the game (Glowing Books, Better Crafting, more salt, and a couple of house mods for Breezehome, Lakeview and the one up north outside of Solitude...in Hjaalmarch) but am generally running the storyline and as many sidequests as I can. As you can see, to this point I have invested 194+ hours into it and it still keeps me entertained. I have enjoyed the scaling of combat to my level, keeping me challenged. SOME of the NPC voice sets and even graphics tend to get used over and over, but to draw and voice THAT many individuals would have required a full on Hollywood budget to make this game. I love how the story leads you around the world, but doesn't limit your choices while exploring. The side quests really make this an "Explorers Nirvana", and yet still offers more than enough combat for even the most battle loving gamer. For ANY players (both old school and newer folk) who enjoy a great solo adventure, and one that can really immerse you into the story, this is yet another smash hit for Bethesda. Welcome to Tamriel, grab a sword and follow me. . . .
Kirou;-;Paid Mods after how long? WTH?!
Hurken;-;After the adition of the workshop and paid-for mods the quality of the game has drastically decreased. Easily obtainable mods is what made this game what it is today and removing or obstructing that has been/will be disastrous for the future of this Skyrim and other games to wich this system may apply in the future.
TheUnforgiven;-;valve, Just WTF People make mods and download mods, cause they can get free fun, and expansions. DLC Already costs, you dont need mods to cost. youll lose more money,cause some people want to make the game better with mods. making them cost will make people not buy the game.
RNGesus;-;Amazing how this game's score has dropped from 98% to 87% so quickly
DriscollBr;-;This was always a game I recommended, but with the caveat of it being made fun thanks to mods. Due to the recent monetization of mods I feel I have, for the sake of fairness, to review this game by its own merits, without modability. Visually, its uninteresting dribble made for Xbox 360 hardware, full of bugs that make it as stable as an one legged chair, with so little content that it's scary. The cities look so lived in you'll feel walking through Prypyat, you can only take one NPC with you, which is a blessing in disguise, because they are as interesting as a pile of bricks. Talking about enemies, the Dragons, biggest enemies of the game, might as well be ashtmatic geckos, for all the danger they pose, and their AI, and that of any other enemy is overshadowed by a dog with down syndromme. The combat is: 1-stealth-fire an arrow 2-Win. The civil war is nowhere to be seen, other than in a couple of exchanges with said uninteresting NPCs. All of those problems (and some more) are fixed by mods. Since valve and bethesda want mods to become DLC to get all those dollars, then the game deserves a review of vanilla.
Contemplative Panda;-;Paid mods should NEVER be a thing supported in the Steam Workshop. Donating to mod makers is one thing - but hiding content FROM the community FOR the community is another. Long live free mods.
Kapitan Neko;-;Paid Mods.
JollyPirateKing;-;I highly recommend this game if you like to go on an adventure and slay dragons. I made many unforgettable memories in this game.
AmpVee;-;A modder's paradise and hell all in one package. And trust me, you're gonna want to be modding this game as soon as possible.
Crudyg123;-;This game is a must ! Although that i didn't play the game for too long but it's amazing and i am going to spend a lot of time on it ! It's the best damn RPG Open World game out there ! Go buy it ! NOW ! Only costs 20$ for this masterpiece ! Also if you have some money lying around i recommend going with the Legendary Edition like i did since it has all the DLC.
iamth3wa1rus09;-;If this game was a potato it would be a good potato 15/10
Aythadis;-;Still haven't beat any story missions...
Dutch Double Dax;-;Vikings. Mountains. Snow. Backwards flying dragons. Looks pretty. And a lot of people apparently voiced by Arnold Schwarzenegger. I felt I had seen it all after 30 hours, but what makes the PC version superior is MODS. I always wanted to ride a Chicken. tenouttaten
Kajja;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim Review PROS -Awesome story -Amazing modding community -Immresive -So many things to see and do -Lots of lore CONS -Can be very glitchy -Default textures look kinda gross OVERALL An amazing experience that everyone should have in their Steam Library. A must play! MY SCORE 9.5 out of 10
scrubmcnoob;-;Paid mods are gone, 10/10 not have to pay again.
Jacob {Trading};-;This game is really amazing. It's almost 4 years old and still plays and looks great. Definitely buy this game.
blue face square face man head;-;I now, in all good conscience can re recommend Skyrim. Here's to hoping Valve and Bethesda have learned from this massive mistake, but I wouldn't count on it. There's always Doom 4, Fallout 4 and TES VI. Happy (free) modding, everyone.
Burqa King;-;Paid for mods, sick joke brah.
Dickerious;-;Paid mods, not reccommended.
RandomUser;-;So Bethesda and Valve realised that only mods make Skyrim actually playable and they decided to make them user made DLC and keep 75% of the profits while also paying the mod creators only in 100$ bills. As you can see the mod creators won't make any money unless their mod makes over 400$.
Cl0wnFace;-;Your game has stopped working? Look no further. ''Skyrim.exe has stopped working'' mod is now available for purchase! At the cheap price of 10$, you can now finally fix this issue that will probably still come back and you'll be forced to manually fix it yourself! Eyeing that pretty looking armor on the Workshop? It's YOUR lucky day, pal! Buy this EXCLUSIVE armor set that is purely aesthetic and actually sucks, while you can get better and more reliable armors from Nexus for free! Don't miss out on this cheap price, only 25 bucks! Want to get the paid version for a mod, but still have the free one? NO PROBLEM! We now allow the creator to forcefully place ads whenever you spend time with the free version to force YOU to buy the paid one unless you like being annoyed! As an added bonus, the creator can now stop supporting the free one! Skyrim: Paid Mods Edition! Buy yours TODAY!
Dances In Rain;-;Paid mods are not acceptible. this is a petition to get rid of paid mods: https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop
Ranger Wolf;-;I was not a fan of the game, it seems there are too many bugs unfixed even years after production
rabureta;-;I cannot approve of allowing mods, by definition an unofficial alteration of a game, to be sold for money as if it were official content. Nor can I approve of Valve or Bethesda taking a 75% cut despite having invested no work. Nor can I believe the insinuation that allowing mods to be placed behind a paywall is good for a community that has freely debugged, redesigned, and improved the Elder Scrolls series via mods since the release of Morrowind more than a decade ago. Neither the Stormcloaks nor the Empire wants the Thalmor meddling in their business. We don't want greedy executives meddling in ours.
Lerggio;-;I've been waiting years for the HD horse testical mod.........and it's under a paywall :/
IRSmoh;-;If mods are still paid for: No; this game is complete trash without mods cannot recommend, nor can I support recommending a company that has paid for mods as an option. If mods are no longer paid for: Sure, its a modding platform essentially and nothing past that.
Unknown;-;Game is fun, but I cannot recommend it due to the way mods are currently being handled. I will update my review if this issue is solved.
Papa;-;Selling mods as DLC is wrong.
J.J. Binks;-;Paying for mods? Are you serious?
Toolio Rodriguez;-;Remove paid mods.
Rev.Phantaztix;-;You know why I'm not recommending this game. SHAME ON YOU GabeN!
FawkesOverlord;-;actual game b4 paid mods: 10/10 game after mods paywall: 0.1/10 at least i can redownload cold and wet off skyrim nexus EDIT: creator removed it from nexus, torrent it is
New God Flow.1;-;I'll review it after I pay for these 2 mod
theadvenger;-;A game where the populace has been enslaved to work for their masters. Where for every gold coin earned the evil lords at Valve and Bethseda take 75%. Let the north be free!
sionor;-;I feel that given the new nature of the paid mods, Skyrim's review should be wholly based on the vanilla version. Bland, colorless game with very little creativity. The combat is stale and boring, the quests laughably repetitive. Only positive is the fantastic score which makes otherwise boring gameplay tolerable however it does not take away from the incomplete glitch filled mess that it is.
JboySman;-;With the introduction of paid mods i cannot give this game a reccomend.
More-doff;-;Mods were what made this game. Now those times have come and gone. This game is sadly joining the countless others in my library that will not be played again.
Jim Hacker;-;Valve + Beth makin us pay to fix this consolized + poorly designed game.
Franku Senpai;-;Boooo! Mods should be free!
The Wolfman's Brother;-;A good game that doesn't need a pay wall.
Gokart_Mozart;-;"We think there is a fundamental misconception about piracy. Piracy is almost always a service problem and not a pricing problem" -Gabe Newell Already had this game on ps3; bought it on steam to play with mods and now its useless. Will be taking my business (data as Gabe called it in an AMA) elsewhere from now on.
Balerion;-;Paid mods implemented very badly.
Knightro;-;Paid mods are not OK.
CosHavoc;-;played the original game. buggy and often crashed. then came the mods..made it rainbow-spewingly starstruck awesome. now the game developer wants a cut when people like me only bought the game after viewing all those awesome mods and killing the overall warm fuzzy feeling of community that is friendly and changing it to hostile. great job Beth.. you should also remember it is the community such as nexus and modders such as Fore that makes FNIS made sure to never help pirated gamers when the mods are not working and help to promote against piracy by telling them to buy the game
Katharta;-;The shortsighted greed of Valve and Bethesda with their shady implemenation of paid modding has tarnished the Elder Scrolls franchise and the Steam platform irrevocably. Bethesda have benefited for over a decade from modders who fix, improve, and add value to their games. This event is an arrogant slap in the face to the dedicated, loyal CUSTOMERS whose money has given these companies the reputation they've earned so far, but apparently that doesn't mean much anymore. We're going to remember this when Fallout 4 comes around. Or if Valve ever uses the piles of money they skim from Steam to create the game we've been begging years for and hung out to dry...
HiV;-;Paid mods are ed up yo.
billybobbert;-;Skyrim gets a "no" until a return to reasonable modding practices is made.
Axios;-;Attempting to destroy the modding community one game at a time. Can't be bothered to finish their game, so they make other people pay to do it.
Harry Kane Emin;-;The only game where you can have an adventurous life after marriage. 10/10
Sylv the Shy Sylveon;-;This game is truely amazing. I have a hard time stopping onceI start and the storyline is completely and utterly diverse and through. I would recommend this game to anybody.
FallenVegeChips117;-;Skyrim is an amazing game 10/10 I give it a huge thumbs up: .......................,,-~*~,, ......................./:.:.:.:.:.| ......................|;.;.;.;.;./ ......................|.;.;.;.;.| ............._,,,,,_.).;.;.;.;.| .........,,-":.:.:.:."~-,;.;.;.| ........(_,,,,---,,_:.:.);.;.;..",, ......,-":.:.:.:.:.""-,,/;.;.;.;.;.", .....(:.__,,,,,,,,,___);.;.;.;.;.;| ...../"":.:.:.:.:.:.:""\;.;.;.;.;.," ....\",__,,,,,,,,,,,__/;;;;;;;;;/\ .....\.::.:.:.:.:.:.:.;.);;;;;;;;;/:\ .......\,,,,,---~~~~;;;;;;;;,"::::\ .........."""~~--,,,,,,,,,,-"::::::::::\ ...................\::::::::::::::::::::::
Tizz;-;This game isn't dragon down my fun
SneakyBandit;-;The benchmark of the Open World RPG. Little can be said on Skyrims shortcomings as the game is an experience that any 'Gamer' should have. The world is alive and it is easy to forget the quests and become a participant in the communities of Skyrim. The game is a brilliant time-sink and it is very easy to rack up hundreds of hours of gametime. The addition of thousands of user created mods enhance your game to your liking. The modding community is active and creative and is constantly producing new and interesting mods that add hours of fun to Skyrim. I cannot speak more highly of a game.
Nicholcheese;-;This game is amazing. There is so much stuff that you can do. I have been playing for ^ and i have not even goten close to finishing all the side quest. But there are some giches so be perpard. the that it is a Bethesda seys that, but it also seys that they spent alot of time of this game and it amazing. A game with so meny good things is bound to have some problems. It was made it 2011 for crying out loud. Any ways YOU should pick up this game, buy it, its 30$ but its worth 60$. There are no words for the AMAZINGNESS of this game.
Dvionst;-;kill dragons without wearing clothes 11/10
daWarLord;-;This is truly one of the best games I have ever played. An epic tale that allows you to play it however you want to. Along with Steam Community and an entire modding community behind Skyrim, the possibilities and adventures are endless. If you have not tried out the epicness of Skyrim, I recommend picking it and living it yourself.
tk;-;why are you reading a skyrim review when you could (and should) play skyrim instead?
~ColdTooth~;-;Thank you for removing paid mods.
dam son;-;Skies with rims. Thomas the Tank Engine mod. Cheese shout mod. Made by Bethesda. Not made by EA. 10/10
Ovoxo;-;Most Of The Time I Just Walk Half Naked In The Snow 10/10
Gutsy;-;Great game!
Cheri//;-;I have 8.60gb of mods for this game and I intend to get more. This is why I havent beaten the game yet.
Dr.Edomae;-;This game contains adventure.......suspence dragons women and sweet rolls!
Stavvy;-;Mod it untill it crashes simulator 2011 10/10
[HS] LukeDaWolf;-;Instead of reviving dead dragons, their bodies go flying off in some direction. Like a ragdoll. 10/10
CommissarRAWR.;-;Why should I even write a review for this game. BUY IT. NOW. RIGHT NOW.
Not the Shipmaster;-;Aside from Battlefield 4, this has got to be my favorite game of all time. I really recommend the Elder Scrolls games to RPG fans. This game has great graphics, great gameplay, great voice acting and deserves a 10/10 rating. The game also supports mods which can be downloaded here on Steam, or on Skyrim Nexus. Mods for Skyrim can be created using the Creation Kit. Overall, this is a great game that I really reccomend for RPG fans. :]
Mr. Palliman;-;You can drive a warhammer into a man's brain and they still dont give two . I love this game.
Fozzie28;-;This game is in my personal top 10. i have owned it on all 3 platform,s beat it uncountible times and to this day still enjoy playing it. if you dont own it GET IT ASAP
rez;-;This game lets you go absolutely nuts with character creation and customization. It also features one of the worst endings I've ever experienced. The Workshop integration is amazeballs. Overall: 9/10.
Faildozer;-;Playing Skyrim is like driving drunk, you never know when you're gonna crash.
Daring;-;Mod it until it crashes.
BC;-;Step 1: Download Game Step 2: Download Mods Step 3: Download More Mods Steps 4-217: (See steps 2 and 3) Step 5: Play game (or maybe more mods) What you can do with mods: -Make followers sexy? Check -Mod the hell out of the graphics? Check -Marry Serana? Check -Bang Serana? Check -Bang (insert any character's name here)? Check -Punish guards for complaining about arrows in the knee? Oh yes. Infinity/10
Gimboid;-;Sooooo fun, better with DLC, mods add infinite replayability. One of my favourite games.
commander shepard;-;its call of duty but with less shouting
Duckie;-;Described a slightly amusing antic within the game and put 10/10 at the end. 10/10
Kane;-;This is possibly the best elder scrolls game ever. It has improved or added features from other games. I would know. In the direct predecessor, Oblivion You can do many things such as join guilds and organizations like the Dark brotherhood, The Thieves guild or The Blades. In Skyrim There are changes, Such as the fighters guild in Skyrim is called the companions, I know these arent the same groups but they do the same things. And the Mages guild is the College of Winterhold. There are also very nice DLCs for this game such as the Dawnguard or Dragonborn DLCs. The Dawnguard DLC adds the ability to become a vampire lord as well as perks for the vampire lord and werewolf. It also adds a questline where you have to fight the vampire menace by killing one of the most powerful vampire lords in Tamriel, you do this by getting a magic bow to stop the vampires from getting rid of the sun. You also have the choice to join the vampires and block the sun temporarily so that you dont get negative effect from it. That sums Dawnguard up. Now lets get on to Dragonborn. In the Dragonborn DLC you get many new things such as shouts, armor, weapons, There is also another new quest line. In this one you fight Miraak, The first dragonborn. You go to the island of Solstheim to find out why cultist tried to kill you and you run into some trouble along the way. You have to learn the shouts that made Miraak so powerful. It is mainly one shout, called Bend will. With this shout you have the power of flying dragons. Cool huh? You have to go to the Daedric lord Hermaeus Mora to learn this shout. You also meet the Skalls, a people consisting of Nords that believe in a god called the All-Maker. That sums that one up. The is a minor DLC called Hearthfire that adds the ability to adopt children and build your own house but that is mainly it. The modding community also are a very important part in this game. They make many fixes to the main game and also enhances it. There has been many mods that patch parts of the game that make it 100 times better. That sums Skyrim up. If I was giving this a number rating then I would give it a 9.7 out of 10.
GeldrinHor;-;I purchased and started this game after at least 7 yrs of playing Morrowind. The World (Tamriel) is a place I fell in love with due to it's intricacies and flora and fauna (tho the fauna does like to try and eat you from time to time). The Storyline in Skyrim is attentive to the world view that ALL the Elder Scroll games seem to follow and that makes it a very enjoyable trip. Admittedly, I have made use of one or two mods with the game (Glowing Books, Better Crafting, more salt, and a couple of house mods for Breezehome, Lakeview and the one up north outside of Solitude...in Hjaalmarch) but am generally running the storyline and as many sidequests as I can. As you can see, to this point I have invested 194+ hours into it and it still keeps me entertained. I have enjoyed the scaling of combat to my level, keeping me challenged. SOME of the NPC voice sets and even graphics tend to get used over and over, but to draw and voice THAT many individuals would have required a full on Hollywood budget to make this game. I love how the story leads you around the world, but doesn't limit your choices while exploring. The side quests really make this an "Explorers Nirvana", and yet still offers more than enough combat for even the most battle loving gamer. For ANY players (both old school and newer folk) who enjoy a great solo adventure, and one that can really immerse you into the story, this is yet another smash hit for Bethesda. Welcome to Tamriel, grab a sword and follow me. . . .
VMR;-;I used to have a life like you, but then I bought Skyrim from Steam.
Larexus;-;One of the best open world games I have ever played, with an active modding community to keep you entertained for hundreds of hours. Pros +Huge open world with loads of dungeons and interesting areas to explore and enjoy. +Even though its a few years old now, it is still eye candy everywhere you go and if you want an even more impressive boost of graphics thier is a mod for that. +Loads of new lore to keep fans of the elder scrolls lore happy. +Steam workshop. This is by far the best part about playing Skyrim on PC. The steam workshop allows you to mod skyrim in so many different ways. Whether it be adding new weapons/armour, more dungeons, player homes, mounts, races, skills, towns, quests, creatures, graphical increases, and pretty much anything else you can think of. =There are bugs in the game much like most bethesda games, however none of these(as far as I know) are game breaking and are actually mostly just humourous. Cons -Though the story dialog is good, in alot of instances I feel disconnected to the conversation or cutscene style dialog and feel more like a ghost floating around a room watching it happen. Final thoughts This is a must have game if you own a pc, even if you have played it on console in the past, it is a whole new game once you dip into the modding community, not to mention it looks great. You could even wait for a sale to pick it up since it is a very popular sale item and goes on sale almost every seasonal/holiday sale.
[CDF] Officer;-;Well goodbye schoolwork and grades this game is so amazing my eyes were spilling red from my sockets from are awsome but all in all most of the time you will forget the time of the day when you play it
Simon Tibbling;-;Where is all the dragons? I give 1o/1O
Nero;-;You probably already know that the Game is awesome.
Sissa;-;Love the story, love the mythology, love the gameplay, love the adventures and the immersion (art, scenery, landscapes, music!). You just want... to... keep... playing! My 'best-friend' game in these last months. :)
Skythur;-;Skyrim's biggest strength as a game and why it continues to be relevant and popular years after release is Bethesda's support for the modding community. With the ability to modify any and every aspect of the game you could imagine, the opportunities available are endless and the final result: a custom gameplay experience created by and for the player. To put the story of Skyrim simply, you discover you are the legendary Dragonborn of myth. Your fate is to stop Alduin the World Eater who has returned from 'eternal slumber', resurrecting his fellow dragons with him and is set on enslaving the world. The main quest line is enjoyable but with the Elder Scrolls series, saving the world can be put on infinite hiatus if you so choose. This freedom of choice is what defines Skyrim and aids in multiple playthroughs with various characters. I would HIGHLY recommend the avenue of modding to gain the most out of your Skyrim experience. This is not always easy work. Managing mods, editing ini files, resolving conflicts and troubleshooting CTDs are some of the work you will face. But the rewards will more than make up for it. For a game released in 2011, you can transform Skyrim into a beautiful masterpiece. If you chose not to mod some of Skyrim's flaws will become apparent: The UI is designed with controller support in mind and is not optimised for Mouse + Keyboard. Combat can become boring and repetitive with too simple base mechanics in place. Graphically some textures show their age with low res models and lighting issues. Missing out on all that realism and immersion. ( ) I recommend the Legendary Edition over the base game. The individual DLCs do not get heavily discounted (to date) and include a decent amount of additional content. Certain mods will require you own all or particular DLC.
Black Iron Tarkus;-;Skyrim is an open-world RPG set in the Elder Scrolls Universe. As the fifth installment of such a well known and influential series, it is certainly the 'biggest and best' so to speak. Looking at a game this large from a top down perspective would be rather difficult though; so lets split it into sections, shall we? Too long; Didn't read: I recommend this game to somebody who wants an adventure, because this game is just that, focused on exploring and trying to become a part of the long Elder Scrolls Story. If you want a difficult journey that will test you as a player, then maybe try Monster Hunter or Dark Souls. Section I: The World~ In terms of real world size Skyrim is nothing to scoff at, because its total explorable world size tops out at around 14.8 square miles, or 23.81 kilometers. Scattered among this massive countryside are bandit encampments, wolf-packs, and many of baddies and treasures. A major threat plaguing the land of Skyrim (to go without saying too much) is dragons, and many of these colossal beasts can be found while exploring. Such size can not be achieved without some downfalls, and many of these include: Recycled voices- many of the voices are recycled and many of the aforementioned bandits repeat the same tired lines and I'll kill yous. 'Same-y' Towns- I personally didn't find the towns super enjoyable, many of the characters seemed to have their heads mostly in the cloud, and what they had to say was muddled, as if some big troll walked through during the loading screen and clubbed everybody once or twice. Similar Encounters- enemies and other creatures in Skyrim are placed determined by a random list, this often leads to predictable and repeated enemies, for example: 'in my plathrough I was wandering through the mountains when suddenly I heard a noise behind me, and found an ice troll charging towards me, after a protracted battle I finally slayed it, over the next hour exploring the mountains I ran into four or five more trolls; of which almost every single battle went in the same direction', this leads into the next point in the review. Section II : Combat and Skills~ Skyrim's combat system is, to put it frankly, very simple, and there is not much room for player skill. In RPG games one of the main components of difficulty is the distance between 'Player Strength' and 'Avatar Strength', this leads to my main gripe with Skyrim. There is an immense gap between the two, the extent of the 'Player Strength' I found necessary was to mash the my left mouse button while occasionally using the shield bash skill I used. After a while I grew kind of tired of my 'ole sword and board' build, so I decided to try my luck as an archer, I was genuinely unimpressed by the unsatisfying archery. During my first bandit encounter I decided shoot him with my bow, my first shot landed dead between his eyes; unfortunately this not only didn't kill him, but only made him angry. I shot many more arrows into face and after somewhere between seven to ten-ish arrows he kind of weakly slumped over. Needless to say I found this very unsatisfying, and magic fared slightly but not much better. The skill tree on the other hand, impressed me quite a bit, and I was pleasantly pleased with the sheer size and aesthetically appealing skill tree. Leveling up is satisfying, and I did feel a constant drive to hit the next level and max out all my skills. Section III: NPCs The NPCs only real purpose seems to be fodder enemies and to give you quests which they certainly fulfill, NPCs are plentiful and almost every non-hostile NPC with a name (IE: not bandits or guards or such) has a quest for you at some point which is good and gives the player something to do at all times. My biggest gripes with the NPCs are the children, I despise every single child in the game, their voices are obnoxious and grating, they all seem to share the same ~five or six lines, and worst of all, there is nothing you can do about it, they are immortal. To say without spoiling much, one of the first towns you can visit has a Jarl, who is basically the ruler of the town, and his kids repeat the same things every time you pass them. Final Thoughts: For a journey, it works very well, the world is large and lush, there is plenty to do, exploration is fun, and there is a sense of unity. The graphics are nice for its time, and I personally believe they still hold up today. Combat eventually begins to feel dull and repetitive, but that is to be expected, this isn't a game focused on deep and involved combat mechanics. My final rating is 8/10, definitely worth a purchase, I hope this review is helps you decide whether or not this would be a helpful purchase for you.
Jethro;-;Coming from a huge fan of the Elder Scrolls games, Skyrim wasn't a disappointment. The story and concept of Skyrim was interesting, dark, mysterious, well-written and an enjoyable experience. Even through a low-quality texture here and there, or a misplaced static object and black texture glitch- I don't see them as that much of a problem. Even though at times you can mutter to yourself, 'Damn it, Bethesda!'... these problems are easily fixable by the modding community. The modding community of Skyrim is well supported by Bethesda. The modding community adds a lot more content, a lot more quests, more NPCs, or certain bug fixes that Bethesda overlooked. Skyrim is not a disappointing game for someone like me who has enjoyed Oblivion and Morrowind. Skyrim was different. Bethesda did a great job at making Skyrim look beautiful, but at the same time cold, unforgiving and dangerous. All-in-all Skyrim is an epic game with a well-written and diverse story. The DLCs were great, Skyrim in general is great, there is not much else to say here. :)
JollyPirateKing;-;I highly recommend this game if you like to go on an adventure and slay dragons. I made many unforgettable memories in this game.
AmpVee;-;A modder's paradise and hell all in one package. And trust me, you're gonna want to be modding this game as soon as possible.
Crudyg123;-;This game is a must ! Although that i didn't play the game for too long but it's amazing and i am going to spend a lot of time on it ! It's the best damn RPG Open World game out there ! Go buy it ! NOW ! Only costs 20$ for this masterpiece ! Also if you have some money lying around i recommend going with the Legendary Edition like i did since it has all the DLC.
iamth3wa1rus09;-;If this game was a potato it would be a good potato 15/10
Aythadis;-;Still haven't beat any story missions...
Dutch Double Dax;-;Vikings. Mountains. Snow. Backwards flying dragons. Looks pretty. And a lot of people apparently voiced by Arnold Schwarzenegger. I felt I had seen it all after 30 hours, but what makes the PC version superior is MODS. I always wanted to ride a Chicken. tenouttaten
Kajja;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim Review PROS -Awesome story -Amazing modding community -Immresive -So many things to see and do -Lots of lore CONS -Can be very glitchy -Default textures look kinda gross OVERALL An amazing experience that everyone should have in their Steam Library. A must play! MY SCORE 9.5 out of 10
scrubmcnoob;-;Paid mods are gone, 10/10 not have to pay again.
Jacob {Trading};-;This game is really amazing. It's almost 4 years old and still plays and looks great. Definitely buy this game.
blue face square face man head;-;I now, in all good conscience can re recommend Skyrim. Here's to hoping Valve and Bethesda have learned from this massive mistake, but I wouldn't count on it. There's always Doom 4, Fallout 4 and TES VI. Happy (free) modding, everyone.
X01JP;-;Paid mods removed - recommendation reestablished
:3 Jman;-;A fantastic, large, open world RPG with infinite quest-lines and constant replayability, thanks in great part to the strong modding community :D
knothead;-;This is an incredible game. Now that the debacle with the paid mods is over, I have no reservations recommending this to anyone who hasn't played it. Whether you're an rpg fan or not, this is a game everyone should try out. Even without mods this is a great game, but the active modding community turns this masterpiece into a living, breathing world that you cannot walk away from.
Drakan;-;One best PC games ever! Make your way to the fantastic imaginary Skyrim, and play the role you want in a totally open world you-decide-game. Graphics are good, and the High Res Pack (free) make it even more beatiful. You can play it even with older cards, with good resolution. I recommend this to all Elder Scrolls and RPGs fans.
MOLESTER;-;OH YEAH! One of the most lively game of all time! Do you wanna finish this game?  YOU saying Skyrim! This game is infinite and you can play and play and play how much your heart desires! Do you like your life? This boring life? NO!? So play Skyrim, Skyrim will replace ur life! I dont have enough words to say that is freaking awesome! I rated it 11/10! Ammmm... Wait! I changed my mind, in this game no sex scenes, and I can`t Molest kids or animals( And graphis a little bit sucks, and I can`t poop in this game, and inventory uncomfortable and... and... ahhhhhhh... Fine! 9.5/10 This is true and fair rate for this peace of life simulator in Russia with Nords, magic, dragons, dungeons, treasures and bags!
BRUTAL;-;Bought game and get warmed by wildfire of last reviews from paid mod haters. 10/10 Would warm again. Also acquired few mods for 10$ bucks.
Flondy;-;Now that Valve/Bethesda has removed the whole paid mods, i can now give this a positive. But I still have my eyes on you Valve.
Silverchoz;-;You hate big giant damn spiders? dont need to worry, just change the Spiders with bears mod and youre done. I can finally play this game without be freakin scared for spiders! 11/10 would bear again
denz =D;-;R.I.P Skyrim mods, having to pay for stuff that was made for free
Tourgen;-;Truly uninspired and terrible combat. The most poorly implemented combat in any fantasy game. The most notable failure is spell casting. Uninteresting and very generic spell selection. The only good quests are the artifact quests. The main story-line quest is unimaginative. Mods were the only reason to play this game and now they are paid-DLC. This game is trash.
Cool Pizza;-;dis game is great i love it and you should too
GreatFable;-;The game itself is one of the best RPGs i have ever played. I love it on console and when i got it on pc the whole modding world oppended up and up to recent days i throughly enjoyed it. However, This is again one of the bad things steam has to done to ruin this once amazing game. Paid mods are not a step forward and i know that the modders in skyrim liked doing it for free but once again Steam ED IT UP!
Ou8mydragon;-;Why not make a donation page for modders Valve.
Fundamentalist Herbertarian;-;Paid Mods are antithetical to the user experience
-HardeRR*Dante;-;Paid Mods=DONT BUY
Ditzy Doo;-;To keep it short and simple, Skyrim was never a great game. It was certainely engaging and it ate a lot of my time, but it has not aged well. Mods are what kept this game alive, I'm not inclined to pay for something that has traditionally been free, and I will never pay for a mod when 75% of the money goes to the distributor and lazy dev AFTER THE MOD HAS MADE 400 DOLLARS THAT MONTH. Don't buy this game, pirate it if you really must experience a buggy button mashing piece of garbage that the fans had to finish.
[Spudlord]Narus;-;Paid mods, no thanks.
Prince;-;Mods should be done out of love. Look at how many mods there are on the Nexus and other sites like that. That's all people putting their time and effort into things they love. Not for profit, at most they should get revenue from ads displayed on their page, like Youtube. Kids, don't support paid modding.
Cyril Figgis;-;I won't be buying another bestheda game from here on out.
Nataniel;-;Screw the payed mods. Lord GabeN, why?
gamerxd311;-;I love this game so 10/10 but just f&#@ mods now ther just a rilly s@$# dlc go to nexus for GODS sake get this game dont pay for the mods.
Hellfire;-;Third party DLC. Do not support this practice.
-=l Smango l=-;-;Way to go steam..... Way to change PC gaming for everyone... then try to ruin it buy doing this. Everyone do not buy this game, do not buy modded content. Setup a Donation Wall if anything but this is plain stupid. You say you can't police all of steam looks like you have to now. $10 for a golden apple??? LOL Please. -10 for steam.
Xars;-;Get your wallet ready if you want to play with any mods. Thanks Valve.
Milky! Milky! Moist!;-;skyrim is a four year old game that has stayed alive for one reason, its community. i am ashamed to say that i cant give this otherwise amazing game a negitive review, because of volvos complete disrespect for the elder scrolls community with the practice of payed mods #freetheworkshop Show your displeasure in Valve's recent descision to make paid workshop mods, join the group http://steamcommunity.com/groups/FreeTheWorkshop stEAm vAlvE gaben is becomeing Electronic Arts
Panic;-;Not recommended . Avarice has nothing to do with the spirit of this game.
Sumgai;-;This may very well kill what made the elder scrolls stand out on the PC. Modders have worked in the past on the basis of collaboration to make great things. That won't be possible here. On top of that bethesda and steam think they are owed a 75% cut for what may include none of their original assets. Think again.
Grimp;-;GJ Valve. Im sure Nexus will appreciate the extra traffic you are sending their way.
Streaka;-;Discount the game and then add cost to the mods to make up for it. Terrible idea. Ruins the community. Unless you want to pay for mods in addition to dlc, skyrim isn't worth it. Valve and Bethesda have ruined this game.
[Volk]Mr Scott;-;This game is supporting a paid workshop, and is worthless to me now. 6 of my nexus mods have been uploaded onto the Paid Steam Workshop, and I haven't uploaded any of those to it... And haven't given my permission. This is a extremely ed up thing, user created piracy.  you Valve
JohnnyTsunami;-;Paid mods, really? Way to close off an otherwise great game.
Grizzly Adams;-;Valve has just set a very dangerous precedent.
.Danny;-;Paying for mods ruined the game.
patzivota;-;Valve & Bethesda are taking 75% of the profits from mods????? Wtf, man. Bloody hell Apple takes only a 30% cut from apps. In comparison, Valve takes about the same from game sales: 30%. So why, when mods, created by fans and freelance artists (some are pros), who put their freetime into enhancing Skyrim does Valve/Bethesda get well over most of the money? Now Skyrim will be tainted with thousands of unproportionally fair microtransactions. 75%??? WHAT???
PaigeX;-;This new "pay for mods" thing is awfull. I've been a huge Bethesda fan since Morrowind and up until recently I've been buying all my games here on Steam. They've crossed the line here and I will not be buying another game on steam nor another Bethesda game until they come to their senses.
King Tamborelius;-;The game use to be great, only because it was supported by the online MOD comminity that I have loved being part of. Now some of my favorite mods are even being taken off NEXUS only to be seen on STEAM as PAID content. seriously  U STEAM WORKSHOP. I DO NO SUPPORT PAID MODS
Baron Zorn von Djur;-;The greed of Bethasda and Valve has killed my love for this game. The once amazing experience has been forever tainted by the new ground that has been broken by charging for mods. This game will now forever be looked at as the one that really ed the pooch. I can only hope that this can of worms will be closed soon.
conan_sloan81;-;I'm on the bandwagon
Naxer;-;Two reasons: - The worst first impression ever... First time I launched it I already had no sound; - Lord Gaben has decided to charge money from mods and started with this game. Whoever supports this idea, be aware that great majority of people hate it. For the well-being of everyone and good future of games, DO NOT buy these mods!
brad_18_white;-;Remeber when Skyrim mods were free? Pepperidge farm remembers.
Schwartz;-;Gaben please.
PRAXE 0,2;-;Added paid mods. \_()_/ Its a pretty mediocre game that was made awesome by mods. Now its a pretty mediocre game that the developers of think its awesome and thought they could sell mods made by the community. I'd rather buy it off of GOG.com or P*rate it. And then get awesome mods at the skyrim nexus.
Who_Ate_Mah_Cake;-;You have to pay for mods now. What the ?
SzyjeCzapki;-;Paid mods. Avoid at all cost. Shame, it is an awesome game.
Damp Updates;-;Paid mods are a horrible idea.
Bobethy;-;The implementation of MODS for an exchange of currency has stripped this game of its once vigorously pleasant Gameplay how uncouth.
[FP] Paul;-;Valve's at it again. The paid workshop is just another pay wall. Go ahead and get this game, it's really good. It's moddable, but go to Skyrim Nexus for your needs for that. NOT THE PAID WORKSHOP VALVE SET UP.
I'm sorry dad, come back please;-;Go  yourself Valve and Bethesda
CPrimex;-;Probably the best game in TES franchise, its a shame they sell the mods that used to be free. Mods are what makes the game on PC so much more better.
senNish[Tenzin NOOOOO!];-;The game itself is good, but I felt the need to come here and specifically not recommend it because of Valve and Bethesda's cash grab on mods created for the game. Even with the option to publish paid mods, it's ridiculiuous that Valve and Bethesda think they are entitled to 75% of any money gained from it...
Cezerye Erak;-;This generation's "The Best RPG & mFPS" Must be played by everyone who is living on this earth.
Falling With Style;-;Used to love this game for the freedom modding allowed me to customize it with, but now that mods are no longer free, I am hesitant to continue. Paying money for extra content that may not be polished, debugged, or compatible with other mods means that each mod I purchase is now a risk for me. Unfortunately, it would seem it is time for me to move on to other games...
Infernal Wraith;-;This just in: Money whoring has reached an all-time high, as valve start to sell MODS.
Jukebox;-;As you can see i put a lot of hours into this game, more than you can see, since ive played it a lot offline. The game is good, but the new pay-for-mods mentalitiy Valve tries to shove into our faces is a farce. And im not gonna support it. Sorry modders, i really think you shoud get paid for your work, but i dont supoort Valve taking 75% of the modders money for 0% of the work.
Chaos Bat;-;me think they mod no do good stuff no i can no support company who let peple copy mod and then sell mod and then let them continue mod sell, bad bad people, bad
-ED[G]E-;-;Paid Mods? Yeah...noooo....thanks..
Comrade;-;False god Gaben has made us pay for mods. Down with the false god.
Chris;-;I do not like the system that is in place for how mods are currently (4/24/15) being sold.
SNAILEATER;-;Awesome game on its own but has been kept alive by mods. Now Valve want to charge for mods and that I dont approve of. Give the modders a donate button and then dont take 75% of the donation you greedy s...
VividRedemption;-;Valve and Bethesda have started allowing mod creators to charge for their mods today. Today marks a day when developers can successfully stop creating games and instead get money for other people building games for them. We are locked outside an infinite paywall of DLC and paid mods.
Max_Black0;-;While I had fun with this game, there is one MASSIVE problem with it. Steam. Steam has extensive DRM and DLC and now forces paid mods. This is the last straw, I will no longer use steam.
[MMW] ecips;-;Mods have kept all Elder Scrolls Games alive for decades - until now. Thank you for killing a perfect game series by kicking their greatest supporters in their asses.
Solaire The DragonBorn;-;] Bob is building an army to fight the war against Paid Mods.  ...\/ Copy and paste him all over the work shop so he Il]. Defeat the paid mods!
Danimal;-;I used to love this game, I really enjoyed it. Sure I may not have been as fond of it as I was previous titles in the series, but with enough mods even Skyrim could be made fun, but now? After the hundreds of hours of work I put into the game to get it running successfully with 500+ mods, finding out which ones conflict, which ones require each other to work, repairing them, cleaning save files, toying with the .ini's, spending long enough learning TESEdit and the creation kit, crafting mods to suit my own tastes. Only to find out one day my game is preventing me from launching it because I'm now stuck at literally hundreds of dollars worth of paywalls? I will never play this game again, and that is truly a shame. Thanks Valve and Bethesda, truly you're supporting the modding scene by making modders never want to touch your game.
UnusualResults;-;End of an Era. Press F to pay respects.
Leo;-;Such a pity.
[KOR]rkaehdaos;-;pay for mods? ! Maybe It's comming to stop steam gamelife
mikoREAL |;-;I thought that mods are made by community for community for free. Right Volvo? RIIIIIIIIIIIIIGHT?
Magicdealer;-;I'm not one to write reviews normally. However, in this case, I find that this is one of my few avenues to protest the addiiton of paid mods to skyrim, and indeed, to steam in general. Modding has been part of bethesda games since daggerfall, and officially supported for a long time now. The environment for modding has always been set up to prevent cashing in. this is important because it means that the only mods that are submitted are done by gamers to improve the game they love, and not by scammers and those looking to make a quick cash grab. This move can only toxify the modding environment, and destroy the community that has built itself around the open and free sharing of mods. I am disappointed in steam for offering this, and at bethesda for allowing it. As consumers, the only thing we can do is to vote with our pocket books, and through the messages we spread. Here's my message: The longer paid modding is supported by steam, the more I'll shift my gaming purchases to other sites. I've got a decent library of steam games. I'd like to see it continuing to grow, but I won't support what amounts to paying extra money for basic bug fixes that should have been implemented before the game shipped in the first place. I encourage everyone else to do the same.
Slaven;-;The game is fantastic, and 100% better being able to download mods and use them to spice up the game from the weird to the wonderful, and I am happy to donate to the modders who are making fantastic mods instead of the goofy but fun ones. But now they aren't free, they are paid for thanks to Valve/Bethesda/Fat cats. So I cannot recommend this game to anyone now. https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop/u/10624086 Sign this petition to stop this becoming the norm!
Radapple;-;Sorry guys. The game is great until you realize what has been extending it's life is the modding community and valve just ruined that to make a quick buck. Without a free modding community I can't reccomened the game.
laggyluke;-;Paid mods suck.
Virai;-;I pretty much just bought this game for user-made content. Thanks to Valve and Bethesda, this will all soon disappear. I never thought that Valve and Bethesda would be the two companies to spearhead such an idiotic paywall and interfere with the amazing PC modding community.
Moon Chris;-;Don't charge people for mods
no3y3h4nd;-;Free mods are a fundamental aspect of the PC gaming universe. Don't support bethesda's stance on nickel and diming from it years after the game was out of active support.
1c2at;-;One of the best RPGs I have played with mods.
Missing;-;| BOB IS BUILDING AN ARMY AGAINST PAID  MODS. COPY AND PASTE HIM ALL OVER THE  WORKSHOP!
Knight of Cydonia;-;PAID MODS?!?!?! I don't want to live on this planet any more...
DoVahKiin;-;BAD Marketing!!!. I am disappointment in your action.
oppy;-;The vanilla game is garbage only fixed by the mods. Just seems that with the mod payment system, valve isn't interested in modders working together anymore, so really can't recommend this game.
Niru;-;Bad until paid mods removed!
Thegreatestname;-;I used to be a good game until I took a paywall to the knee Whats next DRM for mods? Hasnt DRM done enough damage to gamers...
Dazvolt;-;Valve desires MOAR MONEY! GIVE ALL YOUR MONEY TO VALVE! But, seriosly? Payed mods? Hell, there will be no more free mods, because every schoolboy now will mod some one god damn texture and place price over 9000 $. Valve, I'M DISSAPOINT.
whyusopro90;-;great game except the paid dlc wall...
ne|Poseidon;-;Paid mods, no thanks.
Chickenboy;-;Mods are now DLC because of this game and Steam/Bethesda
M;-;Great game, fantastic mods, HD support, customizable to your heart's content... Buuut it's now the breeding ground for corporate ery, so, no thanks.
Masmix;-;I played just for some time, bought it on winter sale - for me game is too empty, still its not a bad game, however... -> !!Not playable without mods!! - and now bethesda wants to make money from modders. Dont support them.
Floppy[SVK];-;Everything was alright until they announced paid mods...
AJ;-;Its a sad day when parents disown their own child. A modding community of 5 years thrown and tossed out into the cold. Pleas and cries of help ignored :(
Uzi Maniac;-;"Skyrim Workshop Now Supports Paid Mods Weve had a long and excellent relationship with our good friends at Valve. We worked together to make the Workshop a huge part of Skyrim, and were excited that something weve been working together on for a long time is finally happening. You can now charge for the mods you create. Unlike other curated games on Steam that allow users to sell their creations, this will be the first game with an open market. It will not be curated by us or Valve. It was essential to us that our fans decide what they want to create, what they want to download, and what they want to charge" Need I say more?
Eilrymist;-;Fantastic game ruined by Valve's short sightedness and greedy ways. Bethesda, Valve, shame on you. Profiting off of what was born out of people's love for the game. If you actually wanted to support these programmers, hire them. Don't monetize off their work by putting free mods behind a paywall. This game is kept alive by the modding community. Without them, you are nothing.
RuinedKings;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve.
neuromancer;-;Skyrim without mods is an OK open world RPG that often feels shallow. Skyrim with the full force of the massive modding community behind it is a masterpiece. With the paid mods system fracturing the modding community and opening it up to fraudulent exploitation by greedy s I cannot in good conscience recommend this game any longer.
Rylo;-;10/10 would buy every mod.
Merlak;-;suka blyat mods should be free!
Skriffin';-;I cannot endorse this game. Paid mods. EDIT: Holy  people actually read reviews, huh, Well regardless Mod paywall reddit reddit gabe newl John Madden John Madden Football ect. I also fixed spelling errors. EDIT 2: I'm going to play this game, and now that mods are free I'm going to mod this game, but I'm never going to forget what happened. Vote with your wallets people.
One Cooked Goose;-;Let this be a reminder to those who would threaten our homes and our community. On this day a great battle was won against a tyranny of paid mods. We honor Chesko, a great mod author who fell victim to this. May he rest in peace. Those of us who were far too harsh had no closer a target in our sights. May we remember the good times of him and the great mods he brought to us. May we keep the community free and open to all. May we donate the money we do not need to those who spend so much time on these mods, so that nothing like this ever happens again. We have won, my friends and can recommend skyrim once more. 'Tis a great game made even greater with mods. Mods that anyone can use.
Nekonomicon;-;I will mod this review to give a positive rating for $50.
[IG] L4V05;-;It is with a sad heart I must say I cannot recommend buying a bethesda game anymore, they have left behind their care of the consumer and joined the ranks of the worst companies in gaming.
wizehuman;-;because they dun did paid mods
sandie.sandgreen;-;This game has the potential to be an amazing game, but... the inventory looks like something they threw together at the last minute, and if you are using a bow, the kill-cam is a gamebreaker, and there are (to my knowledge) no official way to disable the kill-cam. It is possible to fix the game using mods, but without these mods, the game is unplayable. As a longtime fan of The Elder Scrolls, it breaks my heart that I cant recommend this game :-(
Red;-;Why sell mods?
Socrates;-;This is an updated review. I gave it a negative review due to Steam putting a paywall around the most popular mods and the workshop in general. Now that Steam has lifted this, I am willing to give the game a positive review again. Hopefully, Valve learned its lesson from "Modgate". Overall for the game, the Vanilla game is a fun experience, but mods have made it into a game that I can delve hours into at a time without shame. Thank God these mods are free!!! :)
KoolTheKid;-;90% of quests are fetch quests, game breaking issues, ugly graphics, a HORRIBLE engine and it goes on... EDIT: Valve has removed the paid mod feature, I still do not recommend this game. However with the use of mods you can take it from mediocore to masterpeice. I don't think a game should rely on it's modding community to make it playable so I am giving a thumbs down.
Dcoolest_T;-;Edit: The text below you can disregard, but be weary it sounds like valve is going to try and add paid mods again in the future. Well, if they didn't add paid mods I could suggest this game since modding adds countless hours of game-play and has kept this game alive and feeling new. I felt I could support mods that added more to the game, but most of them are out of proportion with the cost to game-play. We are not even guaranteed that mods we pay for will work, and without having a guarantee buying mods becomes a gamble for the future of the game. Lets set up a scenario, say you paid $5 for a mod. Then you get a new mod that breaks the last one. Now you have to choose between them, or as valve wants you to do ask the mod developer to fix it. Sure you have 24 hours to fix it but what if you bought the second mod and had some issues and the return time ended? Then you are stuck with a broken mod or two. I could maybe see this being worth it if all the mods were top notch quality, and supported till the day the mod creator dies, but that wont happen and compatibility issues are sure to arise. I cannot see the longevity of the mods lasting since their sales could go down and the developer doesn't want to support it since it is not bringing in a profit. A lot of the top notch mods add a bunch of time to the game-play but there is no way you can sell it if 25+ people worked on it. Splitting the profits would be a pain, and with the mod developers only getting 25% of the profit, it doesn't seem feasible. Then there is the base mods that a lot of the mods are developed off of. What would happen if one of those was to be sold on the community market? You would have to buy the mod and that adds to the base cost of the game. I do not want to pay for a mod that is required to run other mods, because it just adds to the cost of modding. I cannot see this helping the longevity of Skyrim, and its successors. Mod developers would have it better off with a donation system instead of valve and Bethesda taking 75% of their profits. 25% probably doesnt help the mod developer too much anyways, and its a bad incentive for large developer groups.
Gleb;-;Notable features Villagers will defend their livestock to the death Not TES:Online You can wear a dress as a dude Dragons, probably Teleport to places you've previously been More dialogue than anyone has time for Dwarves UPDATE: Dwarves have been removed. They left the dwarf dungeons in though, lol. Probably a bug Giant-powered suborbital transport (Warning: fatal) I saw this game at walmart once and I regret not buying it then because that was ~2 months more of my life I had to spend without Skyrim. This game has nasty big spiders and is thus not for the faint of heart. However, those who can brave its perilous catacombs may find themselves engrossed in the world's rich lore and complex societal dynamics. Or not. Skyrim's NPCs have acquired a reputation for stupidity somehow. Let me set the record straight. Their pathfinding and dialogue are both top notch. For example, after aiding my brave mage in slaying a dragon, a guard complained about being assigned guard duty rather than an exciting job such as, for example, killing dragons. I've never seen a character in any game with such a well programmed simulacrum of short term memory loss. Every NPC has an assortment of such flaws integrated into their behavior, which makes them feel much more human and relatable. Nobody's perfect, after all. But you have the option to stave off your crippling imperfection by buying TES V: Skyrim.
Lady of Shadows;-;This game is awesome. I had it for the PS3, beat it and thought I would play it on my PC because it's just that good. I bought the bundle pack with the DLC so I am excited to play them all! I dont even do the main quests, I just like wandering around and going into caves etc and fighting enemies and finding some pretty sweet items (most of which I sell for money). Did I mention dragons? I love dragons, it makes sad that I have to kill them but nonethless, they died with honour. Oh, and there's some pretty funny glitches.
Sno |Alpha Wolf|;-;The best RPG i ever played.
HoZzMeBeazt;-;THIS IS OPEN WORLD
Officer Bimble;-;Sky's the rimit
whostolename;-;its a game. 10/10
rhoms;-;With an endless possibility of adventure, and a great modding community, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is one of the best RPGs ever made. However, it suffers from rehashed dungeons and character models, along with familiar scenery in some places. None of that is enough to draw away from the incredible depth, scale, and intensity of Tamriel. The province of Skyrim is an incredible place to trek, but many of the events that happen in the game feel immersive at first, before revealing themselves to be a similar, if not exactly the same, endeavor each time. For example; a fugitive runs up and gives you a sword and a threat. This makes you feel like you're in a living, breathing world, only to have that breath extinguished when you realize it'll be the same situation again and again and again as long as a fugitive needs your help. Rehashed content is the only drawback to an otherwise truly one of a kind RPG.
Like4Sir;-;I used to be an adventurer like you.. then i bought skyrim
F1R5T3L00D;-;An exciting storyline and very addictive gameplay, combined with modding this game will last you a very long time.
Mirror;-;Killed a dragon, Ate his soul, Married a lizard man, Became a cannibal, Ate Nazeem, Ate my husband, Joined the imperial army, Ate Ulfric Stormcloak, 10/10
RockSaltShotty;-;I can personally attest to the fact that Skyrim deserves all the hype it's gotten. One of my favorite aspects of the game is the fact that it isn't a mainstream, overly-colorful, slightly too fantasy-oriented RPG, that ends up being a bit cheesy. Instead, Skyrim has created a beautiful, yet rugged world in which anything is possible (especially with mods), and provides enough realism and strategy to be intense, while still being a fantastic, mythical experience that leaves you awe struck and nerd-gasming. Play this game, I beg you.
Lukey the Spooky;-;If Skyrim was a cat, it would be a pretty okay cat. 10/10
Youssef;-;There's just so much stuff to do on this game, it's absolutely fascinating. Edit: Wow, I can't believe the amount of negative reviews since the "paying for mods" thing. It was only a project that didn't even last and a lot of the great mods were still free. I also always thought people used nexus mods instead of the workshop...
Zahhak;-;goat's riding dragons and killing everything in my game. yes.
FallenVegeChips117;-;Skyrim is an amazing game 10/10 I give it a huge thumbs up: .......................,,-~*~,, ......................./:.:.:.:.:.| ......................|;.;.;.;.;./ ......................|.;.;.;.;.| ............._,,,,,_.).;.;.;.;.| .........,,-":.:.:.:."~-,;.;.;.| ........(_,,,,---,,_:.:.);.;.;..",, ......,-":.:.:.:.:.""-,,/;.;.;.;.;.", .....(:.__,,,,,,,,,___);.;.;.;.;.;| ...../"":.:.:.:.:.:.:""\;.;.;.;.;.," ....\",__,,,,,,,,,,,__/;;;;;;;;;/\ .....\.::.:.:.:.:.:.:.;.);;;;;;;;;/:\ .......\,,,,,---~~~~;;;;;;;;,"::::\ .........."""~~--,,,,,,,,,,-"::::::::::\ ...................\::::::::::::::::::::::
Dr.Edomae;-;This game contains adventure.......suspence dragons women and sweet rolls!
Sir Boss;-;One of the best games i have played in my life. And you NEEDD to play this game.
Airianna;-;Do I recomend this game... HELL YES! I've been so busy playing the game, I never wrote a review, I have played this game far more than any other game I have tried, and with all the mods from various places, the game possabillites are endless. I would get into some of my personal mods I am using, but I will spare you the details other than possible infestations and pregnancies. The balance of the Vanilla game is great, and it happens to be a great starter for one to play. I use the Creation Kit to make changes so I don't have to run to town before getting half way through a single "dungeon", and I tried on several aspects to increase rank wise for aditional perks in different areas. Like for use of 4 enchantments instead of 2, but it is set up where you can only up it once, not 3 times, so was forced to hit 4 directly. And same thing with increased carriing capacity, allows for only a single upgrade to it. Am still a novice, or I would change the base settings to add more branches off that one. Once you learn the controls, that are quite simple, game play is smooth, combat is not really my thing in most games, but in this game, it keeps me going back for more, on a regular bassis, Difficulty is moddable while in game, even in battle, to make the boss fights a bit easier if needed... Ok, there is just too much for me to say about this game, and after speaking with friends, this is the last True "Elder Scrolls" game, as the Online version totally sucks, and not even made by the same team that made this game, shame shame... Anyway, This is the game I play, as my times show, and will continue to grow as time wears on, and new mods become available as 3rd party content, I will add it to my game such as,"Become a Lord" in my case, Lady... Should just say Jarl so there is no gender differientials... Ok, back to my game, Have to Kill Aulduin for the 10th time....
~ColdTooth~;-;Thank you for removing paid mods.
tk;-;why are you reading a skyrim review when you could (and should) play skyrim instead?
xxx_Stahp_xxx;-;Skyrim is an amazing game released by Bethesda 4 years ago. It is the 5th game in the Elder Scrolls series. I have only played Skyrim (TES 5), Oblivion (TES 4) and Morrowind (TES 3). Skyrim is a game with a lot a re-playability, so unless you have no patience, then you'll enjoy it. Allthough it can get very repetative sometimes. One of my friends describes it as going into dungeons and killing Draugr. The main focus is around the dragons, which have returned after the Oblivion Crisis. I highly recommend this as it is now quite cheap and so are the DLC which let you ride dragons, become a vampire lord and build houses among many other things. Can't wait for the next Elder Scrolls game. (not Online, that's daylight robbery)
SchizoChan. #S.;-;The province of Skyrim might be frigid, but the role-playing game that takes place within it burns with a fire few games possess. In The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, you take up arms against dragons, and your encounters with them are invariably exciting--yet depending on where your adventure takes you, such battles may not even represent the pinnacle of your experience. A side quest that starts as a momentary distraction may turn into a full-fledged tale that could form the entirety of a less ambitious game. Yes, Skyrim is another enormous fantasy RPG from a developer that specializes in them, and it could suck up hundreds of hours of your time as you inspect each nook and crevasse for the secrets to be found within. If you know Bethesda Softworks' previous games, you might be unsurprised that Skyrim is not a land without blemish, but rather harbors any number of technical glitches and frustrating idiosyncrasies that tear open the icy veil that blankets the land. Many of them are ones Elder Scrolls fans will probably see coming, but they're ultimately a low price to pay for the wonders of a game this sprawling and enthralling. Prepare for many sleepless nights to come.
lasse.kankila;-;I'm a nord. I have an axe. "Oh, is that a giant? Doesn't look so tough." Hi. I'm a spacerocket. 10/10.
Psychotronix;-;This is my review which lists the pros and cons of, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, for the PC. I've beaten this game three times outside of Steam, and I don't just mean the main quest... I'll mainly try to review the modless version of the game, but I really will try to emphasise how mods can enhance the game and every aspect of it. I'll try to be as descriptive and helpful as I can, while still maintaining that checklist flow. This should sum up just about everything that needs to be said in one review. If anyone has any pros/cons they think I should add, go ahead and tell me in the comments and I'll adjust the material accordingly. Some of these on the list will only be recognizeable by fans of the previous Elder Scrolls games, but they'll be subtle. Here goes... *Pros? +The amazing open world of Skyrim to explore +Decent and immersive story to follow for each questline +Graphics look simply amazing, they're not too extensive on the hardware, and there are plenty of mods to enhance them +Fast travel is an available option once you discover a location, and there are countless locations to discover +Epic soundtrack composed by the well known Jeremy Soule to enjoy +Countless of NPC's to interact with +Unlike Morrowind, this game has more than a single digit of voice actors, haha +Plenty of followers/companions to follow you on your adventures +Tons of factions to join +Countless of quests, sidequests, and misc. quests for you to do +Your actions, choices, faction activies, progress, etc. all have an impact on Skyrim, it's people, and you +A 'crime and effect'/bounty system +Ability to interact with the Daedra Princes +A massive amount of items available in-game +A massive amount of different creatures and enemies for you to fight, and plenty of 'boss' fights available +Plenty of playstyles to choose from (e.g. warrior, thief, mage, craftsman, etc.) +The ability to become a vampire or werewolf, which is very well done (both have their own skill trees) +Tons of skills to level and expand on, there are branching skill tree perks (they've added aspects to the skill tree that can expand the max level to 252+, instead of the original 81) +A difficulty slider for 5 different difficulties- can be changed any time in-game +Amazing character creation (e.g. name, gender, race, hair, eyes, skin tone, paint/dirt, facial construction, etc.), and there are even mods to expand your options +Houses, wife, kids, and pets (Hearthfire DLC adds extra huge houses that you can build up yourself) +Console codes are an option. You can go ahead and cheat, or if you're stuck in a glitch or a bug you can go ahead and try to fix it with the console which is very useful. The console does not deactivate achievements like in Fallout: New Vegas +The DLC expansions are amazing, and are totally worth the price; and you'll clock in tons of enjoyment and hours to the game, which is why I recommend The Legendary Edition to begin with (Dragonborn DLC adds Solstheim to the map- which past fans will remember from the Bloodmoon DLC from Morrowind) +Free 'HD Texture Pack DLC' available for download, which is completely optional +mods, Mods, MODS!!! There are countless of mods out there for you to enjoy, literally. They are easy to install. And, they can change the whole of the game completely. I can't even begin to capitalize on this 'pro'. They can change everything +Steam Worshop integration, and Nexus Mod Manager support +Still a huge community +Steam badges, trading cards, backgrounds, emoticons, and achievements (And Steam Sync is integrated) +Fully mappable controls +My opinion? Morrowind > Skyrim > Oblivion, although newer gamers may not be able to enjoy Morrowind, so Skyrim may be the way to go for you +No cliff-racers *Cons? -Not as good without mods- but still amazing nonetheless, mods are completely optional. This may be more of a con for console players I guess -Mods can sometimes cause CTD's (Crash to Desktop), corrupt saves, bugs, glitches, etc. -Bugs, glitches, and crashes -Some Morrowind 'fanboys' hate on the game- so you might be reading this and end up being one of them (before you say anything; Morrowind is one of my favorite games of all time, and I can admit that I like it way better than Skyrim) -Main questline is a bit short -Repeated NPC lines can get a bit annoying- there are mods to fix that though -Horses seem to be a bit slow and weak- there are mods to fix that though -Becoming a vampire seems to have more cons than pros in my opinion- there are mods to fix that though -Can become a bit OP later in the game, if so, turning up the difficulty should help a bit (might be a good thing or a bad thing) -A bit lacking in graphical/display settings- but it's not that taxing, and it does offer "plenty" of settings in the launcher -Dragons eventually become the new cliff-racer- there are mods to fix that though Well, that was my review of Skyrim. I hope I convinced you to purchase this game. Or maybe I convinced you not to purchase this game, you never know. Anyways, thanks for reading, and I hope I was helpful in your decision. Or, maybe I just convinced you to go ahead and get into mods, hah
Nomed;-;3D Custom Girl RPG ?
guy | against paid mods;-;skyrim, guyrim, don't give it a tryrim until valve and besthesda overturn their decision to charge for mods edit: we won
Ryan;-;Bethesda tends to outdue themselves with every new rendition of The Elder Scrolls. This time its no different. The vast world of Skyrim will suck you in, no matter who you are. There is enough content to qualm anybody who is a naysayer of someone who worries at the thought of a full price purchase. Of course, Skyrim now goes on sale on an almost regular basis, so essentially you get a deal of a lifetime. Why would you pass on that, right? Skyrim has a myriad of spells, abilities, items, and just stuff to do in general. There is a great modding community that increases it's already lengthy playtime. If you are the type who enjoys content that just... well... never ends then you'll enjoy the endless amounts of quests some NPC's will grant you. These NPC's are generally from the Guilds that return to the game - i.e. The Dark Brotherhood, The Mages Guild, etc. if you recall from the previous Elder Scrolls. Of course, there are some downsides to the game, as any game does. Although the game does provide a vast and huge land, a lot of it just is empty. I enjoy the emptiness considering that adds realism to the game but, many do NOT like this. The problem more or less comes from the random Caves, Houses, Ruins, that have no relevance to them. Again, it's something I enjoy, but there is a point to be made that it can appear to be just filler to keep people like myself to keep searching. Some old school Elder Scroll players may be taken aback at the fact that Oblivions ability tree is gone, no more Acrobatics skill. This isn't a bad thing. It's a good thing. Honest. What it comes down to is that Skyrim has adapted to changes in the way games are tailored nowadays and have removed some of the more "grindy" things that was associated with it's predecessors. All in all, get this game. You will NOT regret it.
Lemon;-;a kid can kill you, but you can't kill the kid. SKYRIM LOGIC
{A}Mananu;-;''It's a better GTA V with horses and swords'' 11/10 - IGN
Emosashy;-;Really enjoying Skyrim and all the DLC's a bit buggy at times but can be over looked, Highly recommend it to anyone who wants to play an RPG !
Gamer Luna;-;Fun game more funner if you have DLC installed it gives you a little more adventure once you beat the game :3
tosti the toast;-;10/10 would replace my life for this game again
|RaSTa*| INSPIRED;-;Thank you Valve for removing Paid-mods!! Skyrim is an Awesome Game, but at the end the Mods make it the game it actually is :D
Ananace - Olderman;-;Skyrim is really a place to see, beautifully designed landscape. And the modability really brings it to even higher levels. Just stay away from the hentai mods.
MstrChiefAlexEd;-;So, you want to know how good of a game Skyrim is, do you? Better question is: Why don't you already have it? Joking aside, Skyrim is one of those games which you can sink dozens, if not hundreds of hours into and not get bored or even close to "finishing" the game, and with a vast modding community, both of these ideas get completely wiped off the board. For me, Skyrim was my first Elder Scrolls Game, and since then I have played the other four. I came into this game not being too big into the whole fantasy genre, and when I came out that was completely turned around. Game universes don't get much bigger than the TES universe, as Skyrim is choke-full with lore in many forms: The actual questlines, fully readable books, NPC dialougem and much more. While the game's actual main plot isn't all that exiting IMO (centering around the return of the dragons in Skyrim), the world clearly makes up for it and alone could suck you into this game. Better yet, you DO NOT need to play the other TES games to understand Skyrim's story. Not saying you shouldn't play them, of course. Graphically speaking, Skyrim is quite a nice game to look at. With Skyrim's cold, harsh northern landscape, many different regions are seen with their own art style: A castle fortress on the peak of a hill, a sprawling city in the heart of a plain, and a port-side town in the middle of the arctic woods. Crappy descriptions aside, you'll see a lot here. The game gives a very mysterious atmosphere as you venture through dark dungeons, creep through enemy fortresses, and just have a nice walk on the countryside. The world may not feel all too alien, but graphically it's varied with its Viking and Medieval inspiration. The only honest complaint I have is that small smaller items such as ropes aren't that pretty to look at, but mods always come into play with these problems. Gameplay, oh boy. Skyrim is an open-world action-adventure RPG, with sandbox elements mixed in as well. You fight with swords, battleaxes, daggers from behind, bows, spells that can incinerate your foes, and shouts that can hurl enemies far away. While combat doesn't involve to many stratagies (keep attacking your opponent while keep you distance or blocking their moves), it is nonetheless enjoyable to fight through the many foes encountered. Magic on the other hand is a blast, especially when combining spells or using them in conjunction with melee weapons. Ranged weapons are fun to use when being a stealth-oriented character, so there are a lot of choises you have when combating opponents. As for enemy types, there's a lot as well. You'll commonly fight bandits and wolves on the side of roads, the undead draguar and skeletons in dungeons, and even vampires and trolls when venturing out. Of course there are also the dragons! These are fought by chance anywhere outside, and usually take a lot of hits to take down. Unfortunately, the stratagy of what should be a fun scenario is merely to attack the dragon when its on the ground and dodge its fire, and to attempt to shoot it while in the air, waiting for it to land again. All dragons follow this system, which is slightly disapointing. As for exploring, you'll have a lot to find in Skyrim. New dungeons are scattered across the landscape, as well as some truely unique characters that venture out (one in particular...), all while listening to the game's excellent soundtrack, reflecting the mythical and harsh land that Skyrim is. I should mention that I have only scratched the surface of what the game has to offer, and if you're interested, get it and find out for yourself, which will be quite a pleasant experience. If you aren't, try it anyways. You might find yourself immediatly immersed and impressed as I was. If I had to rate Skyrim, I would give it a 9.5/10. I should also add that Skyrim has one of the best modding communities out there, and even its own Workshop here on Steam. Even so, I'd recommend going on Nexus instead. It's just as easy, has far more mods (the biggest ones are on Nexus nine times out of ten), and doesn't have the file size restrictions like here on the Workshop. Of course, you should at least be familiar with what you think about the game before modding, and going on from there. Mods I would recommend include SkyUI (the vanilla game's UI is UGLY), Helgen Reborn, Falskaar, and Frostfall (which is on the Workshop).
Omnise #ThankYouIwata;-;You can be a lizard. I became a lizard. Now I'm a lizard. Lizards looked absolutely ugly in Morrowind and Oblivion. Skyrim made lizards look good. SKYRIM MADE THEM LIZARDS LOOK GOOD. TEN OUTTA IN' TEN
Nuka-Cola Quantum;-;I paid 3 to write this review
RedIven23;-;, mods should be free like they always have been.
LadyTopHat;-;This game is great value for money - especially with the three added DLCs of Dragonborn, Dawnguard and Hearthfire. It can be a bit annoying to arrive back in Whiterun and be instantly hacked to pieces by Vampires, however, they do have some great kit that you can nick off them once you've given them the good news. Being able to choose between following the set storylines or just wandering around the world aimlessly gives many variables to one's gaming experience, and of course the plethora of mods just adds nice customised play. Having the mods easily accessible via the Steam Workshop is highly convenient. Awesome game, awesome experience - play it now!
KRostik;-;100 hours of game play and i still have not started playing main story line
Paul Cheenis;-;Play as Skyman in the Legend of the Boosher.
Lord Rexasaur;-;What is Skyrim? Skyrim is the graphical, virtual and Physical form of everything an RPG game is supposed to be. It is all the hopes, dreams, lives and loves, as well as the fear, hatred, desease and the pain, all in one game. This is the ultimate Open world RPG, this is the most modded game in history. This, is Skyrim.
Ridderbob;-;Why would you even read reviews for this game? You know its amazing
Steelrain;-;4 years ago, Bethesda released a game: Skyrim. It was pretty good, won some awards, but got old pretty fast, especially since once the hype wore off anyone could see it was chock full of bugs. But there was no need to worry, as the PC gaming community had been making mods for games since as long as anyone could remember. These mods increased the quality and replayability of Skyrim, which drew some people to buy Skyrim solely for the mods, creating a win-win for the consumers and producers. Everything was peachy, consumers would pay Bethesda for the half-finished game they made and then download a few files (that anyone can make) to add lightsabers or horse genitals or what have you to their game. Fast forward 4 years. Despite a few nice (and pricey) DLC's made by good ol' Bethesda, the base game itself was still quite broken, and mods were still basically necessary to get a satisfactory gaming experience. So what do the geniuses at Bethesda do? Tired of actually working on things to sell, they had the great idea to sell things that other people made. I mean, from a business perspective, it makes total sense. Why should a restaurant owner worry about offering good food (or improving items already on his menu) if he could just charge people to sit down and eat sandwiches they brought with them? Sure, thats not a perfect analogy, but it helps get the point across of how ridiculous this is. I still remember the outrage surrounding the Horse Armor DLC for Oblivion when it came out. There were plenty of arguments about the future of gaming, but few could have predicted a day when community-made mods would be hidden behind a paywall, with cuts of modders work going to our good buddies Bethesda and Valve (praise gaben, right? PC master race, right??). With the recent absurdities of day-1 DLC, pre-order bonuses, always online DRM, social media integration, early-access games, and now PAID MODS, I cant help but fear for the future of PC gaming. Were already seeing early-access mods, with the price increasing as work supposedly progresses (but youre still expected to pay for an unfinished product in the meantime). Whats next? Paid subscriptions for mods? Will companies continue to churn out half-baked games, knowing that not only will they be able to charge more via pre-order bonuses, limited editions, season passes, but ALSO charge for the work of other people? No, this review is NOT about being poor, or greedy, or not wanting to support modders. Believe it or not, people were free to support whatever modders they wanted with however much money they wanted, and this system worked just fine. In fact, Id be curious to know how many supporters of this new paid mod system actually donated to modders before it was mandatory. What its about is the destruction of one of the last bastions of traditional PC gaming, that is the free modding community, largely at the hands of this games creators. I do not recommend buying this game if you havent before paid mods were introduced because if you do, youre giving your vote of approval to what Bethesda and Valve are doing. ...But who am I kidding? Just as the Horse Armor outrage died out and useless cosmetic DLCs are now regarded as the norm, I bet a year or two from now people will marvel at the fact that there was a time when mods were free. I just hope this review isnt censored by the saviors of PC gaming, like so many other criticisms of this have been.
xxx_Stahp_xxx;-;Skyrim is an amazing game released by Bethesda 4 years ago. It is the 5th game in the Elder Scrolls series. I have only played Skyrim (TES 5), Oblivion (TES 4) and Morrowind (TES 3). Skyrim is a game with a lot a re-playability, so unless you have no patience, then you'll enjoy it. Allthough it can get very repetative sometimes. One of my friends describes it as going into dungeons and killing Draugr. The main focus is around the dragons, which have returned after the Oblivion Crisis. I highly recommend this as it is now quite cheap and so are the DLC which let you ride dragons, become a vampire lord and build houses among many other things. Can't wait for the next Elder Scrolls game. (not Online, that's daylight robbery)
Gameyer;-;I think it's a good continue in TES serie. And yeah, SKYRIM FOR NORDS !
FIVER PINGER HEIMERDINGER;-;So many mods :) 10/10.
Wolfsitize;-;If you want something to occupy your life for 4 more years, I highly suggest buying this.
Cannedhobo;-;I spent a LOT of time on this game when it came out. Now however, I have to change how I feel about this game because of a terrible descision made by Bethesda and Valve. As an artist I can't stand by and watch someone be extorted for their creative efforts. Valve and Bethesda are attempting to monetize the modding community, and this is NOT okay.
Yru Meister;-;"Sweet Mother, sweet Mother, send your child unto me, for the sins of the unworthy must be baptized in blood and fear. --11/10--
SchizoChan. #S.;-;The province of Skyrim might be frigid, but the role-playing game that takes place within it burns with a fire few games possess. In The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, you take up arms against dragons, and your encounters with them are invariably exciting--yet depending on where your adventure takes you, such battles may not even represent the pinnacle of your experience. A side quest that starts as a momentary distraction may turn into a full-fledged tale that could form the entirety of a less ambitious game. Yes, Skyrim is another enormous fantasy RPG from a developer that specializes in them, and it could suck up hundreds of hours of your time as you inspect each nook and crevasse for the secrets to be found within. If you know Bethesda Softworks' previous games, you might be unsurprised that Skyrim is not a land without blemish, but rather harbors any number of technical glitches and frustrating idiosyncrasies that tear open the icy veil that blankets the land. Many of them are ones Elder Scrolls fans will probably see coming, but they're ultimately a low price to pay for the wonders of a game this sprawling and enthralling. Prepare for many sleepless nights to come.
buggthewaitingman;-;3 of my characters have fully furnished houses. I still haven't done the main quest...
linda;-;Have you ever wondered why exactly it is that it is when it isn't, when it couldn't be what it isn't meant to not be? I mean really, it's just odd that when it isn't what it really is, it's not what it couldn't not be when it isn't what it would be if it were what it was. Sometimes I lie awake wondering, what if it were if it wasn't what it isn't when it wasn't what it couldn't be if it weren't what it was. But that's just me.
a n n i k i;-;The finest selection of cheese and wine in any game I have played! 10/10
Sir Grayson;-;Murdered 200+ of my friends and got killed by a swamp kush man.
The Infamous Hobo;-;A superb title, in spite of the sometimes moronic AI (it's easy to overcome). Massive world to explore, beasts to slay, and bodies to loot! Truly, a must-have for every fan and newcomer. Oh, and there's a plethora of astounding mods for better graphical fidelity, quests, and items. Even just the vanilla version is worth the purchase!
King Slayer 0 aim;-;Viking Metal + Skyrim = U are in the heaven.
Green Ninja in Turban;-;It has nudity mods 69/10
Kevin Bacon's Bacon;-;Like Skyrim without guns
Kristof The Great;-;I have heard of this game before. A lot.... So when I had 20$ in my steam wallet, I said, hey skyrim, checked some trailers and gameplay vids, and nah, not my thing. Then I had a spontaneous rush of blood to the head and bought it, started playing. Itwas hard for me to get hooked on, since I have never played this kind of game before, but honestly, the detail, the graphics, the detail, the ideas, the detail, and the length of the entire thing make this my alltime favorite game. Though im sure there are games out there that i have and will play longer than skyrim, Skyrim is the game of the decade that will go down in all big books. You have to play this before you die.
Fenrisulven;-;Probably the best roleplaying game right now
Bernie Star | Bjoa Squad;-;Best freeroam and adventure game evar!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Juan Deag;-;An amazing open world game with much to offer and endless amounts of entertainment.
Roca;-;Basically all there is are Dragons, no physics and goats flying off mountains..and i'm okay with this.
Yiff Jesus;-;Made an Argonian and got them to lv 65. Now I can make horses rain from the sky. 11/10
DestroyerOfWorlds;-;I wish one day Bethesda Softworks will hire Obsidian to do the writing of their titles. Until then, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim remains a slightly incomplete masterpiece, yet able to provide one of the best single-player experiences of the decade.
Soup De Cock;-;i got a  mod where giants use  to fight you and when you kill one you get it so this game turned from 9/10 to topkek/10 great game would  again
lr422;-;Since this game is on sale I'll do the recommondation thing. I won't waste words reviewing this game as it has been reviewed to hell and back. If you have been waiting for a reason to buy this game it being under 10$ is one hell of a reason to buy it now. It's fun, addicting, time killer. Although I was an adventurer like you then I took an arrow to the knee will get burnt into your brain and you will see limping guards in your dreams.
Vanna;-;Can be modded to absolute perfection.
[Beast];-;Skyrim is probably one of my favorite games. I have played it on the Xbox, Ps3, and Pc, and all I can say is... wow. The game is great ; It has an awesome plot, graphics, and interesting mods. Because however, I have played it on different consoles, it is annoying to have to restart, and then proceed to get through all the cutscenes and quests I have completed so many times before. But time and time again, I find myself dealing with the struggle and continuing where I left off previously, and strangely enjoying every minute of it. This game has a few flaws, but if you like rpg's, get this game now! 9.5/10
pzoranni;-;most definitely one of the best role playing game experiences you can wander upon
LazaS #MakeOregairuSeason3;-;I accidentaly press e on coin and steal it the guy started killing me he chased me i got enough of that  i reborn dead and laugh my  off Fair enough 11/10 - IGN
candysprites;-;I spawned exactly 582 sweetrolls, then yelled at them until they spontaneously combusted. 10 / 10
Angry;-;ing dragons, man. You know?
Kozoon;-;why i love skyrim. i was playing and looking for this dungeon. so im riding along the night on my horse. coming near the dungeon i see some lights flickering on my left side. deciding i can ignore the dungeon a little longer i was going to check it out. upon arrival i noticed it was a village with a ghost on a ghost horse sitting in the middle of the village. trying to kill it i saw i did no damage on him so i got back on my horse i and decided to follow it. whilst following the ghost i came across a freaking dragon rising up form his grave. deciding i had to kill see where this ghost was going i ignored the dragon and went by as fast as i could. still following the ghost i noticed by now he had no head. still following the ghost i came across a bandit ambush. trying to flee from this as well they dropped a boulder from a bridge ontop of my horse. sprinting away as fast as i could i kept following the ghost, but now on foot. finally the headless horseman stops at this tomb kinda looking thing. as i look around a bit the ghosts vanquishes and im now alone in the tomb. killing a few skeletons i see the ghosts his grave. after getting the loot and having exhausted my next options i decided to go back to the village where i met the headless horseman for the first time to go find my dungeon from there on. back at the village the same dragon i saw resurrected earlier flies by and attacks it. killed him and went to my dungeon afterwards. this just happend to me. this game is F*CKING AMAZING!
AutumnWhite;-;Ive spent well over 900 hours and own three copies on different consoles Best game for adventure and immersion of all time, many a night has been spent wandering around the tundra in search of a new event or quest to spend the next few hours on Would recommend to anyone!
Maxgunnar;-;This game ruined my social life and lost some close friends. 100% reccomend
Charlie;-;Hundreds of hours of quality gameplay for the price of an expensive pint (3.74), essentially. Buy. It. Now. (All statistics correct on date of publication 28/11/13)
JackDin;-;A bit old now, but a massive game and well worth the money if you don't already have the game. Bonus is you should be able to get the entire set for less than the latest blockbuster game.
The Cole Train;-;Get to character customization screen, spend 70 minutes morphing into different races and genders in town square, quit game 10/10
Trogdor;-;Why are you reading reviews for SKYRIM? JUST BUY IT :D
POOHMAN;-;Having spent many hours (days, weeks :-) playing Skyrim, I finally feel qualified to report that it is without doubt one of the best games available on STEAM. The vanilla game is very good but where this addition excels is in the mods and the modding community attached to it. With over 8,000 mods, you can play as anyone from an immortal god sent to save the planet, to a serial  and murderer intent on destroying it (I have been both). And anyone or anything you can think of in between! Be warned though, this one will consume you and your time. Having cut me teeth on TES IV OBLIVION, I had high hopes for this sequal and it did not disappoint. If you consider yourself a true gamer or have ever wondered what it would be like to really live another life (within or outside the law), SKYRIM is a must have!
0o-Nomad-o0;-;My favourite game of all time, brilliant. MUST OWN! The game is huge with so much to do and with the absolutely enormous mod community, you can craft Skyrim in to pretty much anything you like. Buy it now!
Superdude;-;Just say no to paid mods.  bethesda
lap229;-;Great game but it will probably cheaper to buy the game on a sale then to buy the paid mods i want for it. What's the next step in content monetization, pay to read the manual? This is the first step of the slippery slope. Game 9/10 DLC 8/10 Paid Mods 0/10
Rockstar;-;I am addicted. Noone can help anymore. Help. Please. 450/100
Dual_Cored;-;GETFREE!!   The Steam Community is about sharing your work. Have good ideas and help to improve each other. That makes us diffrent of the gaming companies. >>>> Post this every each paid mod you see in steam <<<< Because we don't wan't to let end up steam in a greedy for money- gaming platform. ......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... _____.......__............._____ .............//'...'/`............|...__.....\....|...|............/... ___| ........../'/.../..../......./\..........|...|....\....|....|...|...........|..../ ........('(.......... ~/'...').........|...|.....|...|....|...|...........|...| .........\.................'...../...........|...|__/...|....|...|____....|...\____ ..........''...\.......... _...............|_____./.....\______\....\_____| ............\..............( ..............\.............\
bmdisbrow;-;free mods belong to the nords!
drilok;-;Another great game ruined by people trying to make a quick buck.
bluedove;-;valve and bethesda all you fxxking blood suckers OK, so here are real vampires The vampires sucking blood from moders and user are holy motherfxxking Valve N bethesda !!
CyberSpidey;-;Best money I've spent in a Steam Sale. Best offline/Singleplayer game ever. I'm Dragon Born, and I'm a ing werewolf.
NoTimeForZ's;-;To download "Good Review Mod" please pay- $6.99
Reptaile;-;I would say game of the year ... but ... it's actually game of the decade
Athiria;-;Just in case all the other reviews haven't convinced you yet and you stumbled upon mine. You are a crazy person if you don't like a single thing in this game. I get that the whole rpg in a magical viking-like land isn't for everyone, but you should at least be able to enjoy parts of it. For the ones that love the whole rpg in a magical viking-like land, why are you still sitting here reading my review. Go frickin' buy the game! :D It's a must-have for EVERYONE!
Liam;-;Warning: you may experience a loss of time while playing this game. I have this game on both console and PC, and Hands down its much more enjoyable to play on PC. I'm not a fan of the default UI (User Interface) But there Is some pretty good UI's available for download in the workshop. With the default UI aside the gameplay is very smooth with the option to switch between first and third person POV. The music for the game is simple brilliant especially when fighting dragons and kicking back in a Inn. If you are yet to play this game I strongly recommend it.
evaactress245 CSGOCasino.net;-;this is a sooooo good game u should play it if u like single player and roleplay :)
IDI AMIN KING OF SCOTLAND;-;THEY FIXED IT BUT IT'S ALREADY TOO LATE
Jellynator 007;-;Never buy this game is just aweful its nothing like the book 10/10
MoonlightFox;-;.   ,   WorkShop'a    .  . . :,,NPC,.   ,, ,  .              . 11/10
Rabidboy100;-;Would happily recomend this game normally, but unfortunately can't after Valve and Bethesda's new modding policies, and reactions to criticisms of said policies.
ktosiu69;-;This used to be a good game but then it took an arrow to the knee. Mods that once were free are now paid? I'll pass.
iGoem, generic Stranger;-;Paid mod practice by valve already caused servere legal issues. besides of exessively demanding 75% of the revenew demandet for mods by valve, ruining the modding scene with many moders saying "they would rather give mods for free than having valve have 75% of the rev" also false clames on mods and stealing mod's from others in order to get paid causes nothing but a repulsive inviroment in which consumer and developer loose but also those who create additional content.
mbpoblet;-;This game was great thanks to its modding community, which fixed bugs the developer was unwilling to fix, added severalorders of magnitude more content and functionality than the developer ever bothered to, and of much higher quality. Bethesda / Zenimax and Valve have stuck a death blow to that community with the extremely greedy and ill-conceived addition of paid modding (which has divided the modding community, forced most of the modders to remove their creations for fear of them being stolen, hidden some of the essential mods behind a paywall, and generally dissuading anyone with any sense from modding or using a mod as long as this foolishness persists). This is no longer a game I can support. :( Bethesda, Zenimax and Valve are no longer companies I can support. If you care about games, and about gamers, do not support them, and even less give them money.
Kuolettava;-;Played it coming from Fallout: New Vegas. The story was uninteresting cliche fantasy story. Sidequests, which seem to be the meat of the game, weren't much better. Whenever I talk to others about this game they say Mods, Mods, Mods, which to me says "If a game needs to be modded to be enjoyable then its not a very fun game. Oh and since mods now are for pay I see little reason for someone who doesn't have to get it.
|17th| Wizardpimp96;-;What on earth are you doing here valve
Joffrey Baratheon;-;Corporate greed has torn apart what was a seamless and thriving community that worked together to improve and enhance this game. With the introduction of paid mods, the modding community has transformed into a DLC market. Modder and user has now become seller and buyer respectively and as such, the relationship between the two will change. It won't be users providing constructive feedback or fellow modders working together to enhance and integrate each others mods, it will be buyers dishing out scorn and criticism while expecting a high standard to meet the price. It will be modders competing for more money which will inevitably result in less cooperation and integration of multiple mods. And what was it all for? 25%. It remains to be seen how many modders actually lack the self respect to dignify their own work with blatant robbery.
Im A Real Grill;-;withs steams new. syetem of putting mods behind a paywall i can not recomend this game anymore. what made this game great is now gone its great community behind FREE modding...
Don't Be Mad Haley;-;Paid mods are a terrible idea (plenty of others have described why, I'm not going to rehash it all). Count me in with the group who will not spend any more money on steam until they change this.
lorddaemonicus;-;way to  it up valve
Comrade.Vladimir;-;Pay for mods
H.P Loveshaft;-;skyrim has now become pay to mod! eff you bethesda!
Richard;-;Good game overall but if u want mods then u got to pay a price now. SO now I refuse to even play skyrim, when mods become free i will play. mods that need you to pay are going to be the downfall of this game.. when all this fixes up and is all good i will join skyrim again, for now i refuse to even start the game.
HJonGoldrake;-;Skyrim is a reasonably good RPG engine, with a significant backdrop of lore and setting. Unfortunately, it is by itself not up to par with modern games. Its graphics, reliability and depth are considerably lacking. To counteract these tendencies, Skyrim used to support a powerful modding systems. Mods like the Unofficial Patches and graphics mods could significantly improve the experience and transform Skyrim in the game it could have been. It thus came as a sad news that Valve and Bethesda have decided to launch paid mods for Skyrim. Major mods that used to be free are now paid or announced to become paid in a short while. This immensely changes the value proposition of Skyrim: instead of purchasing a decent RPG engine with a great modding community, you are now buying access to an RPG engine and an expensive mod repertoire that will run you a pretty penny if you want to mod Skyrim into being a game fit for 2015. Buying Skyrim even at full price at launch was a somewhat reasonable perspective, because you could count on a modding community that would turn the game into a worthy title and continue to expand on it greatly. Buying Skyrim now, or any future TES game that supports this paid mod system, is completely unreasonable: you would have to pay *several* times the cost of the game to get enough mods for a decent experience. And that's unacceptable, and not something I would spend my money on.
7355608;-;lol paid mods what a joke i would've gave this game a 9/10 for the excellent gameplay, graphics, story etc... but paid mods? oh you've taken it too far 1/10
RTM Matt;-;Enjoyed playing this game but charging for mos is a massive, massive no in my books, especially when the assets are taken from other modders and sold on as OC and when they are created using resources made by other people as free tools for the community.
A.A Ron Balakay;-;id like to see modders get support but the the way the have handled this is awful.
Fisse;-;Pay for mods?! It is becoming free DLCs for the company.
AManWithBreastImplants;-;It's official. The golden age of the Steam Workshop has come to an end. With the addition of mods that require you to pay real money to access them, there is absolutely no reason besides the Skyrim Nexus to make you want to legitimately buy a copy of the game instead of pirating it. The number one reason people paid for this game was the amazing modding community it has that's been active since its launch in 2011. If you want to mod you Skyrim, go to the Skyrim Nexus. There's just as many, if not more mods on it and it's completely free. "Mod Authors" are already releasing fake mods that do nothing to edit your game but cost money. All in all it's a scam to Steam users and to real mod authors. God help us if they do the same thing to any other workshops.
Omen of war;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. People can and should support mod creators via donations, and a 'Buy me a coffee!' button on the workshop page would be good, but putting them behind a pay wall is god damn atrocious. Hoping Valve and other responsible parties for this new practice will turn around.
Jakk;-;Here we have one example for improving a game's modding community.
Slugnoid;-;Game only becomes good once you patch the hell out of it with community mods. Otherwise it's a buggy, ugly disaster made on a 12 year old engine. Now the mods seem to be going behind a paywall I would not recommend this to anyone.
SkooP;-;The base game itself is absolutely terrific. Unfortunately, the one thing that makes this game superior to its console counterparts - the ability to mod - can now be charged for by modders because Valve wants more money and is justifying it as a measure to 'strengthen the community"... a community that needs so much strengthening. Damn, Gabe, damn.
mikaelejade;-;paying for mods is just
Raacz;-;I do not support paid mods. Without mods this game is no where near as good as it can be.
Daxidol;-;Would be good besides the paywall. 2/10
kcgjimmy;-;An apple for $30.00! SURE~ Here it is the money!$36.00 for Valve and Bethesda,and 4.00 for creator~WOW,too great~ IGN: MORE MODS FOR MONEY!!!!!!/10 Valve,please remove the paid workshop mods for Skyrim!!!
Kunkkarunka;-;Good game, but this paid mod stuff is silly and I can't stand by it.
Hunter Este;-;This game supports paid mods, I do not.
LeetZero;-;Regarding the modding directive: "PC Gaming is dying! What should we do!?" "Oh, I know! Let's  up and milk every user for what PC gaming was the best for."
ImmaJellal;-;Wanted to write a review once I am finally done with the game. Now Im doing it to voice my utter digust against Valves Paid-Mod idea (If I actually wanna pay for great user-generated content, I want the Delevoper of that content to actually get said amount, not just a meager 25% cut)
Cubehamster;-;If only the people from Bethesda weren't a bunch of moneygrabbing s.
Rauvagol;-;Valve has managed to be worse than EA and Ubisoft with paid mods.
pokket;-;I can't recommend this game anymore due to Valve and Bethesda's idea that it was a good idea to destroy the modding community and further the destruction of video games as a whole. Skyrim is not a finished game without many mods, and they are now taking 75% of all mods sold for their greed including deciding what the price is for the mods and how much the modders get - see https://archive.is/HdFXi. They want to steal the work of the community. People are stealing the works of others. Big modding teams will now argue over who gets what. Etc. Furthermore, this is a dangerous path. This could set up the route to mods no longer being the sole works of the creators, but the work of the game devs as "contributions". This could lead to tons of legal insanity with mods including work of other games, such as popular armor mods or even among modders if Bethesda doesn't come out and say "no, it's our game so the mods are ours". Or even paid licenses to mod. Then other companies will follow suit, and bottleneck out sites such as Nexus and drive down user traffic. It is no longer a labor of love or to finish games that should've been finished on launch (such as Skyrim's terrible UI). Game Devs now want you to pay them to do what they should've done. People who say it's optional don't realize that there is no reason to not charge for mods if this practice becomes a mainstay. It'd be the state that early access is now. And what's even more unfathomable that mods have a 24 hour return policy when Valve won't allow this for regular games that should've had it, such as plenty of Ubisoft's abortions. People who agree with this practice are nothing short of delusional. There are way too many terrible outcomes to come out of this instead of good ones. You want to have an option for donations? Sure, I have donated before. This is something completely else entirely. Those saying non-modders don't have a right to complain. Well, they're customers now. I guess you didn't think about that. I guess you didn't think about the hell customers can bring. This is the end of video games. There is no love left in my heart. There are no heroes left in man. Crash this plane with no survivors. You were the chosen one, Gaben.
TNS Tiger Skelletbone;-;thanks for letting me buy mods :^)
LooK Bloodshot;-;I would recommend this amazing AAA title, but now that valve wants to use the purchasing mods practice, there's no real reason to buy this on pc unless it's on sale.If you were hoping to use the workshop for this game after purchase, don't even think about it, your wallet will soon be filled with tumbleweeds instead of hard earned money.I wish I could say more because this is one of my favorite games, but this practice is simply unacceptable.Luckily I already got all my mods from the nexus :P
Zeik;-;I will give this game a thumbs up when they take off paid-mods for no i will give it a thumbs down
THE TRUE HULK HOGAN;-;Sadly Valve and bethesda decided to become a bunch of greedy f***s and ruin the Mod community - thank you very much!
wickedzen;-;The best thing about this game was the endless replayability that came as a result of the modding community. That is now gone, unless you're willing to pay even more for everything from cosmetic swords to patches that fix the many mnay bugs Bethesda games shop with (which go for years unfixed, except by modders who take it upon themselves to do it). Now, Bethesda and Valve have teamed up to ruin this once-vibrant community. I cannot in good conscience recommend a game by a company that so cynically takes advantage of its fans the way Bethesda has agreed to do. Moreover, beware buying any game on Steam that is improved (or made more playable) by mods; you may find it ended literally overnight.
Pvt.Joker;-;This game was made a whole lot better due to the vast array of different mods and a creative and sharing modding community. Corporate greed has ruined that and i cannot endorse it. R.I.P
Cobaltsaber;-;Well screw this noise. GG valve.
Culveys;-;Sorry but you need to buy this mod to read the review. Being serious, all the paid mods on the workshop are an absolute joke. Buy when on special, otherwise don't.
MNCP Swegopolis;-;I like this game. But I don't like paying for add-ons. Thanks, Gabe.
phillippassmore;-;Great game but for some crazy reason Steam has decided to introduce paid mods. The key issue with paid mods: 1 - Mods can have compatability issues with other mods and good luck knowing that before buying the mod 2 - The refund period is only for 24 hours. So if the game is updated and breaks the mods you have bought. Well tough luck! 3 - We have to ask nicely to get any issues solved. The consumer is completely screwed over in this arrangement. Apart from the recent issues this game is great.
JsNuke;-;Paid mods need to be boycotted.
Woody;-;I will never buy mods.
The Jews;-;No Paying For Mods
TomMassey250;-;Not recommended because Valve decided charging for mods was a good idea, the game itself is really good, I just don't agree on any level with charging for something that should be free extra content.
JWalterWeatherman;-;Paid mods have ruined this game. First time ever I'll be looking for other means to buy games.
Kyren;-;Paid mods will destroy the modding community, change it now!
Joey Asagiri;-;Skyrim is an alright game, the world is huge and you can play the game for a very long time, although it falls flat due to lack of depth and poor gameplay, since release people have been modding the game to fix a lot of it's issues but you already know where this is going. If you want to play an Elder Scrolls game I would recommend getting Morrowind or Oblivion instead, both are a lot better than Skyrim, I even suggest trying out Fallout 3 / New Vegas instead as those games are excellent and my favorite Bethesda games to date.
Ter0revil;-;BEST GAME EVE... What do you mean "Payed Mods"? .... WORST GAME EVER! Did you really think we would be okay with this? We are sick of DLC, this is worse!
[TB] Darth Vader;-;54.5 hours on record and I'm saying "Don't get this." Why? I'll tell you why. It's a mess that gets boring after the first ten levels or ten hours, whatever comes first. Lies after lies during the development stage, copy pasted dungeons and endless repeating enemies. I've personally experienced many problems such as buggy AI, glitching UI and of course, rare items simply dropping through the map. There's a joke when it comes to Bethesda games that it takes the modders to fix everything. Recently it seems that Bethesda took this even more literally than it should've been taken as. Paid mods? Really? Possibly the worst kick in the teeth is the fact that the modder, who has put in any degree of effort to make this mod (I'm not saying every mod is a hand crafted masterpiece) only gets 25%. The rest is divided up and given to Valve for hosting (30% hosting is rather stupid.) and to Bethesda for making the game (45%) Mods will make this game somewhat fun, but hurry while you can still afford the game and some nice mods to go along with it.
vincoll;-;I used to love Skyrim. There was a day when I could frolick through the snowy fields around Windhelm wielding a 2-handed Dawnbreaker and shooting rainbows from my eyes. I have owned this game on ps3 in the past, but one i turned over to the master race the very first game I bought was Skyrim, due to its vast modding potential. That potential has been torn asunder by the lack of foresight and the sheer greed shown by both Bethesda and Valve. I am shocked, nay - I am dismayed by Valve's move to attempt to monetise on the modding community. Mods have always been the main benefit to PC, which put it head and shoulders ahead of consoles. Until such a day that this is fixed, Valve and Bethesda will not be getting any of my money and I will actively push potential customers away from it.
DreadlordKai;-;game itself is bleh its the mods that made it extremely fun and amazing, oh yea btw you have to pay for those mods now cause bethesda and valve have lost their friggin minds. i do not support a paywall. ADD A DONATE BUTTON FOR S SAKE
Willie;-;>be valve >have many monies >need more monies >hat designers have run out >forgottofeedem.avi >howdowemakemoney.exe >paid mods >everyone goes crazy >tfw valve reveal the plot twist >tfw valve is bad guy >tfw valve is EA >fehk paid mods >fehk valve
dvder10;-;Not Too long ago, I would consider this a game that almost every p.c gamer needed to play. Even if they didn't enjoy the base experience, the fact the the modding community was so large that you could turn skyrim into another experience where the base game ment null. Skyrim has become more of a platform the relies on the modding community rather then a stand-alone game. However, as we know, steam now want 75% of the money that mod users. It's not economically viable to make mods as anything other then a side hobby, and who knows how many of these mods are stolen from places like the Mod Nexus, ect. For example, I have around 80 mods from the nexus and HAD around 20 from the workshop. Buying the skyrim base game, + the expansions + (even if we assume a single mod is a 1/1.50$) I'd expect to pay 120 (180$). Who in their right mind thinks that even skyrim and all its mods are worth that?! Worst bit is, most of my mods are graphic improvements or immersion mods, and as we see with "wet and cold" charging (3.35/5$), I believe if all my graphical and immersion mods were of the same price, the average would be well above 1 ($1.50). This game, any game, is not worth that much money for the full experience. I simply cannot reccomend this game for a such a stupid amount of money, regardless of how many times you put it up for sale steam....
Nivius;-;This game is good, what it means is not. yesterday Valve allowed paid mods for this game, the start of somthing bigger, Usercreated DLC without quality controll (we all know that valve got useless quality controll). this is a step worse then DLC's in general. for the future of Steam, revert this. this is the begining of the end otherwise. also, at the same time they allow people to play Skyrim for free for a few days, just to get some impresive statistics to show "people love it". this is sutch a duchbag thing to do. i defended you valve for over 10 ing years, i fought for you, you was considerd the king of pc gaming, and look at you now, richer? sure... but i lost all my respect for you. If you keep walking down this path, you will single handely add a new tag in piracy... "Pirated mods". don't that sound ing dirty if anything... Valve, do the right thing, stop this before it is to late...
Chrome;-;This game was made great by mods and the modding community. Through those mods it remained relevant and purchased far longer than it otherwise would have. But Bethesda and Valve are now willing to destroy that community -and in Valve's case, potentially destroy the modding communities of countless other current and future games- in order to wring the last drops from the cash cow. If you're considering buying this game right now, you should keep your wallet closed until and unless Valve and Bethesda admit their mistake and put the paid workshop to sleep. Skyrim without mods is a mere shadow of the game you've heard people talk about, and in the near future it could cost many times the base purchase price to mod it properly.
Blundom;-;Valve and Bethesta, nothing to say I thought you guys were better than this. Taking away mods and worse yet taking away 75% out of moders is downright criminal. I hope you guys regret it and fix it in the future since this is disgraceful and embarassing.
Kaka Carrot Cake (HPG);-;Paid Mods. No.
Verboten;-;Nearly 800 hours of gametime mostly in thanks to the amazing community behind Elder Scrolls modding, and now we have a pay system to both splinter it and ruin all their collaborative efforts along with dis-incentivizing anyone wanting to make sharable assets! Good job, Valve.
Rusty Sandusky;-;With Jews You Lose.
IvCOMRADE RUSSKI;-;Paid mods making console gaming look fairer since 2015.
chub;-;paying for mods. no thanks.
Amber Cloud;-;Paid Mods to witch 75% goes back to valve Donate on nexus not a bad game but the workshop is B.S Its Absolute B.S Ill donate to the mod Author Directly Not through this Scam Create Backlash People Dont Let This BS Slide Respect the mod authors but dont respect valves
ithinkrok;-;Was a good game when I could install whatever mod I wanted for free. Now your mod choice is limited by a paywall.
Gabriel;-;I have been playing and modding this game since 2011. It was great, but now Valvethesda have introduced paid mods. I already paid for the game AND the DLC, as if that wasnt enough. Theres also the issue that modders only receive 25% of the mod revenue. Ridiculous. 0/10 Instead of a paywall we should have an optional `donate` button where 100% of the money goes directly to the modder. Another reason for the negative review is that the game, by itself, is incomplete and full of bugs, and you have to fix those problems by installing a bunch of mods (like content mods, HD texture packages, equipment, creatures, companions, quests, gameplay fixes, bug fixes, etc.)
Punk4hire;-;I'm an avid PC gamer, and I've spent a few thousand dollars on Steam. This however, is my first review, and prompted by the mod paywall recently instituted for Skyrim. This decision is something that none of us saw coming, and has really shaken the hell out of PC Gamers in general. When I first saw the port on Reddit, I thought to myself that it was a joke. Turns out, I was dreadfully wrong. This is a decision that not only surprised the hell out of me, but I never would have guessed Valve would have ever green-lighted. Especially Gabe. From everything I've read about him, it's counter-intuitive to his business model, and plans for the future of Steam and Valve in general. I believe the man is a maverick, aside from all that Lord & Savior . Granted, were all going to see Steam Boxes, and the Steam OS actually come to fruition later this year, and primarily in 2016. Perhaps you need a platform for DLC, and this is your way of testing it? I dont know, Im too goddam ignorant to the industry, and clearly out of touch with what Valve is planning. Im just a guy that likes to play games. Any games. I could give a damn the platform. I own six consoles, but over the last year Ive spent about 80% of my time gaming on PC. Once I saw a real effort to move things over to Linux I thought the best way to support Valves efforts was to buy more PC games, especially games with Linux ports. Im at the end of my rope, and I got here rather quickly. If I see this  in City Skylines, or anything else. Im out. Ill change my review when there is good reason to do so. Till then Im leaving this. My first review is a negative one, and for one of my most beloved games. I feel like Im having the, This will hurt me more than it does you conversation with my son before disciplining him. I hate this.
Crash;-;Great game right up until Valve and Bethesda introduced paid user-made DLC with no quality control.
Punk4hire;-;I'm an avid PC gamer, and I've spent a few thousand dollars on Steam. This however, is my first review, and prompted by the mod paywall recently instituted for Skyrim. This decision is something that none of us saw coming, and has really shaken the hell out of PC Gamers in general. When I first saw the port on Reddit, I thought to myself that it was a joke. Turns out, I was dreadfully wrong. This is a decision that not only surprised the hell out of me, but I never would have guessed Valve would have ever green-lighted. Especially Gabe. From everything I've read about him, it's counter-intuitive to his business model, and plans for the future of Steam and Valve in general. I believe the man is a maverick, aside from all that Lord & Savior . Granted, were all going to see Steam Boxes, and the Steam OS actually come to fruition later this year, and primarily in 2016. Perhaps you need a platform for DLC, and this is your way of testing it? I dont know, Im too goddam ignorant to the industry, and clearly out of touch with what Valve is planning. Im just a guy that likes to play games. Any games. I could give a damn the platform. I own six consoles, but over the last year Ive spent about 80% of my time gaming on PC. Once I saw a real effort to move things over to Linux I thought the best way to support Valves efforts was to buy more PC games, especially games with Linux ports. Im at the end of my rope, and I got here rather quickly. If I see this  in City Skylines, or anything else. Im out. Ill change my review when there is good reason to do so. Till then Im leaving this. My first review is a negative one, and for one of my most beloved games. I feel like Im having the, This will hurt me more than it does you conversation with my son before disciplining him. I hate this.
Crash;-;Great game right up until Valve and Bethesda introduced paid user-made DLC with no quality control.
dolguldor;-;TLDR I'm scared of whats happening to the gaming industry. terrified (not in the good way) out of 10 I am really worried and scared for the gaming industry, time after times stupid decisions or clashes between the player base and the developers are happening. Video games make the most money out there, If I remember correctly call of duty was/is the most money making franchise ever(may be a year or two out of date on that data) it was that for a reason now look at it, where anything is successful corruption and moneitisation happens. The biggest problem is skyrim is a great game full of bugs and cut down features but a great game where you could see the developers but their heart and souls in, the small things where there not because they added that much to the game but because the developers wanted to make this world. Because of this bugs where everywhere and features where dropped and the mod community stepped up and made it amazing, if anyone should start paying for mods its bethesda to the people who made an realesed unofficial patches and skse for making the game what it is at its true potential. If valve and bethesda want to make profit from other peoples work hire them or contract them!
sockerpullan;-;Valve+Beth having the balls to take a 75% cut of the profits from other people's work? Unacceptable.
Shinichi Izumi;-;Let's be real, I love this game, but 90% of my love is because of mods. I can't imagine myself playing Skyrim without mods. The fact Steam/Valve created such a shady business around paying mods is wrong on so many levels. Not only because they want us to pay for something that used to be free. But because of how they implemented it, didn't not secure stolen mods, did not take into account compatibility with other mods, updates, but on the other hand do take more than 70% of revenue and leave only 25% to the modder. But most importantly this is wrong because they destroyed a community of modders and gamers who used to all be happy together.
Rez;-;Charging money for mods? Not cool valve, not cool
Corgeh;-;good game, but  paid mods
sweetcakes;-;Absolutely disgusting.
Cosmic Candy;-;I have roughly 300 hours in this game. That number would be nowhere near as high without the continued support given to Skyrim by the modding community. I sincerely would not reccomend this game to someone without modding capability. There are serious bugs that have only been fixed by the users. To put it simply, the efforts by Valve and Bethesda to put modding behind a paywall make it such that you would have to pay far more than the release price of $60 to make it a game worth returning to. Thus I do not believe the product is worth the investment. And really, I don't think it's responsible to reward Bethesda after watching them do their best to strangle the goose that lays the golden eggs.
chrisashtear;-;Paid mods(that arent subject to review, and arent even VERIFIED to be from the original creators) are going to ruin this game
Thanatos;-;I used to be a console gamer wanting to join the master race. The one reason was because of mods. I remember playing skyrim on xbox 360 wanting to have mods so much because the game was so boring withought any. When I finally got my pc skyrim was amazing now that I could download it I loved bethesda. But now that valve's and bethesda's greed has rised so much to make mods paid I am seeing the fall of PC gaming with vavle being the reason. Once a happy life on PC now trying to get a job at 16 wanting to leave the gaming world. Thanks to valves greed I may now not die at 30 from clogged arteries.
The ]-[unter-}<iller;-;Try to censor the community? That should work well.
Q is for Qadim;-;This game is a turning point. Despite it having been wonderful and fun when it was released it will forever be remembered as a horrible point in gaming history as the first mods were monetized for it. It'll be remembered as the thing that made Valve a hated company, for turning the modding community against itself, and aiding in the damaging of PCGaming as a whole. It's a pity.
KUZE;-;3rd party microtransactions? No thanks.
DoubleA7;-;I love this game, don't get me wrong, but it was crap on release, buggy and bad, mods made it so much more enjoyable. What do they do? Milk the modding community until the last cow has been sucked dry. Thanks for ruining one of my favorite games, and thanks for being  about it. If Ford sold you a car, and you want it painted, does Ford charge the garage to paint the car? No, ofcourse it doesn't, they're not Bathesda.
Kiss my Asiimov;-;I recommend you go find yourself some mods elsewhere, as this paid mod fiasco is probably the worst thing valve could've possibly done for anyone. Skyrim is an excellent game, only buy it if you intend not to mod it though, unless you plan on shelling out hundreds of dollars for small additions to an already finely tuned game. This review isn't aimed at Bethesda, but rather scumbag valve.
The Stannimal;-;Don't get this game. This game's main revenue and quality comes from its awesome modding community and mods in general. Now that you need to pay to get them, just forget it. The entire community has been screwed wholeheartedly. Steam is a corrupted business now and so is Bethesda. 75% of the revenues from the mods now go to Valve, for doing nothing, while the 25% left goes to the modders themselves. It's a complete screw-up and Valve should be ashamed of themselves. Say that the modder had made $150 profit. They would only recieve $37.50 while Valve would recieve $112.49 for absolutely nothing. It's absolutely scandoulous, Valve is screwing over the gaming community and the modding community simply for profit. To all those modders and gamers out there who are suffering from this, my thoughts are with you. Do not endorse this disgusting show of business, backstabbing and profit hoarding.
Lluna;-;Definately recommend this game, but do not recommend paying for mods. Mods kept the game alive and now that you have to pay for them, very few people are going to want to. Paying for mods has ruined the game. Very bad decision on Bethesda's part. I used to love Bethesda, and I never thought I'd be giving them a thumbs down, but my disappointment level is off the charts! Bethesda and EA just became best friends.
Ferrus;-;Very buggy and unbalanced without mods. Would not recommend vanilla Skyrim. Just like I wouldn't recommend buying mods.
Zelgadiz;-;Stay away from this game.
Debus005;-;http://i.imgur.com/IP2vedH.png this is what you sould have done valve :) i tought this is not EaGames/Origin :))))
ebola dispenser;-;Milking Simulator 2015. Do not buy or support paid mod system. It is beginning of the end.
IgWannA;-;Stop Valve turning community created mods into paid-DLC where the developer and Valve profit from other people's own hard work, taking more than 75% of the revenue for doing absolutely nothing. Mods should be kept free for so many reasons and it would be a travesty if Valve and Bethesda used their power to completely change the PC scene for their own financial gain. Shame on you Valve, and shame on you Bethesda.
trigger_hurt;-;I purchased this game with the intention of modding it. In my opinion, the recent descision to allow for paid mods has greatly reduced the amount and quality of free mods, and therefore takes away from the quality of the base game. I cannot recommend purchasing this game anymore and supporting these practices.
Doc. Omaly;-;Paid for mods really? On what planet did even sound like a remotely good idea!?!?!
RohtoZi;-;Seriously, wtf?
Thunian;-;NO TO STEALING 75% for doing nothing
Chronodistortion;-;Refrence:DeltaSquad666 We drink to our youth, for the days come and gone. For the age of modding is just about done. We'll drive out the paid mods and restore what we own. With our blood and our steel we'll take back our free mods. Down with paid mods! The killer of Modding! On the day of modding's death we will drink and we'll riot. We're the supporters of Moodding, and we fight all our mods. And when modding is done, every one of us dies! But paid mods is not ours and we'll see it wiped clean. Of the scourge that has sullied our hopes and our dreams! Down with paid mods! The killer of modding! On the day of modding's death we will drink and we'll riot. We're the supporters of Moodding, and we fight all our mods. And when modding is done, every one of us dies! We drink to our youth, to the days come and gone. For the age of modding is just about done.
MONSTER CAT;-;steam should be ashamed of themselves
Strider;-;hate train
Hazzwold;-;Decent series, dumb  move by the developers trying to cash in on the modding community, not unexpected given TES Online scheme though
Live.Die.Repeat;-;Have nothing against modders they made this game brilliant however when Valve/Bethesda start charging for them and taking 75% of the profits from themselves something is wrong. Add a donate button if you wish but make sure it goes to the author of the mod, not someone that has stolen it.
kephstas;-;Played hundreds of hours on 360 and bought a steam copy on winte rsale so I could mod. I'm not paying for something with no real QC and no financial recompense.
Tojara;-;I'm not going to support paid mods with the current implementation. Not now, not ever.
kuZhov;-;Now I need to find free cloud storage big enough to backup 20 gigabytes of mods because next time I'll want to mod Skyrim I may need to pay for them. Thanks Volvo.
kephstas;-;Played hundreds of hours on 360 and bought a steam copy on winte rsale so I could mod. I'm not paying for something with no real QC and no financial recompense.
Tojara;-;I'm not going to support paid mods with the current implementation. Not now, not ever.
kuZhov;-;Now I need to find free cloud storage big enough to backup 20 gigabytes of mods because next time I'll want to mod Skyrim I may need to pay for them. Thanks Volvo.
plus1etal;-;The mod situation is unfortunate. Good thing the Nexus still exists, but I wonder how long that'll be around. I know if I was a modder and had the opportunity to be paid, I would take it. Sad.
Spontaneous1;-;A good game without mods, however if you want to make it a great name you will need mods, mods that with the new changes will cost you more than the base game, and it is simply unacaptable that you will be forced to pay for community fixes to problems the devs should have fixed.
SodaSeven;-;I wouldn't recommend this game to anyone in its release state. You have to get a bunch of MODS to make it work - that are also becoming paid-for mods. This is done in the name of 'supporting modders' - if that were the case, they would hire the modders and pay them a fair/real salary to do the work. Anyways - big - fat - NO to recommending this to anyone. Shallow game - terrible AI - littered with bugs.
KaiserSoSa;-;Charging for Mod Content? No Thanks
5  SAINT;-;paid mods. what a joke
dtiberiusk;-;I love the game, but making you pay for mods is just the worst.
Vengeance;-;This game is amazing. However why the hell do we have to pay for mods? Can't you just add an optional donation button. This is just an obvious cash grab. I would expect this from EA or Ubisoft but not valve. Shame on you.
=UPG= Dalek;-;Remember when Anakin betrayed the Jedi? That's how paid mods feel.
Kurwa;-;You really ed up Gabe you should have just left the ing mods on their own m8
Firadin;-;paid mods are bad
Gam3rnathan;-;Paid mods? No thanks.
Jabroni;-;Get rid of paid mods, bethesda. This is a  money-grab.
Jbblaze;-;this new modding system
0_Well;-;Game fine. Paid mods and Gabe's response absurd. % of money going to Bethesda from mods makes me mildly ill. Also, don't need horse genitalia.
PsychroPhoenix;-;Modding is like being friends with a person. You do things for them because you like them - you don't expect to get paid for it, but you won't say no if they buy you a sixpack of beer out of gratitude either. You're grateful, they're grateful, the friendship is amazing. But Valve wants to destroy that. They want to replace "sure I'll mow your lawn and you watch my dogs when I'm in Spain" with "I'll mow your lawn for 20$ so I can hire a dog sitter for my vacation (PS: The dogsitter's agency takes 15 of those 20 dollars)". What kind of friendship is that? None.
Rica;-;My house, which stored everything I have worked for, is now gone because of the pay for mods update. I hauled  in this game and even with only 35hours I had a very impressive cache, for myself. Now it's all gone. WTF. I didn't even realize this severe of a consequence was about to happen. I could have bought an in-game house and moved everything. This is really unbelievable </3
Marx;-;the paid DLC
SnowCone;-;Paid Mods = Thumbs Down
Mikfoz;-;You dun goofed Valve + Bethesda.
littlekenney13;-;I write this articel from the perspective of someone that bought this game to mod it. I own, and loved, the vanilla game on Xbox but felt I was missing so much due to not having access to modding. I have loved my experience so far with the modded game, but with the new changes to the Workshop towards paid mods, I no longer feel I can support this product. Great game, terrible treatment of the fan base.
FroZenToday;-;DO NOT BUY, DEVELOPER EXTREMELY GREEDY. Unless you buy it only for the basegame which is kinda fine I guess... wait no DON'T BUY.
salboacha;-;Game was fine, then Valve and Bethesda thought they could make a quick buck off modding. Congrats on destroying your modding community!
kailethre;-;This game is terrible without mods. And, oh, wow, you have to pay for those now? Guess it gets to stay terrible.
Rifleman;-;Protest review. Never liked the game that much anyway, but they're setting an awful precedent.
kasowaree;-;So it begins, the great downfall of our time.
Spangle99;-;Charging for Mods? Nope.
CJ144;-;Here at Valve and Bethesda, we'll screw you over AND charge you for it. Ain't that a bargain!
kjhg181;-;Free the mods!!
Artemis338;-;Good luck trying to get money out of me you Morons
aansari;-;I disagree with the decision to add paid mods, it ruins the spirit of the modding community and can only cause further problems from there on.
Mad Bandit;-;This Game was great until the introduction of paid mods. Now its bad.
Immortall69;-;Because paid mods.
Aeramor;-;Paid mods ruined a once great community
Pinhead;-;So the company that created the first dlc decided figured that the vibrant modding community which kept their games living ought to pay them for the privilege to do so. Well, them and steam, I don't think I have seen a company throw away its hard earned good will so quickly and so catastrophically. I can't imagine the state of gaming a few years down the track when they release their paid "bug fix" system. Hell they'll probably get the community to do it for them and demand a 75% cut.
dane18;-;This game would be a must have on PC, if it wasn't for the monetization of mods, which pretty much has ruined what made this game great in the first place. With out the abillity to mod your game for free, I can't recommend it to anyone, and woulod actually recommend against it and any other game where enjoyment is primarily through mods.
Wolff;-;I loved this game and spent a fair amount of time with mods. Implementing paid mods is disgusting, even more disgusting since it already has a insane amount of mods on the internet.
Stalin;-;Used to be good due to modding community, now not worth it.
Broken;-;pls no paid mods thanks bye
Grumpy Bunny Ryder;-;YOU DONE F**KED IT UP
About 10 Bananas;-;Once upon a time there was a game called The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, it was a very good game with a loving, creative community around it. That community was now ruined by the Pay4Mods plague brought by the joint efforts of the evil Valve and Bethesda. This game supports paid mods, I do not. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. Hiding mods behind a paywall is just disgusting! Why not a optional donation button, Valve? You even have the balls to take 75% of the profits made if someone buys a mod while the creator gets only 25%, now how the  do you think the creator of the mod is gonna keep making said mods when you give them the ing black  of Steam in their ?? https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uZAKeddtOuM For those who read this please note, Skyrim is an amazingly fun game to play P.S. I know I dont have a lot of hours on this game but trust me, I have played this game for A LOOOONG time on my XBox 360
Spacebound;-;Horse with giant phalices mod didn't cost enough.
t0te;-;Bethesda expects Modders to fix their games (see: Unofficial Skyrim Patches) but now they + Valve are charging for Mods and taking a 75% Cut. Nice, Valve. Nice, Bethesda. EDIT: We won the battle but not the war. Do not cave to bad business practices!
Jesterskull25;-;Please stop make a great modding community fight, Paid Contact Mods have angered so many of your now betrayed fans. I beg you to Remove it soon. Please......Pretty Please with a cherry on top for the good of the modding community. I dont think anyone should get Skyrim until this is taken out.
[Ayy lmao] Javahooch;-;Fun game, but this review is negative to have an impact against paid mods (Edit: Valve removed the feature but will try again in the future, which is still bad). Edit: The paid mod feature has been removed! This is a step in the right direction, however it is only a step. In the announcement that paid mods would be removed, the poster said "We think this made us miss the mark pretty badly, even though we believe there's a useful feature somewhere here." We still need to communicate that they not only missed the mark, they hit a bystander. They should not try again. This review will stay negative to show that we will still not stand for paid mods of any kind whatsoever.
Trevor Fox;-;Never forget April 23 - April 27, 2015. Steam tried to screw over the gaming community with paid mods. Let this review serve as a reminder to anyone who forgets.
Fallen;-;I DO NOT RECOMMEND THIS GAME WHEN THEY SUPPORT PAYING FOR MOD'S!!! "MODS" NOT "DLC", SHOVE IT UP YER !
Surrialis;-;It is a shame this game had to make such a turn for the worse so much later. This game was quite great, and with a strong modding community, it was far better. But now with the modding community torn to shreds, different camps on the paid vs not-paid side, the pure chaos that has been introduced due to Valve and Bethesda introducing paywalls for modifications with no consumer assurance of the product working, this game has lost the value it once held. The Elder Scrolls has been a bastion of modding greatness, and I suppose in that way, it is fitting that it would also help bring about the destruction of such a strong and active community.
TAW| Cutthroat;-;I can only hope other games don't follow the terrible decision to add paid mods to Skyrim. Don't plan to buy any Bethesda titles in the future if this is the way they're going.
Cornak;-;The paid workshop mods are unacceptable.
Rablusep;-;Paid mods are removed, therefore I'm rerecommending this game.
ThreePounds;-;paid mods are to be removed, so I am changing back to recommending it. :)
TheHappyStickman;-;So many hours of endless fun. I pre-ordered and played at least 120 hours on PS3. Then when I made the switch to PC, I torrented it and played at least 270 hours and now I've bought the game on PC and I still am finding it entertaining, So many interesting stories within this game. This is a game that actually deserves a 9/10. But with mods and dlc, it earns an easy 10/10.
SeorJuan;-;awesome game for everyone. never seems to end and never seems to get boring.
Serpent GUN;-;best game of all time!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
CraZzzy;-;Absolutely amazing game. Fun for every kind of play style. Decent (but fun to play) story with beautiful landscapes and challenging dungeons. 10/10
Jarl Hamm;-;motha in' DRAGONS
The Glorious kL1x;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is everything gamers expected and more. As the follow-up to Oblivion, arguably one of the best RPG's of all time, people expected a lot and Bethesda delivered. That's not to say that Skyrim is without problems, far from it. Fortunately, there is so much good in all of Skyrim that the problems are easy to ignore. I'll start off by saying that if you didn't like the combat in previous Elder Scrolls games, you probably aren't going to change your mind with Skyrim. That being said, combat has changed fairly significantly. The biggest change is in the addition of dual wielding. In previous games, you could assign a one-handed weapon and a shield, or a two-handed weapon and then add a magic attack via right bumper. In Skyrim, you have far more freedom to equip what you want. Basically, everything that uses one hand can be equipped as long as you have a hand available. Also, magic now counts as using up an equipped hand. What this means is, you can use two one-handed weapons to dual wield at the expense of blocking, sword and shield (of which the shield now has attacks of it's own such as shield bashing), a sword and magic spell, or two magic spells. All of these combinations also feel much weightier and no longer feel like the crowbar from Half-Life. Hits feel like hits, magic spells feel like they are doing significant damage and blocking gives you a sense of danger avoided. If you do go the melee route, you'll still get a bit of a sense of button mashing but it's still a big step up from Oblivion. Rating: Viking life 9.5/10
DirtySilverBoy;-;I doesen't matter how many bandits you kill, dragons you slay, how many times you save the world. Every time you greet a ing NPC they will ing insult you and ask you to go and get their ing trinket in some god damn dungeon all the way across the ing map. And when you go back the the same NPC they will greet you whit the same insult and walk away. 10\10
TheSaddestManatee (InsanePinoy);-;My family is really worried for me I stopped taking heroine and started this it has consumed my life 10/10 better than heroine
The Notorious Agent 86;-;Become the Dragonborn, a hero with the amazing ability to shout really loud. Sneak your way through dungeons, trek across arctic tundra, climb mountains and navigate vibrant cities. Fight dragons, undead corpses, vampires, bandits, bears, rabbits, fish and evil walruses! You can do just about anything in this game and with workshop support modding is quick and easy, allowing you to access even more fun player created content. Tons of fun with great replay value. Would definitely recommend.
Galuciela;-;Skyrim is the best openworld game ever.
||T$E||Doge Chaos;-;Ran from Thomas The Tank Engine wearing pink armour shouting at goats "GIRL POWER!" and making them fly into the distance as crabs dressed like Zoidberg, guards for throwing a pan on a guys head and stealing everything he owns. 10/10 would  again. -IGN -Metacritic -PC Gamer -Me
Lewis how much were your shoes?;-;I would  this game so hard that if people came up to me i'd say i used to be an adventurer like you but now i have a sex addiction
SirTopHat;-;If u love rpg games and open, world this is it.... THIS IS IT! i have spent 105 hours on this game and im still not bored and I have probably played it like 3 times and i still love it. There is so much to do. Finish the story do side missions, finish the side missions go and help some people, finished helping people get some mods for more missions or more, finished getting the mods then... wait how there is millions of mods and even if u did get all of them wait for new ones. This game is endless so just GET IT!
[Legend]Michael Ratts;-;One of the best games I've played in a while. In this century, theres not many games that have the feature of long term play. By this I mean that I want a game that I can play even after I complete the main story line and still have fun in the game and this is just it! Better than FarCry2-4 where there are side missions. Skyrim is full with diffrent ways to complete the story and different ways to play in general. There are many characters you can play as, different skills you can master at and overall the game is just a thrill. I recommend this game for anyone who is in for semi-relaxing games but also want some action. You can have either in Skyrim. Added to all of that, there are so many steam workshop mods that you can subscribe to, if theres something in the game that you dont exactly like, make the game twice as good. Worth every penny and more.
Tranquilized;-;A few days ago I heard that mods were being monetized and I would have thought you were crazy. No one in a million years would I think something like this would happen. From the very first moments I started playing on my PC mods were an amazing experience and addition to any game. No matter who you ask, mods have been the best thing to ever come out of PC gaming and make me proud to enjoy the games that I played and interact with the community as I followed modders and watched them transform a good game into a great one. Each modder had their own unique ideas and anyone who wanted to add something more had a chance to. They could shine and present their talent to the thousands of people who would support them and back them and its been one of the best things I have ever experienced while playing games. Jump ahead to this week and I was absolutely amazed by the decision to make money off of mods like this. While I would back any kind of donations or compensation for hard work by a modder this was way worse. People could easily steal and make very lazily any kind of mod they want and sell it for a quick buck if it is broken or not. It was quite the disaster and many people were clearly taking advantage of it. The outcry from the community was amazing in how everyone banded together to fight back against this system which really didn't make much sense. Any implementation could have been way better than how this came out and many people were furious. Finally today I am very glad to say that bethesda and valve are backing down from their decision and there are no paid mods now. Rather than completely trash them for what they did there should be support seen for a much better idea that doesn't make the community go absolutely ballistic like they did. Any thing like a donate button would be greatly appreciated by the community to support the mod developers we love so much. This entire fiasco shows the importance of a healthy modding community and shows just how supportive and close we all are as a gaming community where we will take no . A truly great game made amazing by the people who play it.
Novikov;-;rip mod paywalling u will not be missed
[AJSA]Germnoble;-;They admitted they were wrong about paid mods. The game itself is amazing, but the mods make it legendary.
Toothbiter;-;15/10 would go on a rollercoaster of hate and then forgiveness with valve again
M'Pith;-;Valve and Bethesda have agreed to remove the paid mod program.
Ramen;-;No more paid mods. 11/10 game
Captain Mangles;-;DO NOT BUY THIS GAME! SOME MOD CREATORS ARE CHARGING STEAM FUN BUX FOR THEIR MODS! It's like homemade DLC, and DLC in itself is bad. Remember when mods for PC games were free? Apparently Valve and Bethesda forgot. UPDATE: Valve lifted the pay wall for user-created mods, but don't start thinking it's over, this will happen again. DON'T BUY GAMES WITH WORKSHOP SUPPORT
Exenteration;-;Real cash required for mods that should be free? It's one thing to have a donate button for people who wish to support the mod creators but to force a paywall onto the workshop is ridiculous. Why have you betrayed us lord Gaben?
Silfy;-;Great game playing with MODS. Not recommended at all if you have to pay for that new UNOFFICIAL DLCS. We won and there is not UNOFFICIAL DLCS anymore, but valve and bethesda hurt pc comunity. Don't forget.
Avmrn;-;Wife returned home only after installing unofficial patch. Can get the best crossbow regardless of faction choice, otherwise what would be a very crippling scenario for ranged character. What do I keep hearing about the optional modding again?
Pablo Old Boy;-;Paid mods? No thanks
Shipers;-;What Valve are doing is creating a system where people who actually want to make stuff for free can't because other people will steal the mods and put them on Steam to sell, thus making an unfair profit while the modder loses out on valuable exposure for their work and development time, which was based on an ethos that says if you create for free and give out for free, then others will do the same. Now this work space is under attack by the system that Valve has created, because it makes their environment hostile to the modders work space, the mod creators are now prey to predators who will steal their work and profit on it unfairly. This isn't about Valve making money on mods, it's about destroying the community of sharing in order to monetise everything as much as they can.
2Pro4UStudios;-;Mods are something that should be free, not paid for, especially when modders only get 25% of the money, and no way to prove a mod is yours.
Journey;-;If you're looking for a game where you can easily sink into an epic land of fantasy and adventure, Skyrim is the game you're looking for. This is honestly the best game I've ever played, and I've played a lot of great games. Skyrim gives you plenty of options which gives you a unique sense of freedom you don't see in most games, another great thing about Skyrim is the plot. Skyrim's plot is one of the most epic story-lines you'll ever see in a game.
Nerdheart;-;25 % of the money goes to the modder 75% to Valve and Bethesda... .....no.... just no
Hitlerkin;-;As someone who loves to screw other people without consent, Ive gotta say Im really loving the new direction valve has taken with screwing their costumer base despite the constant screams to stop, but I still cant recommend the game wholeheartedly until Gaben stops being so coy about it and shows up in person to have his way with my unwilling newbille boy booty.
Deadmeat;-;Paid mods will ruin Steam.
Zim;-;Somehow Bethesda and Valve managed to tear apart a 14+ year old, tightly knit community overnight with the introduction of the paid mod system. Whether or not this decision and feature rollout will completely annihilate the ability to freely mod Elder Scrolls games in the future is yet to be determined, but as it stands now this new system is doing far more harm than good to what had previously been a global family of mod authors and players. Nice job guys, ya done ed up.
Dr.packman5000;-;What the actual h*ck!!!! Paying for dam mods? Dam you Gabe Jewell!
Lord Shia LaBouf;-;Are you telling me that if i buy a mod i wont know if its compatible with my game. GabeN, You either die a hero or live long enough to see yourself become a villan.
Aregios;-;I really liked playing Skyrim. And I liked it especially for the mods. But I think Valve/Bethesda are ruining the game right now by monetising mods. There are lots of pros and cons mentioned in the last days, which are: Pros: Modders earning money : The mod is property of the modder. If he decides to share it for free, it's his choice. If he decides you can only play his mod on tuesdays, it's his choice. And if he decides to earn money with it, it's once again his choice Getting modders to create expensive mods : developing mods costs a lot of time. And time is money. So why not support your local modder? Sometimes they even use motion capture of sound studios. And those surely dont come for free. lots of money for valve/Bethesda : Hey, you got someone else to do the work for you, and you just get 75% of the share Cons: You only get 25% of the income as a modder : Really!? How do you justify taking 75% of the profit from someone else's work? Imaging paying 75% taxes on your income. I bet you would start looking for ways of financial fraud. Because 75% feels like working for someone else. Yeah, you (valve) are providing the platform (workshop) and the servers. And you (Bethesda) are providing an editor to the modder. But all those things you did years before for free. No working protection against theft: Everyone can upload mods. They dont even have to be the creator. They just take a mod of Nexus upload it on the workshop and put a nice price on it. no working quality assurence: There's no way of knowing a mod is good/bug free before playing it. Sure, there are user ratings, but someone has to be the first to buy it. nobody will develop huge mods for money: If I'm planning to earn money by creating mods, I can either create 20 small mods for 2$ than a big one for 40$. The risk of failing with one big project is bigger than failing with lots of smaller ones. The great "expension"-like mods will still be developed for free by enthusiasts the mod may be broken after a patch: Usually there are three options: 1) The original modder will bring an update 2) You cant use the mod any longer 3) The mod has become an "ophran" and someone else adopts and updates it. This works with free mods, because it's not about the money. Option 1) Everything's fine 2) Gamers are  because they paid for something which is broken 3) The creator is  because someone else is earning money with their work you're asking money for something that has always been free: This feels like DLCs 2.0. I listed the point for completeness. I think paying respect for someone's work is right and therefore support the general option for modders to ask for money. But by taking 75% you're sending the wrong signal. It's not about supporting the modders but personally getting rich on someone else's labour. How to fix it: 90% of the share belongs to the modder: He put a lot of time and effort in it. He is keeping the game alive and therefore should get the lion's share. Valve/Bethesda is earning enough by new players expiriencing new mods. Quality assurrence: You get a full refund within the first hour and 50% refund within the first 24h
searching for Emma in Ibiza;-;(Please pay 5.00 to view this review.)
Kleon333;-;The core game is decent but the most important thing this game and its predecessors has been the great modding community. They made it a much more valuable experience to me, I would not have enjoyed the game nearly as much without the Mods and being able to test and use them freely was a lot of fun. I think the decision to place user-made fixes and patches to your game behind a pay wall, especially when you take most of the profits, is horribly wrong. It is a terrible business decision and could have unforeseen consequences on the modding community in the future.
JR;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a video game that was released on Nov 10, 2011 and has generated both positive and negative reactions from its target demographic. I have played this video game.
Abang Cimeng;-;Torrented it. And still bought it. Yes it's that ing good. Or I am that stupid. 9/10
Yuzuru (Yamai);-;Very epic game one thing to say DRAGONS!!!!
HG.L3gacy;-;This is a really good game. Best part was... it was only $4.99 on sale... WIN
Penguinmilker;-;This game is autism. 10/10
Hyperiest;-;Paid. Mods. Never again.
Wonup;-;i played 5 minutes....then ed in my pants
SaucySpaghetti;-;This game is amazing by itself, though it's the modding community that made it even far better than it currently was. Turning what made this game amazing into a scummy business practice that helps no one but Valve makes Valve and the modding community look like a pile of dog turds. I would hold off buying this game until Valve/Bethesda get their heads out of their asses listen to what the community has to say.
vihn;-;Killed a whole family and stole their food. Was later arrested for killing a chicken. 11/10
DanteDDL[UA];-;Legendary Elder Scrolls series that made a huge investment in RPG and PC games comes with new world. Slay dragons, grow stronger, become a hero or a destroyer of the world. Big open world with beautiful landscapes and lot of places of interest. Get you sword and explore all you see.
PhixFeiss;-;The Elder Scrolls is probably the best roll-playing game series i have ever played. In my opinion only The Witcher series could rival with The Elder Scrolls. Skyrim plot It is absolutely brilliant, history of dovahkiin will totally absorb every fan of rpg games for even on hundreds of hours. I am amazed by the world of Skyrim. It's open world with a hundreds of side quests whose number we can enlarge by three DLC and many modifications. Graphic and soundtrack stand on a really good level. I would recommend skyrim to anyone who wanna chill with game.
kotekzot;-;Out of the box, Skyrim is a fairly mediocre game, with a large and interesting world, but crippled by boring gameplay, massive bugs, console controls and poor graphics. Thankfully, the community has created a huge number of mods that go a long way toward rectifying these problems. If you're prepared to spend a few dozen hours fiddling with mods, buy Skyrim and you will get many hundreds of hours of entertainment; otherwise you will be severely disappointed. Do yourself a favor and use the Skyrim Nexus [www.nexusmods.com] to download mods instead of the Steam Workshop, it will save you many hours in the long run. If you need help assembling your collection of mods, S.T.E.P. [wiki.step-project.com] is a good place to start.
kidknow;-;its a great game though i just play mods
Monk;-;Buy a mod, game won't open. 10/10
vermillioN;-;good game but I won't support it paid mods.  you 2 valve & bethesda
iTwisteeRex;-;One of the best games I ever modded using a powerful tool The Creation Kit by bethesda. Got me a games designer job. Seriously love this game and everything about it.
HuBy;-;I used to be an adventurer like you then i took an arrow in the knee. 10/10
Rafsterman;-;Skyrim is known as one of the best games since it has won over 200 awards. Not a lot of people remember the original Elder Scrolls but they dont remember/know how good the original Elder Scrolls are. This comes to Skyrim, a VERY long game. If you buy the offical prime guide there is 1134 pages, no joke its real. You play as a prisioner that by luck escape from a dragon who destryoed the town ur in. The game is like a medival time scenery. You can literally do watever you want, even KILL someone for no reason but youdo get a bounty from the nearest city which is not very fun considering if theres 5 guards fighting you. Since this game is extremelly long, only like 2% from all systems actually beat this game 100% and they may have around 2,000 to 6,000 hours, yes its that dam long. So hope you enjoy this game and remember, pickpocket,kill,and rob everyone (just kidding, dont do it unless you want skill points)
Matty G;-;It's like Skyrim with guns.
{JIRD} Jessica Rabbit <3;-;I had played the absolute crap out of this game (and Oblivion) on Xbox 360 before I was inducted into the PC master race. What else is there to say about this game that hasn't already been said? It's ing epic. Even more epic now that Valve has removed it's filthy paws from the modding community. Fetchers. Anyway, for the most spectacular, immersive, lore-rich, addictive RPG yet- you can't go past the Elder Scrolls series, and Skyrim is the .
Cpt.BlackAce;-;I'm a cat with a human body 10/10 ign
Jacob x3;-;Headbutted a ghost 10/10 3spooky5me
Heretic;-;A game with all the depth of puddle, Don't worry though,User made DLC formerly known as Mods can fix that for some extra dosh now. Thanks Bethesda & Valve!
pumpkin42;-;Paying for mods? PAYING FOR MODS??? Greed has no limits..
Edge;-;Next to Morrowind is Skyrim the best entry in The Elder Scrolls series. Great graphics, a working combat system (even though improvements were possible), a beautiful landscape and lot's of ways to spend your time. The only thing that is really annoying is the main quest line. It stands in stark contrast to many side quests which really felt like you were involved in small adventures as a "normal" inhabitant of the fantasy world. But the main quest was just more of "the chosen one saves the world" and "the mysterious evil threatens to destroy the world". I prefer a smaller scale of magnitude personally.
Nope;-;I think pretty much all of you would enjoy this game. Give it a try... but I should probably offer a word or two of warning: * Feed your pets * Draw closed the shades * Say goodbye to your friends and family This game will ruin your life, but in a good way.
Cynical Paulie;-;Avarage story, lot of quests, lot of stuff, addictive soundtrack, bugs, cheap game, very low gameplay feeling, awesome mod support and lot of guards that were adventurers like you.... than they took arrow in the knee.
Lord Linkanator;-;after a week of paid mods being up the paid modding has been taken down 11/10 would mod again
autistic dickhead;-;Play a cat in Skyrim. Ignore cat in real life. This is a good game, ya'll.
Jurassic4LIFE;-;Dude Skyrim is the ing best It's the 5th game in The Elder Scrolls series although they aren't all connected directly based hundreds of years apart Huunnndreeeeddssss of quests that are interactive and often decided by your choices You can basically create your class to your liking Because there are no actual classes If you wanna duel wield swords and be a swift fighter, go ahead, warmage? Sure! Heavy Brute? !@#$ yea. A mix of it all? Up to you. And then besides weapons, there is a ing HUGE set of skills that you can pick and choose from like a in' goose eating crumbs. Tons of options man. Plus, it has ing dragons. AND THAT'S JUST THE IN' VANILLA! If you get this  on PC, you can get THOUSANDS of ing rad mods that make the make even better. Get this ing game, play it.. Enjoy it.
Xezeal;-;Skyrim. The game is just as epic as its name. Even though it is the name of a providence of the north. Most of the people you will come across will be Nord, since it is their homeland. I loved every bit of this game. I played it on several different consoles. It has a lot of reply value and end-game value. Depending on what you do, until you complete the main quest line. The Story Line is really epic. There are so many quests to do, so many places to explore and almost endless things to do; especially with the mod community. You are Dragonborn. You have dragon's blood running through your veins. Which seperates you from most people in the game. Your shouts shake mounts and roar through valleys. The best thing you could ever do in gaming, is slay dragons. These dragons have very specifically qualities and designs. The best effort Bethesda has ever done. You must slay Alduin, who wants to burn the world burn. Who doesn't want to fight dragons. The Lore is quite something. So many different books to read, Stories to be heard and challenges to be adventured. If any of you had played Oblivion, then you must know Umbra, which Umbra was also in Morrowind. I used to really love that Soul Absorbing Sword that filled Soul Gems for the enchants. In one of the lore books, it was mentioned that he/she had died 500 years prior to the starting events of Skyrim. It was a very sad day when I read that book. She was my favorite NPC to slaughter. Now it has become the guards for those repetitive "Arrow In The Knee" lines. Arrow In The Knee? What about Arrow In The Face? The graphics are enchanting and mesmorizing. I've always been a fan of water textures in video games and this blew me away. The rivers and their currents, the waterfalls and their pools below. The cliffs to the largest mountains. The cities to the religious temples. The labryinths to the hidden sanctuaries. No matter how many times you play, you will always admire the beauty, art, work and time that was put into this game. One of the best RPGs of All-Time. 6/5. If you are an RPG fan, this game is for you.
Iron Dgger;-;10/10 Skyrim is such an epic Action Fantasy RPG, it quickly became a much more popular addition to mainstream culture than previous Elder Scrolls chapters had... targeting a broader audience by introducing dragons to the series. Bethesda did superb work with Chapter V: Skyrim and raised the bar again with exceptional story telling, voice acting, original musical score and 100+ hours gameplay. Check out the Workshop to enhance the experience.
TIMMY THE TIMID TIBETAN;-;Paid mods? NTY JEFF They're free again? TY JEFF
Sanic;-;10/10 No more paid mods. Would download again.
Ra.;-;>This game supportED paid mods but thanks to the awesome community the bad idea is now gone. I hope the modding community will come alive again and valve will se their misstake and improve. Great graphics, Amazing lore, architecture and world, massively improved AI and gameplay. It's truly among the best RPGs to date, and the best Bethesda game to date. And the only cons that i can find are the frequent bugs, but honestly there are so many positive sides to this game that you dont notice the disadvantages. - 10/10 would buy again.
KatteN;-;One of the best games I have ever played. And thanks to the awesome mod community this game can do even more. I would recommend this game to anyone who breathes. Buy it and have tons of fun.
bwc153;-;Bethesda and Valve have allowed paid mods onto this game, in addition, Bethesda only allows the modders to recieve TWENTY FIVE PERCENT of the money that anyone pays for their mods.
Dranth;-;Unfinished Game, riddled with paywall DLC.
Wibble;-;Forcing you to pay for mods that were previously free instead of just adding a simple donation button. The very definition of greed, seeing how the creators themselves only get 25% of the profit of their work.
Major Spliff;-;Love the game. Played it to death on 360 and was looking forward to the enhanced PC experience... But paid Mods? No way. Did you know that Value take a 75% cut of the price of any Mod for Skyrim? And I though EA and Ubisoft were bad. Shocking O_o
rj_fire;-;One of the best games that I have ever played.
Soez;-;If this game was a potato, it would be a good potato
wtfcopter;-;Paid mods removed
Nya;-;Superb game with endless gameplay that is rich in detail, atmosphere and most importantly fun. This is also the best looking game I have currently in my library.
Mr.Anderson;-;"10 out of 10! GOD 10 out of 10!"
=WFC=borage123/twitch.tv/djdouge;-;this game ALMOST ruined my life. i already give it a 5/5 rating, this game has a amazing replay value and the fact that i can do almost anything i so god damn well please is also a great factor in a game. im saying if you like farcry 3 or gta 5 get this. open world, choose your path, so many diffrent things to do, long as fudge, and there is SO MANY mods! you will start this game and you wont get off till you ether beat it or grow a beard to the point where it hits your keyboard and you cant play becasu ehte hair is blocking you. in my opinon i say buy the damn game!
N@sHuL;-;Paying for mods is a new low. No, just NO!. If I would have to pay for all the mods for games in over a decade of gaming, assuming the price/work ratio would be the same it would cost me around 10.000 euros. I am not paying that kind of money in the next decade for MODS!
Zenero;-;So today I was like "hey, let's play this game again, let's install all these really cool mods" so that's what I did, I logged onto steam and tried to find some cool mods and I clicked on one that had a cool skin. "Oh sweet, let's get it" I was about to click on it until I saw something.... .99 cents. Well  this. I closed down skyrim and played some CSGO, Valve, get rid of payable mods, look at all these crap reviews just because of it.
cyberghost;-;Either give the game for free or mods for free. I can't pay for base game and mods. I'm not a millionare!!!
123kingmat;-;The fact that the mod authors get a TINY percentage of the profit from content THEY made is DISGUSTING! Could this be the beginning of the end for free mods?
Erases b y the racisist Raisin;-;Those payed for mods are worth buying. -No Steam user ever
KillerAtWar;-;Sell mods for this boring peice of ..for real? roflmao..Its a crap rpg been better for years out thier..
Razo;-;Bethesda Softworks Logo Simulator, comes with an automatic shutdown function once the cinematic opening is over.
x86x;-;I kept saying that morrowind was more fun. I wouldn't have recommended skyrim. If I do it now, you will upvote me. Steamcommunity fail 11/10. Paid modifications suck. Bethesda is greedy. Shorter sentence. Even Shorter. Shorter. 0/10. No. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JweTAhyR4o0 Sorry Samyoul, but you bloody nail it.
__SCidaliX;-;Skyrim is a game that I was massively excited for on its release of 11/11/11. I originally bought the game on PlayStation 3 but due to lag a save bloating problems, I decided to pick it up on PC instead. My experience was instantly improved and it's a game that, over a year on, I'm still playing regularly. Mods are what really make the PC version of this game special and they make it possible to play through the game several times, having a different experience very time. Seeing as this disc activates on Steam, you'll be able to use Steam's Skyrim Workshop to install mods at the push of a button, or you can alternatively use a modding website like Skyrim Nexus to find mods that might not be on the Workshop. The game itself features hours upon hours of gameplay with loads of quests, dungeons and loot available to you. You can do the main quest to reveal your inner dragonborn, side with the assassins of the Dark Brotherhood, join the warriors at the Companions, practise magic at the College of Winterhold and steal things for the Thieves Guild. My personal favourite quests are the Daedric quests which have you doing deeds for god-like people in return for powerful items. The game also has two available DLC packs (Dawnguard and Hearthfire) with a new one, Dragonborn, out soon. If you're into modding, you can download the Skyrim Creation kit for free and do just about anything you can think of, or you can just find what you desire among the plethora of mods already available. I think every PC gamer should own this game. If you don't like something within the game, there's probably a mod to fix it and you can guarantee to see some exciting content in the future.
*: [EZ] Zabi / ^ )>;-;I am Queen Zabi Leader of Skyrimjob :333333333333
enrir;-;Let me clear things up by assuring you that none of the quest bugs, graphical issues, gameplay glitches, or unexplained crashes I've encountered can change the fact that I played this amazing RPG for well over 400 hours and absolutely loved every single moment of it! This game is absolutely fantastic and fascinating! even after years of playing this game it doesn't fail to surprise and amaze me! But the thing that really brings skyrim to life is its modding community! There are millions of great mods out there waiting to be explored! If you're new to modding or don't even know what that means i'd suggest visiting a youtube channel called "gophersvids", you can find tons of recommendations and instructions on how to make your skyrim experience UNFORGETTABLE! And now to cap it up I'd say that you MUST buy and play this game if you're even slightly interested in role-playing games!
smngus;-;Like Skyrim without guns.
Viper Infinity;-;Paid workshop items goes against everything that the modding community is about. At the very least I expect the forced paywall to go away and instead be replaced with a DONATION button.
MagicFlyingGorilla;-;This used to be the ultimate game for me but what made it even greater was the endless customization through mods, but now that it's out of the picture, i'd like to say thank you Valve and Bethesda for ruining the best gaming community on here.
Grink "Luke Skywater" da Boy;-;The Elder Scrolls VI: DLCborn Click here to pay $4.99 to read the rest of the review
Freeman;-;Perfect for action, a very good game that has astonishing adventure, Dragons, Draugr, and entertainment all in one.
Saivader;-;The recent actions of Valve and Bethesda made me give this a negative review, sadly. The game itself is unfinished with a heap of bugs and errors. These bugs and errors have been patched for FREE by the modding community. In addition to this, the huge modding community has kept this game alive and popular these years, giving Bethesda a nice flow of money from people still buying their game. BUT, they wanted more. The idea of modders getting paid for their quality work is fine, but when Bethesda and Valve demand 75% of the profit for doing nothing except providing a place to host (non-curated), and the tools to make the mods. Imagine a carpenter having to pay the company that made his tools 75% of his paycheck, or a taxi driver paying 75% of his paycheck to the company that made the car. This sort of nonsense is accepted here, but never anywhere else. I'd understand a meager 10% cut or so, because of the hosting and whatnot, but they seem blinded by their greed. Skyrim is epic, but with greedy companies like these, it's hard to justify buying this game.
Swizzles;-;I did enjoy this game and told everyone i knew that they should get it if they are into the RPG side of things but then paid mods came instead of a simple donate button. So nope.
woegster;-;10/10 would give away my social life again.
Staatspolizei;-;It's a great game, but paid mods.
dog199921;-;great game  paided mods
folt;-;Turning mods into DLC's...not cool Bethesda.
MasterBryce;-;Charging for mods is dumb. Loved the game, played it a ton on my Xbox but made the switch to PC for the mods. Im not going to suddently pay for something thats always been free. Make the change back to before and my review changes back to postive.
GoddamuelAdams;-;Finally got around to buying this when I saw it was a weekend sale item. Would not have done soif I had read the reviews first. The md paywall is unconscionable, and I regret giving Bethesda and Valve any morey at all under these circumstances.
HIELIC;-;Just buy it! End of review.
mike7159;-;Love the game.
Neasti (   );-;after 300 hours u getting bored but very good game 10/10
SkyTh0rn;-;I would marry this game and have children with it. 10/10
papiwa;-;Undisputably one the leaders in gaming, Bethesda Softworks body slams the market with Skyrim! Tune, Clean, Tweek, replace ( whatever you gotta do to your device) and get ready for the best sandbox of it's Generation. Elderly Scrolls has been a huge hit and Bethesda did not let us down with Skyrim, offering DLC which turn it into a whole new and even better experience!! Forage for material to craft weapons and armor, then forge for more to build! Cook and socialize, create any life you want for yourself, and fight against the wickedest evil while gaining ultimate knowledge and magical power in beautiful landscapes. Flawless Mechanics "Smart Config" Controller Support Stunning Graphics Magic!! Medeival Times Dragons! User Created Destiny User Created Character Great Software Support
Scrooge McDuck;-;No more paid mods... Great RPG
Just Just James;-;I have put many hours into Bethesdas latest Elder Scrolls game and I can confidently say its great! Explore the vast wilderness of the Nordic homeland or relax in one of the many populated holds the game offers. Complete quests in a variety of ways resulting in great value, just create another character (yes you have to play through the same helgen part over and over again) and set forth on your quest... The amount of choice in the game is spectacular for open world RPG lovers, change your characters eyebrows and ears to degrees of precision that I never thought possible. Many of the larger questlines have a set path for you to follow with smaller choices along the way whilst side quests let you choose (usually from 2 options) which path to take. Mods are a great way to keep things interesting, not only can you change the game in ways that give it a whole new feel, but you can just tweak things like textures or weapon appearance. For a relatively small amount you can add in Solstheim or Fort dawnguard to your world and enjoy the new threats and adventures the world holds, or give up your dragon fighting ways, hang up your daedric armour and start a family, giving Skyrim a new generation of Dragonborn (if it is genetic)
Origibro the Nalaholic;-;A very fun game with a superb modding community. However we should probably remember the paid mods and how gamers united against them.
Niccy [Tgr];-;Beautiful game, very nice to play. 8/10
m2fizy;-;This game looks stunning !!! This game is  awesome !!! This is an HARD-CORE-STYLE-RPG with an amazing open world full of DRAGONS ! In this game you can make almost everything you desire. From shield/armor/sword/potion making thru skinning, herb/stuff collecting to stealing and killing innocents. There is a strong story behind this game but also many side quests which can provide more then 100+ hours of play. Nothing more can tell ... cause it will ruin your game. Community also serve a few addons ... like new chars, skills, weapons, locations, quests, ... and many more. For this game its nothing more to say ... JUST !!! ... YOU NEED TO PLAY IT BY YOUR SELF !!! + game type (HARD CORE RPG) + a lot stuff can be done by you (skinning, weapon making, melting, alchemy, potion making, ...) + enchanting + a lot of weapons/shields/armors/bows/ .... + a lot of side quests + difficulty (hard is quiet hard ... can be harder) ++ DRAGONS you can kill !!! ++ STORY +++ GRAPHICS +++ LEVEL DESING/DETAIL +++ GAME TIME (up to 100+ hours) +++++ ADDICTING - game type (HARD CORE RPG) - a lot of side quests - difficulty (hard is quiet hard ... n00bs beware !!!) - - - GAME TIME (up to 100+ hours) - - - - - ADDICTING Graphics: 9/10 Level detail: 9/10 Sounds/Music: 9/10 Mechanics: 8/10 Idea: 7/10 Addicting: 9/10 RPG elements: 10/10 Story : 10/10 ---------------------- Verdict: 10+/10
Tom;-;While the game is fantastic, Skyrim became what it is today from its extensive Modding scene. However after the release of paywalls and Valve selling these off as DLC and taking 75% away from the creators is just disgusting. Modders should get paid for their Mods but adding a paywall to them is just despicable. Most mods are not worth paying for, some mods break other mods. Its just simply not viable to charge for Mods. A donation button would be more feasible but amateur modification cannot be straight up sold, especially for the ludicrous sums people are charging. While the game is worth a thumbs up, the expanded community and modding is what brought this game to the fame it has and 3 years down the line, this is all the game has got going for them, now killed by Valve and their new money grabbing ways.
bydlaq;-;Thanks for the age of pirated mods
Thomas the Dank Engine;-;Decent game, has paid mods. PAID MODS
CODE;-;You can play as a Cat. 10/10.
Sammy;-;THIS GAME IS AMAZING AND IF YOU DONT HAVE IT YOU SHOULD GET IT AND IF YOU DONT WANT TO GET IT THEN I TOTALLY RESPECT THAT BUT YOU ARE MISSING OUT ON A LOT OF FUN AND FRUSTRATION GOOD DAY BYE
kazebird;-;Remove the paid modding system. It does not help modders, it does not drive up quality, all it does is promote content theft, ruining the modding ecosystem, and makes Bethesda and Valve tons of money they did not earn. We are warning your two companies. You have taken one step to far, and you won't get away with this.
Darky;-;I used to like this game, but then it took paid mods to the knee.
JAM;-;I enjoy brevity. Skyrim itself is fantastic. Modding has made the game better by a factor of 100. What Valve and Bethesda has done to the modding community is appalling. Mods should never be purchased. Do not support this game, and do not support what has been done to ruin it.
jbondguy007;-;Did you ever want to forget about real life, and get in a whole new world? Yes? Perfect. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is the game with the most immersive world I have ever seen. The map is enormous, and the gameplay is complex to the point where it feels like you could actually live in the game. There are so many quests to follow, it will waste your days for weeks, or even months.
Barack Obaka;-;Enjoyed the game for what it was, but can no longer support Bethesda in their endevors while they make paid mods into horse armor 2.0.
[] RBC;-;Like Harvest Moon but with Fables. The Crafting Simulator 2014. 15/10
ShadowsFate;-;When you hear the word RPG, what is the first thing that comes to mind? Elder Scrolls, or Dungeons and Dragons? Maybe both? Skyrim is an example of what happens when true elements of both RPG & action are put the ultimatum. It's an absolutely beautiful game with a game soundtrack to pay money for. With the addition of mods this is in the top 10 list of all time greatest Steam Games. In the beginning you start off a prisoner in the hands of Cyrodill's Imperial Legion led by the region head legatus, General Tullius. Although you start off on death throw if you will with your head about to be a seperate part of your body entirely the game quickly breaks the idea of an execution by bringing in a sudden dragon assault on the city of Helgen which is at the time an Imperial outpost connecting the rest of Tamriel including parts of the game Oblivion to the region of Skyrim. There are more quests to even count in this game, I lost count around 60 but the addition of mods can add around another 1,000 quests if not more. Which then we come to the crown jewel of many steam games, modding communities and boy.. Does Skyrim have one, well over 100+ different mods for every reason what so ever. There are mods which fixed the broken military system in the game, there are mods which adds more travelers and adventurers on the road adding more of a lifelike feel to the game. There are also mods which can hurt the games realism as well, some mods are not meant for the lore of Elder Scrolls but the entertainment of the player instead. If I were to give ESV: Skyrim a rating, In a range from 1 - 10 it's nearly a 9.5, It's great on so many levels but there are snibbets even with mods still aren't correcting. Guards only want you and nobody else. The NPC's do the same constant moves 24/7, and for some reason I never understood this an NPC who's 10 feet away will stop everything they're doing to say Hi to you. SKYRIM RATING: SYNDICATE RATING Gameplay - 8 (Gameplay is good but could dramatically be improved with more combat actions) RPG Element - 10 (This game seemed to never have an ending to the nearly limitless number of quests you could do, on PS3 I spent well over 100 hours playing the game and was just barely getting done. ) Multiplayer - 0 (The Game isn't meant for online play, and it really doesn't take anything away from the true game itself.) Graphics - 9 (Graphics on Vanilla are good for the game, but with enhancement mods it will skyrocket to a solid 10 with every little detail imaginable.) Replay Value: 10 (This game is beyond the single word of addicting, it will make you come back for more and more.) Official Syndicate Rating, 9.6 - Skyrim is a masterpiece in Roleplay engineering a true marvel of Bethesda. The amazement is after 3 years this game still runs as strong as ever! Revitalized with the modding community Skyrim maybe one of the legends of the RPG and maybe even Steam game series which lives on.
BOT Kevin;-;Paid mods, with the majority not going to the makers of the mod.
Nope;-;joining the bandwagon
Firedance;-;I used to play this game too much, then I took an arrow in the knee.
Bile;-;Like Skyrim with dragons.
JayDCzarnuhu;-;Mod it until it breaks
Xigbar;-;Lemme explain dis game: You go around the land of Skyrim even though it's not it the sky(WHAT THE 823712 I WANT MAH MONZ BAK) and going around shouting at people to the point where the fall of hills and crap. You can be a man or lizard depends on your level of nerd(mine is 42) and then you preety much die... alot if you don't know what you are doing Don't forget about DLC! that's always necessary Ok let us be honest. Skyrim is an amazing game. Yes it has like over 9000 bugs. But that really does not matter. I reccomend this game alot to anyone so buy it for yourself, mothers, fathers, sisters, brothers, grandma, grandpa, aunt and uncle, cat, dog, dead pet goldfish(RIP) and of course your friends. Have fun!
GoldenFox;-;Skyrim starts out with a short intro that is not a video you sit back and watch, but you can immediately look at people and at the environment. Your character creation is not before the game, but during the intro implemented well in the storyline, whereupon you get a choice to join either side of the war as opposed to forcing you in one direction as a lot of games do. Gameplay contains seemingly infinite quests and different storylines. Quests seem hardly repetitive, for even when there are several quests of clearing out caves, every cave is different and interesting. You can explore an enormous world and collect countless objects and powers. Gameplay can be estimated on about 200 hours to complete every game and dungeon, if not more. Even with the game so immense, interesting and well thought-through, you can download countless mods on skyrim nexus that can increase gameplay by many more hours as well as fix the bugs this gigantic game has and increase performance as well as resolution. There are mods to change appearances of characters, and there are mods that add features such as homes, characters, followers, set-up. Even whole new lands can be added with mods to increase the gameplay even more. The only downside I can think of myself is that the game has some bugs. Simply go to skyrim nexus and download a bugfix and it's done. Skyrim is highly recommended for everyone who likes adventuring, exploring, collecting, active combat, interesting storylines and upgrading. If you love Skyrim, you may want to give Risen and The Witcher 2 a try. These games are different, but felt as interesting, even though Skyrim is a lot bigger and has more features.
[DSL]TimTheBretonFromCyrodiil;-;I have put in exactly 392 hours into this game since I first purchased it. Despite some relatively simple AI, somewhat outdated graphics, a really irritated inventory menu and the inevitable bugs that plague the game, Skyrim is one of the greatest RPGS of its era. Though simpler than the previous titles of Morrowind and Oblivion, it allows you much more freedom than either of the two. You can build your character around your particular playstyle with no real "Optimal Builds", and if you ever decide you dislike the way your character is set up, you can simply start training another skill and become good at it. If you spend enough time in Tamriel slaying dragons and saving damsels in distress, your character can learn and master all of the different skills that are available to you. The open-world environment and HUNDREDS of places to explore and quests to complete, you never really feel like you're being forced to go down one particular path and every time you play, you'll end up discovering something new. The indepth lore surrounding the Elder Scrolls series heavily immerses you in the world and story, making you feel like you've stepped into another world. If you love RPGS, this is a MUST HAVE.
silver;-;I love the open world option in the game. The way you can go and explore the world and your own leasure. You can take on many different quests in so many locations that it keeps you entertained throughout. Your skilling up is also done at a pace that keeps the fights and battles interesting. The scenery is breathtaking, the detail awesome, the realism fantastic. I think this game ranks 10/10 and to me is the top of all RPG games. Bethesda has done an awesome job. Now I would love for them to upgrade both Morrowind and Oblivion to the same standard as Skyrim. I have the whole set from Arena through to Skyrim and each game got better and better. Well done to all the modders out there that have done a fantastic job to add more spice to the game. I would definitely recommend this game to every single RPG player in the world. A must have. Can't wait to see if there are more expansions in the making.
Brad;-;Awesome game, It offers lots more hours of gameplay than Call of Duty
Unleaded Metrodon;-;Mod it until it crashes. If it's not broken, fix it till it is.
Meow;-;If you're a person who likes to find all the loot, search every nook and cranny, complete all quests, well I'd say you're probably in for a couple of hundred hours with Skyrim. Let's make that double if you're playing with Legendary difficulty option since it makes every single thing in game to have absurdly high hitpoints and cuts your damage down about 4 times the normal difficulty setting. Still can't decide if legendary difficulty is actually a challenge or outright torture to kill time (not very much so) efficiently. Still being able to enjoy playing it third time. Would definetely recommend to any open world rpg lover.
LordXenophon;-;The coolest of the Elder Scrolls series, though I only mean the weather. It's no threat to Morrowind.
Viper (no monitor/headphones);-;This is by far my favorite game. You have a huge open world to explore and it just never ends. Quest after quest you will find yourself playing it more and more which isnt bad! 10/10!
Assron;-;Skyrim helped me grow 4" in 4 weeks! Doctors hate me.
LightOrange;-;Very game Many graphics much violence 10/10 Wow
Supreme_Sander;-;You will spend countless hours in this if you haven't bought it yet do it now, and even if you bought it on console you should buy it on pc because you will really see the difference!
Drunken Farmer ~deer~;-;A must get for any RPG fan, DOWN WITH MMO, the elder scrolls will always be a single player experience or nothing at all.
classyknife;-;you can take a bee out of a beehive and put it in ur inventory it doesnt even fight back and u can eat it just eat the bee eat the h*cking bee
Arma;-;About 1400~ hours played (Console+Steam) and I'm still having fun at this. The game itself is huge enough to spend hundreds of hours with it, but when you reached the point where you get bored by the vanilla game.. then the real fun begins: Mods. The game is awesomely supported through a huge community and allows you too do almost everything you want. Flying? jepp. Become a werebear? no problem. Become a lich? why not? blood not realistic enough? take this mod. It's the best action-RPG-game I know so far, I'd definitly recommend it. PS: It's engine is so amazing that you can even run it on a low spec machine smoothly (if not you can install some perfomance mods)
Nevermore;-;The Elder Scrolls series is an easy one to lose yourself in; the characters, the story, the quests and the exstensive lore make it one of the most enthralling series I've ever played. Skyrim in particular is my favourite title. While the main story is amazing in it's own right (last boss is slightly disappointing) there are hundreds of hours worth of exploring, listening to dialogue and doing side quests. If that isn't enough there is a thriving modding community on Skyrim nexus and the steam workshop. I've played Skyrim A LOT spanning over many different profiles and still to this day there is something new that surprises me. While Skyrim isn't as deep as RPGs go it is a world filled with emersive characters and storylines: the voice acting is top notch (they have Mario as part of the cast!) and the artwork on the city designs such as Windhelm is fantastic. While Sword and Sorcery isn't for everyone Skyrim is dumbed down to a point where it's enjoyable to almost anyone. I'm probably late on this anyway...
[CACG] Miss Molotov;-;This is one of my favorite games of all times. The fact that it is open world is amazing, and the character developement is so much fun! I love the voice acting, and the quests. It keeps you busy for sooooo long! And the best part honestly is all of the silly bugs! Skyrim has the best glitches ever. XD
Patrick Not Star;-;This is good game. Get it.
Doge;-;Better than real life
divaal;-;It all started when I was being carried over to Helgen to be executed. I was with three others, I don't recall their names. I was being taken for treason. I swear, it wasn't me. I was in the wrong place at the wrong time. Anyway, when we were loaded off the carriage, there was a man who marked down our names on a list. He didn't recognize me, so I had to take thirty minutes making myself as hideous as possible, switching between argonian to nord to argonian to wood elf to high elf to khajiit over and over again until I was satisfied. I think the man who watched it had to go to therapy for the next five years. We heard loud strange noises over and over again, and nobody cared. Eventually, when it was my turn to be executed a dragon flew in conveniently right before I was beheaded. I escaped Helgen and went down to Riverwood. I spoke to people, stuff happened, and I had to go to some place and speak to the Yarl. On the way there I found a horse, I named him Carl and we rode off into the sunset, stealing cabbages and putting buckets over guards, that was the beginning of a great friendship. 10/10 OK game i guess EDIT: I haven't seen Carl for a long time. I'm starting to think he decided to go on his own quest. But I'm not sad. I'm happy for him. I screamed at a dragon and he exploded.
black coach jesus;-;I play this game with 8 giant fans pointed towards my genitals to retain immersion so I can pretend i'm in the snowy mountains with my character "DongBeetle420" 10/10
ChristKnowsManXL;-;It's great, until you have to deal with NPCs.
bansheegrimserverofsouls;-;it is a very adventuress game full of mystrous and stuff and is easy to mod so i give it a thumbs up
Assassin of old;-;One of the best RPG games iv'e ever played... the only thing i'd complain about is npc AI but now adays there is quite literally a mod for everything so I also recomend enough mods to keep you entertained, but overall great a game.
??????;-;So, Skyrim, a game grasping the ability to do just about anything you want. Being an open world game, Skyrim has many possibilites, similar to it's "Fallout" counterpart. In Skyirm, you may feel the need to run aimlessly around the world looting anything you please, which,you have the ability to do. Don't forget those special weapons hidden all around the map! Some of them obvious, some of them you may not even realise as sacred weapons. Along with that, you'll have to look out for all of the special creatures too. Such as Giants....yup....don't mess with those guys or you'll be getting a close-up with the clouds in seconds. On with the point, Skyrim is one of the best open world games to play! 100/100
Apollo Justice;-;OBJECTION! This game is recommended . Yes I got proof. As the prosecutors that says this game is not good, nor recommended does not have valid evidence to support their reasons. For example, the 'evidence' I read from the not recommended page is stating that this game is boring , over-rated and lonely . I tell you this: Skyrim is a open world game indeed where ttha player have lots of choices and abilities to do what the player in question like to do, in this way the player can do what ever he/she wants to do. Skyrim does have among the greatest mod support , the best I know atleast! As I just stated, the game have significant mod support, this game never gets boring, although this is not a part of the game, it's still a thing that does have an impact on the prosecutors evidence. The prosecutors calims this game is over-rated, yes it got very good rating indeed, 94/100. But on the other hand... why? I tell you this, why would the judge of that case give this game that rating if the judge in question did not think the game deserves this rating? And on the other hand, you can enter for exemple most, if not all houses in the game, insane graphics yet from being released 2011. The last objection I have to make is about the ' loneliness '. What loneliness exactly? the game is crowded with NPC's, wich, your honor is " Not Playable Character's ". These NPC's might be stiff indeed, but as I stated before, mod compatibility and support gives you choices to add user made characters with unique voice acting and different scripts. Now your honor, It's up to YOU to swing that gavel and deaclear a verdict, this game is not guilty!... err, I mean RECOMMENDED!!! //Apollo Justice.
MagicalMLG;-;Skyrim is at the time of this review the latest installment of the "Elder Scrolls" series. Skyrim is a simplified version of the eariler Elder Scrolls games meant to tend to a casual crowd rather than the hardcore players that loved The Elder Scrolls III: Morrowind. The addition of the Steam Workshop really benefited this game with it's easy way of adding in extra content created by the fanbase that is sometimes even of higher quality than the DLC packs that were release for the game. Overall, this game has it's ups and downs but it is a solid game that I have loved ever since it was released. Get this.
Proj3ct Katana;-;Its Skyrim. That alone should be enough for you to get this game if you haven't already done so. The game has been out since 11.11.11 and it's still going strong!
Tyrannosaurus Rekt;-;ever wanted to be a man/lizard/cat thing who got adopted by dragons, turns into a werewolf, has a shout that can slow down time, that becomes a thief,who then goes to kill his adopted parents and wields a giant hammer made out of glass? then get this game.
btech;-;Took me nearly a year to finally beat it. More stuff to do than any other game I've played. Definitely worth the money.
Mellow.;-;10/10 You can smack rabbits with maces and kill them.
Yureina;-;So in this game you are the "chosen one" who has to save the world from the big evil monster using your choice of medieval fantasy weaponry or magic. You also do quests and look at the scenery alot in case there is something worth checking out there. Lastly you can get a house to live in and spend the rest of your time crafting potions and not talking to the spouse of your choice that you decided to leave home because they kept getting in your way during combat. Hmm. Sounds like a billion other games you have played, right? You're sick of this, right? I sure am. Now that i've probably succeeded in making fanboys rage and amusing others, i'll actually write some stuff that might be worth reading. At its core, it's not that different from all the other fantasy games you may have played and never want to see again. Except that it's in a gigantic open world that you can spend hundreds of hours exploring. That there are multiple side-quests of decent length that in most cases are quite interesting and provide unexpected twists. And that if you ever wanted a game that could quite literally have an endless amount of content, then this may very well be it. Also there are mods. Lots of them. Enough to make this game fresh and to eat even more of your time. I've unlocked all of the achievements and clocked over 300 hours into this, and yet I still feel as if I can still get more out of this game. So yeah, it is exactly what everyone tells you it is: a massive open world RPG that can occupy your free time for weeks and even months before you feel like moving on to something else. You have been warned. Now go kill a dragon, marry someone, or kill one of the countless city guards who have taken an arrow in the knee at some point in their lives. Enjoy!
Rank_down;-;I love this, are only two good RPG like this Skyrim and Witcher. Grafics is amazing, playeble is beutiful, soundtrack is realy nice.
Zz:*`*:;-;it's definitely one of the top 5 best games of all the time ever made ! it's  :)
[][7]_[0]xide_[7][];-;One of the best single player RPG i ever played. And yea, you can add some addons on workshop to make your game look prettier
Shirt;-;An amazing game, can only get bored when you're stuck in dungeons, make sure you learned Clairvoyance! Pros: -Many factions you can join -Great main storyline -Great side quests storylines -Amazing graphics -A lot of weapons you can choose from -A lot of magic spells you can learn -Mod-friendly -Just... everything Cons: -Some of the voices are annoying as  -When changing tabs, double cursor happens (fixed using OneTweak mod) 95/100 from me.
black coach jesus;-;I play this game with 8 giant fans pointed towards my genitals to retain immersion so I can pretend i'm in the snowy mountains with my character "DongBeetle420" 10/10
Rank_down;-;I love this, are only two good RPG like this Skyrim and Witcher. Grafics is amazing, playeble is beutiful, soundtrack is realy nice.
Proj3ct Katana;-;Its Skyrim. That alone should be enough for you to get this game if you haven't already done so. The game has been out since 11.11.11 and it's still going strong!
Tyrannosaurus Rekt;-;ever wanted to be a man/lizard/cat thing who got adopted by dragons, turns into a werewolf, has a shout that can slow down time, that becomes a thief,who then goes to kill his adopted parents and wields a giant hammer made out of glass? then get this game.
Quinten;-;This game ruined my life. 10/10 would recommend.
JetPilot;-;Loved it, even when you complete the main quest there is an almost endless amount side quest to do. There are also hundreds of mods that can make your Skyrim experience even better. This game is definitely worth the money. Trust me, you are missing out by not owning this game and it's DLC's.
MagicalMLG;-;Skyrim is at the time of this review the latest installment of the "Elder Scrolls" series. Skyrim is a simplified version of the eariler Elder Scrolls games meant to tend to a casual crowd rather than the hardcore players that loved The Elder Scrolls III: Morrowind. The addition of the Steam Workshop really benefited this game with it's easy way of adding in extra content created by the fanbase that is sometimes even of higher quality than the DLC packs that were release for the game. Overall, this game has it's ups and downs but it is a solid game that I have loved ever since it was released. Get this.
divaal;-;It all started when I was being carried over to Helgen to be executed. I was with three others, I don't recall their names. I was being taken for treason. I swear, it wasn't me. I was in the wrong place at the wrong time. Anyway, when we were loaded off the carriage, there was a man who marked down our names on a list. He didn't recognize me, so I had to take thirty minutes making myself as hideous as possible, switching between argonian to nord to argonian to wood elf to high elf to khajiit over and over again until I was satisfied. I think the man who watched it had to go to therapy for the next five years. We heard loud strange noises over and over again, and nobody cared. Eventually, when it was my turn to be executed a dragon flew in conveniently right before I was beheaded. I escaped Helgen and went down to Riverwood. I spoke to people, stuff happened, and I had to go to some place and speak to the Yarl. On the way there I found a horse, I named him Carl and we rode off into the sunset, stealing cabbages and putting buckets over guards, that was the beginning of a great friendship. 10/10 OK game i guess EDIT: I haven't seen Carl for a long time. I'm starting to think he decided to go on his own quest. But I'm not sad. I'm happy for him. I screamed at a dragon and he exploded.
Andalel;-;It has dragons!
maneks;-;This game is one of the best games I have ever played. It's also in the steam top 10 most played games ! If you don't own a skyrim, GET IT NOW ! You won't regret your money. The game itself is an adventure, the main story line is so long + a lot of amazing side quests and DLCs. Once you will finish the game you can download tons of mods for more quests/monsters/armors/weapons... 10/10
Mythic;-;There's dragons. 10/10
Pilot!;-;One of the best open world RPG games on the market right now. Whether you've played Oblivion, Morrowind, or never touched an Elder Scrolls game before, you're almost certain to love it.
AInsley Harriott;-;ONE OF THE BEST GAMES I HAVE EVER PLAYED 10/10
SexyMahogany;-;This game is absolutely amazing. I must say that the programing gods at Bethesda have really outdone themselves. Skyrim offers a free roam world full of quests, secrets, and hidden tresures that litter the stunningly beautiful, midevil landscape. I would recommend this game to any gamer whether they prefer Call of Duty styled first person shooters, or World of Warcraft styled RPG's. It also offers a number of DLC packs that will carry your adventure through the Elder Scrolls series even further! If you ever get bored of the run-of-the-mill questing crap you can always look towards the Steam Workshop for over 19,000 different gameplay enhancing mods. This work of art will always keep you on your toes, so keep yourself awake every night playing until your eyes are dryer than the Sahara Desert!
M1khaS;-;this is my review for this 2 year old game. to start off dont be fooled by the only 5 hours logged on stewam. I first played around 300 hours on a non steam version of the game and picked it up again in sale. now off to the game. now where to start? the story: the stoy is little short but still great to play trhough, good voice actors, enjoyable story and when your done with the main story there are plenty of thing to do around like just freakin murdering everyone or blowing lydia of high hrotgar with FUS RO DAH :D or just do what you want. write your own story. the gameplay: if you like to play in first or third person your choice I like the third person view myself since you can see more of the beautiful world of skyrim around you. the cmbat is solid. not super hard or something but still pretty good. SO many weapons in this game just choose what you want. the graphics: its okay i guess. not the best ive seen but hey its a 2 year old game. and oh yeah some textures are just terrible. but thanks to the awesome skyrim community there are some great texturepacks out there that make the game look so much better. and speaking of the community. its still huge after 2 years. its awesome. there are so many mods for this game that add to a great gameplay experience. go check out the nexus site for mods and the steam workshop ofcourse well to wrap this review up: I sunk in well over 300 hours and im not even bored yet. the open world is so huge and its worth exploring. for me personaly pretty much one of the best games ive ever played. deserves a good and deserved 10/10 buy it already. bye
Azershine;-;I kill a dragon, bear watches me kill a dragon, bear still thinks he can take me on....I die from the bear 10/10..
Sop;-;Skyrim is the Bethesda game we've been waiting for for years. Bethesda finally fixed the horrible performance problems in the engine that have been present for at least 8 years. The graphics have been improved so much that you can actually call the game beautiful. Combat is more fun and fluid than ever. This is the first Bethesda game I've ever played that's stable. I played from release day and had 2 crashes in 130 hours. Even fully patched Fallout 3/New Vegas with stability mods added can't even go 1/10 of that time without crashing twice. Combine that with the most interesting and content-filled world Bethesda's ever made, no more cookie-cutter dungeons, dragons, horses that are actually useful, and finally a leveling system that doesn't require grinding useless skills to get stat point bonuses on level up....the list goes on. Skyrim just improves on every aspect of the previous games. I know some people still prefer Morrowind, and some weird ones think that Oblivion is better, Skyrim is the king of Bethesda games and of open world RPGs.
FORCEY FUN TIME;-;I like the part with the snow and the bit where you go into that building and you talk to someone with hair.
Lucied;-;Play it. Everyone else did.
ComeAroundPhoenix;-;Me- What have ya got for sale? Belathor- Mmm a little this, and uh little that.. Taught me everything I need to know about running my own buisiness 10/10
DevonWargod;-;sucks without mods sorry console gamers 6.7/10
Dylan;-;Good Game, should get cos good and stuff
OkiFever;-;I love this game more than I love Lydia. That's not saying much because Lydia is a . This game is seriously addicting, with more than one way for the story to end up.
Gotaki;-;Love this game, 1st thing i did i got thrown in jail for stealing a piece of meat and then accidentally set myself on fire later on. 10/10 GOTY
TAS the SPAS;-;The best game yet in the Elder Scrolls series (way better than Elder Scrolls Online). A great game for rpg pros or noobs.
Dant[UA];-;I just can't express how amazing, well-done and powerful this game is. It is just.. the Best RPG I have ever played in my life. It is kinda addicted as well. Moreover, it never ends and has an amazing story. Even if you will get bored from it in far future , it has plenty of mods in the workshop that will make game even more fun. Totally worth buying.. with all DLCs that it has. 10/10 ...
Assron;-;Skyrim helped me grow 4" in 4 weeks! Doctors hate me.
LightOrange;-;Very game Many graphics much violence 10/10 Wow
Supreme_Sander;-;You will spend countless hours in this if you haven't bought it yet do it now, and even if you bought it on console you should buy it on pc because you will really see the difference!
Murderotica;-;I really enjoyed this game.
LordXenophon;-;The coolest of the Elder Scrolls series, though I only mean the weather. It's no threat to Morrowind.
Dylan McKenzie;-;Well I got to start reveiwing at some point the game may be a few years old but it is still fun to play the exploring a huge facter is the mods the modding community has really kept this game alive it makes every thing from Bunny follower to just funny swords like a giant popsical it has apsects of a mmo like the role playing mounted combat the freedom you have getting married oh then getting divorced Freedom right? xD crafting is fun even better with mods when you can crafy stuff like Spartan armour assasins creed armour, even a Darth vader helmet the game is endless of what you can do if you put your mind to it like I even a pregnant Npc mod O_O as I said it is endless in what you can do :)
vynle;-;Bum bum bum bum badadadum. If there was a game that would ruin your life with the same effects as crack then this would be beat only by World of Warcraft. When you buy a game twice just so you can mod it you know you have a problem that can only be dealt with by years of expensive therapy. Don't waste your money on that, however buy more video games to escape those problems. This game will make you question many things. Things like why can horses climb up walls? Or, why do dragons land just so you can kill them? It is a very thought provoking game. I plan to write all future essays that I have to write on this game and minecraft. Buy this game so you can be like me!
Drunken Farmer ~deer~;-;A must get for any RPG fan, DOWN WITH MMO, the elder scrolls will always be a single player experience or nothing at all.
JayDCzarnuhu;-;Mod it until it breaks
Fallro[CRO];-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, what could i say about this fantastic game! As always Bethesda has give us a MASTERPIECE of a game, Bethesda is used to make high detailed open world RPG games, following Fallout 3 from 2008 with the open world high detail terain they did it again, but in a much larger world with much more stuff to explore, Tod Howard is a genious... The story is great, some kind of fetish for prisoners is what Bethesda loves, but the whole game is unbeatable, even after you finish the game and start all over again you will find something new, random events are great, so it gives you planty of side quests, apsolutly an amazing game, 9.5/10
Captain;-;The best RPG that I've played in a long time. Very beautiful and a perfect game for mods. Amazing 10/10. Its a steal while its on sale.
Brandonjph;-;There is NEVER nothing to do in skyrim!
NATURE;-;If you dont have Skyrim then I dont no why you have a gaming PC for lol The Elder Scrolls series is my all time favorite action role-playing open world fantasy video game and Fallout to. Bethesda make the best open world game and it worth ever penny you pay for it. This game can be played for months on end alone and thats not including the mods. The story and the atmosphere of the world is just amazing I cant wait to injoy the world using a 3d Virtual Reality Headset I might not want to come back to the real world lol but i give it a 100 out of 100 must buy if you own a gaming PC
Caustic Soda;-;Fus Ro dah This is a 9.9/10 game im not used to not wallrunning and lots of lag :(
KURWA;-;I've modded this game for 3years. As vanilla maybe not that good, but when you start modding it, even the graphics look beast. This game + all of ultimate  mods = (   ) Shout out to Loverslab modders, keep up the "hard" work (   )
dashboon;-;the best game i have ever played
Ledshot;-;This is my Favorite RPG game ever. The quests are well designed and fun to do whilst being easy to get started Subtract everything you hate about past elder scrolls games, add everything you love, add a better engine that does not crash on you every 10 minutes and is not a steaming pile of bugs, pretty up everything, make the faces cooler and make just about everything better and you have skyrim. This game is a masterpiece, its the game that we have been waiting for in 2011, (Most titles this year have been bad to say the least) This game would deserve a perfect 10 if not for the super lame secondary main quest which is the civil war, you can kill the final boss in one hit, I understand that level scaling is bad in most cases, but in some cases things have to be level scaled. The annoying part is, the civil war is about the length of the dragon questline! this game would get a 9.7 in my book now, thanks to that one little detail, but since metacritic forces me to round up my score, 10 it is!
Auren;-;The never ending game of pure fun :)
Mike;-;If you aren't playing it now, well... I feel sorry for you.
SwMt | Flasher;-;One of my favorite RPG Open World Fantasy games! World is really big and just fantastic. I love the style and gameplay of this game. Quests are really fun and you are never bored while playing. I really like the style of playing because you can play as warrior or wizard style. Also there are skills/levels for character which you decide which one to upgrade. World is huge! Fantasy level is normal because you can kill also normal warriors/people instead only monsters/dragons. Story line is really sick! Only the problem is on start of game because you need to walk a lot but later when you discover all the places and towns then you can use fast travel option. Game also have a lot of side quests and hiden places to complete and discover especially if you buy legendary edition of the game then you have a lot of new quests. Like i said, it's one of the best RPG games so i reccommend this game to all RPG and Fantasy lovers. Game it totally worth of money! 9,5/10
Kaizel;-;In Skyrim you may find yourself in a huge open world where you can choose which path of many you'll take, and, if you put enough effort, why not all of them? You have a really good main questline that is surrounded by even better questlines, like the epic Thieves Guild and Dark Brotherhood quests. You will have over two hundred hours of game before you're able to say "I've got no more quests to do". If you've finished your main questline, slayed Alduin and saved the world, you can still go after the Dragon Claws, Dragon Shouts, Dragon Priests Masks(you probably notice they've got all about dragons this time right?), becoming the leader of the Mages College of Winterhold, Thieves Guild, Companions, Dark Brotherhood, becoming a general on a civil war, collecting all the Daedric Artifacts(which one has its unique quest), joining the Bards Guild, and even doing tons of sidequests, and do all of this with a character that most suits your style of playing, it can be a mage, battle mage, warrior, berserker, paladin, stealth assassin, rogue, summoner... And I'm not even talking about the DLCs that come with new questlines and a whole new continent for you to explore. As if this was not enough, the game counts with a incredible number of totally functional mods that can add more quests, more races, more weapons and armors, take the graphs to a whole new level, make the game mor immersive, give you a new user interface, completely change the whole game that even make you feel like you don't know how to play skyrim anymore(T3nd0, i'm talking to you), and all kinds of mods you can think about(don't use it too much or you may end up like a Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtle slaying trains on Mario Land). That's it, if you like action RPG with a lot of stories for you to be part of there's no way you're not liking Skyrim.
C4ndy Shark;-;Bought it yesterday and already have 15 hours logged... WORTH!
[Exitium] Krisalex;-;THE, best game of all time
okama2;-;DON'T PLAY THIS GAME, if you have something else you must do. When I got this game, I spent 32 hours in the first 3 days. You just want to help every random citizen you can meet and complete all the quests. This game is fun and you will have stuff to do in it and you will be missing from life for at least two weeks before you get bored, just to start again a few weeks later!
Paduok Aspirino;-;Beast Game i learned how to unlock locked doors in real life xD
Dietary Supplement;-;It's like Skyrim... with swords!
G0ldenSp00n;-;This game at my soal 10/10
cadonomgo;-;This game has taken so much of my time up, but Do not regret it for a second. Originally I had it on the ps3 when it first came out and sunk about 300-400 hours into it then, After the debacle with the DLC on the ps3 I bought the game on the 360 so that I could play the DLC when they each came out and sunk a few more hundred hours into the game. Now I have finally found wisdom and got myself a gaming pc I have it again, this time modded for a whole new experience to sink more and more hours into. If you like fantasy, first person and making up your own character back story and character quirks then this is the game for you. You can do anything and everything in this game, but the question is, what does your character want to do?
Alex24c;-;One of the best games made in the last few years
cadonomgo;-;This game has taken so much of my time up, but Do not regret it for a second. Originally I had it on the ps3 when it first came out and sunk about 300-400 hours into it then, After the debacle with the DLC on the ps3 I bought the game on the 360 so that I could play the DLC when they each came out and sunk a few more hundred hours into the game. Now I have finally found wisdom and got myself a gaming pc I have it again, this time modded for a whole new experience to sink more and more hours into. If you like fantasy, first person and making up your own character back story and character quirks then this is the game for you. You can do anything and everything in this game, but the question is, what does your character want to do?
Alex24c;-;One of the best games made in the last few years
Umaroth;-;I currently have 224 hours logged into this game and I haven't ever beaten the main questline. 10/10
LatinoLoco |KwS|;-;Lovely game, aye!
Timbersage;-;Anyone who says this games sucks, sucks.
DrNateWhims;-;I absolutely love this game. I have spent many hours playing it on the xbox360 and ended up buying it again on the PC so I could start trying all the interesting mods and HD rendering. This is a game that you can play over and over again and each time you play through it, it is an entirely different experience. Only downside I can think of is there are a few questlines where you have an option to go one way or the other (I wont go into details to avoid spoilers) any one side is really well developed and interesting and the other falls short. There are only a couple of them where this applies though.
SwMt | Flasher;-;One of my favorite RPG Open World Fantasy games! World is really big and just fantastic. I love the style and gameplay of this game. Quests are really fun and you are never bored while playing. I really like the style of playing because you can play as warrior or wizard style. Also there are skills/levels for character which you decide which one to upgrade. World is huge! Fantasy level is normal because you can kill also normal warriors/people instead only monsters/dragons. Story line is really sick! Only the problem is on start of game because you need to walk a lot but later when you discover all the places and towns then you can use fast travel option. Game also have a lot of side quests and hiden places to complete and discover especially if you buy legendary edition of the game then you have a lot of new quests. Like i said, it's one of the best RPG games so i reccommend this game to all RPG and Fantasy lovers. Game it totally worth of money! 9,5/10
Kaizel;-;In Skyrim you may find yourself in a huge open world where you can choose which path of many you'll take, and, if you put enough effort, why not all of them? You have a really good main questline that is surrounded by even better questlines, like the epic Thieves Guild and Dark Brotherhood quests. You will have over two hundred hours of game before you're able to say "I've got no more quests to do". If you've finished your main questline, slayed Alduin and saved the world, you can still go after the Dragon Claws, Dragon Shouts, Dragon Priests Masks(you probably notice they've got all about dragons this time right?), becoming the leader of the Mages College of Winterhold, Thieves Guild, Companions, Dark Brotherhood, becoming a general on a civil war, collecting all the Daedric Artifacts(which one has its unique quest), joining the Bards Guild, and even doing tons of sidequests, and do all of this with a character that most suits your style of playing, it can be a mage, battle mage, warrior, berserker, paladin, stealth assassin, rogue, summoner... And I'm not even talking about the DLCs that come with new questlines and a whole new continent for you to explore. As if this was not enough, the game counts with a incredible number of totally functional mods that can add more quests, more races, more weapons and armors, take the graphs to a whole new level, make the game mor immersive, give you a new user interface, completely change the whole game that even make you feel like you don't know how to play skyrim anymore(T3nd0, i'm talking to you), and all kinds of mods you can think about(don't use it too much or you may end up like a Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtle slaying trains on Mario Land). That's it, if you like action RPG with a lot of stories for you to be part of there's no way you're not liking Skyrim.
...;-;I absolutely enjoyed every minute spent in this game - mostly free roaming and unwittingly finding side quests. Strongly recommended. My personal top 10 of all times.
GroovyBiceps;-;This game... I love it. You should play it,
]EoG[LoneWolf;-;I been playing this game before but on steam plus the all dlc's and the game is just awesome plus the workshop you can just add the mods without any problems and if you need help just go to the community and disscious and there is always people to help you out :)
Fallro[CRO];-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, what could i say about this fantastic game! As always Bethesda has give us a MASTERPIECE of a game, Bethesda is used to make high detailed open world RPG games, following Fallout 3 from 2008 with the open world high detail terain they did it again, but in a much larger world with much more stuff to explore, Tod Howard is a genious... The story is great, some kind of fetish for prisoners is what Bethesda loves, but the whole game is unbeatable, even after you finish the game and start all over again you will find something new, random events are great, so it gives you planty of side quests, apsolutly an amazing game, 9.5/10
Captain;-;The best RPG that I've played in a long time. Very beautiful and a perfect game for mods. Amazing 10/10. Its a steal while its on sale.
Brandonjph;-;There is NEVER nothing to do in skyrim!
Lucied;-;Play it. Everyone else did.
Mythic;-;There's dragons. 10/10
Pilot!;-;One of the best open world RPG games on the market right now. Whether you've played Oblivion, Morrowind, or never touched an Elder Scrolls game before, you're almost certain to love it.
AInsley Harriott;-;ONE OF THE BEST GAMES I HAVE EVER PLAYED 10/10
Dovahkitty;-;THIS GAME. IS AWESOME. PLAY IT. PLAY IT NOW. DO IT. NO QUESTIONS ASKED/NEEDED.
Natalie Kerr;-;Skyrim is one of the best games ever made. The Elder Scrolls games is my second favorite game series of all time behind the Halo series and before the Mass Effect series. Its an amazing immersive game that I get lost into every time I hear that music.
mattsour451;-;Awesome game. Great potential for modders, small time and professional
Kingslayer;-;I reccomend it, better than Oblivion
Haydenh2;-;best game every one should get it!:)
-;-;Skyrim is a great game that will keep you entertained for hours on end. The game is far from perfect but if you overlook those few bugs you will greatly enjoy the game . ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Keizaal los lot kred tol fen dein hi entertained fah omaar nau oblaan. kred los gut nol tozeinnu nuz waan hi overlook den lith pusojur hi fen lotgaar kujiir kred.
]EoG[LoneWolf;-;I been playing this game before but on steam plus the all dlc's and the game is just awesome plus the workshop you can just add the mods without any problems and if you need help just go to the community and disscious and there is always people to help you out :)
Rzarectah;-;So much to do on this game. I've lost days playing this game. it is hands down the best game ever.
JohnGotti;-;Well i think we cant say enything new about Skyrim. This game is just awesome in alot of ways, The thing i rly like is that u can change views from 3th to 1st person eny time u desire. I recommend this game for enyone who is looking for exitement in an rpg game. U will get pulled from one story to the other all while exploring this vast and wonderfull world (nicely polished) The only small thing i can find is the fact that there is no Online-Multi co-op option, but then i guess thats where Eso will fill in the blanks. 9-10 sound(track) 9-10 storyline 8-10 gameplay-mechanics A Big thumbs up.
Dardragon83;-;Amazing game, even if I get lost in the map quite often, way too big :)
nexustron;-;You know these like games. ONCE IN LIFETIME. There are not many games as great as Skyrim. For my opinion one of the best games ever will be made. The story is a bit seen though but because great Skyrim is famous for it's mods the story will be more interesting after a few mods installed. Graphics are just great. Actually they keep me speechless mostly. And of course bugs, they are the balancing thing between the bloody combat, magic, sthealthiness and travelling. They make this game interesting. I mean that players sometimes even seem to look for the bugs. but as I said in the start ONCE IN LIFETIME. Great game. with 0(worst) - 10(best) i would give 9
Shirt;-;An amazing game, can only get bored when you're stuck in dungeons, make sure you learned Clairvoyance! Pros: -Many factions you can join -Great main storyline -Great side quests storylines -Amazing graphics -A lot of weapons you can choose from -A lot of magic spells you can learn -Mod-friendly -Just... everything Cons: -Some of the voices are annoying as  -When changing tabs, double cursor happens (fixed using OneTweak mod) 95/100 from me.
RuthlessCabbage;-;A massively epic RPG that is worthy of the Elder Scrolls name. Nails immersion, and makes you feel like you're present in the beautiful, and acutely detailed Tamriel. Has tons of quests and secondary missions that will keep you busy for days, and if you eventually finish everything this game has to offer, you could always download new, custom made missions and maps from the Steam Workshop. If you don't have this, you're missing out. Best RPG of 2011.
Pantsless Aaron;-;This game is a gift to gamers who enjoy exploring and being a badass. You will do PLENTY of both. I'm 100 hours in, and I feel like I haven't even really scratched the surface of what there is to see and do in this game.
MemPhiZ ZX - #BackToWitcher3;-;Caution: say goodbye to your social life if you're planning to play this game. XD
Sir.Cupcakers;-;I was mollested by things I didnt know even exist. 11/10
Stoical Ronin;-;What more is there to say? This is one of the Ultimate RPG Experiences available anywhere. This title is very mod friendly and the choices as such are vast. Highly-highly reccomended!!!
Legalize Weed?;-;Skyrim Is a open world game fill with adventure and places to explore there also many fun mods that add alot to the game you should not wait to buy this one!
Shimunogora;-;arrow in knee 8.5/10
Saiyamoto;-;Skyrim has to be one of the most epic (and I mean that in large proportions as well as completely awesome) games that I have ever played. There is a deep sense of immersion to be found, hours upon hours of gameplay (especially if you create multiple characters) and a near endless supply of awesome mods to keep you going. Only things I don't like: Buggy as I'll get out, although not unplayably so. Just ask someone about the horses. Dragon Combat is a bit lacking The Sneak skill is freaking BROKEN you can one shot bosses if you aren't on the harder difficulties Lets fight even MORE Dragur! Also, PLEASE get a DLC, at least one, and Hearthfire doesn't count. They are both good, get one, get both, heck get Legendary Edition if you want and have them ALL, but please get one of them. They add so much to the game. All in all, I'd say 9/10. Great game :D
Yuanqing;-;It certainly is dumbing down compared with Oblivion and especially Morrowind, but it's great if you don't want to use intelligence and just want to have fun. Use an Xbox controller for the best experience.
oddlike7;-;Perhaps one of the best games of all time.
LISACHRIS<3;-;It is a good game, get mods like batman armor, don't be a commie.
||TXIC||;-;in' perfection right here...
GingerPrincess;-;Love! Definitely recommend. I love just how customizeable the story is for anyone. You can make the story unique to your character. The great thing about the game is that you make the choices to shape the story. The graphics are beautiful and the map is huge and diverse, ranging from icy barren tundras to lush pine forests to the open ocean, which adds to the atmosphere. Loads of quests and storylines ensure that you'll never be bored or find yourself with nothing to do in the game; it has lots of replay value. The only thing to be wary of are the various bugs. Most of them are an easy fix but a few can cause you to have to start the entire game over, which can be frustrating once you've logged in a lot of time with one character. Overall, great game, and would definitely suggest for any fantasy buff. :)
Avidit (Red_wolf1998);-;Gahd dammit, I have edited this THIRCE now, due to restarting Morrowind, getting a shot of nostaliga, and thinking that it was marginally better than Skyrim. Long story short, Bethesda did a very good jobon Skyrim, and made quite a few IMPROVMENTS to Morrowind. 10/10 I SHALL STOP EDITING THIS NOW!
beanz;-;Excellent game for when you want your own personal game time. Plenty of quests for when you want to make progress on storylines. But just as enjoyable if you want to just chillax and explore. The latest patches go a long way but highly recommend the unofficial patches to fix some left over minor bugs. The workshop and nexus have excellent mods to customise the base game into a version you enjoy. If you found something annoying in the game, likely someone else did too and already created a mod for it.
[STM]Phatsnake;-;Note: My experience may vary from yours since I was running 70+ mods, some of which altered companion AI, voiced dialogue, graphics, etc. This review is directed at players who never played The Elder Scrolls before and have little experience with fantasy RPGs. Skyrim is one of the greatest western RPGs of this generation but I'm convinced that it's not for everyone. If you're not sure if this is the right game for you, then ask yourself the following questions: 1. Do you enjoy playing in a fantasy setting similar to Lord of the Rings that includes magic, Orcs, Elves, demons, etc. ? 2. Do you enjoy lore? That includes paying attention to the dialogue, considering the impact of your choices on the main story and possibly even reading many pages of text? (the last one is optional) 3. Do you enjoy exploring dungeons? It involves enemies, simple puzzles and loot that may include gear or ability upgrades. 4. Do you enjoy playing a single player experience in a vast open world with only AI to interact with? MMO players often find the game too quiet and lonely. 5. Do you enjoy embarking on hundreds of side quests? I know a number of people who were distracted by the side quests and eventually forgot what the main story was about and unfortunately quit. 6. (Optional) Do you enjoy endless modding possibilities? Skyrim has the biggest modding community on the internet and the things you can change range from absurd to epic. Please note that excessive modding can make your game very unstable and even render it unplayable if you're not very careful. I spent days preparing a list of cohesive mods then I installed and uninstalled them a number of times and troubleshooted multiple problems to make them work. The process can very tedious but the results are completely worth it. If your answer to all the above questions is Yes, then I would recommend that you get Skyrim. A number of my friends quit the game within a few days because they got distracted by side quests and forgot the goal of the main story. If you're like them then I recommend that you beat the main campaign first. You'll have all the time in the world after that for the various quests, factions and DLCs. Bethesda's take on the various playable races and their designs is very different from the likes of Lord of the Rings and Warcraft. Do not expect to see skimpy armors or fair elves. The game has a considerable number of bugs. Nothing that would ruin your experience but expect the occasional glitch or crash to happen. I recommend saving every often. Fallout 3 or NV fan? You will feel right at home. Just replace the guns with swords and magic and the post apocalyptic wasteland with a fantasy setting.
The Asgardian;-;Fantastic game! Gamers who enjoy a continuous story and plenty amounts of side missions and quests filled with magic, dragons and old fashioned combat, will be more satisfied than having a fap on a sunday morning. Great graphics, great gameplay, great storyline. Not much else can be said apart from it being MASSIVELY ADDICTIVE!
JustGamer;-;Really the best game i played!! It's RPG,lot of gameplay,dragons,wild animals,guards,you can be a thief,assassins,with dlcs u can be vampire lord... Worth any euros,dollars etc.! I play it all the time (when i'm on PC) and it's really awesome! I don't know what to write 'cuz i already tell u :D AWESOME ~ with one word! +Awesome gameplay +graphic +dlcs are awesome +Map (villages,castles...) +Sound VERY VERY HIGH RECOMMEND THAT GAME!!!!
Tricky;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, so much to say about this game. I will try to keep it short.  = Poor  = Fair  = Good  = Nice  = Awesome  = Amazing  This game is without a doubt the best, and I mean, the best game I have ever played. In all its beauty, Skyrim brings you all your heart could possibly desire. You can practically be anything you want and the options are endless. Customize your characher like there is no tomorrow. If you want to explore, this is the game. If you want to fight endless ammounts of bad guys and monsters, this is the game. If you want a variety of different combat styles, this is the game. You get to do all that in the most beautiful universe, and I assure you, that you will play no other game that has the same extrodinary nature like Skyrim. Even if you aren't the biggest fan of singleplayerbased games, this game will catch your attention right away. This is a true beauty. ing fantastic!
Death To Islam;-;Very fun game, and very addicting.
Sexy Stalin;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a wonderfully immersive and detailed game. There are so many choices available to the player, from exploring dungeons to getting married. The game is just so amazing, especially when you replace 90 percent of Bethesda's own content and replace it with custom content. 10/10 Would bang.
frozen.Grimmjow #Legend;-;EPIC RPG! Must have it!
Enthusiastic_Penguin;-;"The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim" is an amazing, enticing open world with vast quanities of things to do. Whether it be fighting off Legendary dragons or delving deep into the ancient Dwemer ruins, it is impossible to get bored. The music is exhilarating and triumphant, the gameplay is stupendous, the languages within the game are linguistically beautiful and you feel like the characters are one with your family. After indulging for hours on end playing this game, you'll find your self-impowerment increasing and you will feel like the Dovakhiin, or, Dragonborn. The soul of a warrior... (I recomend playing at an "Adept" or "Legendary" game difficulty or the game will seem a bit slow) -Enthusiastic
Terpor;-;First Person Role Playing Game with decent story and gameplay, yes.
Murderotica;-;I really enjoyed this game.
Dylan McKenzie;-;Well I got to start reveiwing at some point the game may be a few years old but it is still fun to play the exploring a huge facter is the mods the modding community has really kept this game alive it makes every thing from Bunny follower to just funny swords like a giant popsical it has apsects of a mmo like the role playing mounted combat the freedom you have getting married oh then getting divorced Freedom right? xD crafting is fun even better with mods when you can crafy stuff like Spartan armour assasins creed armour, even a Darth vader helmet the game is endless of what you can do if you put your mind to it like I even a pregnant Npc mod O_O as I said it is endless in what you can do :)
vynle;-;Bum bum bum bum badadadum. If there was a game that would ruin your life with the same effects as crack then this would be beat only by World of Warcraft. When you buy a game twice just so you can mod it you know you have a problem that can only be dealt with by years of expensive therapy. Don't waste your money on that, however buy more video games to escape those problems. This game will make you question many things. Things like why can horses climb up walls? Or, why do dragons land just so you can kill them? It is a very thought provoking game. I plan to write all future essays that I have to write on this game and minecraft. Buy this game so you can be like me!
DC| Revenga;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim.. More than Oblivion,less than Morrowind but stop! It's likely to Morrowind! I bet it! There're lots of exciting quests there,lots places to discover,books to read and stories to be listened to. Yes,some guilds hasn't as unexpectable Q-endings as Morrowind's had. But, anyway, if you're fond of The Elder Scrolls you should try it now! P.S. There're lots of interesting things in the game as it is but you can download plenty diffirent modifications though!
lordeagleman2000;-;THIS GAME IS AMAZING, this game is all you will ever play for weeks there is sooooooooo much to do and you will never reach the end in under 500 hours it is worth every penny and more.
TheEagle;-;I used to be an adventurer like you Then I wasted time not playing this game
Art-;-;Join the world of Skyrim and become anything you want and kill anything you want ! Dragon, Orc, Vampire, Elf, Wizzard, Human (etc.) be or kill, the chose is yours One of the rare games where the side quests are as exciting as the Main Quest
Machuga (I'm Back);-;This game is perhaps one of the most comprehensive, vast, and expansive games I have ever played. Throughout my journey through the world of Skyrim, searching through nordic wastelands, crawling through massive dungeons, and completing wonderful questlines, I felt utterly involved, and absorbed into the game. This is a game I very happily paid $60 for, and would highly reccomend it to anyone who's played an RPG similar to this in the past, or even just people who haven't, but would like to know what the epitome of an RPG may be. This has been my favorite game to play through, and I don't regret a second of gameplay.
Malaka Stevenson;-;FUS RO DAH. That's it.
Baragwin;-;Thank you Bethesda, thank you Valve, thank you Gabe. Without you I would have never imagined that you could pay for mods. So  you, your platform and you ing games. And Skyrim is meh btw. Better find yourself some Morrowind, not on Steam of course. Update: Valve decided to remove paid mods from the workshop. And even though we won, we should never forget that this happened, and we should never forgive them for trying to do so.
Fools;-;Microtransactions are not the way forward. Paid Mods might be viable - but Mod creators should get more credit for their work.
Vali Stali;-;THE BEST GAME I EVER HAD ! I'ts full of glitches, graphics are bad, but the gameplay is epic! I play it since 2013 and I stil love it!
Delta;-;We should have acted. It has already started. The April Fools told of their price. The prank, was merely a warning. Until the time after the paid mods started. When the modding community would spill their own blood. But no one wanted to believe. Believe that VALVe was behind it. And when the truth finally dawned... It dawned in fire! But! There is one they fear. In their tongue, they are nahlimaar! The community! 0/10
Games And Delphoxes;-;Hit a deer while on my horse, Deer flew off into the distance. 11/10
Xuw ~;-;Ehm so I have to write a report.. Errr, well done.. Whoever made this game? System and gameplay is so much in depth, more when you like something and suddenly you discover it has more "features" if you look deeper. I know it's blah blah blah but that how I found this system xD Storyline is one of the best! 50h isn't enough to finish the story.. Well, not for me specially when you give me RPG to play. Lel. Graphics.. Even though I'm running the game on Ultra with very nice and smooth fps, I had to downloaded the HighTextures and other graphics enhancment mods so I'd enjoy my moment in-game .. Jungle xD This game is sick! I couldn't drop it for a little so i'd finish Persona Q .. Which I just played the first 15min T.T Best of luck lol.
h4pZ;-;Awesome mod platform
Terixx_;-;11/10 would skyrim again. Mod support, an immersive world, amazing soundtrack, and an amazing addition to the elder scrolls series. Everytime I start playing this game I find something more to do in the world.
Lord Fapulet;-;Couldnt fap hard enough.... 10/10
_BAKLA}|{AN_;-;Action RPG   !     RPG    .
Miles Edgeworth;-;Paid Mods. I can't wait till this  hits GMOD.
DukeSkath;-;The best RPG ever made. The story's not amazing, but the gameplay and the vast open world is worth exploring (and it's fun to do so). Skill trees are intuitive, dialogue is quick, and the quests are plentiful. I have played it for over 1,000 hours. Truly glorious.
talking_goat;-;I honestly don't think this little negative review will change anything but if I can add a little bit of volume to the raging sea right now, I will. Add a "donate" button and make it huge on the page. Make sure people know modders work hard and they like doing it. Don't add a pay wall for things that should be free. Christ.
Mean Jelly Bean;-;Vanilla Game 8/10 game with mods 11/10 game with payed mods -2/10
Yasaur;-;Not cool Gabe, not cool.
Ri Skye;-;Paid mods. Not much else to say. Any dev this greedy, who is supported by free mods and then takes a 75% cut doesn't deserve any sort of positive feedback. It's just wrong. Everything about it is wrong. It takes more and more freedom away from players and gives more and more money to developers. All this is is DLC, something which we have way to much of already. Skyrim, and many games, specifically Valve games were supported, or even built off of mods. There was no money involved, only user collaboration. They didn't do it for the money, they did it for the game. And Steam/Bethesda still made money by the continued selling of the game, due to the mods. TF2, Counter Strike, and many other games have been built off of free mods. No money was ever involved, until Valve bought the mod and turned it into an actual game. Introducing money into this system doesn't make it better. Better mods won't come form this. It's going to reduce quality of mods. More and more cheap little things are going to show up, that aren't worth much but still charge for it, as people quickly try to make a quick profit. Free mods will be stolen and put up. It's also going to reduce collaboration. Lots of big mods have come from the community working together. But, get money involved and that is going to shut down. They're not going to want to share the profits. Greed will take over and the modding community will be damaged. Don't let this spread. Don't give Valve or Bethesda any money from this. Skyrim is a great game, just don't buy it until they fix this. Without free mods, Skyrim is nothing.
Ordinator No1416;-;It is one of the best games I have played, paid mods however is a big no no as the game requires them to be fun.
Waffen SS;-;alright. valve is now get DLC unpaid labor workers :D
Locust;-;paying for mods lmao todd howard strikes again
[RIG]L-GPP Adyu_Gen Kyrill;-;In my mind the game is a masterpiece, the game looks amazing, and is in my mind very well made, as for the storyline, I adore it. There are of course a few minor things in the game, for example the horses, they move very weird and they are quite slow compared to walking. The game itself is a fantastic experience with superb gameplay, beautiful graphics, and majestic music. The fun part is you can get mods installed easily on the game through the workshop on steam, its fun to mod the game with several mods and make it after your own liking. The game over all gets a 9.5 out of 10, as its a superb and amazing game with a fantastic storyline.
Ivey;-;Mods are great, but not when used as a form of microtransation
cento;-;Great game and community until Valve came in and destroyed the modding community with paid mods. I do not support this!
COWonCRACK;-;paid mods have ruined this game
Gastroid;-;While a decent game in and of itself, the modding community is the reason why this game is still relevant to this day. They were able to elevate the game by an absurd standard, and unfortunately the current practices by Valve and supported by Bethesda are working to undue that standard. I cannot support the current paid modding situation, and it reflects poorly on the industry and on Valve that the monetization of goodwill has come this far.
hidden-predator;-;I used to like this game like you, then I took paid mods to my steam account
megalomike7;-;As the original mongers of Horse Armor, which has brought us to the nickel and diming of DLC today, I must express my utter disappointment with Bethesda. Now they have sent us spiraling down another dark age of gaming, putting mods behind paywalls. Many of these mods FIX their game, which was never truly fixed by themselves. Do yourself, and gaming, a favor. Do not buy this game.
Fredamonkeyz;-;While the game itself is amazing, both Bethesda and Valve are implementing changes to the previously all-free mod environment that could lead to mods we all use and love pay to download, so until this has changed, I must give a negative rating.
Temperate;-;I've always had fun with Skyrim. I've never been unhappy with it. Until recently, when Valve decided mods should be paid for. Now the game's ruined. Mods kept it so replayable, so full of life. That's been destroyed now. Until the Steam Workshop will be restored into its original state, avoid at all costs. Same goes for my review, I will not recommend it anymore until they fix it.
Only2morrow;-;Paid Mods? No thank you.
LISACHRIS<3;-;It is a good game, get mods like batman armor, don't be a commie.
...;-;I absolutely enjoyed every minute spent in this game - mostly free roaming and unwittingly finding side quests. Strongly recommended. My personal top 10 of all times.
Nibbles80;-;Great Game 11/10
KURWA;-;I've modded this game for 3years. As vanilla maybe not that good, but when you start modding it, even the graphics look beast. This game + all of ultimate  mods = (   ) Shout out to Loverslab modders, keep up the "hard" work (   )
||TXIC||;-;in' perfection right here...
Tricky;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, so much to say about this game. I will try to keep it short.  = Poor  = Fair  = Good  = Nice  = Awesome  = Amazing  This game is without a doubt the best, and I mean, the best game I have ever played. In all its beauty, Skyrim brings you all your heart could possibly desire. You can practically be anything you want and the options are endless. Customize your characher like there is no tomorrow. If you want to explore, this is the game. If you want to fight endless ammounts of bad guys and monsters, this is the game. If you want a variety of different combat styles, this is the game. You get to do all that in the most beautiful universe, and I assure you, that you will play no other game that has the same extrodinary nature like Skyrim. Even if you aren't the biggest fan of singleplayerbased games, this game will catch your attention right away. This is a true beauty. ing fantastic!
JohnGotti;-;Well i think we cant say enything new about Skyrim. This game is just awesome in alot of ways, The thing i rly like is that u can change views from 3th to 1st person eny time u desire. I recommend this game for enyone who is looking for exitement in an rpg game. U will get pulled from one story to the other all while exploring this vast and wonderfull world (nicely polished) The only small thing i can find is the fact that there is no Online-Multi co-op option, but then i guess thats where Eso will fill in the blanks. 9-10 sound(track) 9-10 storyline 8-10 gameplay-mechanics A Big thumbs up.
Dardragon83;-;Amazing game, even if I get lost in the map quite often, way too big :)
CptCouch;-;You don't get to charge people for fixing your boken game, Bethesda.
Shara;-;Would be better if it had guns
Potato Salad;-;I'm writing this due to the introduction of paid mods for Skyrim. Don't get me wrong, the game itself is absolutely amazing, even more so when you add some free mods into the mix, but what Valve and Bethesda did was absolutely unforgiveable. I renounce Gabe Newell as my idol, and I never had any faith in Bethesda to begin with.
Major_Jackazz;-;not buying the next elder scrolls game if paid mods continues.
Immunity;-;Paid mods ruined the game.
liamjf;-;This game is fantastic in every way. Sure there are plenty of bugs, and the graphics are looking a little dated by now. But do you know what helped alleviate all of those issues? Mods. Mods have extended this games lifetime for years. And now Valve wants you to pay for those mods. I'm sorry, but that just doesn't sit right with me. Fantastic game let down by scummy practices.
Hunterbuzz;-;Having to Pay for Mods.
Chinatsu Yoshikawa;-;Valve are the greediest people ever.
GEOMAC;-;There once was an openworld rpg/adventure game which was great. The greatness of this game was only furthered by the the open platform of modding provided by the pc gaming. The modders were a generous group of community members who worked diligently to add more content and enhance not only their gaming experience, but the gaming experience of the community which in turn supported them through donations according to the communities will. However, GREEDY  ERS AT VALVE AND BETHESDA DECIDED TO MONETISE EVERYTHING; therefore, the community and the game will fall until order is restored. Vote with your wallet players.
Hanako (The Disarming Girl);-;I got a one week ban for saying how  the paid mods are 0/10
Saber;-;i dun wan pay money for mods, pls and thank
Valannor;-;In Oblivion, Bethesda was selling horse armor as a DLC. In Skyrim, they sell horse genitalia textures as a mod. I can't wait to see what's next.
xX$wAgNoSc0p420B1az1nXx;-;Never going to pay for mods
Dovahbear;-;This was the best game in human history, until the paid mods were introduced. Now, it has been . Never, never did I think that Bethesda would go down the path that EA blazed. I will not buy any more games from Bethesda or through Steam until the paid mod program is taken down.
cbeat;-;Vanilla Skyrim: 7/10. Skyrim with mods: 11/10. Skyrim after paid mods: 0/10. Seriously though valve, I have spent hours upon days at times trying to get 200 or 300 mods to work at the same time, and I know some people who can't seem to get 40 working properly.. who is going to PAY for mods that do not work with each other? How will they know if this and that are not going to break and they are left with nothing and wasted cash? You have no idea what you're getting yourself into with paid mods and you provide no quality assurance that these mods are worth the money being charged or that they wont break with other mods being purchased, its not like DOTA2 or TF2 where all your pretty hats are smooth sailing and easy money, no valve this is hard work you're charging us money to do here, the consumer, and you're taking a ton from the modder which i would rather donate directly to him for his hard work if i deem so necessary on a very old game like skyrim that would have been dead if it were not for free mods by modders.
Molecularbioguy;-;Before mods: 7/10 With mods: 11/10 After introduction of paid mods: 0/10 would not play again.
harleyJadevidson;-;"You can do anything!" You can't do anything "But mods!" Paid mods. "But DLC!" Half  shit that is only half as good as mods. What am I trying to say here, you may ask? What i'm trying to say is, the game Skyrim, is no good. It's just a big ol mess of bad game. But don't take my word for it, I mean, I did play it for 190 hours. "But if it's so bad why did you play it so long?!" Because I wanted cards. Because yes, mods were fun, before the current mod workshop situation. Because for awhile, I was able to delude myself into thinking I might enjoy the game. And yes, for a small time, maybe early on, I did. And then I kept playing, and it faded. I stopped enjoying it, and just wanted to finish it. Sure i'd toss in a new mod every now and then, having to reset, but that just spiced it up a little. The only joy I have now from this game is telling you, the other consumers, to NOT buy this game. Do not support it, do not support it's creators. It's just not worth it.
Goml Ramsay;-;Paid mods are probably the worst thing to happen for this. Donations can go a long way.
Babbums;-;Mods being priced.
Tetragrammaton;-;Worst game I've ever played. 10/10.
Pepperino;-;theres funny knee jokes 10/10
Eobard Thawne;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. People can and should support mod creators via donations, and a 'Buy me a coffee!' button on the workshop page would be good, but putting them behind a pay wall is god damn atrocious. Hoping Valve and other responsible parties for this new practice will turn around.
Titler;-;Paid mods are a pretty stupid idea. I love this game and I have thoroughtly enjoyed modding it in the past and I know from first hand experience that modding is not something that should mbe charged for. You are downloading an unknown and potentially game-breaking file made by someone that you don't know you can trust. There is simply so much that can potentially go wrong with paid modding, let alone modding in general. The most popular paid mod, I think the Shadowscale Armor, is a terrible armor mod that I would never use in my game. However, it is really very diffficult to see that quality and features of a mod without using it beforehand. Paid mods are  and while I love Skyrim like so so much, I am going to have to give it a negative vote because of Bethesda and Valve's shenanigans.
Dime;-;I've been on Steam for 10 years. In all this time, I've never been more upset at them than I am now. Keep in mind, I used Steam back when it was a platform that hardly worked.. the friends system was purely cosmetic: it never worked, and you needed someone's account name in order to add them. It was buggy, crashy, resource-intensive and SLOW. I always liked it because it let me avoid having to keep track of CDs and CD keys, which I would end up losing eventually. This is the last straw, though. Valve ruined the very thing that allowed them to thrive: mods. Half-Life was intended to be a very moddable game, and from that they have allowed games like Natural Selection 2, Counter-Strike, Team Fortress, and Left 4 Dead to come into existence. The worst thing about the paid mods is that the creator only gets a 25% cut after the mod sells $400 USD equivalent. The money goes into their Steam Wallet, which cannot be used as regular funds for everyday life. Not to mention you can sell someone else's work as your own, and earn money FROM SOMEONE ELSE'S HARD WORK. This is not only dishonest, it is illegal . This activity forces people who would otherwise make free mods to monetize, because if they don't, then someone else will, and will have control over this intellectual property. Valve opened a can of worms by pulling this stunt. I doubt they'll ever live it down.
(21st Panzer)Erwin Rommel;-;I've played this on Xbox and PC and i might not have alot of hours on here but thats because i dont own it yet but i've played it ALOT on PC and it is alot better on PC I plan to buy the game for PC soon I could spend countless hours on here because of mods but if ALL the modmakers start making us pay for mods then im afraid this game will have lost its touch so until this paid mod conflict is resolved i'm going to have to give a negative review just put a donation button PLEASE
[OCN] Dominant;-;I do not recommend this game.
Genma;-;And this is how customers get screwed once more. Remember DLCs? How they became so widespread in the industry and hurt the enjoyment of many titles? Well now companies like Valve and Bethesda have a great idea; why spend resources doing new stuff when people will do it for them in their free time? Mark my words, paid mods will be the future of gaming, Valve just opened the flood gates to a whole new era of greedy corporativism where games that previously refused to release modding tools, will "magically" see their error and let players form the game's DLC, screwing gamers and modders in the process as they make money. You hated day one DLC? Wait until you hear day one paid mods from "famous" modders.
FortunePaw;-;Turn away from this scam. Skyrim was famous for modability. Now they are putting up mods behind paywalls. Go buy GTA4 or something that support free open modding.
Blitzred;-;In and by itself Skyrim is a good game. However like any game it will get old and repetitive. What has kept me coming back has been a main reason I've constantly returned to Bethseda games: a very vibrant and active modding community. Given a little time after a game's release you could find mods that can tweak and change almost any aspect of the game to customize it to how you wanted it. Over time the mods grow more sophisicated and ones are out overhauling entire aspects of the game or adding quests and areas that rival or exceed even official expansions. Work was shared and expanded on, some modders soley created resources for others while others used them to craft entire graphic overhauls, areas, companions, perk systems, ect. The new update and focus on paid mods already seems to fractured that and raises many headaches. I won't go into it in a review other then to say I'd suggest reading an article put out by forbes, it summerizes it pretty well: http://www.forbes.com/sites/insertcoin/2015/04/24/valves-paid-skyrim-mods-are-a-legal-ethical-and-creative-disaster/ The reason I wouldn't recommend this now is that a mess is going to be swirling around this and there's no way to tell exactly how it will settle. And lets admit it, without the mod scene that grew up the game becomes another decent RPG - good design, fun to play through once or twice and then collects dust, the steam store is full of them for lesser prices. As a last thought its hard to believe this is about helping modders. A 25% cut on sales (for the accountants out there I'm not sure if a dontation would be via what Nexus does would be considered taxable income, but since you're actively selling a product now I'm assuming that this paid system would be) doesn't seem like a good deal. We pay new associates straight out of school a higher cut of production plus a base mininium, and that's with around a 55-60% overhead for a medical office. I doubt the workshop overhead runs that high - just a thought
cocaine_skinned_devil;-;Putting mods behind paywalls is shady ing business.
Sinosia;-;The game is fun to play, but it is lacking in features and interesting content after a while. The mod community is excellent, however, I already bought the game. I shouldn't have to pay indie developers to fix bethesda's game. The whole concept of paid mods is a monumental "F U" to the gaming community.
S.T.E.E.L.N.A.I.L.;-;DIRTY S.C.U.M.B.A.G. FUKKING MONEYHOLIC S.O.B STEAM. YOU MADE H.O.L.Y.S.H.I.T FROM THIS FUKKING GOOD GAME, YOU BYTCH! WHAT'S THE TRUE HELP FOR MODDERS??? WHAT'S THE EASY WAY TO HELP FOR MODDERS??? 25% OF MONEY(50% for bethesda, 25% for steam??? FUKK YOU! CRAZY STEAM!) OR JUST MAKE DONATION BUTTON(100% for modder)??? YOU MAD FUKKING STEAM??? ANSWER ME!!!
haneesh716;-;Not worth w/ paid mods.
Valkia the Gorequeen;-;Due to the recent addition of the Paid Workshop, I can no longer recommend getting into this as a go to game for modding. It's a shame to see a once amazing game slowly start to crumble.
King of the Scrubs Sloth;-;A Scrub Sloth such as myself frowns upon paid mods. Cannot recommend in good conscience.
Khalypso;-;Used to be fun, back when you didn't have to pay for mods.
sinaesthesia;-;Free Mods are the reason the game has had such a long active player base.
Junkie;-;do the right thing valve, undo this mistake
[TS] Hacker;-;Hiding mods behind a paywall is just disgusting! Why not a optional donation button, Valve?
Battle Bunny;-;"Skyrim Workshop Now Supports Paid Mods' Bye Skyrim, Bye Valve.
Hardy;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve.
Eeyk;-;Well i did remove my previous review. The game is fine but the deal between bethesda and Valve not! Think about it what if fallout 4 has microtransaction!?!
TTRedRaider;-;Being charged $1.99 to leave this review. 0/10, never again.
1007jacob;-;Skyrim was my all time favorite game and still is, even before mods i loved it but now with this i'll never be able to look at it in the same way. It's like learning you're favorite author is racist or sexist, it hurts but you will continue reading but you will not suport their new content and you will never be able to look up to them as a rolemodle... LOLOLOLOLOLOLOL F*&% you money w@re$, valve you have sunk down to rockstar/EA/Ubisoft/Nintendo LOW. the sadest part of this is in a month or two we will probally all accept this like we did with google plus on youtube and Valve knows this. another sad thing is skyrims reviews will always be *overwealming positive* so we can't change anything by dislikeing, therfore i really wish there was a poll before hand. The one gameing company i respect has lost by respect. P.S CLUCK YOU MUNEY HWHORDING BUSTARDS GO TO HEEL YOU FAT LASTERDS, I DIZLIK CUZ I'M HIP. Sin-cerely a calm level headed individual, I am now going to spam some random website with #Half Life 3 confirmed, sin-celeray a underage a$$h0le who has no understanding of politics or ethics what so ever. Shrek is life, Shrek is love, it's never all Ogre
Admiral Squid;-;Valve and Bethesda have joined forces to destroy what makes PC gaming the way it is. They have started monetizing MODS made by community members. They try to pass it as modders making money, but what these snakes don't tell you is that they keep 75% of the money, the creator of the content only gets 25%. On top of that, they need to make $100 a month to get paid, if they can't get that, Valve keeps it. This is not only another step in destroying PC gaming, much like DLC, it has ruined what was once a great, friendly modding community. DO NOT BUY THIS GAME IF YOU HAVE ANY CONCIENCE, OR DESIRE TO SEE PC GAMING STAY THE WAY IT IS! A PURCHASE OF THIS GAME IS DIRECTLY FUNDING THE DEATH OF YOUR OWN HOBBY! THERE ARE OTHER WAYS TO PLAY, DO NOT GIVE YOUR MONEY TO VALVE OF BETHESDA,
Nerd | CSGOSWAG.COM;-;best first person shooter horror game ive ever played
AceSound;-;Game is great only the saving is a problem coz it barely autosaves so remember to save heaps Otherwise GAME IS AWESOME coz you can kill bandits and sell their sh*t 8/10
DragonSamurai360;-;Amazing game truly a masterpiece for all of time.
DekonReighn;-;If you have never played. Then what the heck are you waiting for? Just be prepared to become the game. It's all comsuming and probably the best money you will ever spend on an RPG game. It's that good. PC is by far the best way to play it.
Silverclaw The Rattlesnake;-;Great game Great Consept Great Lore Everything a Woodby Lore seeker could ever Dream about, That whid reason Tho Will Likely Murder any Low-Rank Computer it ever whud lay its Sharb nice claws on
RPINerd;-;I don't think there is much to be said about Skyrim that hasn't already. If you were ever a fan of the Elder Scrolls games then you already have Skyrim; if you're not a fan then you probably own Skyrim anyways because it's a fantastic RPG. With the new generation of gaming and the unprecedented popularity of console gaming, Skyrim did suffer from the "Dumbing down" that a lot of cross-platform releases suffer from (wonky console controls, scaled back texture quality, etc.) however, a couple of easy mods sort that right out.
T4O;-;This game is simply AMAZING and it has soul, the art style, music and character models make Skyrim the most spectacular experience so far in terms of a living world to explore. Skyrim is not so much an RPG as it is an "Adventure Simulator."
Zoroark;-;I killed a chicken and the whole village attacked me. 10/10.
Real Soviet Bear;-;First off, it's a great game, it would be stupid to deny it, but if you've had some issues with Morrowind and Oblivion (and even Fallout 3), they haven't been fixed. The animations are still awkward, the combat AI is stiil "fight or flee", without any variation or tactics needed. I don't care about the "main story" as it's a sandbox, but the dialog is abysmal. The balance later in the game crawls into a hole and dies, making the game quite dull the farther you get. And as with any Bethesda title, there are bugs everywhere. But it's still fun to play and when the community starts churning out mods, it's gonna be amazing. As someone who hated Oblivion before it was cool to hate it, I say I had fun with Skyrim. Get it when it's on sale.
Blood_Wraith;-;Fantastic RPG/Action/Adventure game. It's got an ample amount of places to explore and things to do. Theres plenty of quests and sidequests to take on. The game can also be pretty challenging depending on where you are, how powerful you are, etc. You will happily lose 100+ hours into this great game.
uB|Shogun;-;I still killed many innocent people 10/10
GriffyS;-;I love this game, used to play all the other elder scrolls when I was younger on xbox, but then I bought a pc and i realised I needed to rebuy this game. This game is never ending awesomeness if your into rpg and theres hundreds of quests and things to do. If you have a lot of free time I recommend!
[NewN] TechJay;-;The game is fairly fun but if you go down the tank route (heavy armor and 2 handed) then you area basically (almost) invincible. but still its a lot of fun. altough adding a few mods to make the gameplay harder is always nice ;) 10/10
MCArtist;-;One of the best role-playing games I have ever played. Following the footsteps of the previous Elder Scrolls and improving in most aspects of the series, Skyrim has everything you want on a role-playing game. From exploring the world and killing dragons to creating your own house and cooking, the game rarely gets boring as you have a lot to do. Ridiculous amount of quests, gear, cities, landmarks, character builds make the game very enjoyable to play more than once.
NCRex;-;Like a good anal fisting but with dragons. 10/10 IGN
Snake;-;Skyrim is one of those games that have a very poor storyline the truth is that it takes only about an hours to finish skyrim main storyline. And if you play for good storyline dont buy skyrim get a different game. Skyrim is that kind of game where every dungeon will look the same each side quest will be generic and similar, however what makes skyrim a game I will recommend to others is the ability to do what you want as a player. Skyrim allows you to freeroam in a huge open world, as well as ability to mod the game. Modding this game is what it means to play skyrim download 30+ mods and explore endless possibilities. If you like to mess around with games and you wouldnt mind to spend few minutes to understand how to add mods to your game then pick skyrim because I could play this game for days with no sleep as long as I find a good pack of mods. However without the mods this game can only keep one interested for 10hours or so.
BMW's Rule;-;Beautifull game. The story is great. Sooo many weapons/armour to choose and make. The open world is masssive. I have spent 182 Hours on it. Stunning graphics, especially when you mod it. If you are a Elder Scrolls fan, you must add this game to your library! Personally I give it a 10/10.
Leem;-;Its liek far cry 3 with dragons and without guns 10/10
My hips are moving on their own!;-;The game for anyone who haven't delved into the adult section of the internet but still want release, 10/10 need more werewolf barmitzas
Swaggy Defect;-;Dragonborne is a pretty cool guy. He steals souls, and steals things, and doesnt afraid of any bandits.
Gintone;-;Best game I have ever played. You need to make another Elder Scrolls Game
Salaminizer;-;Best character creation sim ever, not only can you tweak almost every detail of your character but you can also try them out for a few hours before you create a new one. I've been told there is an actual story in there and even more quest but my A.D.D. kicks in and I end up just creating a new character. 10/1o would create again
Vyse;-;I love this game and with all the extra workshop and player created content I feel like I'll never finish it.
Dune Drifter;-;good fun - and you can use console commands ;)
zeturk;-;Game of the years !
TheAngelDragon;-;Skyrim is like Pringles. A more serious review: The Elder Scrolls Skyrim is without a doubt, one of the very few games that hooked me on for hours. Very few games achieved that. I've played many games that as much as I loved and enjoyed playing, they couldn't suck me in this black hole where I just can't stop. Skyrim is like Pringles, say you only want one chip, then you want another, and another, in the end you finished the entire can before you know it. As a game, Skyrim's endless number of quests, side stories, NPCs, items, dungeons, random overworld events mean you never run out of things to do, which also means you can never really stop until you tell yourself "I've totally played this for way too long". Skyrim is a first person RPG, a standard not many RPGs follow. Nearly every one I've played is third person or real time, but the first person style makes Skyrim that much more engaging, with combat very skill oriented. You have stats, but it is simplified to only health, stamina and magic, meaning there's no need to fiddle around with crazy amounts of numbers to figure out what are the "best" equipment. Some may disagree and prefer having more stat variety, I say the simplicity means you spend less time looking at your inventory and more time fighting, which is where the fun is. Unlike most other RPGs, if you missed, it's because you missed. Everything based on your skill of aiming. Similarly, if you failed to block, you didn't block in time. All of this makes Skyrim the most action oriented RPG game I've played, something which I find really fun. Fighting is all part of your own skill whilst other RPGs are basically down to just picking the right skills and hoping the RNG will make the enemies miss or for you to land more critical hits. TESV: Skyrim is a black hole. It is Pringles. It is the game that few games achieved to do to me. Suck me in and not let go. For comparison, the other games that did this were: Pokemon Red, The Sims and Metroid Prime. I give TESV: Skyrim a Pringles/10
[9e]SILENT CHEEZ;-;I think this is a very detailed and well put together game. It is worth you money and will give you enjoyment for hours. It is also a good game to mod.
Blackhawk;-;Game developers are so lazy and incompetent that they need to outsource the DLC to the community. End the Paid mods ASAP.
Clovis;-;Category Score Notes Visuals 9 Skyrim is a breathtaking and consistent world that makes you want to walk around just to see what else it has to offer. Open fields, mountains, and dragons flying in the distance truly make you feel as though you've been sucked into the world of the Elder Scrolls. Unfortunately, the occasional but noticeable muddy textures can get in the way of that experience. Story 8 Some quests are mundane and some set you on the path to greatness. The game presents you with many choices, most of which are just different means to the same end, but some of which actually have an impact and will make you think twice. Attentive gamers will find all sorts of hidden stories told through notes, subtle dialogue cues, or even just the way objects are laid out in a certain room. Gameplay 7 Finding the right difficulty setting can be a challenge in itself and some of the skill trees are significantly more powerful than others. Nonetheless, there is plenty of variety and room for experimentation for how you want to play and plunging a sword through a dragon's head rarely gets old. The world comes especially alive when you avoid fast-travel. Sound 10 Jeremy Soul's four-hour soundtrack adds a layer of emotion to your journey through Skyrim that I didn't think possible until I heard that choir of over thirty people singing in the dragon tongue. The music adds suspense, melancholy, and wonder to the world. Towns have their own unique themes as well. Mods 10 Skyrim is a platform for an enormous amount of mods, which has allowed it to remain relevant and popular even years after its release. If you're just interested in prettying up your game, enhancing the vanilla experience, and making the game more immersive, you can do that. But if you'd rather drive the Batmobile to your sex dungeon and battle flying locomotives, you can do that too. Overall 9.3 A fun RPG set in an immersive world with epic music and seemingly endless things to do. Mods transform it from a good game to one of the greatest ever and significantly increases replay value.
Merkz903;-;Great game, especially with free mods!
ETN | Japa;-;This game is awesome! For people who like RPG and dragons, this is one of the must buy games. The greatest part o the game is its system of leveling up and its skill tree that are smartly made by using the character actions as training, and the dungeons are interesting and provide the player a choice to build his own strategic way to do it, according to your character's skill and equipment. The number of items that you can interact with is unbelieveable, just keep in mind that it has some useless itens too. The scenes are greatly made with a lot of details. It worths every penny! But just to be fair there's a point in the game that should've be improved: "The difficult of the puzzles". You won't find any hard logical obstacle to get through, so it's kind an easy game, but still worth playing.
PBGAM3R14;-;Awesome RPG had two of put at least 200 hours on xbox. Even better when you mod it :)
Raven Hawk;-;Valve has destroyed SKYRIM.
BATMAN;-;A decent rpg game with a diverse open world which expose player to numerous challenges,simply to say u feel like ur living in the world of skyrim.
SeaBazz;-;This was the first Elder Scrolls game that I played through all the way,I've never been crazy into TES games. That being said... The base game is enjoyable for a while until the quests get VERY repetitive and tedious. Fetching a weapon from a cave or killing a animal/bandit in a cave stops being fun very quickly and is used very often.The main story quests are decent ,but usually involves the actions mentioned above. The combat is very repetitive and simple.Spells specifically are underwhelming and straightforward. The game seems very simple and stripped down compared to other TES games. To me it's a diamond in the rough. A fairly solid game that saw it's potential realized by the modding scene ,and turned into an incredible game with almost limitless possibilities.
.M.N.P.;-;Really nice game :)
Jeffrey;-;Found A Guy On A inn got drunk together and found myself in a unknown location miles far away. 1.000.000 / 10 Would get drunk again . The game really can be amazing even without mods .This game is the best expierience i have ever had on my life !
fran25;-;Love this game. Over 5700 hours and still fun to play.
Arcaner;-;I wasted all my life playing this game.
TheGeniusPieTrap;-;I spent so many hours modding and enjoying this game definenit must for PC my favorite game, personally.
The Korpsman;-;Paid mods. Yeah. Not much else to say. I still like the game, actually.
-;-;It's one of the best games ever! :-)
Spanky;-;I'm going to be totally chill about this review, but it's safe to say.........THIS IS THE BEST ING  ING GAME EVER OMG OMG OMG OMG OMG AHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH!!!!!!!!!!!! BUY IT NOW OMG OMG OMG OMG OMG OMG
Underoath;-;I'm not a dragon's b*tch like you :) https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ix1dMTj3qXw
yt.com/JaffaParty;-;Classic RPG. Friggen Skyrim. You know what it is. Dragons, magic, arrows in Knee's.. The lot. 9/10
Fliptoe;-;Used to be a wonderful game with a large and vibrant community, then Gabe Newell felt that he was in need off adding to his 1.3 billion dollar net worth and so he exploited these hard working creators by charging for the work they create and taking the vast majority of the profits (75%).  you. Valve "We used to make games, now we make money"
TOG | R.I.P Iwata;-;best game ever with lots of amazing mods . buy it fast
nihiLignator@SHEPARD!!!!;-;Suggestion: Play it on your PC. Endless fun with all sorts of modding & its boundless possibilities.
Qwar;-;Imagine Fallout: New Vegas. Cover it with snow, take out the fire weapons and fill it with medieval ones. Sprinkle it with dragons, other fantasy monsters and horses, and you'll get something not far from Skyrim. Vanilla Skyrim is a good game. It could have been the best game made, but tries to cover such an enormous terrain, such an absurd amount of quests, it necessarily had to end up filled to the brim with bugs, unsolvable quests and various other glitches. Luckily for everybody, Bethesda decided to make this another of the moddable games, resulting in a nearly flawless epic adventure that you can customize to your own tastes. More dragons, no dragons, more quests, more provinces, more spells, more houses to buy or build and call your home. There's pretty much nothing you won't be able to find a mod for. The result is an amazing experience where you can put hundreds of hours with a single character (and not even counting the DLCs) while collecting items, exploring the bazillon dungeons all over Skyrim, comleting quests, or generally exploring the biggest game world I've ever seen. In short, this is as good as a game can be to put your money in.
Electro-BLITZ;-;10/10 This Game never gets old in my scrolls!
Dwarf;-;This game is 100% pure brilliance. If you're the type that likes RPG's (and if you're not it's a good way to start :> ) then this is definitely the game for you. The main story itself is quite good, but the way you can go before you get there, side quests and so forth, is just really really good. You should indulge yourself into this game, this is an amazing piece of art, and the design is just beautiful with and intriguing story. Don't forget that it's PC, and the biggest plus from that is the mod community. There are so many good mods, and mods that will make the game better. Buy it, it is just that great.
Flo Bot;-;Bought Skyrim instead of game with cute little 2D anime girls. I am not a smart man.
Mike Mikelson;-;One of my favorite games to play. It has endless lands to explore, at least it feels that way. I usually get really baked and explore deep down in the caverns getting lots of treasure.. I am the wizard master and I am a thief lord...HERE I AM!!!!
Lumb;-;real life if u do it right
Chaplain Metal;-;Skyrim the game where you can do absolute everything in every class you can think of. Loads and absolute loads of mods to add more stuff like replace all dragons with Thomas the tank engine :D or get fancy armour, weapons, characters from other games to improve your experiance. I would recomend this game for everyone who thinks the souls games are too hard. Think this game is too easy or dull? Tired of the game holding your hand? Try Dark Souls prepare to die edition or Dark souls 2
Frostinberg;-;A very fun game. Please pick this up. However, I would recommend getting Oblivion and Morrowind too before touching this so it doesn't spoil your fun
Flash_Sentry;-;10/10 would have friends.
J0J0M0NKEY;-;Really kool game must play ;3
Twilight Sparkle;-;this game is fun i do not like the fact the main person is about to be de headed but it is a fun rpg has great mods and all kinds of fun stuff that i do not want to ruin for people who want to try it.
boldCactus;-;For a TES game? It's okay. Amazing RPG. Big expansions. Great soundtrack. If you don't mod it until it crashes, you're playing it wrong.
patamau;-;The funny, challenging, stimulating, entertaining and everlasting, first person (or third person if you prefer) fantasy open world role playing game everyone should play (and beat) at least once. Not to mention the active and prolific modding community which is keeping the game up to date with impressive mods, able to push graphics, audio and gaming experience far beyond the original, already huge, capabilities of the vanilla game.
LY;-;It's a great experience to play. ... realistically. beautiful landscapes, immersive music. In my opinion the best game to try if you like the saga or if you are a follower of game with this genre. Skyrim in two words ''simplement magnifique.'' *** Update : As i can see if you keep playing the game hours and hours you would never get bored, plus you can find a lot of great Mods at the workshop to . I keep telling to myself that I should get more free time in my life to immerse myself completely into Skyrim (*O*)
Fedora of Justice;-;Paid mods? Really? Come on now.
Cybourg;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. People can and should support mod creators via donations, and a 'Buy me a coffee!' button on the workshop page would be good, but putting them behind a pay wall is god damn atrocious. Hoping Valve and other responsible parties for this new practice will turn around.
I'm Blue Da Ba Dee Da Ba Die;-;Without mods this game is boring. With paid mods is even worse.
G33LDG;-;Far Cry without guns
uB|Shogun;-;I still killed many innocent people 10/10
GriffyS;-;I love this game, used to play all the other elder scrolls when I was younger on xbox, but then I bought a pc and i realised I needed to rebuy this game. This game is never ending awesomeness if your into rpg and theres hundreds of quests and things to do. If you have a lot of free time I recommend!
[NewN] TechJay;-;The game is fairly fun but if you go down the tank route (heavy armor and 2 handed) then you area basically (almost) invincible. but still its a lot of fun. altough adding a few mods to make the gameplay harder is always nice ;) 10/10
PaniniPig;-;Fixed the mod stuff, so hope we can get it back to 98 :D
FatPanda;-;The best video game I have ever played. It is just so much more than an epic, fantasy, rpg; it is an expierence. It is incredible, just buy it now.
noname;-;This is the first Elder Scrolls I've really gotten in to. I'm not sure what about it grabbed me, but it bit hard, and is just now *starting* to let go, some 160 hours in. Seriously worth whatever you pay for it.
Prezadant Trump;-;While the base game is good, mods were the lifeblood of this game. Sadly, some have been put behind a paywall which greatly diminishes the value of this game. Would not recommend.
[FP] Eiso's In Canada;-;Well, much like previous Elder Scrolls games (I'm looking at you, Oblivion) the main quest line is very short, and very easy. Fortunately, there's plenty of other questing to be done, and the modding community is amazing, as it always has been. So, yeah, great (if a bit easy) content, great modding community, great game. Except for the guards bringing up knee arrows, but there's a mod to fix that!
DAN FTW;-;Everyone knows this is the best game ever made and if you think otherwise then you are wrong. This is an open world action RPG, It is my favourite game by far and only the next sequel can ever top it. You start off as a prisoner who's about to be beheaded, from there you create your character from a variety of different races (human or beast) There is endless customization with what you can create and how realistic you character will look if you use mods, you don't have to because without this will still be your favourite game experience ever, but i don't see why not because it's simple to download mods from the nexus with just a few clicks and if you don't want to do that then you can easily browse the workshop from your library and install mods with a click of a button, that's what has kept this game so fun for so long and it will never get boring or old. There's various factions throughout the game you can join and become leader of, you can even become a werewolf or a vampire, the characters are all unique and loveable and you can have followers and even get married to your favourite ones, You can craft armor and weapons, enchant them, upgrade them, you can create potions, you can have your own home in this game, you level up and gain skill points to build the type of character you want, you can make a perk legendary when it get's to 100 so you level endlessely, there's always a rewarding amount of loot in each cave or dungeon you clear, i could go on forever, even just standing in the town enjoying the view of the lake is enjoyable in this game! The possibilitys with this game because of mods are endless, there's no need in other games when this game has EVERYTHING you could think of Seriously you have to buy it, if you want a game you will never get bored of, be easy to go back to whenever you want, never 100% complete because there's to much to do, then buy Skyrim
Nano;-;This is my form of protest against paid mods. Until Bethesda/Valve remove paid mods this review will stay the same. Edit: Even though they have removed paid mods, Ill be a  and leave my review as negative so that they dont forget.
Zoombie-tfw 2+ weeks no interweb;-;(USER WAS BANNED FOR THIS REVIEW) At least Gabe rolled back paid mods, but i'm keeping this as a reminder of that one time I got community banned.
JeSeTeR;-;The game was fun, but sadly since Valve released the paid mods, I could not recommend this game to anyone...
~Froz3n;-;spend my time in skyrim to modding my char and overhaul landscapes.
SrSecreto;-;There is nothing I can say about this game that hasnt been said yet. Just get it already if you havent!
Astral;-;One of the rare sequels that manages to live up to its title and it goes way beyond that. You have to see it in order to believe it: massive open world, tons of things to do, magic, politics, bandits, monsters, dragons you name it. On the other hand you have the Creation Kit and a friendly modding community. There is no doubt in my mind that The Elder Scrolls Skyrim is one of the best games ever created.
Trust Me, I'm the Doctor;-;First, let me start off by saying that I have 750+ hours on this game. I started on my Xbox 360 long ago, bought it on steam once I joined the glorious PC master race, and migrated my saves with a flash drive. And then I said, "Screw that", and started all over again. Anyway, let's get into this incredible game I wasted so many hours of my life on. GRAPHICS: It all depends on your specs, and if you mod it. -Low Resolution, no mods: It's essentially a large N64 game, polygons EVERYWHERE. -Med Resolution, no mods: Looks very good, water and shadows are rought, and large models may repeat patterns, but still looks great. -High Resolution, no mods: Probably the most beautiful game you'll ever see, if you have the capabilities to run it. Everything looks great, the water, shadows, trees, even that angry Nord hitting you in the face with a battleaxe. -High Resolution, with mods: Naked people,  arrows, and bondage slaves everywhere. Be careful with skyrim mods, with resolution packs, the game looks incredibly lifelike, but theres some... strange ones out there (MLP: Friendship is Murder Mod Pack) -Graphics: 10/10 (It all depends on your specs) Story: The great thing about Skyrim is that, while the main quest is short, and fairly easy to complete, theres an INSANE amount of quests and alternate storylines! It goes from delivering a sword literally 100 feet away from where you're standing, to stopping a midget symbolic representation from getting beaten up by a normal sized symbolic representation, to waking up after getting black-out drunk with a god and fondling a religious statue, to SO MUCH MORE. And with all the radiant quests and random encounters, you'll never finish it all. Storyline/Quests: 9/10 (A lot of them repeat) AI/NPCs: Whoo, boy. This is where Skyrim (And really almost all Bethesda/Zenimax games) meet some kind of downfall. Updates have fixed them a lot since the release, but many, MANY times has a follower died because they walked straight into my own spell/sword swing, or repeated the same line over and over, or got stuck. Recently, it's been much better, but its still not very good. The characters themselves, however, are all very good. They all have backstories, and motives, and are all unique. AI/NPCS: 7.5/10 Lore: Theres hundreds of books, and character dialogue, and quests all to tell you the story of Tamriel and individual characters. The tiniest things have their own mention. Even if you've never played a single Elder Scrolls game before this, you'll pick it up easily. But, that being said, it can be overwhelming when you first start, and everything revolves around past lore. Lore: 9/10 Overview: Pros: -Great graphics -Good combat system -Skill trees let you become whatever you want -Story is incredible -Nearly no end to the amount of quests -Easy to mod, and a massive modding community -Hail Sithis Cons: -ING AI -High specs needed to run at full potential -Mods and DLC can be wonky with existing saves -No lollygaggin' Overview: 9/10 What, did someone steal your sweetroll?
Worthmore;-;turning mods into dlc one developer at a time
Blackhawk;-;Game developers are so lazy and incompetent that they need to outsource the DLC to the community. End the Paid mods ASAP.
Clovis;-;Category Score Notes Visuals 9 Skyrim is a breathtaking and consistent world that makes you want to walk around just to see what else it has to offer. Open fields, mountains, and dragons flying in the distance truly make you feel as though you've been sucked into the world of the Elder Scrolls. Unfortunately, the occasional but noticeable muddy textures can get in the way of that experience. Story 8 Some quests are mundane and some set you on the path to greatness. The game presents you with many choices, most of which are just different means to the same end, but some of which actually have an impact and will make you think twice. Attentive gamers will find all sorts of hidden stories told through notes, subtle dialogue cues, or even just the way objects are laid out in a certain room. Gameplay 7 Finding the right difficulty setting can be a challenge in itself and some of the skill trees are significantly more powerful than others. Nonetheless, there is plenty of variety and room for experimentation for how you want to play and plunging a sword through a dragon's head rarely gets old. The world comes especially alive when you avoid fast-travel. Sound 10 Jeremy Soul's four-hour soundtrack adds a layer of emotion to your journey through Skyrim that I didn't think possible until I heard that choir of over thirty people singing in the dragon tongue. The music adds suspense, melancholy, and wonder to the world. Towns have their own unique themes as well. Mods 10 Skyrim is a platform for an enormous amount of mods, which has allowed it to remain relevant and popular even years after its release. If you're just interested in prettying up your game, enhancing the vanilla experience, and making the game more immersive, you can do that. But if you'd rather drive the Batmobile to your sex dungeon and battle flying locomotives, you can do that too. Overall 9.3 A fun RPG set in an immersive world with epic music and seemingly endless things to do. Mods transform it from a good game to one of the greatest ever and significantly increases replay value.
Merkz903;-;Great game, especially with free mods!
ETN | Japa;-;This game is awesome! For people who like RPG and dragons, this is one of the must buy games. The greatest part o the game is its system of leveling up and its skill tree that are smartly made by using the character actions as training, and the dungeons are interesting and provide the player a choice to build his own strategic way to do it, according to your character's skill and equipment. The number of items that you can interact with is unbelieveable, just keep in mind that it has some useless itens too. The scenes are greatly made with a lot of details. It worths every penny! But just to be fair there's a point in the game that should've be improved: "The difficult of the puzzles". You won't find any hard logical obstacle to get through, so it's kind an easy game, but still worth playing.
PBGAM3R14;-;Awesome RPG had two of put at least 200 hours on xbox. Even better when you mod it :)
Raven Hawk;-;Valve has destroyed SKYRIM.
BATMAN;-;A decent rpg game with a diverse open world which expose player to numerous challenges,simply to say u feel like ur living in the world of skyrim.
SeaBazz;-;This was the first Elder Scrolls game that I played through all the way,I've never been crazy into TES games. That being said... The base game is enjoyable for a while until the quests get VERY repetitive and tedious. Fetching a weapon from a cave or killing a animal/bandit in a cave stops being fun very quickly and is used very often.The main story quests are decent ,but usually involves the actions mentioned above. The combat is very repetitive and simple.Spells specifically are underwhelming and straightforward. The game seems very simple and stripped down compared to other TES games. To me it's a diamond in the rough. A fairly solid game that saw it's potential realized by the modding scene ,and turned into an incredible game with almost limitless possibilities.
.M.N.P.;-;Really nice game :)
Rasta Jaber;-;For the little time i have played this game i have accomplished the following: Nothing apart from killing random people because i keep on getting side tracked from the main quest because the game is just to mlg! I R8 8/8
Grandtia;-;Pay MOD for Single Player? No.
Guero;-;Recently purchased this because I heard there was a large modding community. Soon after I started playing Paid Mods were implimented. I hated it on The Sims, I'll hate paid mods anywhere else. Completely misses the point of mods. I want to be able to improve my game without paying for rediculous DLC that barely adds anything. Now I have to pay for what used to be free? What about a Donation button so we can make sure 100% of the money is going to the person who WORKED for it. Not giving you 75% while you sit there collecting cash doing nothing.
[] No to paid mod;-;As Bethesda and Steam make "Paid mod", mod community is ended. and this "Paid mod" will gonna destroy whole modding culture of whole world gamer should unite to stop this situation or every gamer gonna have another DLC : mods
Starcat;-;Pay for mods I don't think so...
Toortelz;-;This is the one of the best games ever but this frickin paid mods b*llsh*t is freakin me out i hate you valve DONT BUY THIS TILL VALVE ENDS THIS SHI*T .....................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... .............//'...'/`............ ........../'/.../..../......./\.......... ........('(.......... ~/'...'......... .........\.................'...../........ ..........''...\.......... _........... ............\..............( ..............\.............\ STOP THE PAID MODS!!!
Kalimah;-;Modders shouldnt work for free but 75%? We give EA and ubisoft a hardtime for a reason,Valve. The system is terrible,absolutely awful we expected some more thought going into something like this. I would suggest taking the system down and rethinking this. Mods shouldnt be free but if they arent dont rip off the ing modders for their work while giving them no content safety...
Sir Dookface McFerretballs;-;This was a great game, till I had to pay for a modded "Greedy GabeN" to the knee.
Urihater;-;At the moment of writing this I have over 86 hours played in this game and still I'm not even near 50% of completion. Dragons, swords, bows, magic, being the chosen one in a land full of mistery, I mean, what else do you need in a game? The gameplay is perfect, the graphics are gorgeous - except for the ocassional shadow glitch, but nothing you can't fix with a mod -, and it has Steam Workshop for easy mod installation to make it even longer and better and prettier. Each DLC is worth every single cent, because it expands the gameplay A LOT, and by A LOT, take my word, I mean several hours more for you to spend on this game. Even though it has the bugs you can expect in a game developed by Bethesda - and yes, there are lots of bugs and glitches - you DON'T EVEN CARE because THE GAME IS SO ING AWESOME you'll not be paying attention to the bugs. And the best part is there are several unofficial and official patches in the Workshop that actually fix the bugs, so just browsing the Workshop for a few minutes is enough to get rid of them. A giant map, literally thousands of quests to do, skills to master, monsters to kill, books to read, dragons to slay, spells to learn, and places to explore, from dungeons to towns, a lot of replayability - believe me, you won't finish this game with only one character, you will be creating several to choose every single side possible in each conflict and making each choice you can to learn the whole story -, a magnificent lore, and the amount of mods available, make this game - along with its DLCs and expansions - one of the BEST GAMES EVER and a MUST BUY, from casual to hardcore gamers.
EnigmaTNG;-;I personally think this is one of the best open world games I've played so far, aside from Oblivion and Morrowind. Skyrim, to me, seems to be a watered down version of an Elder Scrolls game, but with much better graphics of course. It's fit more for console gamers, but this is still an awesome game, I actually like playing this game with a controller to be honest. If you want a more in depht, complicated Elder Scrolls game, buy Oblivion or Morrowind. I also like the fact that this game has a Steam Workshop where you can download mods for your game to alter your experience, whether it'd be graphics, new hair styles, weapons, quests, just about anything you want to add to your game. Definitely a must have if you're a fan of Open World fantasy games that let you do or go wherever you wish.
whalen147;-;paid mods/10 dont support this BS
zorlag;-;Old and buggy game, now with extra monetization for the makers and distributors? I`d be down for paying very small sums for really good mods, but not to Valve or Bethesda just for sitting back and relaxing. 50% to mod authors would be a start, but preferably more. And of course there is the issue of mod compatibility, which is a killer for anything more complex than art or sound mods. Caveat Emptor indeed. And the stolen mods for sale? Its like some backwater flea market with people taking stuff from other peoples tables and putting it on their own!
MSardi;-;Skyrim used to be the best game around. Then it took Monetized Mods to the knee!!
MylesBennettDyson;-;I have many, many hours in skyrim. This is all because of modding. The base game of skyrim, is booring, empty, lifeless, and lacking character. Now, inorder to use mods, which were and have always been free, you must pay. Avoid this game like the plauge.
Wilhelm II;-;You see those warriors from Hammerfell? Theyve got paid mods. Paid. Mods.
mrbiofan12;-;Its like FarCry without guns!
Dcdan;-;Great game, played it and loved it on xbox (console peasant) when it came out. But paid mods? Sorry Skyrim but I'll have to thumbs you down in the hope that Valve will reconsider.
FnimonSni;-;Fuck happened?
Dark Troll Swagmoner;-;Had over 100 mods installed now i uninstalled the game i support modders but not steam's money-hungry attempts to profit off of someone else's work for a game they dont even own bethesda i love you please see the light
Dr. Scaphandre;-;The game was fantastic and I used to have hours of fun with mod. Keyword: Used to. Now with paid mods a lot of notable modders (Including the guy that made SkyUI, a mod that makes the menus more mouse friendly and is necessary for a lot of other big mods) are charging people for mods when they used to be free. This isn't modding, this is user made DLC, DLC that is possibly going to break the game and isn't compatible with every mod out there. Do not buy this game. Buy Oblivion instead until Valve removes this terrible practice.
QUALITY BUGBEAR;-;Almost unplayable without mods and now they're charging for the mods. At this point, they're revelling in mediocrity. Do not buy this game, and condemn this game if you don't want this kind of scummy practices spread into other games you care about.
El Grande Jefe;-;This is not a very good game as it has bad mods, most mods are bad and they ask for too much money, it is also bad for it's lack of content that the mods are supposed to fill
Vecerate;-;Trying to commercialize mods and modders? Smart, neoliberal move: third party dlc slaves for free. I especially love how much they get from the cake: 25%, only paid out after reaching a ridiculous threshold while outsorcing all license issues (anyone ironman suit mod? have fun with marvel kicking your teeth in), the support for broken stuff ("ask the modder nicely if the mod breaks"...really?) and QA (lel, this 99$ super awesome mod is full of broken scripts and blows up your savegame and gameworld...bad luck!) to those poor sobs. Not talking about poisoning the modding scene. No, thank you. What will be the next step? Blocking Mods from everywhere else except from the workshop? "FALLOUT 4: NOW WITH EXCLUSIVE PRE-RELEASE DLC AND MODS! BUY NOW! BUY NOW! NOOOW!!!!!!" Recommendation? DONT BUY THIS GAME UNLESS YOU WANT TO SUPPORT SUCH A PRACTICE
zamox;-;Paid mods will kill this game and I hope no body pays for any mod....the game is a 10/10, the negative thing is to pay for a mod...
Uncle Fuckin Ruckus;-;This game is fantastic, and is probably the best modern RPG ever made. I am "not recommending" this game ONLY to draw attention to Bethesda/Valve's decision to monetize mods. In short, here's why charging for mods is a bad thing: 1) It exploits/does not fairly compensate indie developers (they only get 25% of sales), who are essentially doing all the work. 2) The system has no measure of quality control, you may buy a mod that is total garbage, breaks the game, or breaks other mods. 3) Someone can very easily steal someones now free mod, and throw it up on the store to make a quick buck. There is virtually nothing to safeguard against this. 4) And perhaps most importantly, paid mods erodes the foundations of a community based on creativity, cooperation, and accessibility. 99.9% of modders got into this as a hobby; it was always a labour of love, about making something for other people to enjoy for free. Hence why many of the True Sons of Modding are staunchly against this change. Vote with your dollar. Don't subsidize the catastrophe that is ESO or pay for Gaben's 15th palatial estate. This is a clear cut case of greed, and basically trying to turn a quick profit off of something that eats away at the heart of the community. #FreeTheWorkshop
A L L I;-;The practice of charging for mods in unacceptable. Anyone and everyone who continues to give Bethesda or Valve any business after this move, or anyone who decides to "wait out the storm" is part of the quickly escalating issue. If you want to save PC gaming at all, uninstall Skyrim, Fallout, and any other Bethesda games. The only way to be heard is to yell with your wallet.
guppalicious;-;Paid mods = . 75% to steam and the company that owes its game's longevity to the creativity and effort of the modders? Add a donate button for the creator if anything at all. Terrible idea.
Nominee;-;This is the first review I've written, and I'm starting to see that it's crucial for players to do their part in providing honest feedback for developers, modders and Valve. That said, here's my review: Go to heII, Skyrim. Uninstalled/10
Chriss;-;Wanna hear a joke? Paid mods. Wanna hear a funnier joke? Valve became as bad as Ubisoft & EA. Wait...these aren't jokes...who's ing with my medicine?? Edit: Apparently i just got banned from the workshop because of this review. Way to go Valve.
Murder  Machine;-;When I originally purchased this game I was under the assumption that, yes, I would be able to purchase DLC, and that is fine, that's the prerogative of the creator of the game and I understand and believe that is fine. But with the addition of the recent "paid for mods" I honestly can say I don't believe I'll be making another purchase of anything related to TES. TES is, at it's heart in the eyes of the PC gaming community, a template. The game itself really is relatively lack luster, go from point A to point B and kill some Draugrs or Bandits along the way. The combat is weak and float-y and the story alongside characters and environments you deal with do not change or react differently when you defeated, what is supposed to be some world-ending dragon coming to destroy everything. But, with the addition of mods that you can download on top of DLC that the games creators have added you can give the game an entirely new perspective and how you want to play it. New schools of magic, new weapons, characters, outfits, entire other games in the series being recreated (Morrowind recreation project specifically) but the thing about those is that they are free, they are from the creators to share with the community. Mod creators are giving lifes blood to a game that, if it didn't have mods, would surely fall to the side of the other games in the PC gaming communities huge repertoire of games and mods to pick from. By charging for mods you are massively decreasing the available to content to a huge amount of people, people that may not HAVE the money to buy DLC, people who just want to play the game from a different perspective, or the infamous adult mods that I'm sure many of you know about. Paying for mods will only be a stake to the heart of the modding community on PC. By paying for mods, you are killing this. I can only hope that valve reconsiders this because it is frankly a very bad move for both Steam's workshop and community mod makers themselves.
Freedom chaser;-;The game itself is great and glorious with mods (try them before all is lost) but it is now the seed of the destruction of pc gaming : PAID MODS! BROTHERS AND SISTERS UNITE AGAINST THE FALL OF OUR MASTER RACE  you paid mods  you bethesda and also the mongrels mod makers who suck the  of bethesda and steam .....................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../.................... _____.......^__^............._____ .............//'...'/`............|...__.....\....|...|............/... ___| ........../'/.../..../......./\..........|...|....\....|....|...|...........|..../ ........('(.......... ~/'...').........|...|.....|...|....|...|...........|...| .........\.................'...../...........|...|__/...|....|...|____....|...\____ ..........''...\.......... _...............|_____./.....\______\....\_____| ............\..............( ..............\.............\
Misha;-;Paid mods and 75% goes to steam. not recommanded.
Darkhobbit;-;+ 9 points for the quality of the game when modded, which is really the only worthy investment of your time. -20 points for the attempt to put dollar signs on the last remaining useful distinction between a computer and a console, that is, the ability to customize your gameplay with third party modifications. Shame on you Valve and Bethesda. Your customers who shell out money for both the base game and the official DLC deserve better than this. If you want more income from this game, release more quality DLC as you have already. It would undoubtedly sell well. The bottom line is that if I didn't already own Skyrim, I wouldn't buy it at all. As with the example of TheCreativeAssembly and their blatant DLC cash-grabs, it is a game that I refuse to play along with.
McSpikeytron;-;Can't endorse this mod paywall rubbish. Uninstalled. Add a donation button fine, take a percentage of donations fine, give some back to the game developer fine. Charging for mods not fine. https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop (Ignore time played, I play offline mostly, probablt gotten 500+hrs no problem)
Random Axe;-;Bought the game for 50 Euro and now they want me to pay another 50 for mods. yay?
Count Leek of Baratheon;-;Paid mods? NO THANKS SAMUEL!
Deltachip;-;Valve wants my money, for stuff they didn't work on.
%&$/$&(#() v2.0;-;You have to pay for the mods.
Okra;-;I like Skyrim ,but the new pay 2 mod troubles me. There are better way to support modding without supporting Valve through it. Go to Nexus and donate to modders through them instead. Steam Workshop pay 2 mods will take advantage of naive gamers and encourage theft of artistic work. DO NOT SUPPORT THIS NEW STUPID THING.
Vibius;-;Logged into Skyrim today, and a couple mods were missing. Now have to pay for them. Thanks E.... STEAM?
EP1CFA1LS;-;Lol, Valve and Bethesda decided to make the Workshop composed of paid mods. GG Ruined my favorite game of 52 hours. Best 52 hours before the paid mods came out. Sadly, I must not recommend this until they remove paid mods.
Jimbles Notronbo;-;paying for mods/10 would not recomend
Doc Irish;-;This game, this wonderful, magnificent game, i can tell you with 100% certainty is probably one of the best games i've ever played. but, i'd sooner go through the hassle of un-installing it from steam, torrenting it from , and using Nexusmods (Which is arguably a better source for modders, and where i get 80% of my mods from anyway) because the good old boys at Valve and Bethesda decided they wanted to make a little extra money on a game that was otherwise not generating any more revenue. Claps for you guys. I urge you Skyrim community, and anybody thinking of buying this game if by the off chance you haven't already, do not support these people. Until they give modders at the very least 90% of the profits (instead of 25%) that they rightfully earn from making such wonderful mods, do not buy this game. What happened to creating for the sake of creation, and enjoyment for others? Otherwise, 10/10 would play this game till the end of time, probably the best game that I have, and will ever play.
FAILED;-;i bought it, but i got a problems when im start it (game's eror),, help me plz
Treantwuver;-;Coming from someone who has never played Elder Scrolls games with the exception of Morrowind (though I didn't complete it), I was expecting this to be the same and just make me lose complete interest after a short while but turns out to be the complete opposite. Bethesda's latest Elder Scrolls game, Skyrim has really gotten me sucked in and having an interest in the franchise. The game was everything that I hoped for back in Morrowind but after its poor tutorial, confusing gameplay, and lack of direction on what to do, I gave up but ever since Skyrims release, Bethesda has addressed and improved beyond my expectations, beforehand and now. Things like the free save system, where you can save whenever you'd like, an enjoyable combat system with various kill animations, third-person mode, the improved questing journal and map tracking, settling and customizing your own house(s) or even just listening to the nordic chants of the fantastic soundtrack, these all add up to the experience. The story plays a fairly big part in any RPG. The rebel Stormcloaks, who are trying to break free from the Empire and be independant from the Imperial Legion, who are in conflict and waging war to determine who will prevail and claim Skyrim as their own. As well as having the infamous Thalmor elves have a neutral alliance with the Imperial Legion, in which nearly destroyed the Empire years ago (a scapegoat). In the middle of all this, dragons have been coming back to life without any explaination and how you need to stop it from happening as the Dragonborn or it will be the end of times with the legendary dragon, Alduin, the main antagonist of the game. While I applaud Bethesda for making such interesting and enjoyable side-storylines across the entire game, without spoilers, the main quests are somewhat disappointing, especially near the end as I felt the conclusion didn't live up to my expectations and felt underwhelmed. I didn't feel like it was a huge accomplishment which is something I really wanted at the end of this especially with Alduin leading the charge. As soon as the game starts, you're thrown right into the storyline with a very intense introduction and will eventually meet various characters along the way who you befriend to aid you along your adventures. NPCs, while they're improved, the guards may be just as generic while some of the other NPCs are unique and different in their own way (other than some shared voices). Learning about their backstory or an issue that we could help them with allows for many ways to approach this game and its interaction. This is an RPG for a reason and because of that, it's very welcome to not only talk with NPCs, but also reading various books and history about the events before AND during Skyrim. There are many things to do in this game, such as lockpicking, crafting, exploring, cooking, or just having some fun with a quest or killing random foes you meet out in the wild. Many other skills such as heavy armor for example, make you tougher and harder to beat down and reducing the weight of your armor (less weight = holding onto more items) when you wear heavy armor with various perks or sneak, which allows you to be more difficult to spot for enemies. You and also gaining various perks to say, do 6x the damage with a one-hander if you attack while sneaking. This can make encounters fun and how you want to deal with enemies throughout the game. Did I mention this game allows you to go at your own pace? Meaning you can approach a quest the way you want to and when you want to. There's no hand-holding here, you do what you want, making this game great for exploration which is hard to resist as you'll never know what you may find, be it a random encounter/event, a rare item/quest, or dungeon for even more loot. Not only that but their are no classes, so you can choose to be whatever you'd like, whether it be someone who relies on sneak and stealth to take out your enemies, the typical heavy armored warrior and fire casting wizard OR why not do a mix of either? You can dual-wield a sword with a magic spell in your off-hand rather than a shield. This lets to decide and choose on how you as the player want to play their character in a way you enjoy it the most. That being said, while the "role-playing" part is indeed fact, the combat is still not as great as many claim it to be. Yes, it has improved animations, it doesn't feel as stiff like it did previously in previous games when you say, swing your sword at the enemy and even has a kill-cam with various kill finishers (which is badass), I find it boring chopwork while watching the enemy health bar slowly get shorter and shorter, then drink potions when my own health goes low. Rinse and repeat. The finishing moves are awesome to look at and make you go: "That was brutal!" but eventually the same finishing moves occur back and forth and it gets old fairly quickly, yes, you'll unlock more the further you get into the game but their isn't a huge variety. Something I'd also like to add as well, while this game is great on its own, the true replayability and survival of this game continuing is simply the mods. The modding community has grown so much and popular with the game that many people have implemented new weapons, armor, mounts, quests, character customization, and even zones into the game. Pure console gamers have no idea what they're missing. Just seeing articles and videos doesn't do the modding community justice. It adds more depth and provides a lot more fun. What the modding community has achieved with Skyrim is downright incredible. Combat overhauls, visual enhancements, immersion mods, entirely new lands, and even UI mods can add so much to the experience. Half second loading times are a bonus. Of course, their are still small bugs/glitches that can occur but are most of the time, easily fixed with a reload. I have about more than 30 mods installed and my game is running smoothly on highest settings. At the end of the day, I feel as though, Bethesda has done an outstanding job and made me an Elder Scrolls fan where the previous games did more or less. Some factors in the previous game I did not like in Morrowind, everything here in Skyrim is so much more polished and well done, it's a lot easier to get into. Skyrim has raised the bar for all other RPGs out there and should not be ignored if you do not have this game yet. Despite the disappointing ending (in my opinion) of the main storyline, I have to say that Dawnguard and Dragonborn are much better, making the game even better since they both add quite a bit of content and storytelling to the game and fleshing out the world even more. If you're looking to getting this game, I recommend you wait for a sale on the Legendary Edition, that way, you get everything in one, and you're set to go. Oh, and you can't forget the mods, it makes the game that much better.
St.Anger [TW];-;free mods!!!!
Lehtikala;-;How about a voluntary donation option for mods, a tip jar ? I am looking at you Patreon.
Dr. Robert Chase;-;I thought it was a good time to review this with the whole "paid mods" debacle going on. The world's just... Bland, I think is the best way to put it. And I think this is part of the problem with the paid mods. The mods did a good job of fixing/altering the world in a way that actually made me want to play this game, and now, having to pay for unofficial content that could very well break outside the 24 hours and all I may get is a "screw you"? No. Take your money, Valve. Be s. Let's face it, you are driving away they people that made this platform great.
Alanthiras;-;Right when you thought it couldn't get any worse with the paid mods and all. I present to you ingame popups that encourages you to buy the premium version of mods: https://archive.is/66fit#selection-661.75-661.354
worry;-;Oh boy, I can't wait to pay for community made mods! Really Valve? What's next, paying for movies on steam? Oh, wait...
Cebearr;-;Mods are not DLC. If you can't make sure your product works, don't charge for it.
L0U1S11;-;Making us pay for something that used to be free is completely ridiculous. It's a great game but I can't recommend it anymore.
h P;-;This game sucks, the company that made it and Valve are rip off merchants that want to charge 29,99 for a mod that adds one apple to one the bench on just one pub in the game! If you want to pay about 1000+ for enugh mods to enjoy the game then feel free to buy this pay to win piece of crap.
Rakarsis;-;Paid mods = going the way of EA = dead game.
Buheheporcodio;-;Fu** paid mods I REPUDIATE GABEN AS LORD AND SAVIOR!
durgah;-;if you are going to get this game get it somewhere besides steam and their mod paywall. Great game and it should be enjoyed but I cannot recommend buying it from Steam.
NotEvenFast;-;I do enjoy this game. Unfortunately, Valve has created an awful system that allows mods to be sold for profit. This destroys one of the key purposes for this game. Game-9/10 Valve policy towards this game-0/10
Spooker;-;Worst game ever from worst publisher ever. Valve and Bethesda decided to rip off fans and modders alike by selling mods on Steam for cash money. The users hate it. The modders hate it. Only con artists that want a quick buck from privatizing collaborative work and Greedy Gabe love it. Shame on Valve! Shame on Bethesda!
Greebogrenk;-;Paid mods will slowly ruin this game and many others in the process. Skyrim is a fanstastic RPG but the business practices of Valve and BSG warrant bad reviews for this game unfortunately in order to hopefully get the paid workshop altered to a donation based system.
Bert;-;Free mods are the most effective engine of product and brand longevity that come at no cost to the developer. What Steam did is repulsive and this was the last straw for me. I don't recommend buying this game, because without mods it's pretty boring and mediocre and with mods is prohibitively expensive.
Drunkenvalley;-;I formerly would've recommended this game. And I might if Paid Mods go away. But if Paid Mods stick around and become popular with any big mods this game is ed. I don't think anyone wants to pay into the game then pay an additional $50 for the experience I want to recommend to them.
Mara's Shadow;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a great game. With an open world a great story I would recomend it to everyone... As long as you don't plan to use mods. But since you have to pay for some mods now, I'd have to say stay far far away from this game. Maybe I'll recommend the game if they return it to its former glory.
Sonwelf;-;Paid mods? . And not only that I can't even play the godamn game because it never stops crashing. Sure, Bethesda can "help" with that but the information doesn't mean  meaning it doesn't help with the crashing.
Davido-kun;-;only s pay for mods ing s  YOU VALVE
ctaco;-;I seriously hope you guys don't play "The Greedy Merchant V: Gibe Monies Pls Edition"
Audioshade;-;Paying for mods? Outrageous!
Rainbow Thaumaturgist;-;Not recommended anymore, buecause the new system allows originally free mods to require a paywall now. Add donate buttons, good devs. Used to love this game, yet core mods like SkyUI are now going to be behind a paywall.
K'eA;-;Probably my favourite RPG of all time. I found it hard to get immersed in Skyrim as the graphics just aren't very good, but then I installed a couple of mods and ENB's, and that totally fixed it.
Sweets;-;This game is ok without mods, although it has a lot of issues and is quite light on content. I had racked up less than 10 hours on the game without mods and completed the main storyline and most of the major secondary storylines in that time. The best part of this game was the mods, when modded this is one of the best games I have ever played and that relied on a passionate and dedicated modding community. Valve and Bethesda have sought to harm both modders and particularly mod users by introducing paid mods, the lions share (at least 75%) of which does not go to the mod authors and instead goes to Steam or Bethesda. These changes will only harm the modding community, which was a thriving and successful community that entirely relied on the sharing of one another's work and cooperating with one another to fix issues. On top of this, neither Valve nor Bethesda will be providing support or quality control for this service. Installing mods has always been fraught with issues, such as compatibility issues with your hardware and other mods, getting around these issues and making mods compatible with one another again relied on a united community that worked together instead of in competition. Without official support or proper quality control, you will have a very limited idea of whether the mod you are purchasing will interfere with another installed mod or cause corruption to your save game (a common occurrence when installing mods). Additionally, these compatibility problems often do not manifest themselves until a certain aspect or area of the game is encountered, which will usually occur after Steam's 24 hour refund period. It took me the course of a couple of weeks to find a mod setup that worked without (much) issue and that time was almost entirely filled with personally testing mod compatibility and seeking fixes to the issues that arrived. If you intend to install more than one or two mods, you will need more than 24 hours to ensure that they work properly.
zorniganz;-;If you wanted to buy this game because you heard of great mods, which give it second life, dont do it. It is now being monetized, micro-transactions are coming and what people have been getting for free over last 3 years is now being put behind paywall. Huge disappointment.
jacksparrowblackbeard;-;I cannot tolerate this bugged paid modding environment.
tarzN;-;+can mod out bugs -Added paid mods. -Content creators get a measily 25% of profit. -sets a terrible precedent for the future of gaming While it is fun once you mod out bugs and add features, the addition of a paywall to have that fun is ludicrous. Valve, stop trying to kill mod communities.
Jardes;-;And so valve saw their many legions of loyal customers, smiled, and  on them from a great height. Introduce a donation system, not this greedy money grabbing scheme.
witty username;-;I'm incredibly disappointed with Valve's decision to sell mods. A wonderful free service turned into a money grab. We're going to be talking about the Video Game Crash of 2015. An industry that never learns. But hey, LODS OF EMONE!!
Sweet Plox;-;I played and loved the game on the playstation. Bought it on steam to get into the modding community. Paid mods will ruin this. I cannot possibly recommend it with mods as paid DLC. Disgraceful.
Jetra;-;Yes, I know there are about ten thousand reviews out there ranging from OMG BEST GAME 10/10 to THIS IS HORRIBLE AND OVERHYPED -100000 OUT OF 10 but I wanted to write this to cleanse my mind and soul from the hatred of the genre that I have held on to for a long while. Anyway, you're more than welcome to skip this unless you want to hear just what I have to say. Firstly, going to gloss over really quickly some things as I played this vanilla, no mods that I'm sure has been said hundreds of time, still necessary if you want an honest opinion. Somewhat glitchy, menu could be re-worked, difficulty rating is all over the place, customization could be better, bugs, BUGS EVERYWHERE. Now that is over with, time to share my thoughts on this game and it was fun, I cannot deny. Personally, I think the pacing was a bit slow, but totally worth it for what it is. The landscape is just so beautiful, it's actually amazing to run around in here instead of fast travelling all over the place. Don't care if the trek is four hours by foot, I can collect some things along the way while I'm at it and probably find a place or two to discover some neat gear. The most amazing part, at least to me, were the dragon fights. This is exactly how I picture epic fights for supremacy. When I hear that Dovahkiin chanting as I'm shooting arrow after arrow at those flying worms, I can't help but feel as if I am a hero destined to rid the world of evil. The story is actually pretty nice, though it kind of tends to speed over here and there which isn't too big of a deal. Hope you love side quests because there are many of them in here. Don't feel like going out to kill things? No problem, collect various materials to do alchemy, enchanting, or some basic crafting. If you are hardcore fan of the game, there is plenty of backstory given to you by various important and not-so-important people, you just need to ask around. In addition, there are hundreds of books that just ooze so much story that it could be collected in a single book itself. This game isn't meant for casual players, though, it's really more geared towards those that just love role-playing, not the leveling aspects, I mean actual, legitamite, you-are-in-this-world belief-it-or-not kind of game that just begs you to check every square inch to find that next quest or maybe some piece of gear that will aid you in your quests to save all of Skyrim. To put this entire game in a few short words: it's just plain exhaustive, simple as that.
texasdean;-;I would have been able to play it IF ONLY THEY DIDN"T PUT FREAKEN SPIDERS IN THERE!!!!
Iosevus Cross;-;Skyrim without mods was a sub-par, buggy, lack of functionality game. It really takes a good 50+ mods to make it what it has been hyped to. 50+ paid mods would be at least the price of the game. If anything, Bethesda should be paying modders for upkeeping and fixing their work. No point in buying Bethesda games anymore, they'll release them with decreasing quality expecting modders to not only fix their crap, but rake in the money while doing it. Bethesda and Valve will never get another dime from me.
Brakmage;-;Paid mods where valve gets 30% and bethesda gets 45%, it's basically getting your community to make DLC for you.
T3ddy 4v3ng3r;-;Didn't review before. Good game but paid mods are BS. 11/10 won't mod again.
winterlightsong;-;Skyrim is a brilliant game made awesome by the modding community...no-one forced the modding community to create these mods, no guns to the head, no coercion. They did it because they love to do it, it's a passion for some, a hobby for most! My hobby is painting pictures, I could sell them, but I mostly give them away for free. Modders made mods and their payment was the awe and respect from the community, the thanks and gratitude, which is more than any amount of money. To create something that someone loves, gives you such an overwhelming feeling of accomplishment and pride and inspires you to continue - that is the payment! Paying for mods opens the dark gates to criminal factions and influences, to corporate run 'mod factories' that churn out mods for profit! But for Valve to take 75% of the profit from the sale of each mod made is shocking. To profit out of someone else's hard work, time, energy and creativity is parasitical. However, corporate greed knows no bounds, it is a voracious, immoral beast with an endless appetite! I cannot, in all good conscience recommend 'modded Skyrim'. And a message to Valve: 'Why? You do not need the money, millions of sales occur globally on a daily basis, PC gamers love you guys...so WHY?'
Crai Crushna;-;Great game made by Beth studios. Too bad Steam just killed Skyrim and all future modable games by them by making a paywall of drm bull. Mods should have a pay or not pay function but by donation, not by Steam who did absolutely nothing in the making of the Mod.
Livenwohex;-;Used to, but not anymore given the way its going on steam
Dirticus Rex;-;Love this game...hate the idea of paid mods. A horrible idea that is up there with Diablo 3's recently retired paypal auction house. Will change review once this awful idea has been done away with. Shame on both Valve and Bethesda for implementing this. Optional donation button is a better way to show support for the modding developers.
Chride2k8 |LZ|;-;One of the best games ever! This goes hand in hand with Fallout 3 and Fallout New Vegas, they all share the first place. Open world, lovely landscape, good story, loads of exploring, loads of loot and the best of all, loads of  AI's. This is just one of those games which you just have to try even tho be warned, you will get addicted and it will eat your sould (if you have one).
SuicidalBillyBob;-;Making Mods buyable, is a big no for all of gaming
unbalancedego;-;There use to be some good left in the gaming industry. The greatest of which has fallen. This is the end of an era.
FlyingBaconer;-;This is an amazing game, but i can not recommend it after the changes made to the the workshop
Nups;-;just when i thought i found a good gaming company...
Feels;-;"You were the chosen one. It was said that you would destroy the bad gaming companies, not join them... Bring balance to the mod community, not leave our wallets empty! You were my favorite game Skyrim, and I loved you." -Steam Wars Episode 3: Revenge of the Sales.
Meta4;-;When you can combine a feasible backstory and an amazing, truly beautiful setting as well as gameplay and variable story line, I'm sold. Skyrim is truly one of the greatest PC games I have ever played.
Starheaven07;-;This game is fun at its core, but there are better options out there now. Even in its prime, it couldn't beat out Morrowind for entertainment hours. The mods had swung this in Skyrim's favor, but since all the controversy started that is no longer a safe bet.
Negronomicon;-;Do not support paid mods. Do not support your industry being more crippled then it already is. Take a stand against paid mods. Allow a donation button to sit there would be fine, but don't paygate.
Risk;-;Please everyone go buy this game! I love it! I can not get enough of this amazing gameplay!
riverr;-;Who ever liked paid mods anyway?
Themole2114;-;10/10 would sell out again
CoopDaddyUSA;-;Charging for mods is going to ruin this game.
amerrycan115;-;Paid Mods = Bad
's all good fam;-;$4.99 for good review
starfan28;-;Paid mods. End of story
Enzer;-;Skryim is a game that had many faults, but since Morrowind, has had the backup of a modding community to fix the faults in this game for the benifet of everyone. Now, in the name of profit, Bethesda and Valve have shattered this community and have changed the modding hobby for the worst.
YA BOY SPOOKY B;-;[CAN'T WAKE UP]
Pongo pygmaeus;-;Game was okay before paid mods, now , do not buy.
Skyf0x;-;Donate button only. Keep the modding community alive!
Conga Knight Gruffalo;-;This is a recommendation that I have written. Play this game because I recommended it and no other reason.
Erekohn;-;[REVIEW PACK #1] Mod was not found in your inventory. Please purchase the [REVIEW PACK #1] modification to view this review.
albinobigfoot;-;A TIP-JAR IS THE ONLY ACCEPTABLE SOLUTION. YOU WANT AN IN-DEPTH LOOK INTO THIS JUDAIC FIASCO, GO LOOK SOMEWHERE ELSE, I'M MOURING MY HOBBY. PEACE.
PugInjected;-;Developer has let the fans and the game down. It's a shame.
AC1D_R4IN;-;Paid mods killed my father
RevolvingTurtle;-;Good game but Valve introduced paid mods so now it's garbage
speuda;-;I wouldnt mind paying a little to support mod developers, But Bethesda taking 75% is just disgusting. Im not going to even start on the effects to the modding community and legal issues, its a bad idea and its badly implemented. My review will stay negative until Bethesda & Valve pull their heads out of each others asses.
.:{ GM | SYS64738 }:.;-;This game will be part of history as the game that spoiled the modding community - I don't think it will destroy modding, but the long-term effects are unknown. Modding was an innocent thing outside of the corporate shenigans where fans changed or built up on the vanilla game for their own or everyone's enjoyment without financial interests. Nobody even thought of charging a dollar for a custom sword and armor. Now Valve and let's not forget Bethesda have pulled this once innocent hobby into corporate space by waving some dollars before their faces (of which they will keep most BTW). The current result is a toxicity that was formerly unknown between all involved parties, modders vs. players, players vs. modders, modders vs. other modders, everyone for/against Valve and Bethesda. Well done! I don't think anyone is truly against modders earning money for their work, there are some huge mods of DLC quality. We too know that donations have never worked in the past in the sense of getting a decent income comparable to an income in the games industry. That wasn't a problem, modders helped one another, shared knowledge and resources and provided their mods for free. Of course some mods get stuck and never finished, but that wasn't the norm and there are other ways to cope with that (e.g. Kickstarter), also i doubt this will change significantly with paid mods, as the modders are still not obliged to fix bugs or finish a mod in the new system. Here's a compiled list of what's wrong right now, maybe that's not everything, and there's more in the details, but these seem to be the most important issues: Valve gets 30% of the cake, while it's ok for them to get some out of it for hosting and occasionally marketing, i don't know if that's enough for a third of the income, 10% feels more appropriate. In the end they get nothing for all the free mod's traffic, and mods help sell the game, so they already profited. Bethesda gets 45% of the cake, for what? They should get nothing or maybe 5% for providing the modding tools. But in the end mods help them already, for longevity of their product, it's a selling point, and especially mods that improve or even fix the base game should be paid for by THEM! Modders don't get money until they reached 400$ sales, so if they're stuck at 399$ they will never see money, while Valve/Bethesda already earned 300$ without contributing anything to the content creation. Mods depending on other mods can build up to a pay-chain, "Oh you just bought the 2$ spell mod, now you'll need some other mods for just 7.99$". A heavily modded game (e.g. to show off what the engine is able to do) can cost multiple times more than the base game, especially with older titles on sale. There's 25000 mods in steam workshop alone, just to remind you. Also problems arise when an always free mod heavily referenced in other mods suddenly decides to charge. A plethora of copyright and distribution issues with modders helping one another and sharing resources, some mods have been taken down due to this already - oh i forgot Valve will not let the authors take mods down anymore). BTW, how come some of the first mods are swords based on the design of swords from a completely different game? What does the original designer get? Ripoff-mods that are plagiated moneygrabs based off of some other available mods, barely changed and used without permission (some *free* mods have been taken down from other sources already to prevent this). There's no way to get your money back when a mod brakes, you can only convert to steam coin for 24h after buying. There's no quality assurance that checks for incompatible mods, so your newly bought mod may break anytime when you buy another one. Paid modders are not obliged to fix or update anything if it's broken because of an engine update after a week, combined with the point above your money goes poof (or is at least in valve's pockets forever). As of now, this new system has done enormously more harm than good. Mods have been and will be taken down here and elsewhere. Legal issues are just starting to unfold. The community is split between the hobbyists and the ones with dollar signs in their eyes. Mods are being pirated. There are heated debates going on and frontiers are building up between former allies for the coming cold war and inevitable skirmishes. Nothing of this existed as mods were free, it's just sad. All because of a little money. The game itself would get a maybe 6-8/10 BTW depending on what you're into, this downvote results from the idiots in suits that forgot why there is modding in the first place, and thus harming this game as well as modding in general.
Betnemar;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You shouldnt charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. Especially when your making large profits at the expense of the creators, forcing the mods to take a 25% cut for 100% of the work they put in to make it, coupled with the fact that you are unprepared unless legally obliged to take down mods once the creator says they dont want you representing them. People can and should support mod creators via donations, or better yet a larger cut of the profit for their work and a right to pull their own work should they choose to. Putting them behind a pay wall is god damn atrocious. This practice is immoral and deplorable. I hope valve turns this around.
Foam Toaster;-;This game with mods is great. Introducing a paywall and trying to sell previously free content? Giving the content creators a fraction of the money? Breaking the modding community? Shame on you Valve/Bethesda. The whole benefit of buying this game (and similar games on PC) is for the modding opportunities. If you take that away (or monetize it) you breed bad feeling and remove the sole purpose of getting the game on this platform on the first place. Introducing this system retroactively is an even worse idea. People may have hundreds of mods. What happens if large numbers of them rely on a mod that has now become paid and the person doesn't want to/ can't afford to pay whatever they are charging? Congratulations, you just broke their game.
Krolethis;-;A brilliant game, and one of my personal favourites. If you enjoy open world games such as Risen and The Kingdoms of Amalur: Reckoning then you'll definitely enjoy Skyrim.
cole1114;-;I played Skyrim for a very, very long time on console because my PC wasn't very good. When I upgraded my PC it was one of the very first games I purchased, but one thing led to another and I never really got much time to play it. I always wanted to come back to it with mods to shake up my experience, but with the new system... that's never going to happen.
andre;-;Killed a chicken, got killed. 11/10
Syrsly;-;Do I really need to justify this game purchase? It's an Elder Scrolls game!
Witchking;-;My Girlfriend is Dragonborn too
Animatronio;-;I'll make this simple: no paid mods.
Incognito W;-;Great game, kept alive by mods. Now Gaben and Valve want to ruin that. I feel a little betrayed.
Chebdos;-;Mods should be free.
Caljif;-;Morrowind is free to mod.
Escapist;-;Made by greedy developers who don't appreciate their consumer base. The mods could make this worthwhile, but they want you to pay for those too.
An actual Wizard;-;Fun game. Ruined by paid mods.
Chin Chin;-;This paid mods thing is silly. Although if you buy this for the base game it's quite good for about 20 hours.
whatthafizznuck;-;Not worth paying Valve for something they didnt create when it comes to mods.
Sancte;-;Paid mods is bad for PC gaming.
Bansheeben;-;Get your heads out of your asses Valve and Bethesda. Pulling this paid mods crap all of a sudden, without any form of discussion is just not done...
cincinnatus;-;The game is extremely buggy and modding is required for it to be anything close to playable. Which they can now charge for with Betheseda taking the lion's share. So they have no incentive to fix the game and can even make money of it's bugginess.
RumPULL4Skinz;-;Paid mods are bad Gabe.
Dreaming Shadowsipper;-;Whether or not it's okay to put up a paywall for something free by definition aside (hint: it's ing not), not being able to even check reviews is absolutely ridiculous. Are you telling me that unless I pay the money I'm not allowed to hear complaints or possible issues with my purchase?
Kiln;-;This game was one of the best games to try after you upgraded your computer or got a new. Emphasis on was. You could see how many amazing mods you could install until the game couldn't handle it anymore. If your computer was really up to snuff you could make the game look amazing and surpass even the most recent games. Unfortunately everything is slowly moving behind a paywall. So even if this game goes on sale for say $5, you could easily spends many times that amount for something I was once able to do freely.
Shotgun;-;If we  on this game enough they'll stop their pay-for mods. You don't do this for the same reason you don't sit infront of a street preformer charging every person who stops and listens an ammount of money and then take 75%. 25% for yourself because you own the street and 50% to the owner of the song the street preformer is covering. That's exactly what Valve is doing and if we  on this game enough they'll stop it here. If we don't we'll have to pay 5 bucks for a mod for GTA V that gives us 1 extra gun.
Smitty Werbenjagermanjensen;-;Can't recommend with paid mods. Modding is one of the pillars of PC gaming, and the best part was that it was always done in good faith, until now. This is nothing but a money grab. I'm not giving valve or bethesda any more of my money for somebody else's work. I would happily support modders with a donation button where all the money goes to the actual modder, sadly I don't see that happening.
Sharahfluff;-;vastly overrated game that just got worse with greed
fydo;-;Skyrim itself is pretty great! Highly recommended. The most recent fiasco regarding paid mods is why this review is ultimately negative.
rBST Cow;-;I'm giving Skyrim a negative review for one reason and one reason only: Bethesda supports paying for mods. I will not remove this review until Bethesda removes the requirement to pay for mods.
[SRF]Psycho;-;I rated this game 9.5/10 Reason being is that the gameplay is amazing no doubt about that! But the storyline is a bit dull. I didn't find myself wanting to play the storyline cause really by the looks of it, it just felt really dull and not as much time was put into creating a good storyline. It's not half bad in my opinion but the story line does need some work, Hopefully, The Elder Scrolls VI has a better storyline, Now onto the graphics and soundtrack, In my opinion, The graphics were very well done, The soundtrack went very well with the graphics, I don't pay much attention to graphics but I think The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim has one of the greatest graphic design. Now the DLCs, If anyone is new and reading this, You'll find out Skyrim comes with 3 DLCs, Dawnguard, Dragonborn, and Hearthfire, All very well though out DLCs, The first one being about Vampires and Vampire Hunters (Dawnguard) has an amazing storyline, Adding in quite a bit to the game. New Weapons, Armors, etc, Now onto the Dragonborn DLC one of my all-time favorites, With an amazing yet long storyline to keep you playing for quite a bit, The Dragonborn DLC brings you the ability to tame and ride dragons along with a few new shouts, weapons, armor and somewhere new to explore, Off the coast of Morrowind is all I'm saying, The rest you'll find out on your own, after you purchese the Dragonborn DLC (Which I highly recommend you do) We know come to our final DLC, Hearthfire, Basically, It isn't really that exciting. The only thing it really adds is a few miscs that can be used to build your house or as gifts for your children but otherwise thats about it. Well, Those are my reasons why Skyrim got a 9.5 outta me. But however, I will give bonus ratings for the DLCs, which I'd give Skyrim, Along with the DLCs, Probably a 9.7/10 Not much of a difference I know but so much could be improved, And of course, we cannot forget the mods, Along with mods,DLCs and the game itself, Thats when the game recieves a 10/10 rating. Thanks for reading my review of Skyrim, By the way, I love reviewing games! :D
llarryllamma;-;Fairly decent game, especially with mods. Has a large open world, however most of the content is the same from dungeon to dungeon. Mods are pretty much a must in my opinion, as they do a number of things, from increasing the difficulty of higher levels, making it look much better, to fixing a number of broken or exploitable mechanics. I would recommend SkyUI at the very least to make the UI much more usable for someone in with a mouse.
Fluffy;-;RIP Elder Scrolls series and future Bethesda games. Never supporting you again with the paid mod nonsense that you've pulled.
Gaz;-;Got sent to the moon by a giant.
Dime;-;I've been on Steam for 10 years. In all this time, I've never been more upset at them than I am now. Keep in mind, I used Steam back when it was a platform that hardly worked.. the friends system was purely cosmetic: it never worked, and you needed someone's account name in order to add them. It was buggy, crashy, resource-intensive and SLOW. I always liked it because it let me avoid having to keep track of CDs and CD keys, which I would end up losing eventually. This is the last straw, though. Valve ruined the very thing that allowed them to thrive: mods. Half-Life was intended to be a very moddable game, and from that they have allowed games like Natural Selection 2, Counter-Strike, Team Fortress, and Left 4 Dead to come into existence. The worst thing about the paid mods is that the creator only gets a 25% cut after the mod sells $400 USD equivalent. The money goes into their Steam Wallet, which cannot be used as regular funds for everyday life. Not to mention you can sell someone else's work as your own, and earn money FROM SOMEONE ELSE'S HARD WORK. This is not only dishonest, it is illegal . This activity forces people who would otherwise make free mods to monetize, because if they don't, then someone else will, and will have control over this intellectual property. Valve opened a can of worms by pulling this stunt. I doubt they'll ever live it down.
(21st Panzer)Erwin Rommel;-;I've played this on Xbox and PC and i might not have alot of hours on here but thats because i dont own it yet but i've played it ALOT on PC and it is alot better on PC I plan to buy the game for PC soon I could spend countless hours on here because of mods but if ALL the modmakers start making us pay for mods then im afraid this game will have lost its touch so until this paid mod conflict is resolved i'm going to have to give a negative review just put a donation button PLEASE
[OCN] Dominant;-;I do not recommend this game.
Genma;-;And this is how customers get screwed once more. Remember DLCs? How they became so widespread in the industry and hurt the enjoyment of many titles? Well now companies like Valve and Bethesda have a great idea; why spend resources doing new stuff when people will do it for them in their free time? Mark my words, paid mods will be the future of gaming, Valve just opened the flood gates to a whole new era of greedy corporativism where games that previously refused to release modding tools, will "magically" see their error and let players form the game's DLC, screwing gamers and modders in the process as they make money. You hated day one DLC? Wait until you hear day one paid mods from "famous" modders.
FortunePaw;-;Turn away from this scam. Skyrim was famous for modability. Now they are putting up mods behind paywalls. Go buy GTA4 or something that support free open modding.
Blitzred;-;In and by itself Skyrim is a good game. However like any game it will get old and repetitive. What has kept me coming back has been a main reason I've constantly returned to Bethseda games: a very vibrant and active modding community. Given a little time after a game's release you could find mods that can tweak and change almost any aspect of the game to customize it to how you wanted it. Over time the mods grow more sophisicated and ones are out overhauling entire aspects of the game or adding quests and areas that rival or exceed even official expansions. Work was shared and expanded on, some modders soley created resources for others while others used them to craft entire graphic overhauls, areas, companions, perk systems, ect. The new update and focus on paid mods already seems to fractured that and raises many headaches. I won't go into it in a review other then to say I'd suggest reading an article put out by forbes, it summerizes it pretty well: http://www.forbes.com/sites/insertcoin/2015/04/24/valves-paid-skyrim-mods-are-a-legal-ethical-and-creative-disaster/ The reason I wouldn't recommend this now is that a mess is going to be swirling around this and there's no way to tell exactly how it will settle. And lets admit it, without the mod scene that grew up the game becomes another decent RPG - good design, fun to play through once or twice and then collects dust, the steam store is full of them for lesser prices. As a last thought its hard to believe this is about helping modders. A 25% cut on sales (for the accountants out there I'm not sure if a dontation would be via what Nexus does would be considered taxable income, but since you're actively selling a product now I'm assuming that this paid system would be) doesn't seem like a good deal. We pay new associates straight out of school a higher cut of production plus a base mininium, and that's with around a 55-60% overhead for a medical office. I doubt the workshop overhead runs that high - just a thought
cocaine_skinned_devil;-;Putting mods behind paywalls is shady ing business.
PaniniPig;-;Fixed the mod stuff, so hope we can get it back to 98 :D
FatPanda;-;The best video game I have ever played. It is just so much more than an epic, fantasy, rpg; it is an expierence. It is incredible, just buy it now.
noname;-;This is the first Elder Scrolls I've really gotten in to. I'm not sure what about it grabbed me, but it bit hard, and is just now *starting* to let go, some 160 hours in. Seriously worth whatever you pay for it.
Prezadant Trump;-;While the base game is good, mods were the lifeblood of this game. Sadly, some have been put behind a paywall which greatly diminishes the value of this game. Would not recommend.
[FP] Eiso's In Canada;-;Well, much like previous Elder Scrolls games (I'm looking at you, Oblivion) the main quest line is very short, and very easy. Fortunately, there's plenty of other questing to be done, and the modding community is amazing, as it always has been. So, yeah, great (if a bit easy) content, great modding community, great game. Except for the guards bringing up knee arrows, but there's a mod to fix that!
DAN FTW;-;Everyone knows this is the best game ever made and if you think otherwise then you are wrong. This is an open world action RPG, It is my favourite game by far and only the next sequel can ever top it. You start off as a prisoner who's about to be beheaded, from there you create your character from a variety of different races (human or beast) There is endless customization with what you can create and how realistic you character will look if you use mods, you don't have to because without this will still be your favourite game experience ever, but i don't see why not because it's simple to download mods from the nexus with just a few clicks and if you don't want to do that then you can easily browse the workshop from your library and install mods with a click of a button, that's what has kept this game so fun for so long and it will never get boring or old. There's various factions throughout the game you can join and become leader of, you can even become a werewolf or a vampire, the characters are all unique and loveable and you can have followers and even get married to your favourite ones, You can craft armor and weapons, enchant them, upgrade them, you can create potions, you can have your own home in this game, you level up and gain skill points to build the type of character you want, you can make a perk legendary when it get's to 100 so you level endlessely, there's always a rewarding amount of loot in each cave or dungeon you clear, i could go on forever, even just standing in the town enjoying the view of the lake is enjoyable in this game! The possibilitys with this game because of mods are endless, there's no need in other games when this game has EVERYTHING you could think of Seriously you have to buy it, if you want a game you will never get bored of, be easy to go back to whenever you want, never 100% complete because there's to much to do, then buy Skyrim
Nano;-;This is my form of protest against paid mods. Until Bethesda/Valve remove paid mods this review will stay the same. Edit: Even though they have removed paid mods, Ill be a  and leave my review as negative so that they dont forget.
Zoombie-tfw 2+ weeks no interweb;-;(USER WAS BANNED FOR THIS REVIEW) At least Gabe rolled back paid mods, but i'm keeping this as a reminder of that one time I got community banned.
JeSeTeR;-;The game was fun, but sadly since Valve released the paid mods, I could not recommend this game to anyone...
Bruntburner;-;REMOVE PAID MODS
AlDuIn;-;I love this game. This is my world,this is my life,this is... My girlfriend. ".
THEDARKKNIGHT;-;awsome game
Lowe Gule;-;Best 3D Hentai Game! 10/10 would fap
Gengar Del Rey;-;10/10 would bang
AoL.CatchyRun;-;Taught me how to kill villagers in towns and shout. 11/10 Would play.
il Duderoni;-;Skyrim only shines in what it allows, which is acting as a medium for custom content from peers. And it does it well. In itself, it is weak. The story is not very engaging most of the time, relying on it's many shinies and features. Radiant AI is, frankly, quite boring after the third time. Bugs are, of course, literred throughout the game as every TES game does. But, as you might guess, it shines where everyone knew it was really designed for. Mods. The range of oppertunity for what can be modified and added, is even wider then it's predecessors. By the time the CK came out, the game had more impressive mods then Oblivion. That is a testament to the creativity of your peers. And it should be the primary reason for you to buy this game. Buying this game without getting involved in the modding scene is a waste of money. Getting involved with having it modded, however... is more then worth your money. No skill required. Just pay attention.
CMDR ali07saad;-;The Elder Scrolls V - Skyrim is with no doubt one of the best games recently released. An open-world RPG with an infinite amount of quests and modding support ? Count me in. The replayability is also almost endless, because you can make a totally new character with other skills and so have a new experience. Installing mods can also help you fighting the boredom when you've reached 300+ hours ingame.
41488;-;Whenever you watch a video on YouTube about Skyrim, you will bump into a person claiming that Skyrim has been totally dumbed down and it's a  game and Bethesda sucks (and, believe me, this works for ANY YT video about Skyrim- even OST vids. Type 'Skyrim' into YouTube and watch the magic unfold). What's interesting about this, though, is that these comments always turn into a heated war between Skyrim lovers and the OP who apparently hates Skyrim. And guess what? Both are right. A year ago, I watched Samyoul's video about The Elder Scrolls series being dumbed down. Although personally I felt that Skyrim was one of the best games I have ever played (I spent literally an entire summer, day and night, playing Skyrim), I clicked that little "like" button at the bottom of his vid. And although I have played Oblivion quite a lot, and I own Morrowind, though I have yet to give that a serious try, I did not like that video because I was flooded with nostalgia about how good and "complex" and detailed the older Elder Scrolls games were. I clicked that because I did feel that Skyrim was the most "stripped" game of the entire series. Conversations no longer had pages upon pages of topics to scroll through. Quests were no longer memorable. We would never get another guild tale reaching the depths of The Arena questline in Oblivion. And the Oblivion gates- all unique in their own ways- were replaced by generic mini-boss fights that happened whenever a dragon decided to attack you. So why am I recommending this game? Because, although it's dumbed down, SKYRIM IS FUN TO PLAY. Oblivion was indeed more complex than Skyrim in many aspects- custom spells and complicated alchemy, just to name a few. But at the same time Oblivion was annoying to play. I had to carry around extra weapons at all times in case they broke, which was a nice, but VERY annoying little feature present in Oblivion and not in Skyrim. And although, even as a whole, Skyrim's mechanics could not reach the complexity found in RPGs like Neverwinter Nights, it manages to string together all of its little parts and create something that's not complex or deep, but is FUN. Yes, Morrowind and Oblivion were better, more complex games. Yes, they were deep in detail and lore, But Skyrim doesn't remove those aspects entirely. They just sacrifice some of the less pleasing parts (whoever needed 4 pieces of equipment to brew a potion?!) to make an overall nicer and more pleasing tone to the game. Conversations feel natural. I'm no longer talking to Mr. Imperial City Tour Guide whenever I talk to a guard. I'm talking to a tired man who's more happy in bed than patrolling around in the cold- and probably can't really stop to chit-chat anyway. I think this all has to do with the evolution of the Elder Scrolls series. Daggerfall was, in my opinion, the pinnacle of the series in terms of complexity. The entire, yes, ENTIRE continent of Tamriel was rendered in the game. And you could travel the entire continent (though it would take hours to get to anywhere- just like in real life). Morrowind sacrificed that feature to make the game a bit more accessible. Oblivion added fast travel and removed chance-based combat, focusing more on skill. And Skyrim removes the complexities of most activities. But I don't mind that- nor do I protest that. Games, I feel, should be rated based on how fun they are to play. I don't want to come home on a Friday night- just to spend hours worrying about how I'm going to get more repair hammers. I want to come home on that Friday night and play a good game. In conclusion, there's a difference between a good game and a fun game. I feel that the Elder Scrolls series is slowly transitioning from being a good game to being a fun game. But the thing that makes this series great is that it's vital to maintain a balance between the two. So no matter how dumbed down the game, no matter how stripped the content, Bethesda is going to keep on making good Elder Scrolls games. The lore demands it. The story demands it. The content demands it. There is always going to be a "good" in a fun Elder Scrolls game. Skyrim is proof of that. That there CAN be a balance between the two- even if it means sacrificing a bit of one to re-balance the other. Skyrim is not a good game. Skyrim is a good AND fun game. 10/0.1
DigiM;-;The game that had a really big hype before launch, and also delivered lots of fun during launch. First look at the game at a friend's house, and I was tempted to buy it, lucky enough for me that someone generous decided to gift me a copy. From what I experienced, this game has a lot of content, ranging from epic main quests to the little quests it gives, the flexibility of what we're gonna do, and also the combat. It has so many stuff to do and finish, It feels like it goes on and on, not even going through half the gameplay. And not to mention the mod support. Skyrim has a lot of custom mods created by the skyrim community, resulting in endless fun and laughter in the game itself. Conclusion Open-world RPG with mod support, can also be classified as sandbox, preferrably one of the best games of the era.
button_duck;-;Skyrim is by far my favourite game, and even if your graphics card isn't that good, the game still looks amazing. I definitely reccomend buying the game, because alongside the main quest, there are a ton of dungeons and endless scenery to explore. EDIT After reading negative reviews purely to get myself angry, one comment caught my eye. They mentioned that the game had a single digit amount of voice actors. In comparison to Oblivion, Skyrim has 80+ actors, each essential and quest related character having their own voice, personality and fighting style. The game involves unique characters, and this is quite contrary to the previous games in the Elder Scrolls series. My previous review sounds bland to what this game is in reality. The team of Bethesda has worked hard to make this game immersive, yet make you feel like you are living a fantasy life. I know, after playing Oblivion for many hours in the years before Skyrim came out, the fifth installment of the TES was a breakthrough for Bethesda. With the soundtrack recorded by an orchestra and an arrangement of vocals, it is enough to send shivers down your spine. After 600+ hours in this game over multiple platforms and computers, there is always something new. With the community releasing a constant stream of mods, there is an infinite amount of time to spend in this game. It's easy to waste time in Skyrim, and there is always something to distract you from your quest. There are multiple ways to play this game, as a mage, warrior, an archer, an assassin... the list goes on. Every enemy in Skyrim is levelled to your character, which makes the choice of weapons and magic you use critical. The Dragonborn DLC adds in many more hours to your gametime, along with Hearthfire. After saying all of this, I realise that each person might take Skyrim differently. I know that it's been amazing for me, and I hope many more people choose to buy this game.
NuttyBow6;-;this is a great solo game its really good story and it always keeps you at your computer.
Spongebob Roundpants;-;Beautiful. A masterpiece. One of the best games I have ever played. Morrowind was amazing. Oblivion was wicked. This is just too much to handle. So much amazing scenery to soak in. It literally took me fifteen minutes to make my character because I was so busy taking screenshots of other things. Buy this! Pay whatever they ask. 100/100!!
Spicey;-;Beware, Skyrim will life-steal the  out of you.
Partyprime;-;I love, LOVE, moist towelletes.
HotwheelsKid2003;-;It took all of my personal life including, my girlfriend, my family, my jobb, my money. 10/10 bananas
Oliva Twist;-;This game is the best game I have ever played, story and gameplay really went in to my heart and veins while exploring the land of the nords, Skyrim. As a Nordic guy I must say the whole nature and weather really feels like reality and at the same time it is just this epicness with all magics and awesome fights. I wish I could live in this world for ever. For me this game is worth way over the price it is. If you want to experience what I felt like was a true dream. Buy this game. I really wish I could experience this game over and over again for the rest of my life..
Target Bravo;-;The ultimate RPG from one of the greatest developers in their field. No playthrough is the same, and the elimination of the class system means your character plays how you want them to. Just ****ing play it.
Desolutional;-;The vast world of Skyrim is massive, and you will have countless hours of fun playing this, there are too many quests to count. Play it anyway you like, however you like - in Skyrim, you get to choose what happens.
Atis;-;I went to leave Skyrim, then I Took an Arrow in the Knee... so I stayed :D 10/10
Naahdrekii;-;Best game I've ever played!
Cat Dragon 64;-;I used to have a life like you, but then I took Skyrim to the knee. wasted my entire summer. set me back quite far on several projects. 10/10
TrSdHue;-;What an amazing game! For all RPG fans, a must have! You can play it in your own way, no stupid locked classes. Immense world and lots of missions (and submissions) to play. Great music in landscapes, battles, etc. You got a great map to explore and many adventures. If you want other things you can simply download new-mods in the workshop! ( there are also other mods online, but keep in mind, not everything is trustable! ) Or if there aren't fun things, you can create it yourself with the ''Creation Kit''. TES:V is a really Fun game! My Metascore: 9.2 / 10.0
Captain-Weasly;-;What else can I say about this game? Skyrim is expansive and with the support of user mods, it encourages the way to the played in various ways.
PsychoGhast;-;Its Dungeons and Dragons in video game form. need i say more?
The Notorious A.N.D;-;Where do I start with this game. First off, I have to say I was highly impressed with how the game held up. It's so immersive, I sometimes forgot about my 5 pet cats; Georgie, Nintendo, Jeffery, Hinawa, and Paul. Enough about my cats though, let's talk about the game. You start out as a prisoner being held by the Enclave, natives of the civilized, cosmopolitan province of Sky ROM, the Enclave are well-educated, wealthy and well-spoken. Imperials are also known for the discipline and training of their citizen armies. Because of this, the Imperials have dominated Tamriel for more than 2,000 years. After spending an hour giving your character the right sized eyebrows, scars, face-paint, mascara, toupes, and even writing a 5-page backstory for him that goes in-depth on his early childhood, love life, carreer, and even has a little page at the end with fun facts about him that weren't included in the actual story, you go to the stone, so a guy can chop off your head. Coincidentally, right as you're about to meet your fate, a talking dragon man comes down and kills the bad guys. You escape with the man. After that, the world is yours. Fight off bad guys, develop a stealing addiction, mindlessly repeat the words "Fus ro dah" out in public, mod the game so there's naked ladies everywhere, download the mods where you can kill the kids, anything you can imagine, the sky is the limit. This game will be the demise of your computer with the right amount of graphical mods, but who cares? Your computer? Hell no! Your computer can't even talk. Unlike any other RPG today, (Call of Duty: Ghosts, Viva Piata, Super Mario 3D world, EarthBound) this game has something that all the others don't. And that is love. What does play Skyrim mean to me? Many groupies are not experienced with play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim. Play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim The Elder Scrolls on Steam was my bread and butter. Play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim The Elder Scrolls The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim The Elder Scrolls is known to cause this. OK, that's one reason. I have one play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim that I don't leave to play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim The Elder Scrolls Skyrim Skyrim V on Steam. It is a well worn feeling. That is the latest installment of my Online play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim The Elder Scrolls series. My play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim University will tell you how to do this. That is true for all intents and purposes. I don't need to put myself in a tight spot. play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim online is one of the most popular collectible play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim online types. It certainly takes into account a puzzle several fellow travelers have with play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim. When we look at it as a whole, here are the essentials referring to watch play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim. I had never laid eyes on this before that night. There is, however, a happy medium between it and it. By what means do noobs collect sterling watch The Elder Scrolls new online handbooks? Deep breath OK All you want is a bit of imagination. I'm not searching for formulas to make up for the past. Currently we are offering more The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim When I Get My Dress In Lights. How do connoisseurs capture inexpensive play The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim The Elder Scrolls on Steam ? In any respect, not many children desire to do what is good for them and I have a bit of staying power when discusssingplay The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim. You probably feel the same way they do. The Elder Scrolls 5, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, The Elder Scrolls: Skyrim, The Elder Scrolls V, The Elder Scrolls V Steam, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim Dawnguard online, The Elder Scrolls Online, The Elder Scrolls V Bethesda, The Elder Scrolls 5 V Skyrim
The Mighty Cthulhu;-;10/10 After countless hours on journeys and quests all over skyrim, i'd like to mirror my impression in this review. I had high expectations for TES:V Skyrim, and i wasn't let down by Bethesda. I bought the game at release, and i'm still playing it today, cause in my opinion its still one of the very best action-rpg's ever! So lets take a closer look why i think so! Story: The main story covers the appearance of dragons in skyrim and the role which our protagonist plays within it. As TES-usuall, the main quest can be completed within several hours. Even though its predictable, its not boring. The presentation of the happenings in skyrim is epic and fighting the main quest is fun. As usuall you do not need to follow the main quest, and can start exploring the map from the very beginning without any obstruction through not following the questline. Sidequests: A sidequest can be found around ever corner in skyrim, and as expected they cover every event you can think of. From loveletters and intrigues up to assasinations and theft. Almost everyone has a story to tell... and need your help with it, of course! Fighting: The fights in TES:V are very action-heavy, and have nothing in common with traditional roleplaying games. Simple math, the one with the bigger weapon wins most of the time. If you don't expect strategic, roundbased and profound battles, you will be very happy in skyrim. Because after all the fights are a lot of fun, and the fact that you can still chose how your character should fight - either with spells and summons or with swords and shields - makes the fights enjoyable. Characterdesign and gameplay: The character customization in TES:V is extensive as used to TES-games. You can make your character fit perferctly your preffered playstyle. The visual custimization is as wide as the playing one - lots of different armorsets, which you gather from quests, find in dungeons or craft yourself give your character a unique look. The skill perks are very deeply designed to match your preffered playstyle. You can create loads of perk combinations to design your unique character. Every playstyle you can imagine is covered by it: You want stealthing, destruction mage in heavy armor with alchemy skills and pickpocketing? - Sure! An axe wielding rogue, light armor and the ability to summon creatures and also handle a big two-handed mace? - Not a problem! The Elder Scrolls - Skyrim is a very extensive game, with a huge world to explore and countless dungeons to defent. Elder Scrolls fans, aren't even asking themselfs to buy it or not. For RPG and action fans its definitly worth a closer look. Its contains hundreds and hundreds of hours of quests and exploration, and (at least for me) never gets boring!
Owlburgers;-;I killed countless dragons, saving the world. Then I was killed for stealing a fork off a table...
RPharazon;-;It's pretty mediocre unless you get the DLC and then mod it to just before the point where the mod bloat makes it explode. Like any Bethesda game, it's not so much a game as it is an engine and a landscape for modders to do their stuff. So really, you'd better be competent at installing mods and getting them to like each other. Learn how to use Wrye Bash and BOSS, be smart about which mods you pick, use the online G.E.M.S. list as a guideline, and avoid Workshop/NMM Manager like the plague.
worztide;-;one of best games ive played placed countless hours
Djinn /;-;Is this reallife ? 5/5
Fenrisulfr;-;Normally I'd write a thoughtful and coherent review of this game, but it's skyrim we're talking about here. So if you don't already have it, you should; because this game was the reason why I built a PC.
Fargo;-;everyone should own this game.
Golemancy;-;This game will be worth the countless hours you put into it.
Lafert;-;Skyrim or social life?, I CHOOSE YOU SKYRIM! I think Skyrim is one of the best RPG games of all, really innovated in many ways, The Elder Scrolls: Skyrim worth every cent, and is always on promotions in steam . I'm sure you will LOVE IT and i'm sure you will lose your life like i lost mine ;c but im still happy that way. I'm Married with Lydia, and i'm a Vampire Lord, and im leader of many groups like Dark Brotherhood and The Companions, BUY IT , TAKE IT AND LOVE IT
SuperSnake;-;aint no crash bandicoot but its still good
Lathbalrog;-;10/10, would explore a vast world, fighting hords of Dragur, slaying dragons, delv into dungeons, and save Tamriel again
[AIDS] Bloody Chicken;-;So far I've played 50 hours and have only done 4 or 5 of the main quests...This game is huge and there are hundreds of hours of pure entertainment. Huge expansive world, endless amounts of side quests..You already know how good it is. All you have to do is click buy and enjoy the best investment you'll ever make.
d1gamer;-;ONE OF THE BEST GAMES I HAVE PLAYED
Superhero7294;-;I personally would recommend this game to everyone who lands on this page. Skyrim was initially the first game I played in the Elder Scrolls Series, Despite not having any experience in any of the other Elder Scrolls games, I was still able to experience the excitement that the lore has to offer. I have spent countless hours (On Console) Exploring the vast and open landscape that Skyrim has to offer, and as I began to feel as though I have done all I could I then bought the DLCS and boy did that extend the playtime a whole lot, I remember when I bought my first plot of land and built my first house with the Hearthfire DLC It was Heljarchen Hall I made the house with a Mage/Alchemists touch, I felt as though I had accomplished something again.Dragonborn was the most epic experience I've ever had from additional content. The vast lands of Solstheim added another 200 hours to my playtime (Xbox) and I achieved countless hours of epic battle and excitement, Exploration on the island led to me discovering more and more quests that kept throwing more fun at me.Now for the Dawnguard DLC, well Dawnguard is a good DLC, The thing I enjoyed most about it though was having Serana as my companion. The crossbows were also a really nice addition, they added a new way to play Skyrim. When I had completed all of the game having only the repetitive side quests left I decided to start over again and experience the game all over again it was different. Personally I'd like to say that there are so many paths you can take, so many ways you can play this game and so many different adventures you can go on in this game but it's your choice to keep pushing on.
saturn1;-;The only true perfect open world game I have ever come across. 1. Smart NPCS 2. Fully open world 3. Complete freedom to play how you want 4. Never really ending you can always find something new 5. Look up mods on the steam workshop once you put 100 or so hours into the game without mods. There is nothing negative about this game! I would buy this game if it was $200.00 I really hope they re-master some of the older elder scrolls sometime.
Felvet;-;It's a Bethesda game so of course even years after release it still has a few bugs hiding around in its crevices. The combat is playable and the stealth system is in no way balenced. The game has alot to do in plenty of places but never alot to do in one place. It is an ocean's worth of content but at no point in that ocean is there any depth excluding the main quest line and the Dragonborn DLC. The game just feels rushed. The standard "Guilds" that are in every Elder Scrolls game are fairly lackluster with few of them even making you feel involved in the group. The entire Mage's guild questiline would have been 2 missions worth of Mage's guild in Oblivion. The civil war barely has an effect on the game, you can beome thane of all Skyrim by moving goods from point A to point B, the most humerous part of the game are the guards who all apparently hail Sithis. The crafting system, fluidity of combat, and mods are what saves this game. Crafting is quite honestly fun, if it wasn't for the new and better leveling system I would put all my skill points into it with no regard for my own life. If Bethesda had delivered on the econonomy system they promised us than maybe I would be able to without dying to the wolves in between Riverwood and Whiterun. I enjoy traveling to mines, slaughtering the residents, and then stealing the ores to forge more weapons and armor to help me do it all over again. Mods fix many of the problems with the game from graphics to AI bugs to the lack of a good storyline for guilds. Honestly I am going to say that Vannila Skyrim gets a different rating than Modded Skyrim since Modded the game is just so vastly different. Vannila: 7.6/10 Modded: 9.2/10
Cydran;-;I liked the quest where you sacrificed someone close to you. R.I.P Lydia, I've moved on.
milo;-;I am pretty late, but I have so many friends who are not playing it. Just let me say this: The fact that skyrim is my most played SINGLE player game (xfire) kinda speaks for itself.
pants;-;i killed a chicken and the whole town attacked me 69/420 would meme again
AngeDeLaMort;-;Short review: 50 hours and more of pure fun. If you enjoyed Oblivion or Witcher series, you should definitely try this one. Good Points: * Good enough main story and insteresting subquests * Aswesome graphics and landscapes * Skill trees and combat * Huge world * Best Elder Scroll so far. * Open worldness (You feel quite free) Bad Points * Can easily become too easy if you abuse the game (unbalanced) * Can lose interest if leave the main story. * Repetition. (ex: Killing the first dragon is cool but afterward it becomes too easy and boring chasing them)
qoackity;-;the buggy horses make this game 10% more amazing
Arkkean;-;This game is so fun with so much to do. You can chose what you want to do and play way different then your friends while both enjoying the experience. With this game your not limited to the main quest but other side quests some small some big. Not to mention you can mod this game with both the workshop and from websites adding even more to the experince. Even if you have played Skyrim before on a console, to get the true Skyrim expeince (along with downloading mods) you must play it on PC. Def a must buy. 10/10
Clutch Palpatine;-;MANKINDS FIRST STEP INTO SPACE COLONIZATION. Skyrim combines elements from many other successful titles into a bland pure joy. The game boldly takes inspiration from call of duty, mimicking its graphical fidelity perfectly. The environments one visits are truely breathtaking, my favorite was Cave#107( you Cave#106 lovers, #107 was superior in every way). The combat was nailbiting at every turn, I wasn't sure if i'd have to alter my tactics from an encounter to encounter basis. However I was able to prevail with my old faithful strategies, it reminded much of the feeling of being a warrior constantly improving his unique tecnique as his life progresses. The music was truly astounding, I liked the part where the choir yelled. The combat mechanics were unlike any other, who knew that streamlining the looking for raid mode in world of warcraft would've benfited a single player RPG? The indepth lore behind the dragons was -------------------------------------------------------------------SPILLER ALET-------------------------------------------------AWESOME. -------------------------------------------------------------END OF SPILER------------------------------------------------------The games loot system was incredibly rewarding too, I fealt like an empowered badass slaying bandits and then picking up their numerous loaf of bread. On the topic of bread, the cooking in the game was unlike any other I've seen, chef gordon ramsey would draw inspiration from these mechanics. Inspiring. How does one describe the dragon fights in one word? EXTRIMTENSESOMELYBADAWSOM I HAD TO MAKE UP A WORD JUST TO DESCRIBE THESE FIGHTS!!!!1 The battles were tests of everything I've learned my twelve years of life, everything i've ever known culminated into these battles. If you are faint of heart, DO NOT PLAY THIS GAME. Each type of dragon stronger than the last, bringing its own unique menchanics to the mix forcing you to adapt your life to battle them. The fact that i can just be attempting to meet my wife in my home city just to be attacked by a dragon helps to build up the feeling of hopelessness this world has and in no way breaks the flow of the game. In conclusion, this game is my game of a lifetime. This game will define me as my life continues and I master the art of making nude mods, perfect for the kids bring family. 12/9 AND IF YOU DISAGREE  YOU BEST GAME EVERY OU FUXING NOOB I SWAERT PLP IKE YOUY ARE RONG WITH GEM INDUSTRY ASKIG HIGHER TEXUTRE RESOLITIIN  YOU THIS GAMEW IS PERFECT FOR MY IMAC WHEN IOM GAME, and sneak.
/ Regn;-;I never liked medieval related stuff, neither games, novels or movies. Skyrim changed everything!! I never had so much fun playing a game and everytime you start a new character, there's so much to experience! Every story is different! My friends say I may be addicted or too attatched but I am just overly excited to get home to play Skyrim! Can't imagine life without Skyrim anymore! At this point, thanks to my partner Attrazone for introducing the world of The Elder Scrolls to me! <3
banshee LFT;-;Are you gentlemen prepared for another riveting review? From the masterminds that brought you a tf2 review! Creator Sir NeckBeard McCheeto Dust brings you: 10 saucy ways to sex up your cooking! this game is rly  good pls buy it - thank you for your time *this has been verified for accuracy by the FDA
coLe;-;This game is awesome and addicting.
davepat98;-;Pay to mod? REALLY? Were not console peasants.
Glxy Walker.;-;What can i say? One of the best games!
{DGT} Lumina;-;Got murdered by the villagers in Riverwood for killing a chicken. 10/10 Get on it.
neoVictrix;-;I do believe it's obvious to say that anyone that is a fan of The Elder Scrolls won't be too disapointed by what Skyrim has to offer. From discovering unmarked caves and forts, to the game's storyline, even to the odd things we've come to expect in games by Bethesda (NPCs walking in the air, projectiles launching people thirty feet away, placing NPC bodies in awkward positions), the game will give you the chance to kill a couple of hours. And lets not forget the modding commuity. Those people never fail to disappoint, and kudos to them all for the work they do. From the Unofficial Skyrim patches for bug fixes, to new and immersive weapons/armors, to ai adjustments and value tweeks to make the game a challenge for even the the most experienced and well-geared player, or even just to make the game even more amazing to look at, the work they do easily adds countless hours of additional gameplay that'll help you milk more enjoyment out of the game than Steam sales milk money out of your wallet. Edit: Not responsible for any problems that may occur with the game if you decide to try out manually installing mods to improve your gameplay experience. Remember, Google is your friend in instances like this.
5000 People;-;This game was once good, but that was considering the year it came out, rather than the quality of the mechanics as they aged. This game is awful compared to most current games, and now has become the leading force in terrible monetisation practices for valve.
AutisticWolf;-;How the great have fallen. This was, and still is a good game. But the mods are what made this GREAT. Now Valve and Bethesda want to put mods behind a paywall. This is by far the worst thing to happen to PC gaming in a long time. Please don't buy this game so these companies see that blatant cash-grabbing like this is not okay.
cabpet;-;Finally,the paid mods were removed! Hail talos!
< blank >;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a magical game. I love its medieval atmosphere, music, beautiful graphics, fascinating places, great story, everything.
Darth Hunt;-;Nice graphics and hours and hours of gameplay. A must for any RPG loving gameplayer. All it takes is a good processor and good enough RAM. Plus there is always the choice of getting super cool mods from one of the oldest modding communities on steam if you finish the game to add hours more gameplay, enhance the graphics or just to have a few new weapons and armor. Enjoy!
Jayer117;-;I have 630 hours played on this game while posting this review and even though this game is old it is one of my all time favorite games that I will probably never stop playing. With all the mods you can get to help enhance the game and they are FREE...it's a win - win. And a must - must to have in your library.
The Fool;-;You have to buy mods now. Not worth getting this game because mods were the whole point. Don't buy it, even for $5.
gangster3dawg19;-;This gets gets a thumbs down because of Valve's evil business practices. You ruined it. Every one hates lord Gaben now. I hope his wrath doesn't hurt too many people's wallets. Aha. Lets not buy any of the MODS! Genius.
Puggsly;-;A good game, and EVEN BETTER WITH MODS EH GUYS? Thanks for changing your minds.
)|(opory4ka;-;- Escaped execution - Survived a dragon attack - killed a chicken in a village, got ed up by a mob of angry people. 11 fried chickens out of 10 -   -    -    ,    . 11    10
2touka4meh;-;Hard to learn...
Zero Dark Pootis;-;You should have acted. They're already here. The Volvo scrolls told of their return Their no-price accessibility... was merely a delay Since the time when workshop support had opened when the sons of steam community would spill their own blood but noone wanted to believe believe that it would actually happen and when the truth finally dawned it dawned with paid mods BUT.... There is one they fear in their tongue they are Freemodkiin NEXUSBORN!
StormWolfHunter;-;Review: 10/10 Audience: Teen + Adult Genres and Themes: RPG, First Person, Fantasy, Choose You Own Adventure Review: The best game I have ever played. The gameplay is astounding, the graphics vibrant, plot and quests in-depth and a lore to the world so well studied it makes our own world's history seem obsilete. I cannot stress how much this game has amazed me and the rest of people who played it. Warning: Only play this game if it is within the perameters your favourite kinds of games, and be prepared to read up on lore so that you can understand and appreciate the game fully.
SydMel;-;I've spent my last dollar on Steam so long as this "paid-mod" feature stands. Valve can kiss my .
neeko;-;You probably need to play Skyrim.
Zona;-;It's one thing for Bethesda to shirk their job of making a playable video game and then give their customers the ability to fix the game to their liking, but now these fixes are being put behind a paywall, makin git even more reprehensible. I really disliked this game to begin with but this whole paid mods business has made me dislike Bethesda (and Valve) even more than I already did.
[_Ass-[A]-ssin_];-;It is one of the best games that i have ever played
[GZ] Wraith;-;The "main quest" denotes tasks the Dragonborn is compelled to complete as part of the game's main story. Other quests can be performed for a guild or faction, while others are considered side quests, which skirt on the periphery of the game's plotlines. As with most of The Elder Scrolls titles, there are quests for each of the Daedric Princes of Tamriel, excluding Jyggalag. Unique to Skyrim are Radiant Quests, quests which are initiated as part of the Radiant Story artificial intelligence system. These quests can be repeated an infinite number of times, allowing for never-ending gameplay.
Deadringers;-;First I'd like to point out that the game itself is fantastic, and it is through the multitude of mods that make it so damn amazing. Now that Steam is supporting paid mods, more and more content is and will be put behind pay walls. Welcome to the new era of DLC, DLC that the company itself doesn't have to make. I do not support Steams idea of paid mods.
novaldemar;-;Not the younglings GabeN, please not the younglings! Now that steam is removing the DLC approach to modding the game I can recommend skyrim again.
tukitaki;-;I have played Skyrim many times before, but I recently bought it. Skyrim is one of the best RPG games ever, holding my first place alongside with Dragon Age: Origins. With 3 great expansions, this game offers 200+ hours of fun, but if you add (free) mods it becomes even better. The story is good and the music is GREAT (especially if you add few mods). This is great game for every RPG fan out there. FUS RO DAH !
Metal Dragon;-;Scroll back up. Buy This Game. Buy All DLCs. Shut Up and Play.
seth3po;-;It's funny. When I was new to Steam I actually debated whether or not to buy this game. This is an amazing game that completely exceeded all of my expectations.
Jany1937;-;One of best RPGs of all time!
Lexi;-;Wow great game a'lot to do..27 hour's and i'm only lvl 14 almost 15..lol
[DRS] Sidular Mysteec!;-;A world filled with dragons, magic and unending violence can only ever lead to one thing... EPIC!! If you're a gamer, and you enjoy killing things of the virtual variety, you should really consider giving Skyrim a try.
[79thCH]Gaddafi;-;I went to buy it and realized I already had it.
Chan;-;But, There's one they fear... In their tongue, he's Dovahkiin... Dragonborn! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=whJ7jECTGZw
WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
king_of_dinner;-;amazing game, very buggy, but what matters and fun and he has a lot
Fifth_Quarter;-;A superb game, with many hours of story, faction and miscellaneous quests. Lots of locations & landmarks to find and explore from ancient dwarven cities, caves outfitted by bandits to ritual sites inhabited by necromancers or simply the local wildlife. With skill trees that you can shape, and an array of weapons and/or spells to use, you can customize your character how you like. Single or dual weapon/magic wielding or even a combination of both further allow you to personalize the playing experience, as well as providing countless setups of hostile & allied NCP alike, All providing different experiences on consecutive playthroughs. The Dawnguard & Dragonborn DLCs are a must have addition to the game, adding new armor, weapons & clothes to the game [even if only to make your character look even more awesome] as well as new locations & enthralling story lines. The only thing I miss from the Oblivion days, is the ability to create my own spells, but as Skyrim as a nation generally dislike magic I can see why it was left out. But ... with the steam workshop this and anything else you just did quite like can be added, changed or removed. New cities, more crowded cities, new quests, greater detailed trees, or a simple as a re-skin for your favourite armor, its all in there, somewhere. But I would urge you to play through without mods at least once. A must get game that I am so glad to have played and even though I have at this point I will probably spent 100s more hours playing. 10/10
kiadajthebeast;-;Amazing game. Too many hours on record. worth it for every second.
Blind Spirit;-;Absolutely fantastic game - if it should even be refered to as a "game". A masterpiece in terms of graphic design, beautiful landscapes and carefully tinkered dungeons are just around the corner, no matter where you are. Above everything else, this game will take up so much of your time; not because of frustrating moments, but the sheer amount of gameplay that's been put into this game. Apart from the main questline, there's hundreds of other sidequests to take part in. The imersion of natrual beauty is incredible, however little can be said about NPC realism. NPCs aren't very quote "smart", as they tend to repeat the same lines continuously and grow to be quite annoying. That's just one of the few downsides about this game however, next to the glitches and awkward combat system. All in all, very great 3D RPG, to anyone who doesn't have it: get it NOW!
SirRabies;-;I'm going to attempt to say everything you can do in Skyrim. If you have not played Skyrim yet, sit back and read. Okay, in the Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim... You can: -Kill Dragons -Get paid by nobles to kill bandits. -Scream Words of Power. -Travel to the top of the highest mountain. -Defeat the king of dragons. -Summon a dragon to fight for you. -Go fishing. -Eat cabbages. -Go farming. -Get a house (of many choices). -Decorate the house. -Get married. -Have a wedding. -Adopt children. -Listen to annoying guards. -Decimate small rabbits. -Use swords. -Greatswords. -Use Battleaxes. -Regular axes. -Frickin' magic. -A -load of other weapons. -Become a Thane. -Get arrested for stealing a plate. -Get marauded for killing a chicken in town. -Become a vampire. -Become a werewolf. -Ride a horse. -Become an assassin. -Kill the Emperor. -Become a thief. -Live in the sewers. -Get drunk. -Kill witches. -Alchemy. -Join the war. *LOUD GASP FOR AIR* Now keep in mind, this is about 3/4 of what's in the normal game. There are also DLCs, Mods, tuns of stuff! 10/10. Buy this game NOW!
Ohm Das Couves;-;My steam says 69hours but those are lies... I play the game mostly offline! Its one of the games i make sure to turnoff the internet, do ctrl+alt+delete and close as many stuff as possible (yes even explorer.exe) just because i wanna have the full experience with NOTHING in the way :) i also make sure i turn on my external soundboard (wich i normaly just use to produce music or do some audiowork) cause iam an audio geek and cause this game deserves it. Iam still doing my first playthru and im having so much fun, def hooked on this one. The mod scene is amazing and huge, the amount of content and dedication that these fans put in, is mind blowing... I really thank these guys to uplift the game (modernize the looks of a aging game) and turning my first playthru into something epic. ill update my review has i progress in game istill have so much to experience (to be continued...)
OrangutanSam;-;In the famous words of William Shakespeare, "There's a mod for that"
Astero;-;To all you ignorant fools out there, paid mods are off the table now, so chill out.
LRRP IceBergs.;-;Thank god they fixed it. Just kidding They're ing morons
[dudeswh]  Koppain;-;If you don't know what this is, you should go and cry for a month and then buy it.
Science Dog;-;I used to be an adventurer like you, but then I bought Skyrim and I haven't left home since.
Jeorg Ersteman;-;I actually have a ton of hours on this. I got it retail a long time ago, only recently added it to my steam list, and that was after I got the addons. So I figured I should add my review to the multitude of thousands saying this is one of the best ES games. I have played them all, sadly I was part of the ESO fiasco right from the start, that has left me feeling so bad about it I dont think I ll go back to it. But I digress, Skyrim, get it, play it, love it.
Bacxaber;-;Again, your character starts off as a prisoner. However, they ruined the purpose of this tradition by later explaining what you were doing to get arrested. The idea of being a prisoner in the earlier games was to allow the player to come up with their own backstory, rather being force-fed one for your character. But in Skyrim, they tell you that you were illegally crossing the border into Skyrim, just as a Stormcloak squad was apprehended. Skyrim had a decent story, but Alduin as a main antagonist was lacking the depth and characteristics that previous ones like Mehrunes Dagon did. In a land filled with dragons, their best enemy for the plot was a slightly bigger dragon who could talk. Not very interesting, if you ask me. Its just the fact that dragons are everywhere, and then theres one that is sort of special, but not by much. The story and experience would have been more compelling if the characters in Skyrim had any personality. Sure, they have opinions on things like the civil war, but everyone is so bland. Part of the problem is that everyone sounds alike. There were a few unique NPCs, but that voice was only used for that one character, such as Clavicus Vile. But voices arent the only thing similar about the people. Like I said, nobody has any personality. The combat is very well executed, the best combat in a firstperson RPG yet. It has dual wielding, you can have a spell and a sword, and much more. The thing that makes the fighting so unique is that hardly any games that Ive played can pull it off like Skyrim did, and dual wielding is surprisingly rare in North American games (so dont bring up any Japanese ones). Not only do they tell you why your character was a prisoner, but it doesnt make much sense if you play as a Nord. Skyrim is your homeland, why wouldnt you be allowed back there? Graphics, although pointless in terms of a games value, are quite polished in Skyrim. Though, I dont like the dull environment. Its just dark cave after dark cave, identical Nordic crypts, and most of the land is just barren with snow and mountains. I get that it is a snow province, but theres no diversity in the environment. As for mountains, they just get in the way. If you want to add mountains to a game, make sure theyre easily climbable and have goodies or caves on top. It would have been nice to add in a dead guy with tons of loot on him somewhere on the mountain who froze or something. Or at least a journal of a climber. The leveling system is much better than their last Elder Scrolls game. That makes me happy. But some skills in Skyrim feel tacked on or unfinished. A big issue in Skyrim is the enormous amount of glitches. For example, the Legend of the Red Eagle quest. You read about this ancient warrior, bring his sword to a pedestal, unlocking his burial site, and then you fight him. The problem is, you can keep reading the book every time you complete the quest, and it will start the quest all over again. Theres only one Red Eagle sword, but doing it multiple times spawns multiple swords, and its asking you to kill someone youve already killed. Like with Oblivion, some characters dont stay with the continuity. Long after the player ends the civil war for either side, half of the characters in the game still talk about it as if its still happening. I like all the guilds in Skyrim (besides Companions), but it feels overwhelming and contradictory if you join them all. Why would the Listener of the Dark Brotherhood also be the leader of the Companions, or the Arch-Mage? It wouldnt make too much sense. Thats why I dedicate one character to one guild in my games. One minor thing I would like to note is the walkspeed. You walk slower than everyone, yet you run way faster than everyone. Its hard to keep pace, and I dont like that. I liked Skyrim, and I would put it above Oblivion as a better game. It has many things an RPG should have. I rate this game a positive 6.5/10. It doesnt get a higher rating because of lifeless characters, boring and flat environment, forgetting the whole reason as to why the player is always a prisoner in Elder Scrolls games, and tons of glitches. Unlike Oblivion, I feel as though Skyrim has replayability, and not only would I recommend Skyrim, but I have started multiple characters, all with their unique stories.
Victor;-;99/100 ,Best of the Best. Let the Modding Begin!
nugz;-;Guys, this is the game that never ends. This game is for the casual gamer, and for the most hard core. One does not simply dislike skyrim
Mr. Oakenshield;-;great game, love it with mods even better...what else to say FUS RO DAH!!!!! and i hope you'll enjoy the game
Namikai;-;Skyrim is amazing and still stands as a hugely popular game today because of it's literally limitless amount of content. It offers tons of ways to build the characters you create and many ways to create those. There is never a shortage of things to do and when it seems like there might be you'll more than likely unearth an entire questline somewhere. You can play Skyrim for hundreds of hours before you even get to the DLC, which could add another 50 hours of content. And even when you're done with that there's a huge modding community still diligently working to provide enhancements and expansions to this almost four year old game. Mods can make a game from 2011 look like it was released yesterday and on top of that add many hours of community made storylines and extra quests. But do not think Skyrim is completely perfect, for delivering this amazing content spawns many kinds of issues, mods or not. Be prepared to deal with then. All in all though, Skyrim should be a favorite among all RPG fans and modders alike. Pro/con summary: +Hundreds of hours of content +Lots of ways to build characters +DLC is great +Still active modding community +Tons of NPCs, quests, and locations (see hundreds of hours of content) -Bugs/Crashes/Freezes -Looks less than desirable without graphical enhancement mods
actualcooldog;-;can keep bees in my pocket 60 000 bees/60 000 bees, would play again and again
Pyromide;-;FOOS RO DAH.. and also mods and dragons and shouts and ragdolls and guards that never will forget you, and every adventurer has a trauma because they got shot with an arrow.. in the knee. dis game's gud
mm.324;-;This game is OK but it has many issues that Bethesda never bothered to fix. The only way to fix these issues is to use mods, unfortunately Steam and Bethesda have talked modders into charging for these mods. They're effectively making you pay for patches and to make it worse Steam/ Bethesda keep 75% and the modder gets 25%. Without the mods the game is playable, but can get very frustrating. So because I have to rate only the game, not the third party DLC(mods), I have no choice but to give it a "thumbs down". EDIT: Steam/ Bethesda have taken down the paywall (for now?), so you will be able to get the mods that make this game run much smoother. I'm leaving my down vote for two reasons... 1. Many of the issues that the mods fix should've been fixed by Bethesda. 2. Call it a "reminder" to Bethesda that they need to treat the people who they are profiting off of with some respect.
Kimziol;-;The Game is just ... AWESOME :D
masterpainter78;-;Bethsada and Valve are now at war with the community that has helped them sell millions more copies than would have been feasibly possible for this game. Good job.
[TBC] FlameFireBlast;-;This game is amazing if you dont have it get it really is a great game cos it has a great story mode amazing grafics and if you dont want to do the story mode just walk around doing random quests cos skyrim doent end unless you want it to so really just get it it is one of the best games of all time :D
Epsilon5;-;The game made me waste 582 hours of my life and I'm very happy
elf butt;-;I love this game because I can shout people off the ledge and loot their sweet clothes!
Kouga;-;Wait, I have over 870 hours played? What, how? This can only be a good game.
RAvE,  AKRacing;-;This game is so epic it will change your reality. Behold the power of The Dovahkiin (Dragonborn), be an Archer,mage,warrior,thief,vampire or werewolf.. everything you can imagine in dreams could be done in this game... umm keeping naughty thoughts aside though... you can choose from hundreds of mods to make your game look more epic.. I don't need to say any more.. Just buy it or get Fus Ro Dah'd.. :D
Mr. McSmelly;-;Pretty sure that this game is actually reality
Slovenian_Gamer;-;One word describes this game: EPIC!!! I mean this is the BEST RPG I have ever played in my whole life! It has so much depth to it, so many choices to be made, so many locations to visit, so many quests to complete, very big expansive and dynamic world of Skyri makes it the best game I have ever played. You can be whatever you like, you have an in-depth character customization, you can pick up almost everything you see in the game, and the whole world is open. No boundaries, just exploring the wast region of Skyrim. I played this game before on Xbox and I'm sure I spent at least 1000 hours in the game. But the game doesn't stop here, there are also cool DLC-s and tons of mods. So, If you want to have a really good invest in the game, you must really OWN this game! You are not going to regret it!
DgO;-;Totally recommend! One of the best games ever! :D
ZombieElephant;-;This game starts out all well and good. It looks decent, the soundtrack is nice, and the intro quest is exciting (the first time). After about 4 hours I started to really notice how shallow it was though. Every quest seemed to involve going into a cave to kill bandits/zombies and retrieve item x to give to person y. You can be good at everything in the world with one character, from the worlds deadliest assassin to the leader of a group of werewolf warriors to the archmage of a college of magic. The combat never strays far from clicking rapidly until your health runs low, downing a few potions, repeat. Harder difficulties only make combat take longer, it doesnt actually make it harder.That being said there is quite an extensive mod community and everything thats "wrong" with the game has been fixed and everything you could ever imagine can be added to your game. tl;dr: Is it fun? Yes (with mods)
Six;-;I can't In good concience recommend this game, it promotes the worst type of greed and horrible business practices I've ever seen. Valve and Bethesda have officially killed modding. Hope you're happy you greedy s.
Bappish;-;Skyrim is the best game I've ever played and anyone who hasn't played it is missing out. There is so much to do and many different approaches you can take in the game. The questlines and individual quests are all fun in different ways, they are hugely varied. There are so many places to explore and the graphics are excellent, not to mention the fantastic music and voice acting. The DLCs are all of a very high standard, providing many more quests, lots more places to explore (even a separarte island), and different items to use, as well as powers. Anyone who likes to roam free in a game and take whatever approach they want in an incredible world should definitely get this game.
Norwegian;-;Paid mods were removed. Great game again. You should get it! Bethesda is an amazing community that actually LISTENS to it's community which is the thing I mostly adore about the company. The game is long, and tons of fun.
Anonymoose;-;My favourite game and the best game. /10
Mr. McSmelly;-;Pretty sure that this game is actually reality
Namikai;-;Skyrim is amazing and still stands as a hugely popular game today because of it's literally limitless amount of content. It offers tons of ways to build the characters you create and many ways to create those. There is never a shortage of things to do and when it seems like there might be you'll more than likely unearth an entire questline somewhere. You can play Skyrim for hundreds of hours before you even get to the DLC, which could add another 50 hours of content. And even when you're done with that there's a huge modding community still diligently working to provide enhancements and expansions to this almost four year old game. Mods can make a game from 2011 look like it was released yesterday and on top of that add many hours of community made storylines and extra quests. But do not think Skyrim is completely perfect, for delivering this amazing content spawns many kinds of issues, mods or not. Be prepared to deal with then. All in all though, Skyrim should be a favorite among all RPG fans and modders alike. Pro/con summary: +Hundreds of hours of content +Lots of ways to build characters +DLC is great +Still active modding community +Tons of NPCs, quests, and locations (see hundreds of hours of content) -Bugs/Crashes/Freezes -Looks less than desirable without graphical enhancement mods
Slovenian_Gamer;-;One word describes this game: EPIC!!! I mean this is the BEST RPG I have ever played in my whole life! It has so much depth to it, so many choices to be made, so many locations to visit, so many quests to complete, very big expansive and dynamic world of Skyri makes it the best game I have ever played. You can be whatever you like, you have an in-depth character customization, you can pick up almost everything you see in the game, and the whole world is open. No boundaries, just exploring the wast region of Skyrim. I played this game before on Xbox and I'm sure I spent at least 1000 hours in the game. But the game doesn't stop here, there are also cool DLC-s and tons of mods. So, If you want to have a really good invest in the game, you must really OWN this game! You are not going to regret it!
RAvE,  AKRacing;-;This game is so epic it will change your reality. Behold the power of The Dovahkiin (Dragonborn), be an Archer,mage,warrior,thief,vampire or werewolf.. everything you can imagine in dreams could be done in this game... umm keeping naughty thoughts aside though... you can choose from hundreds of mods to make your game look more epic.. I don't need to say any more.. Just buy it or get Fus Ro Dah'd.. :D
DgO;-;Totally recommend! One of the best games ever! :D
Six;-;I can't In good concience recommend this game, it promotes the worst type of greed and horrible business practices I've ever seen. Valve and Bethesda have officially killed modding. Hope you're happy you greedy s.
Mr.Choco;-;It's like Skyrim without guns
Intodadeep;-;Awesome game with nice graphics, the gameplay is amazing. Even though bethesda has got a reputation of releasing buggy and glitchy games, there are no real gamebreaking bugs. The two DLC's are amazing and the combat and magic system have seen a great improvement from The Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion. And the leveling system is also very well thought out. There are only some complaints that aren't even worth mentioning, exept that the AI can be really bad sometimes. The heartfire DLC gives you the oppertunity to built a house and have childeren. While Dawnguard DLC and the Dragonborn DLC give you new locations and 2 brand new storylines with both amazing and fun quests. Worth the money and you will play this for hours of time. 10/10!
Masenkoe;-;In its present state this game has become unacceptable. Mods must remain mods. Not DLC. EDIT: Paid mods gone. Skyrim confirmed for good again! Rejoice! Side note: The North Remembers. We shall never forget of these past few days.
Alechoc;-;This game will blow your mind with the intense action and packed landscapes!
Masenkoe;-;In its present state this game has become unacceptable. Mods must remain mods. Not DLC. EDIT: Paid mods gone. Skyrim confirmed for good again! Rejoice! Side note: The North Remembers. We shall never forget of these past few days.
Intodadeep;-;Awesome game with nice graphics, the gameplay is amazing. Even though bethesda has got a reputation of releasing buggy and glitchy games, there are no real gamebreaking bugs. The two DLC's are amazing and the combat and magic system have seen a great improvement from The Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion. And the leveling system is also very well thought out. There are only some complaints that aren't even worth mentioning, exept that the AI can be really bad sometimes. The heartfire DLC gives you the oppertunity to built a house and have childeren. While Dawnguard DLC and the Dragonborn DLC give you new locations and 2 brand new storylines with both amazing and fun quests. Worth the money and you will play this for hours of time. 10/10!
Majora101;-;Might as well write your will now. You won't be seeing your family for a while.
Shia LaBeouf;-;Bought this game 3 times,first on console then to PC for normal edition and now Legendary edition cuz obviously the almighty Gaben will give good deals. Spent over a few hundred hours on my Xbox and now with my PC. Definitely the best game to invest on before your exams, Altogether, the story is immersive and mods on pc makes it a bloody good game. Wasting lives since 2011 - 10/10 IGN
[CD]STARKILLER;-;Great super fun and fast way to murder your social life. 11/10 Only who keeps lighting the tourches and candles in ancient tombs and ruins? And how do ancient corpses keep reburying themselves? Who allows you to eat 50 raw potatoes mid fight? And where do u keep 200 potions and an aromry to equip a whole army in your inventory? Still best game ever.
Redsnapper;-;Lenny approves of this game. Bring your army, bob. 420/420 (   )(   )(   )(   )(   )
Mr.Choco;-;It's like Skyrim without guns
Elvis;-;Skyrim belongs to the nords ! 10/10 would be a storm cloack again.
SuperPlayer;-;Good without mods. Great with mods. <3
Copy That;-;If you bought this game and never played it, follow my steps. Step 1: Get some ENB's. Step 2: Look at pretty ENB's with new save. Step 3: Make the game your new friend. Step 4: Make the game your only friend. Step 5: Claim virginity for life. Step 6: Sell  (that floppy thing) to devil so you can keep playing.
HylleBaby (Away);-;Graphics 8/10 Pretty Good Gamplay 8/10 Magicka Stamina and Health bars work good Singleplayer 10/10 One of a kind Controls 6/10 Works Rich Single Player With Tons Of Side Quests And DLC`s And Many Good Mods
-Hankster-;-;Not even Bin Laden could blow it all up. Not even Ghandi could restore peace. Not even James Blunt's singing could kill Alduin out of Sovrengarde . Not even Akatosh could kill the Thalmor. But seriously, you are the Dragonborn that can turn your voice into a powerfull Shout (Thu'um), kill dragons and absorb their souls, Fus Ro Dah Hemskr off a cliff and you can't fight in water.
FireHeart;-;Fight the Fight in Old Skyrim! Beyond the frozen tundra lies the homeland of the Nords, where radiant stories bloom and you can dual-wield magic and swords, use perks just like in Fallout, defend the family that you've reared, kill dragon's just by shouting, and you can even have a beard! 11/10 would Skyrim again
Baker;-;Should get this.
xax;-;Fantastic game, definately worth the 15 euro(but its usually on sale) -good graphics -runs on ultra on a medium pc with good fps -lots of mods -free roaming -you can keep on going around doing wtf u want -u can customize ur character iz nice
Dumblydore;-;This game destroyed my social life aaaaaa
Acute Mania;-;5th Instalment in The Elder Scrolls series in which like previous instalments you will lose a lot of time playing it,because there is so much to do and explore and with all these FREE mods *cough* you can even extend that playtime or just refresh the replay value on your second/third/fourth playtrough. Ofcourse people are still sour from that fiasco with paid mods, but that shouldn't be the reason to downvote the game since the game itself was unaffected but you can't stop the coal train that easy when it picks up the speed. I'l keep this short because if you wan't more detailed review there is bound to be a bible lenght by somebody out there. Like any Bethesda/Obsidian open world game you will sink in so much time that for the price is not only worth it but highly recomended. SkyrimwithnoGuns/10
stLmpp;-;I did not think this game would be good, I though it was another RPG game (that I do not like) and I was surprised, really surprised. This game is in addictive, and with a great gameplay, history, charismatic characters, etc. I liked it so much. Recommended.
Mad Man With A Saxophone | DGN;-;Skyrim, a land of where you can do anything. I love Skyrim for its ability to turn hours into minutes. Yes, loading screens are everywhere it seems, but when you are exploring the terrain with clear blue skies and Lydia carrying all of your  life is good. Access to the console makes some things easier, or much harder depending on what you are doing. Countless hours spent looting dungeons, helping with the civil war, and even stealing everything in a shop by putting a cauldron over the NPC's head can be found within this game. The Workshop and Skyrim Nexus have loads of things to help, or hinder, the young Dovahkiin in their journey, but overall you can find just about anything you want. The graphics, even on low, are amazing, and each little story seems to be rich and full (even though it is just as simple as delivering something). I recommend this game for that it's stunning beauty plus the amount of quests and such that is within it is worth it. Just the base game alone is amazing, but getting the legendary edition is the way to go. Yes, the occasionally silly bug of a dragon skeleton dancing or your follower getting stuck in a river for all of eternity happens, but overall the game is extremely enjoyable. The constant conflict or sweet escape you can find within Skyrim is only a few of the things. Slaying dragons, learning magic, eating 1,000 cheese wheels, and killing Heimskr and Nazeem are always a pleasure within Skyrim, and it never seems to get old. Overall rating 9/10 The Graphics aren't potato quality Zor nau, Dovahkiins...
Zoma * Kinguin;-;It's a frozen nation, just to the north of where the previous game, Oblivion, took place. A pleasantly brief introduction sets up the plot: Skyrim is in the middle of a revolt, you've been sentenced to death, and dragons have just shown up. Good luck! At that point, you emerge from a cave into 40 square kilometres of cold and mountainous country, and that's it. Everything else is up to you. Even after spending hundreds of hours in Morrowind and Oblivion, the sense of freedom in Skyrim is dizzying. The vast mountains in every direction make the landscape seem limitless, and even after exploring it for 55 hours, this world feels huge and unknown on a scale neither of the previous two games did. Not all of the landscape is subzero, and even among the frosty climes there's an exciting variety: ice caverns that tinkle with dripping frost crystals, hulking mountains with curls of snow whipped up by the howling wind, coniferous forests in rocky river valleys. The mountains change everything. Wherever you decide to head, your journey is split between scrambling up treacherous rocks and skidding down heart-stopping slopes. The landscape is a challenge, and travel becomes a game. It's hard to walk for a minute in any direction without encountering an intriguing cave, a lonely shack, some strange stones, a wandering traveller, a haunted fort. These were sparse and quickly repetitive in Oblivion, but they're neither in Skyrim: it's teeming with fascinating places, all distinct. It was 40 hours before I blundered into a dungeon that looked like one I'd seen before, and even then what I was doing there was drastically different. These places are the meat of Skyrim, and they're what makes it feel exciting to explore. You creep through them with your heart in your mouth, your only soundtrack the dull groan of the wind outside, to discover old legends, dead heroes, weird artefacts, dark gods, forgotten depths, underground waterfalls, lost ships, hideous insects and vicious traps. It's the best Indiana Jones game ever made. The dragons don't show up until you do the first few steps of the game's main quest, so it's up to you whether you want them terrorising the world as you wander around. A world where you can crest a mountain to find a 40-foot flying lizard spitting jets of ice at the village below is a much more interesting one to be in. But fighting them never changes much: you can just ignore them until they land, then shoot them from a distance when they do. Your first dragon kill is a profound, weird moment. I rushed to the crashed carcass to loot it, then looked up. The whole town had come out to stand around and stare at the body, a thing as vast and alien to them as a T-rex in a museum. I tried shooting an ice bolt at it, just to demonstrate it was dead, and the force unexpectedly catapulted the whole thing violently into the distance. A beggar looked at me and said, "Oh sure, just throw your trash around." Your character gets better at whatever you do: firing a bow, sneaking up on people, casting healing spells, mixing potions, swinging an axe. There's always been an element of this practice-based system in Elder Scrolls games, but in Skyrim it's unrestricted - you don't have to decide what you're going to focus on when you create your character, you can just let it develop organically. That alone would feel a little too hands-off, but you also level up. When that happens, you get a perk point: something you can spend on a powerful improvement to a skill you particularly like. Every hour, you're making a major decision about your character's abilities. They're dramatic. The first point you put into Destruction magic lets you stream jets of flame from your hands for twice as long as before. As you continue to invest in one skill, you can get more interesting tweaks: I now have an Archery perk that slows down time when I aim my bow, and one for the Sneak skill that lets me do a stealthy forward roll. Again, the freedom is dizzying: every one of 18 skills has a tree of around 15 perks, and the range of heroes you could build is vast. I focused on Sneak to the point of absurdity - now I'm almost invisible, and I get a 3,000% damage bonus for backstabs with daggers. It's the play style I've always wanted in an RPG, but I've never been able to achieve it before. The enemies you encounter are, in some cases, generated by the game to match the level of your character. In Oblivion that sometimes felt like treading water: progress was just a stat increase, and your enemies kept pace. That doesn't apply now that your character is defined more by his or her perks, because the way you play is always changing. Levelled content is also just used less: at level 30, my most common enemies are still bandits with low-level weapons. And I still run into things too dangerous for me to tackle. Taking a narrow mountain path to a quest, something stops me in my tracks: a dragon roar. I check the skies - nothing, but I hear it again three more times before the peak. At the top I find a camp full of bodies, with a large black bear roaring over them. Hah. He's still more than I can handle in straight combat, but as he reaches me I use a Dragon Shout. It befriends any animal instantly, and he saunters casually away. Feeling slightly guilty, I stab him in the back before it wears off. Which is when the dragon lands, with an almighty crash, six feet from my face. A roar of frozen air catches me in the back, but I keep going - over a ridge, down a short drop, and straight into a bandit. I dodge the bandit, straight into a Flame Atronarch. There are five more bandits behind it. The dragon is airborne. I throw myself off the mountain, several hundred metres into the river below. I plummet to the riverbed, and swim until I run out of breath. When I surface, the sky is alight with fireballs and flaming arrows, the dragon is spewing a stream of ice down on the bandits, and I'm laughing. The stealthy character I built in Skyrim would have been less fun in Oblivion. Whether you were detected was a binary and erratic matter. Skyrim cleverly gives you an on-screen indication of how suspicious your enemies are, and where they are as they hunt for you. It makes stealth viable even against large groups: if you're rumbled, you can retreat and hide. And there's a slow, methodical pace to it - long minutes of tension broken by sudden rushes of gratification or panic. Magic, meanwhile, has been given an incredible crackle of raw power. Emperor Palpatine would be a level one mage in Skyrim - unleashing two torrents of thrashing electrical arcs is literally the first trick you learn, and it doesn't even get you tossed into a reactor shaft. One tweak is a huge loss, though: you can't design your own spells. Oblivion's spellmaking opened up so many clever possibilities - now you're mostly restricted to what you can buy in shops. While we're on the negatives, physical combat hasn't improved much. There are cinematic kill moves when your enemy is low on health, but whether they trigger seems to be either random or dependent on whether the pre-canned animation fits into the space you're in. Too much of the time, you wave your weapon around and enemies barely react to the hits. The exception is archery: bows are now deliciously powerful!
ChaseTheWolf;-;i am so addicted to this game! its the best game! i love it. i also get to cheat a little because of the console commands! this game is the BOMB!
Iwata;-;Better than Hitman Absolution.
Yolk'Zar;-;Like Skyrim with guns.
Jorreborr;-;This game is one of the best games ever. It has a high replay value because you can do everything different each time you play a new game (sure the beginning almost goes the same but after a while it's like you're writing your own story) :D Be warned: you'll probably lose your social life!
AndyDX;-;You can talk with dogs. 12/10
Abbe;-;mods.. just mods sweetrolls and dragons
garvinmarvin;-;Had a life, oops now it's gone. Thanks Skyrim!
Gandalf the Goat;-;Whoever said the best things in life are free was wrong.
(Merc)ChaosKnight;-;Oh, there once was a hero named Ragnar the Red Who came riding to Whiterun from ole Rorikstead And the braggart did swagger and brandish his blade As he told of bold battles and gold he had made But then he went quiet, did Ragnar the Red When he met the shield-maiden Matilda, who said; "Oh, you talk and you lie and you drink all our mead Now I think it's high time that you lie down and bleed!" And so then came clashing and slashing of steel As the brave lass Matilda charged in, full of zeal And the braggart named Ragnar was boastful no more- When his ugly red head rolled around on the floor!
UncreativeBoyZz #rektbyhippies;-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you do it again. 10/10
Jetstream Sam _;-;Texture Mods, ENBs, and all sorts of other mods make an otherwise dull game with dated graphics into one of the greatest things PC gaming has to offer, next to Fallout 3 and New Vegas.
[HERO]Angell;-;One of the best ever RPGs
[aVo] Raikou;-;If you don't own this game I feel sorry for you
Kidd Wickidd;-;This game is the reason modders live!!! On its own, straight out of the box - it's a good game and worth buying. Play it through in it's "vanilla" state to completion, then go get some mods and start again - brand new friggin' game!!!! The possibilities for replay are endless, mostly in thanks to the modders, but Bethesda has not been shy in handing them the tools, so they deserve some credit too. I seriously can't wait to see what they put out next, but I am just going to keep playing Skyrim until they do
Bane;-;Sexy
killa beez;-;it's like far cry 3 without guns
FIGJAM!;-;This one's a favorite of mine. A legend we all know and love...
Charlie Brown;-;best game ever, with the AP Mod and few of the best individual standalone Female Followers *Wink* *Wink*, EVERYTHING IS POSSIBLE
General Botz;-;I killed a dragon, it died, i got soul, i powerful.
El Pap;-;Totaly recommend. Lovely made, with an huge open world. 300hours + on cracked savegame. Never finished Story with my lvl 66 char... One of the best games I ever played. (Graphic mods and ENB's make it even more epic)
Canti;-;Few games can compare in terms of content to Skyrim, this has been true since the first Elder Scrolls games which were also regarded as highly ambitious for their time, dropping players into huge, open worlds to explore with no shortage of quests to undertake and treasure to find. The world changes around you depending on your actions, NPC's can die and never come back and a lot of dialog choices have drastic consequences. The game is played mostly in 1st-person, but can be switched to 3rd-person camera if you want, depending on your preference. Single-handed weapons allow you to use the right-mouse button to hold up a shield, but there are also two-handed weapons as well as bows and crossbows. Various materials and enchantments with different effects mean a huge amount of customization can be done with your equipment. The graphics are gorgeous, very few locations look the same and it is a visual treat for the eyes with a massive variety of environments to explore. The attention to detail is just mind-blowing, considering just how big the world is. It's matched by an equally epic soundtrack, although I found that there wasn't enough diversity in the music and started to get tired of hearing some particular tracks multiple times. Unfortunately, the game is crawling with bugs and I don't just mean giant spiders. Quest lines frequently get stuck, assets will warp and spazz out all over the place, the physics engine sometimes gives up and throws furniture everywhere... Some of these can actually prevent quests from being completed at all. I recommend it anyway, though, because there just isn't anything out there quite like the Elder Scrolls games. Bugs aside, it has enough unique content to keep you busy for a long time, more than enough to justify the price tag of the "Legendary" edition.
Billetjes;-;You just need this game! Never really played an RPG before, but damn this game is cool! 20/10
Bazuso The Grey Knight;-;A great archeology game, the world is massive, but the dig sites are extremely hard to find. I played for quite a while, but i could only find different types of ores. I'm really not sure how to find fossils yet. Great easter egg in the game too! Dragons! Haha Pretty funny!
Metal_Gear_Chikkun;-;Ok! It's time to finally review this masterpiece; now that i'm 400+ hours into my first playthrough, that is Skyrim has a lot of good things going for it; I'll list my top 3 1) The Exploration--exploration has always been top-tier for me in Elder Scrolls games. Here Skyrim, like the other ES games I've played, does not disappoint. The world is ginormous, tons of places to go, quite varied topography and regions, graphics of course are gorgeous despite the occasional clipping error, very forgivable. 2) The Perks--Skyrim is the first ES game with a dedicated Perk tree and if you're familiar with perks in other games, Skyrim's tree is similar--the perks are great, many to which I said 'Oh nice! They are gonna let me do that!' Perks give a player a good reason to continually level up, to get that next perk point they need...just one...more... 3) The Writing--while nothing stands up to Bioware writing in my book, Skyrim has excellent RPG writing and quests, continuing the strong standards set in the previous games. While I'm not a fan of the main story in any ES game I've played so far, Skyrim and the others make up for that by giving a plethora of well-rounded written quests with a very respectable main questline this time, better than Morrowind & Oblivion's. What I love most about Skyrim's writing, though, is the centuries-deep backstory and history of what has happened in the host country of Tamriel since Oblivion. It is rich and detailed and some of the in-game books you can read are not to be missed, some will just crack you up. There is a lot more to say about this game but in general, you will enjoy it if you like exploration, dungeon-crawling, or racking up phat lewtz, which tends to happen a lot. Add customizable houses (If you get Hearthfire or Legendary edition), a finally good magic system, dual-wielding weapons or spells (a first to the series), the entire mod spectrum for PC players, pretty decent allied AI, and nearly infinite leveling with Legendary, Skyrim will have you playing almost forever...or till you drop dead or quit going to work, either quite likely imo. Skyrim is a relationship breaker, I'm sorry, it just is, learn to deal with it. The clincher? Those of you looking for a nice long RPG to sink time into, I spent my first 200 hours simply exploring the world, doing some side quests but mainly just following riverbanks or roads, clearing everything along the way, didn't even down my first dragon until 225 or so, and even then I'd only uncovered half the map. Add in the 2 big expansion packs and you will be set for a long while. And that's just the official non-mod content. Wait for a sale to buy Legendary edition, it is so worth it.
FatBatMan;-;Worst dating sim. One mammoth tusk? Ysolda, you slet.
RaShayRitto;-;You can mod it to be naked people
spaghetti and memeballs;-;I have no words to describe the amazing, in-depth, epic gameplay this masterpeice has to offer.
Jon0u;-;Better than Call Of Duty: Ghost.
Nebula|Scotty;-;Much better than Elder Scrolls Online. Bestheda have screwed up with that but you can still playthrough skyrim, over and over again. The game is getting old but i highly recommend installing mods from the steam workshop. They make the experience even more fun!
Chizel_Duck;-;IF you like rpg first/third person games and most of all free roam than skyrim is a game for you. sure the story isnt as well developed as oblivion was but the number of mods and the detail in side quests makes this game get an A+ in my books sure the graphics arent as good as the crysis series but after all the game was made in 2007. one more thing the game tends to have many bugs
Lynx;-;Magnificent game. Pros: - endless possibilities of creating your own, unique character - enormous and addictive world to explore - great story - interesting side quests - soundtrack - nice graphics Cons: - bugs - might be too overwhelming at the beginning
Starsailor;-;Once you played, you can't stop
501st Wanted Hero;-;This Game, is absolutely worth whatever money you are paying for During your time here you will be sent to time where swords and bows were powerful, and magic reigned The main story line is long enough yourself, but once its finished, there are more than 100 side quests for you to complete, keeping you busy for quite a while ALL in ALL this game is worth buying, it will keep you busy for a while and is just generally fun to play
Salem Saberhagen;-;Love this game to bits! and on pc it is even better with mods and such.
kakotan;-;This is by far the deepest RPG I have ever played. No this is not the type of game eliest like cause they want just combat to be only thing that matters. This game has nice combat for a RPG. Best I played other then Dark Souls. Dark Souls are for those who just want the rpg combat. This game delievers everything else and more. The biggest fantysy map i have ever explored. The DLC is a ton of fun. Then once you play all that. There is a large mod community for this game. You can make food and armor, weapons, and other items. This game can be played in so many ways. There is no wonder it is the most sought after game on the RPG market. Get this and play this game. You will not regret it.
kremit;-;This game is just excellent. The GUI is hard to use and even version 1.9 is glitchy, but its great fun.
dadiller;-;5775 hrs on record. Need I say more. Woot.
Tentacle-Kun;-;This game is ing  very small map no mages not much to do mabey around 4 quests 7 main story quests theres barly and dragons anywere but when they pop out you can blow in there ear and die horrible game 10/10
hamoudi4u #New PC;-;Best RPG Game U Should Play it
Whiterabbit-uk;-;My first impressions......Brilliant. The character models are a big improvement on Oblivion, the environments look even more amazing and things like bump mapping add even more realism to the game. I've only just started playing the game so this is just a taster. I wanted to say get this game if you like RPG, Fantasy or open world games, it's probably going to be the game of the year ahead of games like Sonic Generations, Red Faction Armageddon, Crysis 2, Battlefield 3, Shogun 2, Call of Duty Black Ops and Modern Warfare 3 to name just a few releases this year. I like the lock picking process compared to Oblivions method; they have used the coding from Fallout and re skinned it. I'm not sure about the new inventory system yet; and I do miss the ability to customise the character I choose to play. Apparently Kotaku found that for every Call of Duty MW3 player there was 10 Skyrim players on its first day of release. Another innovation with this new Elder Scro
OPPRESSIVE MISOGYNISTIC PIG;-;When someone thinks about Skyrim, they might think of Dragons. When I think of Skyrim, I think of extreme, violent sex scenes.
Zin-Zalo;-;Shot my horse in the butt with an arrow and gained a level. 10/10
minikane;-;10/10 Amazing single player game! Hours and Hours of gameplay. simply a MUST have game!
Runetwist;-;In the first hour of playing the game I acidently killed a chicken then everyone in the town came to get revenge for it. 20/10
Clara Hawkins;-;The Best i ever player no matter how many times i play i never get booring its jst Awesome evryone should try it im sure u'll love it
The Outlaw Josey Wales;-;And god said Let there be light, on the first day, he made this game.
Imperator Cuniculus;-;Awesome game, when you start playing it, you just can't stop.
Faxter;-;Overall: Great fun. If you like exploring, roaming and looting, this is definately the game for you. Skyrim is a huge place, where you'll find mostly scandinavian-like countryside, but still a huge variety of ambience and style. I did not really play this for the story, it is kinda interesting, but not too deep and pretty short. The main part of the game (at least for me) is roaming, sidequests and exploring. There are quite some generic misc-quests which will send you into a dungeon you then finish and return the quest. This might get boring after a while. However it is very exciting for a lot of dungeons. The Dwemer ruins especially are awesome. But still, if you find yourself stuck with boring quests, there is the Steam-Workshop loaded with free mods and/or custom made questlines. Potential for hundreds of hours of gameplay!
BasedGod;-;This game is the very definition of sex
Blaze Gaming (Holo);-;Skyrim... Oh my where to start... Helgan would be a great place to start seeming that's the first town you see in the game, and my oh my it's one of many, and I mean many! Skyrim is a fantastic open world, free roam game in which you create a character to help you complete the hundred, maybe even thousands of main story, and side quests! In Skyrim you play however you want to play as, be it a Mage, Archer, Warrior, even a Human Cat! You can go where you want, when you want with use of Skyrims fast travel, but if you really want, how about you just get there on foot, meet some people on the way, maybe you meet someone who needs help, maybe you meet someone who is out to kill you! It's all possible in Skyrim! Skyrim is one of my all time favourite games, when I'm bored, I play skyrim because even though I have played it for 100+ hours, I'm always finding new places, new people, new missions and more! Also Skyrim has the steam workshop and the nexus mod community behind it's back, so if you do get bored with Vanilla Skyrim, there are Thousands of downloadable quests and mods to keep you entertained for hours on end! Final rating of TES:Skyrim : 9.8/10
Lizumi;-;Skyrim, it seems, is a game that people buy expecting it to be the best or the worst game ever. When they plunge in, most people think it's very good, with its beautiful world, a story that's pretty good (in my opinion), and nice atmospheric music. After you plug in several buttloads of hours, though, it starts to lose its appeal, and gets repetitive. The game mechanics are all very nice, although the combat usually ends up just mindlessly hacking/spurting magic at your enemies. Playing as a sneaky thief, however, might help make it more interesting, with bows and whatnot. The story might seem kind of ehhh, but really, I just like the lore. All things considered, Skyrim is definitely a worthwhile game.
Galatians 2:20;-;Skyrim is one of the greatest games I've ever played, and with a handful of mods it is probably the single greatest game in my modest Steam library. For me, it's all about immersion. The land of Skyrim is richly atmospheric, as many games are, but it is also organic. From the most mundane cellars to the windswept mountaintops and everything that lies between, the land of Skyrim was painstakingly crafted, with equal parts skill and love, to be a living and breathing place. Find a tavern and take a seat, and the little village lives on without you. You'll find yourself, even on second or third characters, discovering new conversations and overhearing new dialogue; you'll stumble into new random events, and forge brand new paths to the same old objectives. The very landscape, even, takes on new angles as your characters develop into different people with different direction, loyalties, and perspectives. I have never actually completed the main storyline of Skyrim. This is due not only various glitches that make missions unable to accomplish (most of these caused by conflicting mods, not the game in its original state), but also because only very rarely are you ever pressed to follow the structured storylines or sidequests. From the beginning, you can choose to join the Nords or the Imperials and see where each path takes you. You can join a number of guilds. But neutrality, or even hostility towards these parties, is completely possible and maybe even preferable after a few playthroughs. Skyrim is made even better through a number of mods. ENBs and texture enhancements, bug fixes, user created quests, companions, armor and weapons, and even entire islands to explore - there are literally thousands of mods available and in a very brief time one can accumulate hundreds and consider many of them to be absolutely must have... Many mods exist to cater to whatever your thing or niche might be. As a History and Anthropology student, I thought itd be cool if the Imperials didn't just emulate soldiers of the Roman Empire, but actually looked like them. I was part of the Historical Revival team as an artist and historical consultant  our mod, which also includes some Celtic and Eastern equipment and weaponry, received over a thousand endorsements from the Nexus community before we abandoned the project. During Holiday Sales, Skyrim is hitting the $10 mark (or possibly even lower). For the layers upon layers of entertainment this game offers, it is almost criminal to not own this game.
lovegirly2014;-;i love this game if u havent play it u are in wrong time its awesome both with mods and not with mods :)
frame;-;"Frostfall" mod is highly recommended to improve immersion. Adds hypothermia, cold water survival, and camping equipment.
Kamez;-;Probably the best open-world RPG out there. Definitely one of my all-time favourite games. The replayability is superb and the modding community is highly active, which makes it easy to play the game the way you want to play it. For me the modding experience has been the greatest aspect of the game. You can easily make the game graphics look like up to date games (as long as you have a decent graphics card). The atmosphere in the game and the way the game feels alive is something that will keep amaze you throughout the game. It really feels like a living world, even though you will stumble upon bad or awkward NPC movements and behaviour (but mods can help fix this). The music and voice acting is as good as it can get. If you like RPGs there are no reasons why you shouldnt own this game already. 10/10.
rresuggan;-;really enjoying this game, better than fallout nv
[OPTIC]DrPhil<ToysRus.org>;-;How to be a 50's dad Step 1: Buy the hearthfire DLC Step 2: Adopt a child from the orphanage Step 3: Drink untill your liver is on the brink of failure Step 4: Take out your fist Step 5 : Proceed to take your fist and RAM it in to your child's face Step 6: Tell your child to get a "God Damn job"even though they are probably just 6 and then call your child a  Step 7: If your child gets asked anything they have to say they "fell down the stairs" To be a 50's husband do the same exact thing execpt for steps 1, 2, 5, and 6
SVarg;-;Do not support paid mods. Stop it at very beginning, don't buy it. ------------------------------------------------------------------------ This remains as a reminder in case these are coming back.
Jennifer Lawrence;-;im butthurt
some dude with a gun;-;paid mods is in not a bad idea in itself but the 75% cut by bestheda and valve is ridicolous. a donate button would be much more suitable
Silver.exe - Gone;-;The MOD paywall has made this fun-customized game into something of a cash cow. Very disappointing.
Panda;-;I am the PandaBorn. FUS RO DAH!
Doctor Dove;-;Now lets all thank Bethesda for supporting mod buying at 25% profit.
JimmmyB;-;in the past i would have easily recommended this game due to the games bugs and short comings being made up for by mods . however now with the introduction of paid mods i will judge the game by itself Pros +open world +hours of quests +reasonably interesting storylines +fully voiced (with the exception of your character) Cons -there are a lot of quest breaking bugs in the game that can occur for several reasons -repetitive combat -repetitive enemies (be prepared to fight about 10000+ draugr) -limited spells -spell casting system ruins immersure (e.g using healing magic means opening the menu equiping the spell to 1 of ur 2 hands using the spell then reopening the menu then reequiping ur old spell, sword, shield etc) -painfully obvious console port (menu and interface designed for console, very different from oblivion) -solutions to quests are more often than not to kill something or a bunch of somethings, then bring something back -fighting dragons is fun at first but quickly gets tedious (oh look another dragon but this one shouts at you in a different colour and takes an additional 14 sword swings to kill)
Katch;-;Really paid workshop content? how bout you go  yourself Vavle...
Johnny Reb;-;paid mods can lick my . rip skyrim but my heart will go on. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KolfEhV-KiA&index=128&list=WL
Fen the space... Pirate?;-;Paid mods. This game lost me just now.
creatiOn;-;White Jesus wouldn't ask people to start paying for mods.
Artylius;-;No to paid mods!
Kelvy;-;I recommend this game to all. I must admit working through all the pain of ridding it of glitches and crashes is now fun, no more anger management consulting as before. Now I look more closely at what is written and find the faults readily. Now I just seem to know exactly where they are or where they come from. Except for that random CTD but I think I have that one sorted now, fingers crossed. I still enjoy the game over two years on.
Nigguv8;-;God this game is like a sponge for badness, it took all the horrible features from a great game like Call of Duty: Black Ops, put it in this game,  on it, and boom you made the game. Idk what Bathsalts was thinking when they made this horrible abomination but it sure is horrible. The story makes no sense, you play as an abroted dog that was brought back to life to go back in time and assassinate George Washington in order to free the slaves, with your set of toothpicks that are expensive as hell and break(atleast not until you've spent all your skill points on toothpicking) when you try to open a locked bathroom door. I gave it a 10/10 because i'm a ing idiot.
TmP Riddler;-;Well to start all the Elder Scroll Games are really just horrible to watch unless you have already played them and can understand them while watching. And despite the fact that the game doesn't look very action packed once you get into you are in great battles were you need to use tactics and smarts along with some skill to beat them, in the start yes all it is is run here hit him 2 times and bam he is dead, but as you reach lets say lvl 10 (maybe a half and hour of running around caves, not even) you end up having to use tactics not on your right trigger or mouse. Along with the amazing combat there are 1000's of quests which all have there own detailed back story, and there are also 4 guilds, 3 branches, and 1 main line which each have there own detailed rich and emotional back story that is as i describe it like a book, where every mission is like a cliff hanger and once you finally find a break point, it's 7 hours later and you just did like 20 quests. Then the treasures, the goal to become rich beyond everyone sucks you in where you need to steal from everyone to increase your coin purse by only 500 gold sucks you in till the point where you end up murdering a whole city for there stuff. Plus there is a huge world covered in towns and mining camps and caves that you can explore when ever you would like to filled with magical treasures and plot twists. And finally every player can create a character that they see them selves as training skills and grinding levels(which is the only game i have enjoyed grinding levels on) s you personalize your character to be the amazing hero you wish you could be.
lolschrauber;-;I punched a chicken and then got my  kicked by an unarmed woman
HaTsUnE_NeKo;-;I spent a bit of time in this game played around for a bit. learned some new tricks. Must say from my other TES games i have played, this is by far the most fun. I still play morrowind and Oblivion to this day. Steam is no where near the actual hours i have spent in those other games, Now as for Skyrim. would i recommend this game to anyone? Yes i would. and why would i do that. Well for starters, its mod friendly, and i do mean friendly. once you get a mod sorter to help with errors and mismatches and putting them in a proper loading order, this game becomes more than just Skyrim. it becomes a life of its own. With player created content this game could live on, and get better every year, not with the Devs help but by the Modding community. If this was a Game Dev Tycoon game, it would get that 11/10 rating. Its just that good, so good infact that i deleted my 2012 review and completely redid it. even right now, i watch youtube videos on mods to get my game to that next level. I even wiped clean my current Skyrim to get ready for a realistic game play this time around, i wanted everything fresh and clean as i piled mods on to make my game better. this will take me a couple days to get ready but once i jump in. ill be gone for a while. Some games are just so good, you go wow. whats next. all i can say is, thanks bethesda I hope Fallout 4 is as good or better than Skyrim. you got some big shoes to fill now. until then Skyrim, Morrowind, Oblivion, TESO, New Vegas, Fallout 3 will be getting a lot of my time. more so Skyrim though hehehe oh yea Buy Skyrim!!! YOU WILL NEVER REGRET IT EVER! we now bring you back to your normal programing, Arrow to the knee special
starwarclon;-;skyrim a world filled with so much snow you're would think your on hoth
some dude with a gun;-;paid mods is in not a bad idea in itself but the 75% cut by bestheda and valve is ridicolous. a donate button would be much more suitable
Jennifer Lawrence;-;im butthurt
Silver.exe - Gone;-;The MOD paywall has made this fun-customized game into something of a cash cow. Very disappointing.
Kinny;-;Skyrim is defenitely one of the best games i've ever played. The story, the awesome and big as hell open world, the way your actions have consequences, the almost infinite quests and all the awesome armor and weapons and other cool stuff you can find in this world is what makes this games almost perfect!
WolferS;-;Good Game Rate Up +
[EST]Sickness;-;Shout at dragons and take everything .
Sanic;-;Write a review for The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim
Hemzok (  );-;To begin with this one of the best if not even the very best game I've ever played. Graphics are gorgeous, and breath taking. Game is based on Open world system which is done perfectly, thus there is option to fast travel, it is actually very entertaining to travel on foot, hence the landscapes are vivid and inimitable. The land is actually full of believable and well made locations, there is no feeling of boredness like in most of Open world RPG's. The whole game world is just so intense, it lives on it's own, every NPC does it's daily basis, and have a story to tell. The main plot isn't maybe so gripping as in the plot based game, however except the simple side quests the game consists few extensive and separate side story lines, and those are usually better than the main quest line. More over the game can take a lot of various mods, which can improve or revamp any aspect of the game, especially the ENB mod is a must have if You are into visuals. Despite that game is almost the perfect in all aforementioned terms, it has a few flaws. Firstly the leveling system, although it works well up to about 30 lvl after that some enemies are just prevented from leveling, thus fighting with them is becoming boring, and the loot in this case is useless. Secondly, combat styles are unbalanced, for example magic is weak at the beginning, then it gets overpowered, and then again it becomes weaker than everything else, because it cannot be improved after some point, unlike the conventional combat methods which in theory can be upgraded to infinity. Another minor disadvantage is the AI, enemies are truly dumb if it comes to sneaking, they can take "an arrow in the knee" and after 15 seconds they say something like "oh, it must have been wind". And of course like in every gigantic project it has to contain some bugs, most of them have been fixed, and there is no major bugs with completing the game like in fallout, but sometimes some quest item get's stuck in inventory after finishing the quest, and just clutters it. But like I mentioned before game is extremely moddable, so most of bugs can be prevented with mods, and unbalanced combat system can be overhauled. And if we consider that Skyrim is so extensive game we can overlook those minor flaws and enjoy one of the greatest if not the very greatest game on this generation. ++Visuals (+++Visuals with ENB) ++Believable world ++Decent and vast DLC's ++Incredibly moddable +Physics +Audio +Story-line +Well optimized performance in vanilla game +/- Modding is not easy as it seems, and it is time consuming, however it's worth it +/- AI - A couple of minor bugs - Unbalanced combat system in vanilla game
MalloryKnox.;-;A game that enables you to play as either gender and personalise your character to the last detail is always going to gain my interest. A game where you can ride horses, use magic and beat the  out of dragons is definitely going to gain my interest. A game that isn't linear, is packed with fantasy and lets you wear badass armour and make or find formidable weaponry is.... yeah, you get the point. Skyrim is just so full of everything that you couldn't play it the same way twice. Right from the beginning, you can choose the type of person you are going to be. A sneaky thief, a wizard, a hero, an assassin, an annoying git; you can follow whichever path you feel like and change it daily, if you want to. You can build houses and adopt children. You can punch random people in the head. You can start bar fights. You can murder innocents. You can adopt stray doggies. You can marry in a same sex marriage (well played for beating the UK at this). You can save villages. You can wreak havoc in villages. You can make enemies of an entire race of people. You can assassinate kings or make them kiss your butt. I could go on... Even if you dislike the concept of magic and prefer the 'down and dirty' physical combat like I do, the game does not disappoint. The storyline retains its relevance throughout and keeps you absorbed. And I haven't even mentioned the incredible, contrasting scenery yet. Highly, highly, recommended. I didn't even LIKE RPGs before I played Skyrim, and now I am searching in vain for a game to live up to it.
Raymond Tracer;-;ing lol this game is a joke
HaTsUnE_NeKo;-;I spent a bit of time in this game played around for a bit. learned some new tricks. Must say from my other TES games i have played, this is by far the most fun. I still play morrowind and Oblivion to this day. Steam is no where near the actual hours i have spent in those other games, Now as for Skyrim. would i recommend this game to anyone? Yes i would. and why would i do that. Well for starters, its mod friendly, and i do mean friendly. once you get a mod sorter to help with errors and mismatches and putting them in a proper loading order, this game becomes more than just Skyrim. it becomes a life of its own. With player created content this game could live on, and get better every year, not with the Devs help but by the Modding community. If this was a Game Dev Tycoon game, it would get that 11/10 rating. Its just that good, so good infact that i deleted my 2012 review and completely redid it. even right now, i watch youtube videos on mods to get my game to that next level. I even wiped clean my current Skyrim to get ready for a realistic game play this time around, i wanted everything fresh and clean as i piled mods on to make my game better. this will take me a couple days to get ready but once i jump in. ill be gone for a while. Some games are just so good, you go wow. whats next. all i can say is, thanks bethesda I hope Fallout 4 is as good or better than Skyrim. you got some big shoes to fill now. until then Skyrim, Morrowind, Oblivion, TESO, New Vegas, Fallout 3 will be getting a lot of my time. more so Skyrim though hehehe oh yea Buy Skyrim!!! YOU WILL NEVER REGRET IT EVER! we now bring you back to your normal programing, Arrow to the knee special
starwarclon;-;skyrim a world filled with so much snow you're would think your on hoth
Freelance Autist;-;Like Far Cry 3, without guns.
lolschrauber;-;I punched a chicken and then got my  kicked by an unarmed woman
Sancho;-;Best game I've ever played...EVER!
Azor Ahai;-;Pretty much the greatest.
kubikajiri;-;You hear that? It's the winds of .  mods Randy,  mods.
UberMegaIceIceBaby9000;-;Pay 5 dollars to mod in a good reveiw.
kountervibe;-;The only way to make this game and any bethesda game good is with mods, and I mean, lots of mods, I usually end up using about 60+ mods, that means the game end up costing 200+ USD easily, and can go even greater. Never buying another bethesda game again, and that saddens me a lot, because the TESO and FO series have a special place in my heart.
Un4tural;-;an amazing title now turned to micro transaction orgy. well worth it for core game, even though bethesda doesn't deserve a penny for their business practices.
Haidar Alo Ali;-;Paid mods are a disgrace.
OACobalt;-;It's frankly a low quality game, one unsupported entirely by its publishers and entirely reliant on its community for both patching and additional content. In this day and age, people should expect this from Bethesda, who have a history of lying about the origins of their game engines, failing to innovate, and making grandiose promises in the style of Molyneux about procedural content that ends up being lackluster while replacing handwritten things of much higher quality in previous games. Of course, all this would normally be quite forgiveable because of how truly excellent their community is - unfortunately, I must now no longer credit them for that community, because Bethesda has shown a callous disregard for that community's wellbeing, and has decided that instead of supporting said community they'd much rather make a profit off it. So no - do not buy this game. Do not ever buy any Bethesda game. They aren't worth it anymore.
RetroSatyr;-;Paid mods this time? Hurting the community as a whole. I'm all for helping modders make money but scamming them in the process? tsk tsk. Its a great game and we can still support the modders? Why not just include a donations page to the modders when you go to download the mod?
Carl;-;This is PC not consoles. Stop ing with the mods. Go milk the dumbtards on psn or xblive and leave things as they are were here.
Knuffel-sama;-;Skyrim is in general a good game. Sadly the Steam Version its appeal with the new paid mods system. So i cant recommend this anymore.
Fenrial;-;Remember when Cities: Skylines added paid mods as an April fools joke? Haha, how we all laughed... no ones laughing now are they?
Contradictions;-;Great game. Amazing game with the best quality you can get for a fantasy RPG. This game has been around for a long time, the DLC are a okay, but I would like to see them actually added to the game. The game has so much content and each character (NPC) has a whole backstory. It must've taken a long time to make and that is why they shouldn't have added a PAID WORKSHOP. PAID WORKSHOP - YOU "SUPPORT" FOR THE USER MADE ITEMS. What is the point of that? To encourage the workshop? The whole point of the workshop is to enjoy the free content that is given. It is basically adding tons of DLC to the game. I personally would not want 1,000 DLC in a great game. I know this feature is probably never going to be removed, but rather than encouraging people to list workshop items, it is discouraging the use of the workshop. Now the free items are all going to be absolute horrible, and the paid items are going to be maybe $1 per workshop item. These items get you aesthetic armor, fancy looking weapons, and improvements. I feel like the only thing that would actually fit in to the base game and not stnad out like crazy is the improvements. Graphic changes are nice and I like the effort to make them but I don't like the corruption that will spread through buying these. If people want to make a living off of making content, then join a company. If you want to have people enjoy the items of the workshop, then do it! But don't make someone have to pay for someone's works on a game that isn't theirs, it will be awful. The content may be decent and could've taken some time but I, and most others would not want to pay $.50 per one useless armor set. This "useless armor set", on the other hand, would be really cool if I browsed the FREE workshop and said, "Oh look, this looks pretty cool! Let me try it out!" I might like it and I might keep it. Most everyone uses mods for skyrim. Skyrim is so much based on mods and that is why everyone loves it! Do you really think people are going to like it for DLC? No. That isn't why the workshop was created. The workshop's purpose is diminishing, yes poeple can make their own works, but now it isn't open to everyone. Only people who are willing to act as if it is worth it. Games update for free with MUCH more content than a simple workshop item. The most I would do to help these people is add a donation button, but please do not make what everyone loves into a worthless DLC marathon for cheap aesthetic money-wasters. I love what Steam is doing to show they care for these people making the listings in the workshop, but this was a bad idea and needs to be approached differently. - Contra
Killahillnga;-;Don't invest any time with this game, I've spent a week trying to fix the random crash to desktop issue. Nothing works, and yes, I've tried all of it.
Hosey;-;My full review is availible on steam workshop for $29.99
Scarlette Rose;-;That paywall is starting, do not buy buy this game and cause a collapse of modding, wait until Valve changes or removes the policy until then...
Can't Wake Up;-;8.8/10 "It was okay" - IGN
Kaaji;-;Good game. Greater with mods, However I do not endorse paid mods, Mods are from the community to the community, not by the official developers, or granted by valve, also they don't offer support. Was such a good game, if you still have it, or play it please consider when to use the workshop, you can also use good mod sites nexusmods.com Also if you do not endorse this new pay method you can go to https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop and try to change this.
Relo;-;Game 9/10 Mod support 1/10 Bad review due to the current mod market implementation and subject to change if the market does... Good modders deserve to get paid, I will not doubt that, but the system in place now is terrible. A full on paywall is a terrible way to do things with the nature of mods and how easily they break, corrupt and sometimes do not work with other mods. All this is is going to do is cause problems with the modding community, before if there was a problem it was no big deal, it was free, just uninstall and move on. Now that some of these will be paid for, there will be many angry people when things do not work or take to long to be updated after a gamebreaking patch. Aside from that, the modders get nothing from this deal but pocket change. As it currently is set up, 75% goes to Bethesda and Valve while only 25% goes to the modder. This is a bad deal, made worse by the fact that Valve only pays you after $100.00 in sales earned. One would have to sell 400 copys of something at $1.00 to even get paid at all, not only is that crappy but it will inflate prices so modders can cover the loss and hopefully get paid sooner instead of a year later when that money cap is hit. Also, why does Bethesda get any of the money? They deserve none of it at all. Now, before some of you get up in arms saying it is Bethesdas game, they have rights to it and so on, think for a moment. You bought the game, you own it, not Bethesda, it is paid for... In this current logic, if we applied it to a car, you take your car in to get some window tint and rims, a car modification of sorts, then the money you paid to have it done is split 25% to the mechanic who did all the work, and 75% split between the place those parts were stored and the cars manufacturer. The deal should only be between the mechanic, storage and the customer no? Why does the manufacturer get a cut here, they did nothing but build the car you paid for already... So yes, this system is stupid. Set up donation tabs for the modders, if not, cut Bethesda out and give the modders the lions share of the profit, they did the work here.
TheAlbinoAmigo;-;I cannot recommend this game when mods are paid for, and the mod creators geta meager 25% of the cut. The creators deserve at least 80% of the cut and some mods are practically necessary to fix the game to begin with (Yes, Bethesda, you haven't avoided the well-deserved blame, too).
benboisdbest;-;Up until today Skyrim and the rest of the Elder Scrolls series were a shining example of how the modding community can turn a great game into the best game. Unfortunately both Valve and Bethesda have chosen to destroy this community by profiting unfairly from the work of others. I do believe that those who enjoy the many mods made by passionate, volunteer developers should be able to support those developers financially through donation pages or systems like Patreon. However what Valve and Bethesda are doing is taking most of this support for themselves and hiding mods behind a paywall. What they are doing is destroying the modding community which has existed for many years for their own gain. Until the option to charge for mods is removed (and I doubt it will be) not only will I be boycotting all Bethesda games but I will no longer be using Steam for any purchases whatsoever.
Felupi;-;Riot now. Before they ruin the mod community. Support Nexus.
Killahillnga;-;Don't invest any time with this game, I've spent a week trying to fix the random crash to desktop issue. Nothing works, and yes, I've tried all of it.
Hosey;-;My full review is availible on steam workshop for $29.99
Scarlette Rose;-;That paywall is starting, do not buy buy this game and cause a collapse of modding, wait until Valve changes or removes the policy until then...
Can't Wake Up;-;8.8/10 "It was okay" - IGN
Kaaji;-;Good game. Greater with mods, However I do not endorse paid mods, Mods are from the community to the community, not by the official developers, or granted by valve, also they don't offer support. Was such a good game, if you still have it, or play it please consider when to use the workshop, you can also use good mod sites nexusmods.com Also if you do not endorse this new pay method you can go to https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop and try to change this.
Relo;-;Game 9/10 Mod support 1/10 Bad review due to the current mod market implementation and subject to change if the market does... Good modders deserve to get paid, I will not doubt that, but the system in place now is terrible. A full on paywall is a terrible way to do things with the nature of mods and how easily they break, corrupt and sometimes do not work with other mods. All this is is going to do is cause problems with the modding community, before if there was a problem it was no big deal, it was free, just uninstall and move on. Now that some of these will be paid for, there will be many angry people when things do not work or take to long to be updated after a gamebreaking patch. Aside from that, the modders get nothing from this deal but pocket change. As it currently is set up, 75% goes to Bethesda and Valve while only 25% goes to the modder. This is a bad deal, made worse by the fact that Valve only pays you after $100.00 in sales earned. One would have to sell 400 copys of something at $1.00 to even get paid at all, not only is that crappy but it will inflate prices so modders can cover the loss and hopefully get paid sooner instead of a year later when that money cap is hit. Also, why does Bethesda get any of the money? They deserve none of it at all. Now, before some of you get up in arms saying it is Bethesdas game, they have rights to it and so on, think for a moment. You bought the game, you own it, not Bethesda, it is paid for... In this current logic, if we applied it to a car, you take your car in to get some window tint and rims, a car modification of sorts, then the money you paid to have it done is split 25% to the mechanic who did all the work, and 75% split between the place those parts were stored and the cars manufacturer. The deal should only be between the mechanic, storage and the customer no? Why does the manufacturer get a cut here, they did nothing but build the car you paid for already... So yes, this system is stupid. Set up donation tabs for the modders, if not, cut Bethesda out and give the modders the lions share of the profit, they did the work here.
TheAlbinoAmigo;-;I cannot recommend this game when mods are paid for, and the mod creators geta meager 25% of the cut. The creators deserve at least 80% of the cut and some mods are practically necessary to fix the game to begin with (Yes, Bethesda, you haven't avoided the well-deserved blame, too).
benboisdbest;-;Up until today Skyrim and the rest of the Elder Scrolls series were a shining example of how the modding community can turn a great game into the best game. Unfortunately both Valve and Bethesda have chosen to destroy this community by profiting unfairly from the work of others. I do believe that those who enjoy the many mods made by passionate, volunteer developers should be able to support those developers financially through donation pages or systems like Patreon. However what Valve and Bethesda are doing is taking most of this support for themselves and hiding mods behind a paywall. What they are doing is destroying the modding community which has existed for many years for their own gain. Until the option to charge for mods is removed (and I doubt it will be) not only will I be boycotting all Bethesda games but I will no longer be using Steam for any purchases whatsoever.
Felupi;-;Riot now. Before they ruin the mod community. Support Nexus.
DIABLO258;-;I can't believe I have to pay for mods. Why? I uninstalled.
[P@] Bron;-;Don't support a game that is trying to ruin our precious mods :(
Neovius;-;Paid mods Early access mods Freemium mods Mods with ads Mods with DRM Mods with microtransactions Mod season passes Mod Steam sales ... This is the future you choose.
DankMemes;-;Very clunky UI and poorly written engine, basically relies on mods to run at an appropriate level That'll be extra :^)
Exhumet;-;This once great game and community have been torn apart thanks to bethesda with the help of valve. Thanks to the monetization of mods members of this amazing community now look at each with hatred as they come after each other for mod stealing, unethical use of mods etc. etc.. this community was a once gigantic symbiotic web that fed off of each other in the best of ways. modders would help other modders and give them resources to use including myself, but now that is all gone and some of the big modders are leaving the modding scene and taking all of their tools with them. Modding was one of the major things that seperated us from console gaming and let us tailor the games to our own needs and now we can no longer do that. I used to love this game but sadly until this changes and beth/valve put in a donate button instead i will no longer be playing or getting mods off the workshop if i do. i will go else where whether it be independently hosted mods or the much better skyrim nexus. The future is looking dark and i am truly afraid to see what happens with fallout(my favorite game series). Great job destroying the community bethesda/valve :D
Zikael;-;Do NOT buy this game until mods are free again! Valve shouldn't be allowed to get away with such a disgusting money-grab.
thekanoopy;-;With micro-transactions for things that were what originally brought me to PC gaming. No.
Burning Love!!!;-;Game is good, paid mods? not so much
why is my mem;-;I constantly come back to Skyrim whenever I see new mods available on the nexus or on the Steam Workshop. I definitely would not have logged the amount of hours that I have were it not for the free availability of mods. Now, however Valve/Bethesda have decided to start charging for mods. This is content that people have made off their own back, yet Valve/Bethesda are taking 75% of the cut. There is absolutely no need for paid mods as they are what makes Skyrim so replayable, yet Valve/Bethesda saw another oppertunity to grab your money and they are taking it. I encourage everybody who wants the free availability of mods back, to leave a review as I have to show your discontent with the situation. For a mod creator to even make a feasible amount of money they have to charge at ridiculous rates, which means that nobody will be downloading their content. I feel that the community would be a much better off place without the charge of mods, and therefore will not be playing this game until paying for mods has been removed.
Boon;-;Giving this game a negative review because I am not willing to support Valve and Bethesda's new way to handle modding. This is a road that only leads into the deepest pits of exploiting your customers. Those of us, who can afford it, should support mod creators. It is thanks to them that a game that'd normally deliver about 100 hours of playtime can be played for 600 hours and still be something new with every new playthrough. BUT it is NOT up to us to turn a modder into a millionair! We should be thankful that Bethesda has given them the tools to make such great mods. But it is NOT worth 75% of what the mod creators have deserved!
TKAMA;-;You now have to pay for what kept this game alive. And bethsda and valve are making profit out of it. They are attacking what made them be who they are. gg
Nystical | battleleague.com;-;25% Is not acceptable. The destruction of the goodwill of the modding community is not acceptable. The $400 limit to even pay out is not acceptable.
Queef Latina;-;Paying for mods is dumb. An otherwise great game.
Albioth Honeymaple Valliere;-;Paid mods are bad. I've gone back to playing Morrowind. Graphics aren't as great but it does everything else better, especially the MODS (for now).
Sven Bloodmoon;-;no just no this is worse than having to buy dark souls 2 twice because of the re-release
Lil B theBasedGod;-;Gaben although you based, Omar is commin for you for putting pricetags on them mods.
Stumme;-;Mods cost money. Singleplayer cash shop.
[D.I.C.C] Kaul;-;Paying for mods is ridiculous, this game has died.
shadow91110;-;I used to love this game and this developer, now? I just feel betrayed by them.
hai there;-;pay for mods ......
Stu;-;Paid mods is bad and you should feel bad.
Rex Powercolt;-;Mediocre Game that went completely down the drain with paid mods. Do not buy this in case you haven't already.
waterslug;-;Steam took 75% of my review only leaving 25% for you to read. Skyrim was released as a broken game - hardly playable - until modders released an unofficial patch due to Bethesda's laziness to patch it themselves. Now, Valve got together with Bethesda to charge for mods, thus efficiently pitting the gaming community against one and other. Overnight, no less. This is what happens when something becomes "mainstream". Greedy corporations come to to nickle and dime you for every cent you have. They'll suck you dry... and not in a good way. First DLCs, then on-disk DLCs, then already finished content hidden behind a pay wall to finally being charged to buy a mod. Well, I'll say this, I'll be playing those mods, but I won't be paying for them. Know what I'm saying? Hint hint... In conclusion,  Valve. They first tried getting rid of the game Hatred because it was 'too controversial' and now they are pitting the gaming community against each other by charging for mods (by the way, Valve and the game developers are taking 75% of the profit from said mods and only giving 25% to the mod creators). Here's hoping for a gaming crash in the near future. The gaming community needs it! Get rid of all the greedy corporate rats and bring us back to great gaming as it was in the 90's and early 00's.
Lightning;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. This is unnaceptable.
Orphan81;-;Terrible until the Mod Paywalls are taken down.
Ari-;-;Was once a great game with a great modding community only to be destroyed by stupidity and greed from bethesda. will NOT be buy anymore games from them if this is how they treat their community.
Teleriel;-;Please pay 16.99 to unlock this review. Disclaimer: Contents of review may change. Refunds not available.
DirtDragon;-;It was a great game, then I wanted to mod it but all I found was a payment wall. Could be done better.
Nacho Slug;-;Don't get me wrong: Skyrim's one of my favorite games of all time, but Valve's new policy is simply defacing. Paying for mods? No thanks! Listen to the community Valve. Stop being so money hungry, and listen to us! Down with paid mods!
Kitten of Strife;-;Paid mods trying to ruin the game, really drags down enjoyment :(
HitNail;-;This is one of the few games that I can honestly say deserves a 100, at least it did a few days ago. They are now greedily trying to make money off the modders that gave their game staying power. Bethesda has taken one of the best things about this game and destroyed it.
palkkipantteri;-;otherwise good, but paid mods are bad, very bad.
Davos Seaworth;-;With paid mods come into play, I won't buy this game now. Not worth it.
Foolish;-;Pay to win is never fun
BiGGles;-;Fun game but paid mods are a terrible idea.
mggonzalez92;-;Paying for content that may not even work? Disappointed with both Valve and Bethesda as two of my favorite publishers. Looks like PC gaming has lost the advantage that it had, and now sits on par with consoles.
Buddha;-;you valve and  you gabe newall
Plainace;-;Paid modifications? This completely removes the point of modders. I litterally can't even right now.
Jinsle Dollarhide;-;Paid $5 for a dlc mod that added an apple to breeze home. 1/10
Crosner;-;It saddens me that Bethesda and Steam try to milk one of the greatest game i have ever played. I expected this move from a company like EA, i hope that all the negative reviews lead to a rethinking. Adding a donate button to the mods would just have done it but i guess Steam doesn't make any money with that which seems to be the major motivation.
MaddBunny;-;Payin for user created is disgusting. I understand if there is a donation, but putting monitary value on a mod that could be use other modders' asset and putting them together and selling them for profit it's basically stealing and a lie. I refues to pay for mods that have a potincal of ripping the original creator of there work. (Just like Nick Simmons riping of Bleach and artists on deviantart). MODS ARE USER CREATED CONTENT NOT DLC b*****t. I love the game but I just can't support this buisness model, the fact that it's too easy to steal others work and you loose your money to Steam, isn't good. Mods at times don't work with other mods, and you have to remove one of them and our out of $0.25 to out ragest amount. Better off just drive down the street and throw your money out the window. Also, this is a lazy attempt of developers not wanting to make cotent for there games.
drmcshizzle;-;Mods should not be behind a paywall. This moves stifles creativity in the community and opens up the floodgates for developers to release incomplete content with the intention of the users fixing it. Modding is a hobby, not a profession. For those mod creators who feel they are entitled to payment, go find a job in gaming or move out of modding all together if you no longer have any love of the game. Its a shame because Skyrim is quite fun.
Kaeniar;-;In light of the recent paid mod debacle Skyrim has lost one of its few redeeming factors. Don't buy it. Not anymore.
Nick;-;Paid mods in a bad system. I'm fine with modders being paid for hard work, but Steam/Bethesda's cut is absolutely ATTROCIOUS.  you, once again EA- I mean, Valve.
Mr. Game and Watch;-;paid mods making a once good game even worse
Arkalys R.;-;The worse Elder Scrolls ever made. A Call Of Duty like with swords and spells. Just have to click and click again, whatever the level of difficulty. And now, they want us to pay for mods...
hobbs in gravy;-;It's like skyrim with EA
thatbasketballguy;-;The game which was once the poster child for everything awesome about PC gaming is now the poster child for everything wrong with the gaming industry. 10/10 idea, 0/10 execution Bethesda & Valve.
Real Human Bean;-;Upsettingly bad.
Krul epe;-;steam and bethesda take away 75% of the profit as their commission fee. Hows that supporting mod creators?
NO ONE;-;no free mods .well bye bye skyrim!
DeathRunner00;-;You now have the option to pay for bad user made content in the workshop......
Batman;-;Paying for some cheap  recolor sword made by some neckbeard basement dwelling no talent hack is bull , and if you know better, then you won't support that .
Dirtybirds;-;Bethesda are a bunch of greedy hacks, stay away from their products.
JohnnyRadman;-;Skyrim is a buggy ocean with the depth of a puddle. In order to fix the bugs, make the game look pretty, and generally make gameplay not mediocre, you must download mods. It's often said that Bethesda has always relied on the modding community to fix and polish their game for them. In short, the mods are really what make this game. Here are some fun facts about paid mods. - 45% of the cost of mods goes to Bethesda. - 30% goes to Valve - 25% goes to the mod creator - The mod creator will only recieve their cut after they've made 100 dollars (so if I priced a mod at $1, it would need to make 400 sales before I even saw any money) - If they do not reach 100 dollars within three months of releasing the mod, they will recieve no money. Ever. - The mod becomes IP of Bethesda immediately upon posting it up in the shop, leaving the mod creator no rights. Some other food for thought - After 24 hours, if, for whatever reason, the mod ceases to function, you have no recourse. - Currently, its very easy to cheat the system by downloading mods off of nexus and selling them as your own content. I'm not against mod makers making money. I think it could inspire some ambitious projects and actually be helpful. For years, the modding community has made Bethesda games what they are. Now, as recompense, Bethesda and Valve try to stiff them. Seeing such underhanded, parasitic behaviour disguised as a favor leaves a rather foul taste in my mouth, I must say.
Detoxicity;-;This game supports paid mods, I do not.
Michigander Highlander;-;I want to get this straight, I love skyrim and reccomend it to anyone. The reason it is now getting a thumbs down is becasue of steams recent money for mods system. Never will I pay for a mod when the modder used bethesdas creation kit, bethesdas engine, and bethesdas resources. Lets nip this in the bud right now. Paying a third party for bethesdas creative license is ILLEGAL. Lets not kill out modding community guys......
joshualeerackley;-;I love the game but sadly since the mods are now a way to leach money I will not support the game. Shame on Valve and Bethesda.
Loominaughtzi;-;Fool me once, I'm mad. Fool me twice, how could you. Fool me three times, you're officially that guy, you know the one. You go to the bar and he's like "This suit is aaa... offically Giorgio Armani, ask him my Dad knows him and a" - F__K YOU. I AIN'T HAVING THAT S__T! ~JonTron (Regarding Paid Mods)
Badbob;-;Great game, but they started going full jew with this Workshop crap. Maybe they will rethink their decision when there are enough negative reviews.
Zalman;-;Good game, Extremely poor and unethical marketing decisions. The new Paid Mod fiasco has highlighted an extremely good case for why it's a terrible idea. There's zero content control, and paid mods can easily have content provided for free by their original authors uploaded by anyone. We see this happen with cell phone applications but it tends to be less severe as uploading programs to places such as the Google App store require a certain process and have measures to prevent copywrite enfringement as they are original programs and not merely addons to an existing one. With mods, it's as downloading it for free, repacking it's files, and adding it to Steam for a price regardless of who you are and Valve has offered no substainal content control other than very loosely defined self policing options, which is completely unacceptable. Now, many good, legitimate, free mods are being removed from many places as their authors are afraid of their content being stolen and charged for on Steam. This gross monitization of mods has not increased mod interest, but more direly driven legitimate authors and lovers of modding and the medium they mod into hiding, for fear of having their content stolen. What if DeviantArt let you charge money for a download of a picture on their site and did nothing when people shamelessly stole art from other blogs to charge cash for. That wouldn't work for that form of media, so why the hell should we allow it here. The game gets a negitive review until Bethesda wakes up and realizes the mistake here and removes this absolutely monsterous form of cash grab from their game, nor will I recommend any other betheseda game to anyone going forward until this is changed. Unfortunately, while wisdom says we can vote with our wallets, in this case it's just not enough to drive the message home.
BullRandom;-;Paid mods? This WAS a great game. It has become everything wrong with the gaming industry.  Valve.  Bethesda.
MongrelSlayer;-;It was a good game once, now its not.
Bartonar;-;To begin, Skyrim was a very good game, providing hours of entertainment. HOWEVER, because of the recent introduction of paid mods, the game becomes mediocre at best. Mods were what made Skyrim great, being forced to spend a fortune on them to fatten Bethesda's pockets is despicable. I would not recommend this game to anyone, now.
Microsoft Word;-;http://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop Sign this petition for valve to remove the paid content from the workshop. It is a load of BS.
Danger Mouse;-;Great game which was massively improved with mods. However Valve have taken it upon themselves to destroy the modding scene, so I cannot reccomend this game.
Level 1 Blackmage;-;This new practice is disgusting.
joshualeerackley;-;I love the game but sadly since the mods are now a way to leach money I will not support the game. Shame on Valve and Bethesda.
Loominaughtzi;-;Fool me once, I'm mad. Fool me twice, how could you. Fool me three times, you're officially that guy, you know the one. You go to the bar and he's like "This suit is aaa... offically Giorgio Armani, ask him my Dad knows him and a" - F__K YOU. I AIN'T HAVING THAT S__T! ~JonTron (Regarding Paid Mods)
Badbob;-;Great game, but they started going full jew with this Workshop crap. Maybe they will rethink their decision when there are enough negative reviews.
Zalman;-;Good game, Extremely poor and unethical marketing decisions. The new Paid Mod fiasco has highlighted an extremely good case for why it's a terrible idea. There's zero content control, and paid mods can easily have content provided for free by their original authors uploaded by anyone. We see this happen with cell phone applications but it tends to be less severe as uploading programs to places such as the Google App store require a certain process and have measures to prevent copywrite enfringement as they are original programs and not merely addons to an existing one. With mods, it's as downloading it for free, repacking it's files, and adding it to Steam for a price regardless of who you are and Valve has offered no substainal content control other than very loosely defined self policing options, which is completely unacceptable. Now, many good, legitimate, free mods are being removed from many places as their authors are afraid of their content being stolen and charged for on Steam. This gross monitization of mods has not increased mod interest, but more direly driven legitimate authors and lovers of modding and the medium they mod into hiding, for fear of having their content stolen. What if DeviantArt let you charge money for a download of a picture on their site and did nothing when people shamelessly stole art from other blogs to charge cash for. That wouldn't work for that form of media, so why the hell should we allow it here. The game gets a negitive review until Bethesda wakes up and realizes the mistake here and removes this absolutely monsterous form of cash grab from their game, nor will I recommend any other betheseda game to anyone going forward until this is changed. Unfortunately, while wisdom says we can vote with our wallets, in this case it's just not enough to drive the message home.
BullRandom;-;Paid mods? This WAS a great game. It has become everything wrong with the gaming industry.  Valve.  Bethesda.
MongrelSlayer;-;It was a good game once, now its not.
Bartonar;-;To begin, Skyrim was a very good game, providing hours of entertainment. HOWEVER, because of the recent introduction of paid mods, the game becomes mediocre at best. Mods were what made Skyrim great, being forced to spend a fortune on them to fatten Bethesda's pockets is despicable. I would not recommend this game to anyone, now.
Microsoft Word;-;http://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop Sign this petition for valve to remove the paid content from the workshop. It is a load of BS.
Danger Mouse;-;Great game which was massively improved with mods. However Valve have taken it upon themselves to destroy the modding scene, so I cannot reccomend this game.
Level 1 Blackmage;-;This new practice is disgusting.
FarmerG;-;This will prove to be a disaster, and may damage the PC the modding community irreparably if the practice spreads.
The Hin Chui;-;Valve has been a great company up until it stopped releasing actual games and looked towards its banking/marketing departments for ways to make money is the laziest ways imaginable. What the hell are you guys thinking. You are creating the worst type of gaming experience possible and splitting the gaming community from people who want to profit off of stolen mods and people who just want to have a better gaming experience. I never imagined such a horrible move from a company that I have come to respect since the earliest years of its existence. I hope that the outrage from this move doesn't die off, that you retract this horrible policy, and work to rectify any negative outcomes that were a result of this.
rodneyterry;-;The DragonBorn DLC has been broken for years but you didn't have time to fix that but you had plently of time to milk mod authors for money. I'll never buy another one of your games.
Fledgeland is the Penguin;-;I used to be an adventurer like you... To see the rest of this review, please pay $6.99. Hiding mods behind a paywall. What a way to ruin a great game.
Commander Shepard;-;Just when you thought microtransactions was hell on Earth: BOOM! Pay4Mods. Thanks Gaben!
roguejwolf;-;Fantastic game in its own right with good dlc and great moddi......oh wait nevermind, scratch that, PAID MODS! yay...thanks valve?!? but seriously, i dont agree with paid mods, donation however i strongly support and agree so long as valve dont take 75%!!. will change my view top positive when they change this B#####it.
SuperToeIsCute;-;Due to the push for mods being paid for, I will simply talk about vanilla Skyrim. The menus are poorly layed out, it seems that they were designed for consoles and the PC version was an afterthought. The Civil War Quest seems to be left unfinished due to the fact that the hero only takes over a two holds in the game as well as many other parts which should have been added in the game. The same can go for the College of Winterhold Quest as that just seems like several different ideas smashed together. Essentially this game is pretty mediocre without mods to fix the problems made by not following through on something.
Herv the Goat;-;Now that the mods have to be bought the game pretty much lost all of it appeal, because without them, the only thing this game is is a walking simulator
Tinteex FALLOUT 4 FUCKING HYPE;-;MODS SHOULD BE FREE! ADD A DONATION BUTTON INSTEAD!
Mshee32;-;the game has paid mods i do not agree and these mods may not be capable with your other skyrim mods so they will crash meaning you wasted your 2 dollars
MtrSkllz;-;This was one of my favorite games of all time, But a large portion of what made this game so great and re-playable was the mods. Now that Valve and Bethesda has decided to milk the gamers for every dollar they can get I cant recommend this game,
UnluCK;-;You were the chosen one, Gaben
?;-;I just bought the legendary pack - IT WILL NOT WORK. Tried deleting app/cache - no joy. Keeps looping back to install screen. Do yourself a favour and don't waste your money.
Iretep;-;The UI sucks, only stat that matters is HP, most of the quests suck and magic sucks. If you want to improve any of these you have to pay a bunch of microtransactions.
Crash;-;Valve and Bethesda ruined it.
Raist;-;If modders should stand to gain money through modding, do so through a donation button, NOT a bloody paywall.
Jackobus Phantom;-;The greatest RPG of our time, the greatest PR -up of our time
whatsthiscrap;-;Paying for mods, I would "donate" if pushed but nope, to the scrap heap it goes
Tarkonian;-;I love TES: Skyrim. This game has truly been one of the most fun games I have ever played in my life. The storyline was epic, you feel ike a total badass shouting and slaying monsters all the way to the end. Whatever it is you want to do, go do it, the game doesn't care. And if it does care, then mod the  out of the game and go do it anyways. The BIGGEST reason to love this game as much as I do is for the ability to modify the game and keep adding hours of content to play through. Done with the main storyline? Why not add a new continent to explore. Spells lacking? Pick up this mod and you have a bajillion (rough estimate) more spells to use. AND. ITS. FREE. .... .... Wait hold up... ... ... You're telling me it's not free anymore? What the hell? You mean STEAM stepped in and tore apart an already thriving community by adding a pay-wall to the very mods that kept it alive? With no means of regulating the crappy mods from the good mods? You're saying that this is only going to get worse as time goes on? WHAT THE HELL, STEAM. Well way to screw this game over. Just one more thing to charge us on, right? Couldn't get enough from Early Access, Pre-Order, Multiple DLC, and any other means of screwing over the customer base you can think of, right? How the hell could Bethesda even condone this? The game barely runs on its own. It's BECAUSE OF MODS the game has been bug-fixed to a stable version (Since Bethesda can't seem to error test their own games). Why the hell would you charge people to get access to the content that actually incentivize gamers to buy this? Well in the end money talks, and right now STEAM is hearing money say that if they charge people for these mods they'll make a  more money. However, as I'm sure everyone who reads this is aware, there is a great place to get mods for TES: Skyrim without having to open your wallet. Although the Skyrim Nexus [ http://www.nexusmods.com/skyrim/ ] has nothing against those who want to sell their mods, they also have a strong community more than willing to offer these mods for free. Stop on by and give them a look over, and move on from this nightmare STEAM has created. You'll still get to enjoy hours upon hours in Skyrim, without having to cushion Gabe Newell's greedy  more than it already is. And if it only gets worse from here? Then  this . I have over 500 hours on this game, I got my lulz. RIP Skyrim.
NayMoreGames;-;Vanilla skyrim is a buggy and hard to use waste of time. It is only due to the hardwork for modders that create mods like SkyUI and other mods which make things like the levelling system make sense and enjoyable. Vanilla skyrim 3/10
celtic warrior;-;Valve/bethesda are now charging money for mods for this game . 75 Percent goes to them and 25 percent to the modder , when the modder did all the work , WTF ! . I would of supported a donate button so the modder would get all the money as he/she did all the work, but not this . This is just another way of trying to milk gamers out of more cash . What next , pay a yearly fee just so you can log into steam ? . Pay a yearly fee to play multiplayer ? . GG valve/bethesda . You done ed it up. This will forever stay as a negative review if they still go ahead with this .
ChickenN'Wafflez;-;Paying for mods is a digusting addition to this once great game
Lumpeh;-;I uninstalled this after the release of paid mods on steam.
CommunistKitten;-;Yeah, it's a good game. I wouldn't recommend buying it, as the whole mod-paywall fiasco is going on. It's a stupid idea and should be gotten rid of. Don't buy this game until they get rid of the charging money for some mods.
Awemage;-;Gread game ruined by the platform it's sold on. Putting mods behind a paywall is completely unacceptable, especially with the rampant theft of mods being uploaded by people other than their creators. Adding a donate button instead would be a much better option, for verified creators of mods, which would give an incentive for mod makers to work hard on making great mods, and to keep them updated. I would gladly donate $5.00 to a modder making something truly great.
Deadman101202;-;This game is 5 years old, and they want us to pay for community created mods that have also been around for years? I'm never playing this game again. And honestly without mods, this game isnt worth buying today.
kyleathix;-;The modding community has been around for ages. I first got into it with Morrowind, and the community had been great ever since. The collective of us worked towards a common goal: to produce better mods and to push the skyrim engine to it's limits and beyond. Talented 3d model makers, texture makers, quest designers, story tellers, programmers and more came together to collectively share their work, free of charge. I even had someone compose a song for a mod of mine at one point! Paid mods shifts the focus to community driven to money driven. Now let's talk about it a little bit. Modders who put literally thousands of hours into their work for free probably deserve compensation for their work, but they didn't start with that in mind. Skyui comes to mind. The developer has decided to sell it on the workshop. I'm more or less ok with that due to the sheer amount of time and work put into it. However, now we are seeing  sword models for sale. Why would I pay for a sword that I could go into cinema 4d and design myself in a half hour or so? It's stupid. Until this system is changed I cannot recommend this game, damn it bethesda! Valve/bethesda are taking 75% of the profits for the work of modders. That is absurd.
Tantric;-;What really made this game great was mods. After nearly 4 years and an expansive mod community, Skyrim was really great in the terms of value you saw added to this game, and it's really what kept this game relevant this long. While I understand and agree that some modders may want to cash in on their work, the current implementation of this is poorly done. The fact that it's been so poorly curated (we're already seeing junk mods for $99.99 being added) is fracturing the community. Modders are seeing their work ripped off and sold without their knowledge, and some mods require other mods to work. When mods like SkyUI go up behind paywalls (it already is becoming premium only) it's breaking several other mods which rely on SkyUI as a backbone. It's turning modders against modders and modders against gamers, and to top that all off, the modders who are putting out paid mods are making Valve and Bethesda rich for their own hard work. The current mess that the state of this game is in makes it not worth my recommendation. If the current paid mods fiasco was implemented in a way that makes any sense, I might reverse my rating.
Supreme - TheTrapEmpire.com;-;Paid Mods = Dead Game.
Fear;-;I play this game constantly just because of all the mods I love to go and try out. But now with me having to pay for each, it ruins that factor and makes this game lose it's shine.
Cythas;-;>Company makes half- game which only manages to be so successful due to cooperation and goodheartedness of modding community. >Company decides to then sell mods and withhold 70% or more of the profits despite doing absolutely no work. >Company disregards the crazily abundant number of legal, moral, and business issues that accompany this move. >Company disregards that attempts to do this in the past only resulted in large amounts of piracy. >Company paves the way for this to become an astronomically worse issue in a large number of ways. >Company proceeds to pocket what is essentially chump change to them in exchange for commiting cultural genocide. Seems reasonable.
Awemage;-;Gread game ruined by the platform it's sold on. Putting mods behind a paywall is completely unacceptable, especially with the rampant theft of mods being uploaded by people other than their creators. Adding a donate button instead would be a much better option, for verified creators of mods, which would give an incentive for mod makers to work hard on making great mods, and to keep them updated. I would gladly donate $5.00 to a modder making something truly great.
Deadman101202;-;This game is 5 years old, and they want us to pay for community created mods that have also been around for years? I'm never playing this game again. And honestly without mods, this game isnt worth buying today.
kyleathix;-;The modding community has been around for ages. I first got into it with Morrowind, and the community had been great ever since. The collective of us worked towards a common goal: to produce better mods and to push the skyrim engine to it's limits and beyond. Talented 3d model makers, texture makers, quest designers, story tellers, programmers and more came together to collectively share their work, free of charge. I even had someone compose a song for a mod of mine at one point! Paid mods shifts the focus to community driven to money driven. Now let's talk about it a little bit. Modders who put literally thousands of hours into their work for free probably deserve compensation for their work, but they didn't start with that in mind. Skyui comes to mind. The developer has decided to sell it on the workshop. I'm more or less ok with that due to the sheer amount of time and work put into it. However, now we are seeing  sword models for sale. Why would I pay for a sword that I could go into cinema 4d and design myself in a half hour or so? It's stupid. Until this system is changed I cannot recommend this game, damn it bethesda! Valve/bethesda are taking 75% of the profits for the work of modders. That is absurd.
Tantric;-;What really made this game great was mods. After nearly 4 years and an expansive mod community, Skyrim was really great in the terms of value you saw added to this game, and it's really what kept this game relevant this long. While I understand and agree that some modders may want to cash in on their work, the current implementation of this is poorly done. The fact that it's been so poorly curated (we're already seeing junk mods for $99.99 being added) is fracturing the community. Modders are seeing their work ripped off and sold without their knowledge, and some mods require other mods to work. When mods like SkyUI go up behind paywalls (it already is becoming premium only) it's breaking several other mods which rely on SkyUI as a backbone. It's turning modders against modders and modders against gamers, and to top that all off, the modders who are putting out paid mods are making Valve and Bethesda rich for their own hard work. The current mess that the state of this game is in makes it not worth my recommendation. If the current paid mods fiasco was implemented in a way that makes any sense, I might reverse my rating.
Supreme - TheTrapEmpire.com;-;Paid Mods = Dead Game.
Fear;-;I play this game constantly just because of all the mods I love to go and try out. But now with me having to pay for each, it ruins that factor and makes this game lose it's shine.
Cythas;-;>Company makes half- game which only manages to be so successful due to cooperation and goodheartedness of modding community. >Company decides to then sell mods and withhold 70% or more of the profits despite doing absolutely no work. >Company disregards the crazily abundant number of legal, moral, and business issues that accompany this move. >Company disregards that attempts to do this in the past only resulted in large amounts of piracy. >Company paves the way for this to become an astronomically worse issue in a large number of ways. >Company proceeds to pocket what is essentially chump change to them in exchange for commiting cultural genocide. Seems reasonable.
qeldroma311;-;Paid mods? No thanks.
saknugget;-;The mod community has been a thriving section of gaming which has kept, not only Skyrim, but every Elder Scrolls game since Morrowind alive. With the introduction of paying for mods, I no longer support a positive outlook towards Valve, Bethesda, The Elder Scrolls, or Skyrim. Hopefully the substantial amount of negative reviews gets the point across.
ViperZeroOne;-;It's no coincidence the game dropped to 75% off the same week they launched the Pay4Mods scheme. This negative review was mostly prompted by Valve's new Pay4Mods policy, and I'll tell you why... First, the sheer number of "enhancement" mods available on the marketplace goes to prove that Bethesda didn't put in the time or effort to make the graphics in this game as good as they could have been. Everything from water to landscaping is severly lacking, as there are mods which drastically improve it all (but none that do it all in a single mod). By having to now pay for these mods, we're basically paying a 3rd party to make improvements to a game. Improvements that should have been done by the developers either before launch or through patching. It's, quite frankly, a Pay-4-Patches scheme, when you think about it. Second, you'll find the world a bit sparse and lacking in quest structure. Again, this is proven by the sheer number of mods which add locations and mission content to the game. The main storyline of the game itself is fairly short if you skip the side-missions, and the side-missions you'll find usually just have to do with you being recruited into a guild of some kind. Imagination was really lacking here. You would think some guilds would want you to devote yourself to them, but nope. By the end of your trip through the main story you'll end up being a high ranking member of every guild imaginable, asuming you do the side-quests at all. This affects the game's realism quality, which of course can be repaired by adding a paid mod (or 50). Third, and probably the most important thing, is the lack of actual equipment content. This is a huge downfall by Bethesda, as shown by the absolutely insane amount of armor and weapon mods available for purchase on the marketplace. Without mods you'll find yourself wandering a world where it seems every enemy is carrying virtually the same weaponry. That said, everything from wooden armor to the Elder Scrolls famous Daedric Armor is available (for a price) in the marketplace. In addition, there is a plethera of non-Elder Scrolls related equipment also available through mods. What really hurts though is how much of the equipment mods are actually content that exists in the Skyrim realm. Equipment which Bethesda didn't include in the game and is now hidden behind a "pay wall". All in all I have to give a big NO to recommending Skyrim. It was a great game in it's day, no doubt there, but today all of the mod content you'll have to pay for to bring this game up to date just isn't worth the price tag you'll have to pay. Just to give you an example, to make my game very enjoyable I've had to install a total of 67 mods, although from what I hear that's an extremely low number on average. Without those mods I might as well skip buying this game on Steam and get it on a console. After this many years I can probably pick up the 360 version in a pawn shop for a couple bucks. There really is NO reason to buy the PC version anymore, expecially through Steam. The Pay4Mod scheme has ruined the PC experience of this game as much as the Pay2Win scheme ruined online games. While the (free) modding community thrived the PC version was well worth the $21 price tag, but in order to "fix" the game today using the Pay4Mods scheme it'll cost you well over twice that price. Even with the game right now at 75% off, it's not worth owning it on PC. Skyrim had it's day in the sun, and sadly greed has now caused that sun to set. It's a dark day for gamers.
gowkaizer;-;PAID FOR MODS?! NO LINUX VERSION After the failure of Elder Scrolls online Bethesda and Valve have teamed up on destroying one of the best games ever made. By taking mods created with talent and love to share with others and monetizing it. Bang up job you potatoes.
Paladin Leeroy;-;Paying for mods now ? Next they will start charing for chat ,and save games .
Felix;-;I had already thought this game was bland before mods. Now that they're milking every lost drop from gamers I cannot recommend purchasing this game.
jdean4795;-;paid mods? no thank you
IvoryState;-;payed mods.
fourthspartan56;-;Skyrim is one of my favorite games of all time, which is why I was horrified when I saw that they added paid mods to it. The reason for my displeasure is that Skyrim is a game whose longevity is significantly enhanced by mods, and adding paid mods is completely unacceptable and frankly has the potential to cause untold destruction within the modding community. In short I cannot support a game that is being crippled by such a blatant cash grab on the part of Valve and Bethesda.
Jayhawker987;-;Used to be the symbol of pc gaming superiority. Now Valve and Bethesda have ruined it with paid mods. Such a horrible idea for so many reasons. Screw you Valve and Bethesda
OrangeAir;-;Terrible shame about the paid mods.
Belisarius68;-;I won't rant for long about this, better words have been spoken about the same thing by others. But really, I had to chime in on this. I love this game. Look at my damn hours played. I've sunk the equivalent of mastering a foreign language into exploring Tamriel. And you know why I've played that long? Mods. Mods add sooooo much to a game like this, let you do just about anything - enhance your specific playstyle, explore new areas, new quests, or just look like a badass with new armour and weapons. But you know what I won't do? Pay for them. Would I be willing to donate to some of the more prolific or skilled modders? Absolutely. I use nd enjoy their mods on a regular basis, I'd love to support them. But nothing good comes of taking away the ability to choose. Making an entire selection of mods inaccessible except by payment defeats the purpose of mods themselves. Would it have been so much work to add a simple "donate" button? Would that have killed you, Valve? Sigh. You get the point.
Darewind;-;I hope to one day see a North American Grizzly Bear and an African Silverback Gorilla fight to the death in a cage match. Paid Mods are a terrible idea.
Hodd Toward;-;You tried to start paid mods, that meme was nasty.
Catch;-;Paid mods? No thank you EA.
DonaldTrump can melt steel beams;-;Paying for mods is worse than paying for sex.
Aces;-;Skyrim is a game that needs mods to survive, but with the new paid mod system introduced by Valve its not worth it.
OverlyAttachedGamer;-;played this game modded to hell...half the mods i loved, some of which i donated to the creators are now paid mods...taking the industry in the worst way possible.
lrcorem;-;This game is like many Bethesda games: Huge, expansive, acceptable visually, and chock-full of bugs To get rid of the bugs, you need mods (the "Unofficial Skyrim Patch" serie, to name them) To get it to the graphical standart of today, you need mods Can't do that if you need to pay for the mods
full_metal_waifu;-;After valve swooped in and tore the mod community apart, I cannot recommend BUYING this game. By all means play it though.
dmarxs;-;Edit: Value has currently reversed paid mods... For now. This game is currently supporting the questionable pratice of placing mods behind a paywall and stiffling the community. As many mods interlink peoples content is being stolen and used without permission for the sake of greed and aggressive content control. Avoid.
(D12)JOE1st;-;pay for mods turning freemans work into DLC and taking the lions share of 75% nice one valve the paywall has been removed but i will leave this review as a reminder so that steam thinks twice before trying this again
ConcreteShelter;-;By putting mods for sale, Bethesda is aiming to destroy a community built in years of efforts and made of common interests, shared passion and a little bit of criticism for their scarce coding skills. Their corporate greed has surpassed even EA by hurting one of the major points of PC gaming, and thanks to them everyone who loved customizing their game will now be put in front of a huge paywall. They don't care about copyright or ownership issues (mods are usually built using other mods as a base), they don't care about a united community of fans, they just want to put their hands on something they have no right to take advantage of. I will never buy another Bethesda game, from now on, and I suggest you to do so.
Markydoo;-;Don't buy with the current modding  by valve
Lonmoer;-;First horse armor then paid mods? eat a bag of penasia bethesda
killroy225 [NMT];-;EDIT: Valve has taken down their paid mods. I still wouldn't trust them for quite a while. If you do want a BIG game with a much more interesting story I'd recommend Morrowind with MSGO and something in the way of a hit mod. I am sad to say this, but I'd never recommend this game now that the Valve has decided to force people to pay for mods, I do support modders being able to get paid for them, but the customer experience of this would make this a horrible idea! for one would prefer it be optional and if it is bought and stops working either refund the money or credit that money to the account.
Were;-;Mods make this game a great buy, extending its lifespan by at least several hundred hours. Also, all mods are FREE!
Xzal;-;Paid For Mods. Negative Review. A very good comment was made and it shall apply here. "My review is staying [negative] because you tried, Bethesda, not because you got away with it or not." Valve are advertising "Paid Mods" as a benefit for the creators, but Modders are actually losing out. Mods which are dependent on other mods will find themselves becoming defunct / unusable. Modders which use software to create custom models etc will have Licensing issues & legal issues. Valve + Bethesda claim 75% of the cited Paid Mod cost. That leaves 25% to be divided between the people who created the mod. For larger mods like Falskaar which has 12 people working on it. So for example if Falskaar was 'sold' for 10, only 2.50 would go to the Falskaar team, each member getting 20p for each sale. Then here the kick in the teeth, NO ONE on the Falskaar team will see a penny until they earn 400 minimum. Paying for mods only promotes Single Man creations that are as small and effortless as possible.
[INACTIVE til 08/24] Payne Train;-;This review can be purchased on the Steam Workshop for as low as $3.99!
mrwriter;-;AHAHAHAHA! 20 QUID!? FOR A MOD PACK!? 20 POUNDS. OF REAL ACTUAL MONEY. NOT MONOPOLY MONEY. NOT IN GAME MONEY. 20 QUID. 20 POUNDS. FOR A PACK OF MODS. AAHAHHAHAHAHA hahahaa ahaha aaahhh... Valve is dead. Abandon ship. UPDATE: Yeah. They've gotten rid of it now. This review will remain as a testament to the day Valve died for good, after a long struggle with "trying to be worse than EA" syndrome.
Toxikyle;-;Between paid mods and ESO, Beth's just going to end up joining the club of Triple-A cash cows who turn a blind eye to the complaints of the community. I think EA and Ubi saved them a seat. I myself am a small modmaker, and I can promise, you'll never catch me trying to profit off my creations. EDIT: Paid mods are thankfully gone, but Valve plans to reintroduce them again after they "refine" them a bit more. Unless their new system works, this review isn't changing.
Filthy Weeaboo Scrub;-;Congratulations Valve, Skyrim got a negative review. If you would like a better review, please select from one of these Mod Packs: 1. Good Review Mod Super Fun ($8.99) 2. Valve Why Would You Do This ($12.99) 3. This Was A Terrible Mistake ($19.99) 4. NEW GOOD RING OF CHEATING GODMODE FUN ($124.99)
OrangeRevan;-;I don't have many hours logged with this game for the simple fact that I bought it and never found the time. Then the paid mods came out and now I'm going to delete this all together. Valve knows we don't like this idea of paid mods yet they keep trying to shove it down our throats until we just surrender. NO WAY!
Nielscorn;-;It once was an awesome game that you could mod to infinity but I would NOT recommend it to anyone as of right now where you have to pay for mods. The game itself is only really fun once you have the expansions and even then you blow through the content pretty fast. Mods were the lifeblood of this game and now it's behind a paywall. DO NOT BUY THIS GAME
Hungover;-;i dont like it especially the field of view is like 50 and withdrawn sucks  especially the movement of the controls um graphics are really good i'd hav 2 say this game would b mean't for nerds.
Happy Store;-;Save the mods. Don't support paid mods!
DancesWithHogs;-;The game itself is great. The idea of paying for mods that used to be free and modders only getting 25% is awful. It's a business decision that will stifle innovation and open up Valve and Bethesda to loads of legal troubles.
999;-;Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is. That's why I'm copypasta-ing all over to  this up. Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you serious. This is beyond necessity. You took a clean thing and you made it worse. People are still buying Skyrim, many of whom would download mods. Look at the devastating negative publicity. You are going to lose more money than you will earn. Even if you do fix this, than the community will forever shun your raunchy behavior. Fix it now and stem the bleeding. . You aren't even reading these reviews. No one is.Valve please. Are you
Maxwell;-;You have to buy mods now Which is just Greedy
Vincent Adultman;-;Its a great game, but the modding community isn't friendly anymore since bethesda has become money hungry. only 25% of money spent on mods goes to the mod creator, which isn't jack  since bethesda doesn't have to do anything but rake the money in.
Marcie;-;Valve takes 75% of the money for a mod that somebody else made. Don't buy this game or its mods until they fix this atrocity.
Lachrymus;-;You have ruined what was once a magical thing Gaben. Two thumbs down The greed is real boys
Nova Deus;-;Paid mods are
BrutalicusMaximus;-;Paid mods is a terrible idea. 1) People are stealing mods from elsewhere and posting them for a price. 2) Mods have no quality control and often interfere with other mods, they shouldn't ever be sold directly without any QA 3) If you insist on making paid mods you should select certain free mods to go through extra development and quality assurance. Only then should they be offered for a price. The system as is will cause a lot of problems and ruin the current mod community for Skyrim. You are totally ripping mod makers off with the insane cut both Steam and Bethesda are taking. The huge selection of good free mods used to be a huge part of this game. Now many will get taken down and put up for sale. I can't reccomend this game anymore.
ethanhart35;-;Paid Mods are BS sign the petition against this S***!!
Mr. V;-;Recent developments had led me to not recommend this game. The world of Skyrim used to be open and free to explore. We had HEROES who developed new content for the game because they loved it ; not to make a profit. When I bought this game, I paid the creator of the content. When I found mods that I loved I donated. This relationship was healthy. I miss those times.
Taters McGee;-;Skyrim - 7/10 Skyrim with mods - 10/10 Skyrim after I have to uninstall mods I can no longer afford - 0/10
Punished Snack;-;When two super Jews, Bethesda and Valve, unite they bring you the premier money laundering scheme of the milenia. Truly the epitome of how devs feel towards their communities in this current gaming world.
Punished Snack;-;When two super Jews, Bethesda and Valve, unite they bring you the premier money laundering scheme of the milenia. Truly the epitome of how devs feel towards their communities in this current gaming world.
Harvey Alibastor;-;i used to write good review's but then i took a sweetroll to the knee. contains: -ultra realistic horses -lots of lolligaggin' -fus ro dah -sweetrolls -naked cats punching dragons to death -totally non-repetitive phrases used by guards 10/10 must buy
Kompsies;-;Immersive, hardcore, and RPG-like +sexy women 10/10
KVINSKY;-;I'm not the hero you need but maybe I'm the hero you deserve, this game is le bad, le mods cost $$$$$$?????? gabe is le troll, in closing to the window to the ball, till the sweat drip down my balls, that is all.
SnakeNtheGrass;-;Great RPG, go where you want, kill who you want, steal what you want. The quest are great with a good story behind it (I dont do alot of story lines, not really a fan in any game). The combat seems like an improvement from previous Elder Scroll games. Magic is fun to play around with but I'll always use my trusty Bow, the aim is right on, just hard to hit them flying dragons. Skills are done nicely, If your an archer type, using bows alot, and wanna try 2 hand weapons, you dont have to make a new character, just start using 2 hand weapons with your archer and you'll gain skill. Since there is level ramping (enemies in the world level and scale up compared to what level you are) when you switch to using 2 hand weapons, you will notice a damage differance, but just keep using you'll get your skill where it needs to be soon enough. Its easy to get lost in doing side quest from the main story, as they randomly generate. Over all, if you like alot of the Elder Scrolls and/or Fallout series, you'll love this. 9/10
Frost$abre;-;paid mods occured. no.
nashley;-;Now that steam removed the mod paywall, I don't think that there is anyone who wouldn't recommend this game. If you haven't bought this yet, disregard the angry reviews and rest easy knowing that a crisis was narrowly avoided. The game itself is fantastic and the wonderful supply of high-quality mods is what allows this game to still grow and expand even today.
DreaddJester;-;What can I say about Skyrim that hasn't already been said. Probably not a lot but I'll try. If you're one of the few who have never played Skyrim then you owe it to yourself to play it. Skyrim truly is just as incredible as anything you've ever heard about it and is quite possibly the best fantasy setting role playing game ever created to date. It's a true treat to play this game and just the base game will have you playing for a long time to come, and replaying it to try different things after that. It's one of those games that you'll remember your experiences in for the rest of your life. If you've never owned Skyrim on the PC then you should certainly consider buying it on Steam. There are millions of mods out there, both in Steam Workshop and out on the general web that can add a lifetime of content to this game. Didn't like the way the developers did the original skins for the races? There's tons of mods to change that. Bought a computer that cost more than your house and feel the grapics are dated?? There's mods that will make this game look as near real as you can currently get in computer grapics. You've seen all and done all there was to see in this game?? Well first off, GO YOU!! That's quite a feat! But there's mods out there that add entirely new lands, quests, armor, weapons, you name it out there so I'm betting you haven't seen it all. If you can dream it, there's a mod for Skyrim somewhere out there for it and with all that mod goodness out there, I belive you could play this game for the rest of your life and never truly see it all.
-RyIL3x-;-;Skyrim is better than Minecraft
Squirrel;-;Skyrim is one of those RPG's that could be classified as "one in a million". Immediately after the brief opening scenes, the game lets you go out into the enormous world and do whatever you like. You can go directly to the main story; or solely focus your attention of just the guilds; or even spend 5 hrs picks flowers. The game gives you absolute freedom to do whatever you want. And that's rare in a game now-a-days, where even in RPGs there are hidden walls and linear questlines. Besides the quest, the game has hundreds of locations for you to explore. Every dungeon is different. In previous TES games, most of the dungeons, caves, or whatever looked pretty much the same (which wasn't a bad thing), but each dungeon was hand crafted to be different. Humans, beast, creatures, and dragons have set lvls, meaning the stronger you get, the easier they'll become. This is a BIG difference compared to Oblivion, where everything you fought scaled with you. That made the game much more difficult and annoying. But Skyrim allows you to go beast mode the higher you get, making you feel like you really are the Dragonborn. Then there are the mods. Mods, mods, and more mods. I love them. I have close to 50 mods on my game right now. 3/4th of them are either texture or city mods. When I say city mods, I mean there are mods that allow you to change the way a city looks to give it a more vibrant and colorful feel. Bethesda did an amazing job with the cities, but they're pretty bare. I have screenshots on my profile of just a few of the mods. So as someone who has played Skyrim on the Xbox 360, the PS3 and the PC, I can 100% say that this is one of the greatest RPGs that has ever been made. You would have to be a fool to not try it. It literally has something for everyone's play style. 10/10
SajBear;-;Do you wish you could live in another world? Well now you can. You never have to come back to the real one, I promise. Its much safer here. 11/3.8
ITEMS;-;5I used to be an adventurer like you then I took an arrow in the knee.
Mr Mustelid;-;The Elder Scrolls has to be one of the best open world RPG game series ever released. Every game they release seems better than the last and if the quality of Skyrim is anything to go by i can't wait to see what they do next. :)
Kelvy;-;I recommend this game to all. I must admit working through all the pain of ridding it of glitches and crashes is now fun, no more anger management consulting as before. Now I look more closely at what is written and find the faults readily. Now I just seem to know exactly where they are or where they come from. Except for that random CTD but I think I have that one sorted now, fingers crossed. I still enjoy the game over two years on.
Nigguv8;-;God this game is like a sponge for badness, it took all the horrible features from a great game like Call of Duty: Black Ops, put it in this game,  on it, and boom you made the game. Idk what Bathsalts was thinking when they made this horrible abomination but it sure is horrible. The story makes no sense, you play as an abroted dog that was brought back to life to go back in time and assassinate George Washington in order to free the slaves, with your set of toothpicks that are expensive as hell and break(atleast not until you've spent all your skill points on toothpicking) when you try to open a locked bathroom door. I gave it a 10/10 because i'm a ing idiot.
caidicus;-;Wow, I can't believe I never reviewed this game. It's good. It's a really good game.
Glorfy;-;It was okay. I didn't play it much.
rhiannon_3r45mu5;-;Get the game, there is no good reason why you shouldnt do. Well I lie there is one the UI is designed for a gamepad, but you can mod it to something better, and you will want to.
ShinyRai;-;Great game with an awesome storyline that includes... DRAGONS, pick pocketable ghosts, flying tree horses, MORE DRAGONS, zambs, cheese, vampires and werewolves, (still a better love story than Twilight) EVENMORE DRAGONS, your own personal slav- Uh... Imean followers, BLOOD, did I mention DRAGONS? and M A N Y M U C H M O R E 10/10 would Fus Ro Dah again
HeavyWether;-;great game not so great paid mods
Alcatraz;-;Walked into Riverwood for the first time saw a chicken battered it to death then the whole of Riverwood was chasing me. 10/10 would batter a chicken to death again.
TwIsT;-;Its good!
Tibu;-;Way to ruin the reputation of such awesome game, Volvo. The game is and forever will be AWESOME. 10/10. But ain't payin no' shiz for mods. If you want awesome mods and enjoy the game the way it was supposed to be enjoyed get em at Nexus (Google it). Giving a bad review just hurts me, but I'm done with Volvo's greedyness. We just should Fus-Ro-Dah all their bs. Edit: We did it guys! Volvo, has removed that "feature" that allowed us to "pay for mods" no more horse genitalia for $99.99. Edit2: Please change your reviews, let's not give this game a bad review due the bad choices Volvo and Bethesda did. Now I fully recommend you this game, so I recommend Nexus.
Pekmez Pita;-;You want me to pay for mods now? Please, from the bottom of my heart... GO  YOURSELF! That includes Bethesda, Valve and the modders that are partaking in this despicable . I will happily and openly pirate your content from now on.
LSD;-;in the second part of bethesdas epic oblivion series, we join the dragonbored as he experiences deja vu. "didn't i just play this game", "isn't this the same combat system as before", and "didn't i just speak to that guy" are some of the 3 questions you'll ask yourself as you play. in an unprecedented move of content creator support, valve now allows us to fork over our shekels in exchange for the mass of reskins that the excellent modding community spews out on a daily basis. for just 80 great british pence, you too can imagine what your sword would look like if it was green. we give it eight-venturer out of ten-knee
Darkboom;-;I already came to this game. I'm not kidding.
Bultungin;-;This game supports paid mods, and I don't.
Elenix;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. People can and should support mod creators via donations, and a 'Buy me a coffee!' button on the workshop page would be good, but putting them behind a pay wall is god damn atrocious. Hoping Valve and other responsible parties for this new practice will turn around.
TmP Riddler;-;Well to start all the Elder Scroll Games are really just horrible to watch unless you have already played them and can understand them while watching. And despite the fact that the game doesn't look very action packed once you get into you are in great battles were you need to use tactics and smarts along with some skill to beat them, in the start yes all it is is run here hit him 2 times and bam he is dead, but as you reach lets say lvl 10 (maybe a half and hour of running around caves, not even) you end up having to use tactics not on your right trigger or mouse. Along with the amazing combat there are 1000's of quests which all have there own detailed back story, and there are also 4 guilds, 3 branches, and 1 main line which each have there own detailed rich and emotional back story that is as i describe it like a book, where every mission is like a cliff hanger and once you finally find a break point, it's 7 hours later and you just did like 20 quests. Then the treasures, the goal to become rich beyond everyone sucks you in where you need to steal from everyone to increase your coin purse by only 500 gold sucks you in till the point where you end up murdering a whole city for there stuff. Plus there is a huge world covered in towns and mining camps and caves that you can explore when ever you would like to filled with magical treasures and plot twists. And finally every player can create a character that they see them selves as training skills and grinding levels(which is the only game i have enjoyed grinding levels on) s you personalize your character to be the amazing hero you wish you could be.
Haruka Amami;-;Ahh yes the elder scrolls V was a very good game for the rpg style gameplay like fallout games with customizing your character the gameplay is amazing the storyline is that your a prisoner that you could give him or her a name is up to you how u want to make your character look like. +++gameplay and graphics +++weapons and spells +++good voice acting +++soundtrack If you like a RPG game like the elder scroll this game is for you
Fancy;-;wanted to adopt a kid, but she already had parents. So I killed her parents. She got sent to an orphanage and I adopted her. 1 of my favorite games, a must-have!
Byll Nie;-;I recently bought this game for the mods, went on vacation, came back, I have to pay for  that was once free? You were the chosen one GabeN you were supposed to destroy industries like EA not become like them!
Barium;-;so far pretty fun. i just wish it had a action bar like rift and wow does so i could get some extra use out of my razor naga mouse. kinda dumb that im a caster and have to use both hands to cast when i was watching the new lord of the rings last night and he had a sword and staff and could still cast. still a pretty fun game once you get the  weight removed from items you carry. stupidest idea ever specially for a kleptomaniac like myself. i have like 200,000 gold and i still steal everything in sight cause i just cant help myself. if its lootable its mine
Kath;-;One of the best games ive ever played, hours of exploration and quests to complete, highly reccomend.
Minority Man;-;Paying for mods??? What is this EA?
Domojaxx;-;SHOULD YOU BUY "The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim" (+DLCs) butterfly ======================================================================= -> For the base Game: Once you get into the vast world of this RPG game, which is one of the most impressive ones ever, you wouldn't want to get out from it in weeks! It has a very detailed customization system! The storyline and it's narration are amazing, the vistas and graphics are breathtaking, and the feel of the character and controls are truly great! Also, the audio effects are always sounding good and authentic which adds to the atmosphere the game has even further! Also, you can choose different factions, various skills and choose from many dialogue options and roads to take, which have different outcomes in a lot of quests! You can ride a horse and get a companion, which can be helpful for covering long distances and using the companion as a mule! The free Steam-Workshop mods that you can get, double, if not triple the fun! You get a Free HD Graphics mods for the entire game and 2-3 other ones that This masterpiece is unconditionally worth having! Trust me - if you like this genre, this game is a MUST HAVE! -> For the DLCs: Basically "Dragonborn" lets you ride the Dragons; "Hearthfire" let's you build a home from scratch and you can decorate it more than the base game; "Dawnguard" has a really interesting new questline and adds a few enthrallingly designed armours. ALL DLCs are not worth it for their money, or buying them alone - the prices never drop more than 50%. If you're buying the game - buy the Legendary Edition, because you'll save much more on the DLCs and they add a good deal of quests and hours of fun and adventure into the game. "Dragonborn" and "Dawnguard" are worth it the most because they both add new sets of Armour that adds more protection than the base game sets, a lot of new and exciting quests, and if you find it cheaper to buy only 1 DLC - make it "Dragonborn" (most quests among all DLCs; the ability to ride dragons; best armour protection in the whole game content and more...) OVERALL SCORE: 10 (YES - YOU SHOULD BUY!) ======================================================================= falkwreathAudio (Voices, Narration, sounds): 10 markarthVideo (Graphics, Quality of in-game videos, vistas): 10 riftenStory (Plot, side-quests, how it is all introduced + variety): 10 solitudeGenre-typical atmosphere: Amazing for an RPG = 10+ windhelmPhysics (Mechanics, Gravity, General feel and control): 10 whiterunLongevity (Time you will definitely spend in the game = 100+ hours): 10+
Third Eye;-;This negative review is prompted by Valve's new practice of selling mods and passing it off as a courtesy to the mod creators, all the while taking the lion's share of the profits. Want to really support mod creators? Remove this atrocity of a paywall and add way of donating to the authors directly.
I kill dogs;-;paid mods are really gay
Anthony [Be];-;Dragons, dragons everywhere
Alene;-;got over encumbered after picking up a feather 11/10 would pick up more feathers
The Smolder;-;Introduction: It's rare for me to give a game a perfect score, but Skyrim is a real gem. In this chapter of the Elder Scrolls saga, you will probably end up investing hundreds of hours of your life to experience open world storytelling at its best. Bethesda did a flawless job immersing the player in countless diverse adventures, from fighting dragons to dabbling with gods, and none of these questlines ever lose their shine. Being an open world roleplaying game, it goes without saying that Skyrim provides a huge environment that you can explore at your own leisure. However, like its predecessors, Skyrim is not completely without flaw. On rare occassion you might happen accross a technical glitch or two (usually easily fixed by a mod), but let me tell you firsthand that this is well worth the price. In spite of its shortcomings, Skyrim is still the best game that I have ever played, and it is impossible to see it as anything outside of a uniquely enchanting experience. Story: Really, there is too much story to cover, so here is the primary synopsis: Tamriel is a land brimming with danger, in this masterpiece. It was once prophesied that a dragon, known as Alduin, would return to destroy the world. It is up to the player to defeat the world eater, before it is too late. Meanwhile, there is a war brewing between the Stormcloaks and the Imperials, in which the player can choose to involve themselves, or remain neutral. Again, this is a HUGE open world experience, where you can safely ignore the main storyline for 80% or more of your gametime. There is always stuff to do, and you will never be bored. Gameplay: There are several races and classes that you can pick from, and there is something for everybody in the mix. You can even mix races with their non-default roles, if you wish to experiment. By default, you can play a Breton, Altmer (High Elf), Argonian, Bosmer (Wood Elf), Dunmer (Dark Elf), Imperial, Khajiit, Nord, Orsimer (Orc) or Redguard. There are other races you could mod in, however I feel the default races are perfect, and found no need to do this myself. It should be taken into consideration that each race starts with a different set of base stats. The early game customization is wonderful, and Bethesda gives you a lot of options to work with. I think the character customization in Skyrim might just be one of my favourite elements, so don't be afraid to add personality to your characters appearance! Classes are also extremely diverse, and there is no right or wrong way to play them. You could mix and match them, and still be able to beat the game. However, some of the archetypes include: Two-Handed Warrior, Archer, Battlemage, Thief, Assassin, Warlock, Paladin, and Nightblade. There are many places to read up on the archetypes, so I won't flood this section with information. =) It should also be mentioned that the difficulty can be determined at any point in the game by the player. I felt this was an extremely nice feature, as I enjoy challenging gameplay. I feel that Skyrim is extremely well balanced, and (unless you're playing legendary) never strays to the realm of impossibility. Even legendary creatures are beatable, it just takes a lot more effort and strategy. Controls: Controls can be set through the settings menu, and the default controls are really not so bad. If you're anything like me, however, you might prefer the 360 controller approach, and I am pleased to announce that this is entirely supported by Skyrim. It was no fuss for me to set it up, and so I would say that the controls of this game are very user friendly - and in the end, boil down to personal preference. Graphics: I feel as though the graphic quality of Skyrim has been highly praised elsewhere, so permit me a moment to beat a dead horse: The graphics in this game are true to detail, and very in-depth. In other words: Worthy of the hype. You can take your game a step further, if you so desire, by installing mods - as Skyrim is a host to many of these personal preference improvements, and remains highly customizable. The aurora borealis which spans over Tamriel at night is possibly the most beautiful feature to be found in the game. The visuals and sounds are highly impressive on their own, but when you mix them with exploration and discovery, it's only icing on the cake. Sound: The sounds of Skyrim feature an original score, which I have been told reminds some people of Oblivion. The main theme is brilliant, and has been covered countless times for those of you who might be interested. The lyrics of the main theme is written in dragon language, which sets it apart from the little tunes that you will hear the bards sing throughout the game. Replay Value: I have already replayed this game so many times, and I guarantee you will too. Smolder's Note: Finally, a note on modding. This is extremely simple, for those of you who have never modded before, and even easier for those of you who have. However, you can easily fix a lot of the game bugs and glitches by use of these wonderful implementations made by other Skyrim users. It is also very simple to add other mods to your game, such as Immersive Armors, Immersive Creatures, or Immersive Weapons (all three are mods that I cannot live without). I really want to take a moment to encourage you to check out the lore-friendly mods that might enhance your Skyrim experience. I hope this helped!
Achaeus;-;Its Skyrim...nuff said really.
_ToxicTurtle_;-;I like that you have choices and you get to kill dragons!!!!
geldofas;-;It's a great game with a great modding community. Thanks for getting rid of the paywall, Valve and Bethesda.
[H] 2 Rust Items [W] 1 Ark Item;-;I took 80 worth of arrows to obtain this beauty
TLCP Atrum;-;OY VEY, PAY ME MONEY FOR OTHER PEOPLES' WORK! TIME TO DESTROY THE MODDING COMMUNITY AND OUR REPUTATION FOR A QUICK BUCK! Oh , the Nexus exists, better plot its death.
TLCP Atrum;-;OY VEY, PAY ME MONEY FOR OTHER PEOPLES' WORK! TIME TO DESTROY THE MODDING COMMUNITY AND OUR REPUTATION FOR A QUICK BUCK! Oh , the Nexus exists, better plot its death.
Tapuahi;-;Like Skyrim with swords. 11/10
Pika;-;Paid mods are finally gone, which consists of pretty much 99.99% of the negative reviews. BUY THIS GAME YOU WILL NOT REGRET IT
George Potampkin;-;i was going to write a review but THEN I TOOK LE ARROW TO LE KNEEE XD HAHA IM SUCH A NERD XD
WhiteBoy;-;best game in my life *after fallout*
Vuxxey;-;Love it! :3
BarotTD;-;10/10 Horse mechanics.
Sigure;-;altho i just started the game for a while, i already find the game fun and interesting. especially with all kind of mods out there. i love games with quests! this game has plenty of them!!
John Basso;-;pretty good xD
Grimmy left 4eva;-;This game is good.
CrazyGPU on GTX 780 Ti;-;The Elder Scrolls V Skyrim is an open world role-playing game developed by Bethesda Game Studios and published by Bethesda Softworks in 2011 The game takes place in the Nordic lands of Skyrim where the character must defeat the legendary dragon Alduin who according to prophecy will devour the world. The player can also become part of the Imperial Legion or the Layers of the Storm, parties that are under civil war. This game has several different stories going on at once in a huge world. Skyrim allows more than 100 hours of gameplay doing different things. It has a great replay value and looks very good for a RPG. Also it has lots of mods. The game is not linear, the player can explore the vast world choosing to meet goals . You can also get mates who attend to fight with you and deal with several creatures of nature that get in your way and the dragons that Alduin revive . The graphics engine called Creation Engine improved graphics and interface level when compared with Elders Scrolls IV Oblivion. It is a game that even those who enjoy other genres find more entertaining. Skyrim takes us into a different world, like when you watch " The Lord of the Rings ". The combat system is also improved compared to other Bethesda games like the excelent Fallout 3. Skyrim sold over seven million copies in its first week and was the best RPG of 2011 . The game was released for PC , PS3 and XBOX 360. Although the minimum requirements are lower, a Quad Core PC processor , 4GB of RAM and a powerful graphics card with 1GB of video ram is recommended. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ESPAOL ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim es un videojuego de rol de mundo abierto desarrollado por Bethesda Game Studios y publicado por Bethesda Softworks en 2011 El juego tiene lugar en las tierras nrdicas de Skyrim donde el personaje debe derrotar al legendario dragn Alduin quien segn la profeca devorar al mundo. El jugador adems puede convertirse a la legin Imperial o a los Capas de la Tormenta que estn en guerra civil. De esta forma el juego posee varias historias diferentes que ocurren al mismo tiempo en un mundo enorme a disposicin del jugador. El juego permite jugar tranquilamente 100 horas haciendo cosas diferentes. Tiene una gran rejugabilidad. El juego no es lineal, el jugador puede recorrer el extenso mundo eligiendo que metas cumplir. Adems puede conseguir acompaantes que lo asistan. Tambin puede enfrentarse a los seres de la naturaleza que se encuentren en su camino y a los dragones que Alduin revive. El motor grfico llamado Creation Engine mejor el nivel grfico y la interfaz si lo comparamos con el Oblivion. Es un juego que hasta los que disfrutan ms de otros gneros encontrarn entretenido. Skyrim nos sumerge en un mundo distinto, como cuando uno mira "El seor de los anillos". El sistema de combate tambin est mejorado con respecto a otros juegos de Bethesda como el excelente Fallout 3. Vendi mas de siete millones de copias en su primera semana y fue el mejor juego de rol del 2011. El juego se lanz para PC, PS3 y XBOX 360. Aunque los requisitos mnimos son mas bajos, en PC se recomienda un procesador Quad Core , 4GB de RAM y una tarjeta grfica poderosa con 1 GB de ram de video.
DeathEagle;-;Jumping from 100 feet with a horse --- horse dies . I survived . 10/10
lxMattAranxl;-;I'll admit, at first when I heard of the game it didn't seem as interesting, thought it would be like the rest that claims to be epic when it's not. But over time I saw my friends play it, and when I looked it up for a voicepak project I was working on, I was wrong... the game was something I was actually expecting in a game: no ending point, full customization, the ability to fight in 1st person with any weapon, outstanding music, ability to make potions, armor, weapons and food like in MMO games, and a great storyline with many branching quests. All in Single Player! I never got the DLC yet, but I can already tell it'll make the game worth every cent it's worth! Too addicting. Even the mods make the game fun. Never gets old with a character with wings. ESPECIALLY if killed by a giant! (Flying in the air always cracks me up. XP) Screw the 10/10 rating, and even the 20/10 rating... it deserves the 50/10 rating!! Best RPG game ever on Steam!
Profile name;-;dont buy this its not good game. buy a better game sonic adventure 2 is better its like this but better.
Sicwolf;-;Skyrim offers probably the best possible value of Money versus Content. Truly astonishing and vast world; fantastic voice acting; huge number of quite diversified quests - many of them deserve applause; beautiful graphics with some amazing design work behind them, and many, many more... "Remember always this: As you will it, so it shall be".
Mad Cow;-;Wait, I know you.
lester;-;The game itself is mediocre at best. Shallow, monotonous, boring. Mods are what made it so popular. The recent change is going to kill it. I'm not recommending this game. You're much better of to go and play Morrowind or Oblivion instead. They will probably be affected but this "paid mods" mess too but to much lesser extent anyway.
east;-;I will play this one day. Promised.
ObnoWolf |;-;This is one of the best games I have ever played ( )
Ultramarine Vindictus;-;Paying for mods is a disgrace.
~ t 8 0 0 8 8 ~;-;Paid Mods. Need I say anymore. Well I will anyway, the introduction of paid mods will be the downfall of steam, and the soon enough the downfall of the gaming industry as a whole. All eyes are on you bethesda, if you don't back down then other companies will begin to introduce paid mods, and begin the downfall of the gaming industry. Everyone makes mistakes, there is still time to undo what you have done.
Tristan Oxnam | Twistybum;-;I have no life xD 1902.5 hrs a bit too much XD i dont know how i still play this game probly cause i havent completed the game as every race xD on legendary x10 difficulty
Wizard;-;Vanilla Skyrim is a decent game. When modded with Skyrim Nexus, it become comes a superb game. For any Skyrim fan who's never modded thier game with Nexus mods, I can't recommend it enough.
Dactrocki;-;I have over 100 hours in this game, and I have only done three quests from main story line... So many things to explore to care about main quest...
Suave Mongrel;-;Unlock the Positive Review mod for 4.99!
teediz;-;finished the game in 5 hours using the console 10/9
Noxy;-;Paid mods. Nope.
Rye;-;Paid for mods goes against the entire 20+ year spirit of pc gaming that has been built up. This is bad for everyone and only helps to line Bethesda and Valve's pockets even more so.
Trampstamp;-;I used to like Bethesda but if this is how they are going to go foward then I'm done buying their games. This is some EA levels of greed. Paid mods are bad in every possible way.
Onizuka;-;FATAL ERROR!! Pay for mods! Not fool enough to support how greed both company: Valve & Bethesda. www.change.org
Sweezog;-;Boo for payed mods
Nox;-;Be ready to pay even more money for all the extras (paid mods)
Ben's Low Cal Calzone Zone;-;Supports paid mods, I do not
Ecstatic1029;-;Congratulations, you've managed to  off an entire community and  up a fantastic game with your greedy .
Fr0zenAlive;-;more then half of my mods are gone im done with this game
RP Inigo Montoya;-;They are selling mods....
Phoenix;-;Microtransactions make everyyyyyyything better! (Get more comments like this, only $4.99 a piece!!)
Syman;-;Base? 6/10 Mods? 9/10 Paid Mods? 0/10
Bagels;-;Don't mind me, just part of the hivemind.
stepheneneng;-;Show your support to keep PC modding free.
Mr. Buttons;-;down with GabeN
Rave [GWJ];-;Really disappointed with the way paid mods have been added. Might be stupid to publish a negative review for a game I have enjoyed for years, but this is setting a bad precedent. This has the potential to ruin a great mod community, there are many mods I have used for awhile now that are suddenly over $4 CDN. I hope major changes are made and rethought about this new practice. Seems like a good time for GoG to release a client seems like valve maybe needs some competition.
Grandpa Rick;-;Paying for user-generated content is for console gamers. Paying for user-generated content based on non-commercially licensed software is flatly illegal.
hold your colour;-;Paid mods are absolutely unacceptable. For every dollar you "pay" the developer only received 25 cents and the rest go to Bethesda and Valve.
derp;-;PAID MODS?!?! I'm out. I saw what you did there valve. Now nexus mods alongside some of my favorite mods are being sold.
Dr. Salmon;-;Paid mods is a problem that needs to be remedied.
Toasty;-;Refuse to suport a Game with Paid mods
AggroBro;-;Paid mods? NO STARS!
Ja'Crispy;-;o
Satros{{WaR}};-;Combat isnt very good. Also i'd rather play a game that doesn't make you pay for mods.
Paul;-;I always wished Bethesda and Valve my two favorite game companies could  me in the ! With something they didn't even create! 75% glutenfree
DonPedrox;-;What can be said that hasn't been repeated ad nauseum? The game itself is fantastic it's just a shame Valve and Bethesda chose this 4 year old game as its guinea pig and subsequently the communities target for it's distaste in what has become one of the biggest PC gaming controversy in recent years.
Irish Wristwatch;-;Payed mods are a detriment to PC Gaming. Bethesda and Valve, stop.
big_nips;-;Dear all paid mods ......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../ .............//'...'/` ........../'/.../..../......./\ ........('(.......... ~/'...') .........\.................'...../ ..........''...\.......... _. ............\..............(
Binyah Binyah;-;Unfortunately, if buying this game means supporting paid mods then it's just not worth it in the long run. It's just too destructive for the community. Daggerfall and Morrowind are both better games anyway.
<Thunderking>;-;Paid mods removed. All is well.
Mr. Unforgiven;-;Ohh my god.. this game is just awesome.. its addicted like hell. the graphics are the best i've ever seen the story line is great and never got bored... 10/10!!
TRIPLE BALLS;-;paying for mods is ok. But giving the creator only 25% ?  it
Buiuna;-;Paid modding is the single most  concept right after making a game about E.T the movie.
Stop Calling;-;This game has such dull combat system and quests. But it has huge interesing map and it looks pretty, and if it doesn't you can mod it as long you don't have to pay for that...
py6 Spider;-;Very good game, 10x better with all DLC's.
Tootington;-;An accurate representation of finns. You run thorugh snowy wastelands, shouting at everything and drink all the time.
Sir Lawrence;-;Good game, made even better thanks to an amazing modding community.
Count Petrus the Retard;-;this paid mod . I'm more than done with this game.
Siirus;-;Paid mods. Thanks, stEAm.
Zomby;-;Even with all the bugs and quirks that can happen in such a massive game, Skyrim is definitely a breathtaking experience. Large open world, numerous quests, interesting storyline. The graphics have of course much improved since the last installment. They somewhat dumbed down the interface to accomodate consoles but once you get past that the game is really enjoyable.
Duck Hunter;-;I couldn't feel more disgusted with they way Steam and Bethesda have handled modding with this now. I hope you take joy in the desecration of community modding because valve and Bethesda don't have enough billions yet.
[NPG]ale mperor;-;- Installed - Loaded in - Created Character - Did all the intro quests - Talked to jarl of whiterun - Noticed that I could use console commands - Turned off my auto-save feature - Spawned 500000 cabbages - Game crashed - Loaded back in - Sees that I can't continue my game - Creates another character Cabbage/500000; would over throw whiterun with cabbages.
Mike_J;-;Do not Mess with chicken in Riverwood!
MelonFarmer;-;Horse genitalia is free again.
Metal Head;-;Don't get me wrong skyrim itself is a great game and will give you hours of fun But as a lot of others say the game is trying to make you pay for comunnity made mods and even if you would be stupit enough to buy it. 75% goes to steam and the developer you are not even supporting the creator A great sulution the community came up with was the donation button no forced pay for the content but your able to support the creator Like many other community brothers will tell you dont support this kind of moneygrabbing!!!
goka9696;-;So uhh... Game was mediocre already. Not too bad, but got boring fast, especially the music was bad. But now they are SELLING mods. PCMasterRace wins again, I guess Edit: They stopped selling mods. But hey, without mods game is not worth it, and with mods it's so-so. Still not recommended
Santoro;-;Bought it at a sale for 4 bucks. Installed it the second day. Played 11 hours straight. Got addicted. Took a break. Bought the Dawnguard DLC. Got addicted. Took a break. Bought the Dragonborn DLC. Got addicted. Either way, this game is <3. There's alot of things to do, many quests(missions), different armors (light armor, heavy armor), weapons (two-handed, one-handed), magic (destruction, conjuration, illusion, alternation) and muuuuuuuuuuch more. The story is bassicly a land in which a civil war is raging, between the rebel Stormcloaks led by Ulfric Stormcloak and the Imperial Legions lead by General Tullius, and then dragons appear and your story starts ( You can also be a Stormcloak or a Imperial). There are many other factions/guilds, such as the Thieves Guild, the Dark Brotherhood, the Colleague of Winterhold (mages) and the Companions, and the Dawnguard DLC introdouced 2 new factions: Vampires & Vampire Hunters (Dawnguard). I also forgot to mention differnet races, you can be a Argonian (lizard-like humanoid), a Khajit (cat-like humanoid) and there are 3 types of Elves (originally 5 but other 2 were wiped out), there are also Orcs, then there are humans: Imperials, Nords, Bretons, Redguards and more. There are many places to discover, anyways not to spoil this game any further, it's worth buying it. Especially if you played previous Elder Scrolls titles or Fallout. Oh and there are lots and lots of dragons, they even made a dragon language.
snay;-;Does this game really need a recommendation? You must play it.
LeppyV;-;So good I don't even own the game and I can write a review.
Morky;-;Godly. Glorious. Majestic. Perfection. Merged together all in one.
Morky;-;Godly. Glorious. Majestic. Perfection. Merged together all in one.
\_()_/;-;If you don't have Skyrim then get out from under your rock and play this.
Jesse Pinkman;-;Needs a mod where you can turn all the High Elves into Nazis and then just kill them one by one I mean they are all basically mini Hitlers why the  are they a race
$uokukko 8);-;Great game! 0/10!
Adlersch;-;The game that made me try out Steam, and made me stop using Steam. Well done Valve!
Scott Steiner;-;Down voting because mods
Black Hawk Jesus;-;Selling mods! Gaben has officially turned .
Smitty W.;-;i love this game i have over 100 hours in it and i killed my wife in it, killed our dog and burned down my house i built by hand, you all should buy this game! ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^
BinGuy;-;12/11 - Just had a huge amount of DLC released, making it even better. And most of the DLC is dirt cheap! $.25 for a sword!? Hell yeah! Love the direction Steam is taking with workshop.
Protagonist;-;The game has always been a walking simulator that has a quick t ravel option, but now its directly anti-consumer.
Ender;-;We trusted you...
McSoup;-;Yeah lets pay for mods. Good call Bethesda and Valve.
plutori;-;Used to be amazing. Now the platform for paid mods. Do not recommend.
Zenkho;-;Anybody is complaining about dlc's under a different name. 10/10 best flamewar ever.
ID;-;10/10 with mods, 0/10 with paid mods
topdoog1;-;People stop giving this game a negativ review!
Limping OJ Limpson;-;Because paying for DLC wasn't quite enough already, now paying for community created mods is a must, great job. Go take a big tv remote control and shove it up your  Gaben & co. Skyrim Vanilla 1st time: 6/10 Skyrim with mods: 10/10 Skyrim after purchasable mods: 1/10 - Never going back to vanilla after use of mods therefor R.I.P.
ibfpero // @WORK-back in October;-;Sex position simulator with dragon toys and magic. 8/10
Rektalphabet;-;open world capitalism simulator
r.Wlffstamps <>;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim I have played this game for many hours now, so I shall finally come to complete a review. Graphics The graphics (unmodded) aren't half bad, you could live with them without a probleem. However, if you want a real pretty game, you can mod this game until it just won't even want to play anymore! In fact, there's around 10,000 mods on Nexus, G.E.M.S and Steam Workshop! So if you like to mod till you drop, this is an epic win to buy for you. The textures are outstanding, especially since this is such of an old game! You could easily run this game on med-high settings to get 60fps, then add mods to still have a decent fps! This game is a real gem if you choose to add the 4K mods, although you might experience only around 45-55fps on average, so you should be slightly worried about what mods you're going to download! There's plenty of ways to get yourself out of trouble if your game won't launch, so it's usually a quck fix to get your game back up and running again. Gameplay The gameplay is extremely fun to have in an already awesome game. You could: Kill, scavenge, steal, go to prison, "borrow", eat, fight, drink and tons more! Skyrim is sort of realistic, but only in the sense that you can eat, scavenge, steal ect. So no, this isn't an accurate representation of what medieval times looked like too much! Although on some parts such as the castles and forts, it is quite close to how they could've looked like, so extra points there Bethesda. You also can get a whole new game with the Legendary Edition that adds all the DLC to your library with the full game, granting you access to a wife, Vampires, a house, children and so, so, so much more! You can clearly tell by the number of mods, you won't get bored of Skyrim easily anyime soon as you could get the entire combat system be reworked on, or have some items become over powered or reskined. If you do get stuck in a situation where you are just plain bored, there's tons of cheats you could use, such as more money, but remember, make a new save before you create your legit save illegitemate! Maps! Skyrim's map is an absolute collossus! It is around the size of Just Cause 3's map, but just medieval! They put tons of detail in this map, but if you want anything else of the map, you can always mod it. In fact you SHOULD mod it as long as your PC can handle it. There's plenty of animals / creatures to kill, loot and get XP points from. You could go mining, you could go on an adventure, you could even ride a stallion to the tip of a mountain, nearly touching the clouds while staring down below to see how far you have come. But don't forget, if you dissaprove then just mod it! Summary To sum Skyrim up, I've created a list, or else I'd have to make 10 pages worth of a review on this superb game Pros and Cons Pros: Excellent graphics Giant number of modders and mods Barely ever get bored There's so much things to do You can play the game without using a single cheat There's cheats If you don't like something , you could use a mod to change it Legendary Edition is worth the price DLC is worth the price Massive map Thousands of enemies Quests that eren't fully boring The Gameplay is fun Skill tree Voice acting isn't terrible Some funny dialouge lines You can install a mod such as Wyrmstooth for a few more hours of fun The combat is pretty good You could buy/build your own house (requires DLC) If you already own DLC, then mod the game, you will feel as if it's a completely different game You can change how things look (such as changing the setting to extremely hot) using mods YOU can mod Skyrim Cons: No multiplayer Skyrim might crash because of some mods :/
Def;-;This comment is hidden behind a paywall, please transfer 4.99$ to Gabe Newell and Bethesda to unlock the content.
pietsch;-;one of the best games ever
ptrcK;-;Man,This game man..is ...well..INCREDIBLE AND AMAZING,This game here is Just..Worth buying and playing!,The Enviormenthe Quest the items the Story.9/10 why 9/10? why not 10/10,Well because what i sometime dont like is that When you Kill a king he wont die..no matter what you do..And..THE Mods is just Incredible! HIGHLY RECOMENDATION! Good job Bethesda!
Torosa;-;it's like super hexagon but without hexagon
Navarre;-;As much as I hate jumping on bandwagons, what made this game so great that I kept coming back for more than 1600 hours was the mods. Without it, it's bland and not very interesting, with an awful story, uninspired gameplay and tons of unfixed bugs. Still a decent game if you like exploration, but that's really all that game has going for it. And now Bethesda moves to a new business model, making people pay for mods, with potentially future games allowing only paid mods, which means we'll have to pay for bugfixes and additions to the games, without any guarantee that it will work or any accountability from the developers for these paid features developed by amateurs. Therefore, I can't recommand this game or any future Bethesda game anymore, at least until we see how the future games are handled in that aspect. It was fun while it lasted. Farewell for now Bethesda. Edit: well, looks like all that agitation had a result, Valve and Bethesda backpedaled and paid mods are gone. It will take a bit of time for trust to rebuild though, so in the meantime my review stays negative. No need to change it if Bethesda tries another boneheaded move tomorrow or the next month. Edit 2: lol, a bunch of idiotic fanboys went through all my reviews and downvoted them all to avenge their beloved Skyrim. "This guy made a negative review of Skyrim for reasons we don't agree with, let's downvote all his positive reviews for games that have nothing to do with Skyrim." And by doing so they did exactly what they were blaming me of doing, only for 9 games instead of 1. The irony and stupidity of that move is hilarious.
Seattle Sound;-;Its a great simple fun to play game, be careful. YOU WILL GET ADDICTED!!
Mave;-;I'm sorry, but the paid mods thing have completely ruined a community that has been going super for the last 10 years.
INVCTS;-;An interesting and engaging game that contains numerous hours of gameplay time, though it can get a bit repetitive. Unfortunately is suffers from a great many simplifications compared to the older games in this series, such as Morrowind. There is a large difference in the quality of procedurally generated content and handmade content, so I would advise people to focus on what they like and not to worry about passing up quests. Unfortunately the main selling point, mods, has recently taken a huge hit, leading me to be unable to recommend this game.
Swagneto;-;Paid mods are simply not acceptable. Period. Put in a donate button. I used to love this game, but I have very quickly grown to despise its developers and steam.
Smuli;-;This da game what u need blame 10/10 IGN
Donquixote Doflamingo;-;Only 3 words can describe this game: FUS RO DAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH
[M&F] KoolDashKid;-;This game literally has ENDLESS possibilities. Best money I've ever spent and one of the most popular RPG products out there.
MidnightWolfie;-;A bit about the game and developers. Skyrim was made by one of those top known companies on Earth, called Bethesda Softworks. They are the same guys behind all other The Elder Scrolls games, as well as the upcoming hit MMORPG which i will only buy if it will not have monthly fee: Elder Scrolls Online! About Gameplay. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, or Skyrim for short, is a role playing game which puts all those WoW and any other MMORPG elements into one beautiful single player game. There are hundreds, probably even thousands of quests which you can complete in Skyrim. Some give you money, some give you items, some give you fame. They also sometimes give you all three of those. There are various missions such as: Protect a guy while he is going from one city to the other, or find the lost treasure which might or might not be in a cave, kill a dragon in a nearby village, slaughter bandit camp, hunt down vampires or some other very fun missions. Great thing about Skyrim is that there are no classes. You can be anything that you desire. You can be a mage with heavy armor. Or a gladiator with robes so you could move faster. Literally anything you want! There are also a lot of professions that you can chose from like Blacksmithing and alchemy. Blacksmithing allows you to build some weapons which can not be built in game, while alchemy allows you to make various potions and enchants on your weapon, allowing you to make the most powerful equipment in the whole game. There is one main quest and tones of other quests. You can also join a guild that will give you some benefits such as cheaper items in shops, they will also allow you to buy some items which can't be bought by normal merchants and so on and on. There are various guilds such as Thief guild, The Comapnions, mercenary guild, mages guild, The Dark Brotherhood (assassins) and so on and on. There are various armors, robes and leather equipment for you to use. There are also various weapons such as bow and arrow (with a lot of different types of bows and arrows), swords, warhammers, maces, staffs... There are also combinations such as dual wielding swords, or sword in one hand and an axe in the other. Enchants also make your equipment much stronger, giving you some boosts as 15 more protection from heavy armors, or "Upon hit you deal shock damage" or something else. Since you can enchant your own equipment, there are also various combinations you can use as well. Character customization is pretty amazing but nothing that would go into the depth of a character as some other F2P games such as Tera or APB: Reloaded. There are also various of different races to chose from. All races give you some boosts. Also, choosing a race is also important for some quests because some NPC's might like you more if you're a Nord, while other would like you more if you were an imperial. Combat system in this game is pretty sweet. You need to aim above the target with bow and arrow because arrows fall after a while. Some magic skills require some time to get casted, others are instant. Melee weapons allow you to do few different attacks, depending on how you do them. If you move your mouse to the right or left while holding the attack button, your character will do a slash attack, while if you move your mouse up, your character will do a slice attack which also does massive damage to all enemies right in front of you. Graphic and Audio Graphic in Skyrim is amazing. There are wonderful sights to see, wonderful mountains, flowers, trees. All the NPCs look stunning, and so do animals. Well wolves are kind of disappointment to me but everything else is just wonderful. And the sky takes my breath away, no mater if it's day or night. And songs are amazing. But then again, all Elder scrolls songs are amazing. Once you hear them, you can't stop listening and humming them all day long. Dovahkiin, Dovahkiin! Pros, cons and final grade. Pros: - Nice customization. -Wonderful graphic and audio - Massive sandbox world, full of various creatures and places. - Saving a village from a dragon, the village people will remember your fame. Cons: - A lot of bugs which are not important. Overall grade: 10/10 Thank you for reading my reviews! Don't forget that I'm usually posting new reviews on my blog weekly and you can check them out here: http://midnightwolfie.blogspot.com Thank you!
marijuana;-;IT IS A VERY NICE GAME SKYRIM 4REVER THE BEST GAME recomand for all is open big world! Skyrim is not a direct sequel to Oblivion, but a new chapter in The Elder Scrolls series, set 200 years after the events of Oblivion. As with previous The Elder Scrolls games, Skyrim begins with the player character as an unknown prisoner.
F5uck;-;This is my Skyrim. There are many like it, but this one is mine. My Skyrim is my best friend. It is my life. I must master it as I must master my life. My Skyrim, without mods, is useless. Without my Skyrim, mods are useless. I must play my Skyrim true. I must play my Skyrim straighter than Valve who is trying to destroy it. I must shoot him before he shoots me. I will... My Skyrim and I know that what counts in war is not the vanilla games we play, the noise of our corrupted modders, nor the money Valve makes. We know that it is the mods that count. We will mod... My Skyrim is human, even as I, because it is my life. Thus, I will learn it as a brother. I will learn its weaknesses, its strength, its parts, its accessories, its sights and its barrel. I will keep my Skyrim clean and ready, even as I am clean and ready. We will become part of each other. We will... Before False Prophet, I swear this creed. My Skyrim and I are the defenders of my kind, gamers. We are the masters of our enemy. We are the saviors of gaming. So be it, until victory is gamers' and there is no paywalls, but peace!
Siri;-;One of the best Sandbox RPG games.
JohnB;-;An excellent game which is still great fun even after several playthroughts. I recomend checking out the steam workshop and skyrim nexus for mods, which can greatly improve the game.
Sir_Reaper;-;Easily one of the most awesome games the world of RPG will ever make. Skyrim hasn't been there for even 5-years and I can say that it has left a mark in history...
$acHav;-;Are you tired of taking the same old paths? Feel like you're going nowhere fast?! Fast Travel'd! Are dragons taking you on a one-way trip to high HrothSNORE?! zzzzzzzz These convenient means of travel are so boring. There's got to be a better way. THERE IS! Try to hop over that mountain at a 75 degree angle! The most exciting way of getting where you want to go eventually!!!!!* *Getting where you want to go NOT guaranteed. But on a serious note. Gameplay: 10/10 Graphics: 10/10 Wasted Life: 10/10 I recommend this to ANYONE who loves to sit around in their room for hours/days/weeks/months/years on end without human interaction.
Juliannb;-;A masterpiece from the XX century: great graphics and music, huge map and variety of quests, interesting storyline and a big amount of weapons, armor, potions, enchantments, etc. Almost the same game style as Fallout 3 (being that it was made by the same company), but instead of guns, we have medieval weapons: swords, knifes, axes, bows, even a big amount of magic spells. The level up system works not just by killing people and creatures, but by performing different actions, such as sneak by, selling stuff, archery, different magic schools, theft, alchemy and more. Even though the game looks like a FPS, I think it's a fair game when it comes to battles and it has the posibility to change camera views. What it makes it unique from the other sequels is that the main enemies are dragons which you have to fight and defeat throughout the game. A fully recommended game which takes quite a lot hours to be beat and another amazing game from Bethesda Softworks.
Michael Ross;-;Unbelievable game cant stop playing it. Definately Reccomended
AMIC_Susuri;-;Your whole life will change when you buy this... trust me :D
[InsertFunnyUsername];-;Where to begin, this is a fun fantasy RPG that will satisfy anyone, you can play however and who ever, you can be a mage, thief, or warrior. It sounds like some stupid game no one cares about but trust me you will like it.
Philosleon;-;Personally the best action/adventure RPG game I've ever played. You can play the game over and over and over again, and you still wont get bored of it because there is simply too many choices too make, too much quests to finish in a large variety of ways. 10/10
Arcani|Wolf;-;9/10 I Love this game, and everything that goes on in it. I Bought it for my PS3 when I lived in an apartment, I also own it on PC (obviously). Can't say I regret ever having bought this game. Everything is worth checking out. The DLC is amazing, and brings new things that help improve the game even more. I would advise checking out mods. This game has replayability and definitely a chance to get your moneys worth from it. I still have a hard time believing I invested 1,300 some odd hours of my life into this game. Aside from that, some negatives is probably the fact it is older, and may not meet new standards of graphics for some people who are all about pretty pictures, but if that is not a problem for you, as it isn't for me at all, you will love this game.
Tweak;-;it cool
Chief_Sanders.wave;-;Great game with more and more to do each day you play, and mod support!
kungfux;-;Open world, many features, very good story and much more hours to play this cool game.
Bergendy;-;Everyone should own this game.
()Maaya();-;skyrim belongs to the nords!
Sgt_Prof;-;If you've played previous Elder Scrolls games, glitches and oddities don't come as a surprise. Nevertheless, Skyrim feature tighter combat, fewer bugs, improved graphics and so on. If there is anything to complain about in this game, it would be the user interface, inventory taking up A LOT of useless items, SOME bad acting, as you level up, the creatures you fight take FOREVER to kill by hitting them 30-40 times, and finally its replayability value. Creating characters is nice (even though it takes a very long time to get what you want done). Finding and completing quests is solid. I said all I disliked. The game succeeds in comparison to Elder Scrolls IV, and I am addicted to this game like a... person... playing games! Replayability value is hard to get back to though if you leave the game for a month or more. Anyways, great work on the game, this is more than I expected it to be with little to no struggle to get "used to". Postives: +Tons of content +Fun combat +Huge open world to explore +Modding tools +Deep character creation tools +A lot of side missions and long/endless gameplay +A lot of ways to improve graphics Negatives: Bug-free Horrible voice acting Poor character animations Overall: 9/10
Sparawk07;-;This game is so excellent that I don't even feel worthy enough to review it. Suffice it to say that "the bar" in terms of Role Playing Games is just a plaything for Bethesda Game Studios. They can put it wherever they want and it will stay there until they come back for it again. Nobody else will even come close.
TyGetic;-;a very entertaining and addictive game
Cavalier;-;Honestly, this is one of the best games I have ever played, it's up there on my lst with the Legend of Zelda games like OoT and LttP. Enough with that, back to the acutal review. If you ever loved Medivaeavl Fantasy as a kid, or still do (like I do), you will love this game. You can do whatever you want in this game. The stories are not tight like many other games I've played. You can turn from a Mage to Warrior in a blink of an eye, and back agian. Also, my 300 hours of playing this game doesn't give this review much justice as I first played on my Xbox 360 when it came out, but eventually bought it on the PC for mods, and it is sooo much better, In the end, we won't see a game as good as this in awhile, at least untill Bethesda makes Fallout 4 and/or The Elder Scrolls VI. (Or if Valve makes Half Life 3..) Last thing I would like to say is that Famitsu, a highly revered review magizine gave Skyrim a perfect 40/40 score, it was the first western game to get the perfect score, Grand Theft Auto 5 being the second.
[TSC] The Other Guy;-;Be a cat and empty everyones pockets, ben a man and defeat a dragon or be whatever you want to be and kick some as. done with the game, maybe try some mods?
I hate Olly #GoT;-;I've put 150+ hours into this game on xbox 360 then i saw mod's i got a PC got playing and so far have put 100 more hours into it and haven't even started the story it's by far the best game of all time ( in my head anyway ) it's great for role playing and even better for modding but if you do mod skyrim i reccomend the Nexus there's a link here https://www.google.co.uk/url?sa=t&rct=j&q=&esrc=s&source=web&cd=1&cad=rja&uact=8&sqi=2&ved=0CCEQFjAA&url=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.nexusmods.com%2Fskyrim%2F&ei=8fU4VLuVN4iS7Ab6rICwDA&usg=AFQjCNEazjtbVL2aDTcRk3hz2472xISR8g&bvm=bv.77161500,d.ZGU but if you haven't play this game you haven't gamed
BelleEvE;-;"its like cod with out guns" -ign 10/10
-7-;-;I love this game. I wish it was a bit more like Morrowind but it is still the best game Ive played.
Sleepi;-;When you're bored, Skyrim is there for you. Always.
Alex;-;its a good RPG game,the dlc are good,like the steam workshop mods, i would give this 10/10
zachmedia;-;TESV: The Elder Scrolls is a great, amazing game with incredible depth. I fully recommend it. 10/10
PolitikZ;-;"Like Far Cry 3 without guns." -ign
StingingVelvet;-;If you like questing in a fantasy world and don't own this game you might be insane. Say whatever you like about simplified mechanics and action combat, Skyrim takes you to a world like few games do and is fun from begining to end.
DangerousC04;-;Skyrim is one of my favorite RPG's of all time. You play as a speacial Hero known as the "DragonBorn" meaning you have the blood of dragons within you, and you can use the speacial words of power. As you adventure through the massive land of Skyrm, fighting monsters, bandits and Lengandary Dragons, you learn more about the land and its dark and instresting secrets and story. This game is worth any price.
OVA Kakyoin;-;you can eat bees.
Tom Snow;-;Game of the ing century.
-Blank-;-;Oh skyrim what a glorious piece of art. Everything about it is right. Only a few flaws, but really improved from it's pass brothers. Leveling and combat system for example is fix to many players comfort. Graphics are beautiful and have no limits if you have it on pc. To sum it all up, I highly recommend this piece of art. For every cent is worth it.
CFFG. Mccat Likes Mcdonalds;-;Day 1 Made an epic charecter. slayed some imperials, almost got decapitated, and made friends with a soldier. Day 2 Murdered a chicken, and the whole town tried to kill me. luckily I escaped to Windhelm, where I joined the stormcloaks. Day 3 Retrieved a Stone Tabled Enscribed with runes. Got yelled at for being slow about it. Day 4 Killed by a mudcrab. *Slow Clap* 10/10
people dont change;-;i installed a porn mod and thats all
Huntie;-;awesome game lots to discover :D
TheClankZ;-;This game, is a game of massive preportions. As is a game that I've invested over 1k hours into, not only for it's content in the landscape or terrain, rather its sense of "I haven't done everything yet" or "I've done everything, mabye I'll do it again". This game has consumed a majority of my life, and I can't say I'm against that, it truely is a game to buy, play, complete, then mod to oblivion. Speaking of which, buy oblivion too.
Aronie;-;Well, to be quite frank i only have one sentence to describe this game. 10/10 would bang.
The Flash;-;I killed a chicken and got stabbed to death by an angry villager. 11/10 GOTY
maddy;-;Killing a chicken will cause everyone to try and kill you. Do not hurt chickens, but if you must, do it stealthily.
Mafu;-;This is the best game I've ever played. If you don't know about a game to buy, this is the perfect choice and the right destination of your money. And, thanks to the mods, you can play it forever. You don't even have to worry about the story (If you only center your attention in it, your game will be a little short, I guess) . The beauty of this game is to explore the amazing lands of Skyrim and the beautiful lore that has to offer. The freedom that this game gives you, it's impossible to compare with any other. It's just unique. I love it. PS: If you value your social life, just don't buy it. This game is a real life-drainer.
Chicken of Death;-;*On a quest to receive Mammoth tusk* *Found a Mammoth* *Started Punching it* *Giants started chasing me* *Ran* *Few yards later a Mammoth falls out the sky and dies* *Retrieves Mammoth tusk and completes quest* 11/10.
Marv;-;One of the best RPG's i've played. Even though I owned this game on my xbox I brought it again on Steam and can happily say it was a good decision. I own the Hearthfire and Dragonborn DLC at the moment and have over 200 hours in this game after completing it on xbox as well. If you're willing to mod you can add so much more to the game which is especially useful if you're looking to add more hours of gameplay in if you get bored after a while. Great game overall.
[PCMR] Shuckle;-;Although I have few hours on my PC, I have well over 1,200 hours on my PS3 playing this game and I can tell you, PC is better in every aspect. This game never ends, as soon as you think "I wonder if there's a mod for..." There is. You can go install mods that add new followers to ones that allow you to open your own market stall, to be tended by said followers. You can slay dragons, conquer dungeons, and best of all, get smashed. If you're on the borderline about getting this game, get the Legendary Edition. Hearthfire really allows you to immerse yourself in the game, while Dawnguard and Dragonborn provide more challenges than the average missions. 10/10
ManBearPig;-;One of the best games ever.
rj;-;200 hour game 150 hours of menu navigating
RazzyFTW;-;Is there anything else to be said?
Coco | Tasty;-;Totally blew away my initial expectations, and has everything Oblivion had and more. The story of this game definitely lives up to the Elder Scrolls series, throwing you into the middle of a country on the brink of war between the empire loyalists and the stormcloaks. While this is going on, an ancient prophecy begins to unfold as well, marking the return of dragons in Skyrim. I have to say this storyline was incredibly engaging and satisfying to me, especially since you have the ability to choose a side in the war and follow that path through to the end. The soundtrack of this game is still very good, although I still prefer the music from Oblivion more. As far as things to do, there is so much to do in this game it is insane. There are hundreds of hours of gameplay to be found in activities and questlines in a single playthrough alone, and the game even warrents multiple playthroughs due to the heavy level of customization present in character creation and skill trees. I myself had more than one playthrough of this game doing different types of characters, some more satisfying than others. This is easily one of the greatest RPG's of the year, if not of all time to date.
Trinitykill;-;If you don't mind a little tinkering, this game can be one of your all-time favourite purchases. Any Elder Scrolls game wouldn't be complete without a massive modding community, helping you to twist the game to any of your fancies. Want to make the game better looking? Mods. Want to have more realistic in-depth lore while you explore the land? Mods. Want to bash your enemies with a Captain America shield and a squeaky toy while using a dragon shout to call forth Thomas the Tank Engine? Mods. No seriously, there are mods for that last one.
[SoW] The Camera man;-;I put alot of time into this game, and I have to say it is one the greatest games I have ever played. Skyrim takes to a snow covered kingdom torn by civil war and a new threat, Dragons. You play as the Dragonborn, a mystic being capable of speaking in dragon langauge and using the power of your voice to produce a th'um or a shout. By now i would assume that people already know about the internet famous, FUS RO DAH shout that pushes enemies back. On the subject of enemies, Skyrim offers a wide variety of enemies that you can face. You want dragons, you got dragons, you want skeletons with shrouds who can shoot magic from thier hands, you got that too. The game also has a leveling systen so when you level up the enemies will get slighty stronger and have better equipment. Not to mention the almost endless variety of mods you can use with your game. "But Dy-no, what if i like Call of Duty?" Don't fret, they have guns. MEDIVAL GUNS. with the all new dawnguard add-on you can have crossbows. Yet again not to mention the modding community makes some pretty sick flintlock pistols. the game also has longbows and shortbows. "But Dy-no, what if I wanna set someone on fire?" Well, now you can with the all new skyrim the video game that has a magic system that rivials that of oblivion. You can set someone on fire, frezze the  out of them, or turn them into a lightbulb that has to much electricity. "But Dy-no, i'm a 13 year old boy, what if i wanna be a girl?"  LOGIC, in the first mission of the game, you hope off a carriage and a man askes who you are, then a plastic surgeon who is played by you, must make you character as deformed or as astheicly pleaseing as possible. There is no time limit so you can spend hours and hours trying to find the find the right shade of brown to go right below your cat person left  cheek. Also being the plastic surgeon you are, you can make your cat person a man or a woman in the click of a button. "But Dy-no, what if i want to play with my friends?" Well little timmy, you can't. this game has no co-op of any kind. except you do have followers that follow you around the whole map like a fat guy looking for his piece of pizza that slid into his fat rolls. "But Dy-no, what if i want to have sex with a person, in this game?" NO, you can't because those es who were working buy the whiterun stables got narked out.  DA POLICE. "But Dy-no, what if i hate awesome games that let you kill stuff?" Then you go back to Call of Duty and don't buy this game. "Last question, what if i want to kill a chicken?" NO, YOU CAN'T HARM THE GOD DAMED CHICKENS BECAUSE THEY ARE PRICELESS AND EVERY GUARD IN EVERY HOLD WILL BE GRIDDING ON YOUR  BECAUSE YOU ACCIDENTLY LIT A CHICKEN ON FIRE. 10/10 GOTY
Squiddy;-;Has nude mods. 11/10 would fap again
toxune;-;I shouted a goat off of a mountain and then got robbed by an elf with no shirt on. 10/10
|BC|directpixel;-;Got this Sunday afternoon, and every moment I've been at home I've been playing it. Its ruined all my plans!
Guardly;-;It's like oblivion except it doesn't suck
Princess Egg Breath;-;If you dont like this game, you're a .
Core2Duo;-;Skyrim is a must-have! If you're a huge fan of TES series and RPG games like I am, then don't hesitate to buy it.
Officer Jaco;-;This is actually good, The graphics are very nice and the HUD is very easy to understand as of the colours for Health, Stamina and Magicka. This game got me so hooked I have planned a youtube series of it and will be excited if/when I get a better computer so I can play this game on ultra and enjoy every damn moment of it. 10/10 owns all DLC
Atlas Fontaine;-;Wander the open world of Skyrim as you, the Dragonborn, use your awesome magical gift of the ancient language to: Steal cabbages, steal horses, pick pockets, pick locks, and even rob shops at night! Still be the hero as you kill off an entire empire such as the Stormcloaks or the Imperials. Hunt through the ancient ruins of Nords and fight through armies of zombies just to get bored in the end and murder everyone in Windhelm just for the hell of it.
{158} Mcnolty;-;One of the best games of this generation made better with mod and Workshop support. An excellent purchase no matter what the price.
Krats;-;Like Skyrim with dragons. 10/10
M3;-;I have owned this game for 2 days and already clocked 24 hours. Help my soul
Murthles;-;Skyrim offers an en epic adventure that will take you to the most memorable places around the map. The world of Skyrim is beautiful and has a really good atmosphere including an awesome soundtrack. In Skyrim you are a Dragonborn and you must stop the invasion of dragons and defeat the legendary dragon Alduin. You can customzie your character pretty well and you can defeat your enemies in many ways, ranging from seperating their heads from the rest of the body to incinerating them to nothingness.
Pig honey;-;Pros: Probably one of the most enjoyable games I've ever played! Graphics 10/10 Gameplay 10/10 Cons: You don't have a real life after you play this game lol
sporks5000;-;As a person with attention deficit disorder, I generally find that ten hours is the best that I can dedicate to a game without getting bored of it. I'm well past that in skyrim and am still enjoying the gameplay.
Emur;-;This game is a masterpiece, want a good rpg? PLAY SKYRIM, want a good open world game? PLAY SKYRIM. In Skyrim you can do so freaking much. You can become a vampire lord, werewolf, dragonborn, king, theif, assassins, a freaking flower collector if you want. Skyrim has tons of quests you can do, each of them is fun and interesting with lots of twists and turn around every corner. Maybe the only down side to this game is its voice acting, its bland, you maybe hear 10 different voice actors in the enitre game. Other than that Skyrim is perfect. Any problem you might have with the game can be fixed with mods, you can make skyrim look like Crysis 3, graphics wise. The modding community will keep this game alive for the next 10 years, no doubt about it. I mean for god sakes a mod was released that was the size of an official dlc. Speaking about the DLC, the DLC adds tons of new items and quests, even landscapes. Well worth the 10 euro price tag. This is my all time favourite game hands down.
Forzyn;-;Warning; don't buy this game when you're about to have exams, I got mine about a week before I started them. This was the first TES game I played and I loved it. The amount of sidequests that are in it is just insane, there is almost literally one under each rock. I haven't even completed the game yet (I'm a slacker). This game is (almost) perfect in each of its aspects; sound, lore, gameplay and after getting used to the combat I really enjoyed it (it's a bit cluncky if you're not used to it). This is a must-have for each gamer!
illuminatus;-;If you are single, you will find your woman here, and build a family with her. Maybe the best game I ever played. I played things like that, like Darksiders 2, Dark Souls 2, and other great titles, but Skyrim, it's a game that you won't take 7 hours to complete it, but yes, about 30/40 hours. It's a hard game, but your friend in that mission will always help you. Let him do all the stuff for you. The secondary quests will help you grow up and evolve your skills. Also, you will find the Dragonite (Paarthurnax) that will let you find your Outrage (Fire Breath). Cheating on this game will make lose the story itself. Don't cheat. I tried on new save, and the game is not the same thing . If you are a guy that wants all Steam Achievements, this game is the right one, but try to do it by yourself first. Buy the Legendary Pack. You will get all DLC's and they are worth of their price, it increases +10 hours to your gameplay, no matter if you completed your game mainquest or if you still did not ended it. Be a Dragonborn today.
Oggy;-;This game is great and the fun is endless. I reccomend this game to anyone who like RPG's. Its not too hard and you can use cheats for fun. I would give it a 10/10. One of my favorite games of all time. Everyone who I know who has it loves it.
Stannis the Mannis/Tormidal;-;As someone who has put in quite a number of hours into this game on my PC, and almost three times that much on my 360, I can confidently say that this game was worth single cent. But you're looking at it right now, aren't you? That's how you're reading my review? Stop reading my review, and buy this game. You won't regret it.
Squidge;-;I got a mod that lets me kill children
TripleD;-;Skyrim is one of the best games I have EVER played in my whole entire life. Right behind Star Wars Battlefront II ;). This game has soooooo many things to do on it. Just like in Oblvion or even Fallout 3/New Vegas. Perfect game! I always enjoy this game and it is so hard to find things that is bad about this game! There are a few bugs, of course, what game doesn't have bugs. The Legendary Edition contains all of the DLC that is totally worth it! None of the DLC is bad at all! Good job Bethesda :)
Darude;-;Definately one of the most fantastic games i have ever played, I put off buying the PC version for over a year, instead playing the Xbox 360 version every once in a while, i must say, the PC version far surpasses that of the console, what with the upped graphics and mod support, this is a must have for ANY PC gamer. The game in itself is truly amazing, you could play for days and still stumble upon some old crypt that, before then, you had no idea existed. The game is huge, and the vast ammount of user created content availlable is, beyond awe inspiring. Skyrim is a must have - the storyline, world, lore, and everything to do with it is beyond anything seen in any other game ever.
stop stop stOP STOP STOPSTIOPSOA;-;No more complaining about carrying the Dragonborn's 50+ cheese wheels
Spage;-;Four characters and 570 hours later...what am I doing with my life?
uncle ramba pirate king;-;all i did was punch one cow and everyone wants to kill me? like come on cows are not as cool as me right? right? 420/10
LiLCano24;-;One the best games I've played
Calibur;-;One of the greatest titles of all time. Also, dragons are cool.
You;-;Oh just buy it allready. 10/10
FidelCashflow;-;My new hobby is to enter homes, murder everyone, and put together an elaborate crime scene to make it seem like all the food in the house came to life and massacred an entire family.
40880472;-;Play it, notice there's something you don't like, mod it, play it... Rinse and repeat Dear God this game is entertaining
Boris Johnson;-;Its just amazing. Enough said, just buy it. Do it. Now.
TorgrMan;-;This is one of the best game I have ever played. The only reason I have not played it more, is beacuse of the fact it`s not 2 player, or online. If you love RPG games, get Skyrim. But the possibility that you love RPGs and have not bought skyrim yet, is very low. Recommended on the highest!
dml757;-;Fantastic Game. The PC allows you to push Skyrim past its limits and create a game that streches far beyond gaming console capabilities. Exuberant and Inclusive. what does that mean
GucciMenorah;-;wif da proppa mods dis gaem can b z best gaem that is in exestence nawmsayin
Durin;-;I have to say i liked some thing's about Oblivion more, it just had something that Skyrim lack's. Not really something you can discribe to someone, however this is still a great game and more then worthy of the Elder scrolls name (looks at redguard adventure). You start out as a prisoner in true ES fashion, right before you are killed by an axe a dragon destroy's the town and you are able to make your escape. From there you learn that you are "Dragonborn" a rare skin disease where you whole body grow scale's and horn's, making you the only one who can sneek up on a dragon and kill it while it is confused about what you are. All in all a great game :>
Kenshinzo;-;Set approximately 200 years after events which transpired in Oblivion, Skyrim invites you into a journey filled with adventure, battle, and destiny. Continuing to build upon the expansive lore and history etched by the saga, and the "open world" sandbox premise of the previous games, right away you are struck with the huge realization that you can do what you want, when you want, and how you want! Fancy being a mighty sword wielding warrior, a deadly, stealthy assassin, a mage who has mastered the arcane arts, or a combination of all? Skyrim makes this possible. Though not without flaws (bugs), the depth and scale of this game coupled with the interactive gameplay, compelling stories and quests create an enjoyable gaming experience. With beautiful graphics, stunning soundtrack, and immersive feel, Skyrim is definitely a gaming journey of epic proportions!
SonOfACookaye;-;In my opinion this is the best game of all time. Amazing graphics, amazing story, amazing sountrack, amazing everything. I have around 800 hours on the xbox 360 version and I still want to invest time into the pc version since there is now awesome mods that increase graphics, gameplay and even the story. The open world is fun to explore but after a while it does tend to feel a little tiresome when walking for a long period of time. But thankfully there is a fast travel system that speeds up the process. You also stumble apon unscipted avents when roaming the open world such as dragon attacks and bandits. There is also AI that you meet when traveling the roads of skyrim like guard patrols and traders. This is a game you must play.
SteakMeat;-;This game is probably one of the best I've played. Although my opinion is very bias with me favoring sandbox games, it's one of the most immersful. Starting out you get countless different playstyles. You can be a barbaric tank, rogue, mage, or many more. The talent trees that you get choose from to enhance your experience are very diverse and straightforward. The game in the very beginning itself is made to fit your personal style, and then you'll soon find out so are the quests. You don't need to complete all of the quests in skyrim to complete the main storyline, therefore skipping the ones you don't/ wouldn't enjoy. If you prefer the theive's approach, you might like the dark brotherhood or theives guild. Or say instead you picked a mage, you might like the college of winterhold's quests. The quests themselves are amazing. There is so much lore and storytelling behind everything. What makes it even more unique is that there are often conflicting factions. You get to play and hear both sides of the story. The only people I wouldn't recommend this game to are people who don't like straightforward combat. It may get repetative over time, but that all just depends on the player. After all, the game was meant to have a more realisitic combat style. Or if you're someone who doesn't like sandbox games, don't play it. This game has a few minor bugs and glitches (like any other game) but honestly, it doesn't matter with how well developed this game is. I'd highly recommend it to anyone.
Slingzarro;-;I've only played Skyrim for about 3 hours and I can honestly say, amazing. I bought it for $5 on the Summer Sale and I'm glad I did Skyrim is mind blowing from graphics to gameplay and will always keep you on your toes. The only complaint I have is that I cant rim the skys 9/10
Storm.e;-;It's like farcry with swords
Bishop the Black;-;Excellent medieval style WRPG. Massive world to explore, tons of side quests, and an amazing story. I was very disappointed in Bethesda after Fallout New Vegas for all the bugs I ran into while playing it, but this game was surprisingly stable in comparison, and has renewed my faith in them to produce quality software.
The Dude;-;I've been playing for over a month now and the game never ceases to amaze me. You can lose yourself in the world and become a part of it. There's not just one story, there are hundreds. Sure there's one driving story, but all stories together make for fantastic adventures. I'm around 90 hours in and I think I've only just grazed the surface of this epic tale. There are times where I just sat back at looked at a vista and how the sun cast shadows. If you have heart, you'll want this game. If you don't, don't worry. The game has more than enough heart for you.
ZUTS;-;ONLY IF YOU HAVE MALE REPRODUCTIVE ORGANS
Nipaa~;-;I haven't actually played this game, just installed a bunch of mods for it.
DarkEclipse;-;Because this box wouldn't go away if ididn't recommend it
dflow;-;I like, not as much as Oblivion, or Morrowind. But you know, hey, it's good.
OnlyneedJuan;-;Still love this game after 3 years. Mods are amazing, kuddos to the creators of those. Careful though when installing mods, lots of conflicts can be created. Use Nexus Mod Manager for that. Also, be careful with mods that add a lot of scripts. Mine slowed down so much that buying a horse would take 15 minutes to complete haha. Still, the immense freedom this game gives you. Fast traveling is the boring way.
sudo;-;Vanilla Skyrim is an enjoyable experience, one most people can only stomach once. I find the the true joy comes from modding the game and using all of the community created quests and enhnacements the greatest thing you can do with any Elder Scrolls game.
Winnie The Defiler;-;My playtime was achieved in about 5 days....... steals your life. Best RPG game ever made. Cant find any negatives buy it and the dlc and let you life drain away.
Wynaut;-;The Best Rpg To Date 10/10
(RP)Kratos;-;Its really fun to mess around with horse's and shoot arrows at spiders.Graphics not the greatest, but a lot better then fallout:NV.I still prefer the Fallout series. 8/10
Nova Aeterna;-;[Ru]     ,  , ,     - Skyrim,     . [En] Well, after all this time, right now, i can be sure. Skyrim - is the best buy ever.
Misha Collins;-;I enjoy the open world feel. While usually I am not one for single player games this one actually keeps everything rather fresh and new offering all kinds of things to work on and fight. The quests though can be interesting to try and complete when you do not get detailed directions. I have had to look up some of the quests now and then because the directions given in game were not in depth enough. Regardless though it is a fun game.
GamerpH13;-;300+ hours of approval Its gr8 I r8 8/8 m8.
Defox01;-;Skyrim is an open world action/adventure game. You can climb the tallest mountains (to a certain point then you can't go any further up), swim across massive lakes, fight dragons, explore dungeons, kill anyone(some poeple just faint then get back up). Basically you are free to do whatever you want, but what you choose to do affects what will happen. Can you forge armor? Make weapons?? You bet you can! Personally I think it is one of the best games I've ever played! I highly recommend it to anyone and everyone!
HeroCC;-;This is a very fun game. There is an in debth story line, many quests, choices that change your future, one of my new favorite games. If it weren't for the M rating, I am sure many more people wolud play it. I use a blood removal mod, so it brings it down to a T rating, one that me and my younger siblings can play. Great game, 8.5/10
Osroni;-;By far one of my favorite games. I don't even know how many times I have played through it now.
marK.B.;-;If you like open-world RPGs you gonna like Skyrim. With all those amazing mods produced by the community you just can't get enough of this game.
Wim~;-;Best game since Morrowind!
Djs;-;Probably one of the best games I've ever played,
HIPfreez;-;Skyrim just made Elder Scrolls gold. The game is unbelieveably amazing in every aspect especially when Bethesda made it. The Fallout Series (3, New Vegas) were the games that made the type of gameplay that they put off, hands-down my favorite. Combat in my eyes is very stratigized, Not having to rush to kill the enemy BEFORE your companion does, and not having Vats is great. Example: I had to run and jump off of things so that the enemy, which was way stronger than me, would fall back father behind me so that I can heal and gain some more magika. Also on PC, It blows the Skyrim expericence up to the roof, Its beautiful. Skyrim is where Its at if you want a new, open-world game. 110/100
Phant0m;-;Amazing,ING AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!,stats,weps,texture,amazing journey to stop dragons from returning :DDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDD
Yoshi;-;--------BREAKING NEWS----------- I am bringing this report from various sources stating that Bethesda Game Studios have accidently released a product that has become so addictive that people are refusing to leave their computers. Persons having used this product have reported that they only played 30 mins but have awoken to a different day altogether. Reports of 3 -4 hour warp times are common with some users experiencing what seems to be a 6 hour jump in time. It seems after use, players become severely disorientated greatly yearning for sleep. However we have confirmed reports that this product is also quite addictive with reports from players seeking to finish one more quest but then relapsing into exploring this land that people have dubbed Skyrim. Experts are warning against the overuse of this product however it seems there is no stopping people wanting to experience more of this product as supposedly people have been experiencing a high when they find about stronger equipment in this game. Indecisive people are strongly warned about its addictive nature with one expert claiming that modded with ENB and other files found in the workshop and Nexus, the potency of this product can be extremely addictive with time jumps of 24 hours. Thats all from me today, back to the studio.
sarelifrey;-;Let's just say that if I were trapped on a desert island that somehow got electricity and wifi and could only have one video game to play for my entire life I would choose this one. Because it is not humanly possible to do all that there is to do in this game in one life time and you will probably never get tired of it. Just when you think you're done, you'll get sucked back in somehow. It never ends. Ever.
RCMRampage;-;its a good open world sandbox game that goes with the rest of the elder scrolls lore.
Thoon;-;Good as a game, but even better as a platform for player-made content Skyrim is a themepark. If you go knocking on the walls of Disney World, and peering behind the magic curtains, of course you'll expose it for what it is: shallow escapism. But is that so terrible? Morrowind contains the best worldbuilding, and Oblivion the most charm and charisma, so what's left for Skyrim? Fun. Yeah, the quests might not be as deep or the leveling as complex as previous titles, but that doesn't make it a bad game. You can sink hours into Skyrim without getting bored. And once you do (get bored), after a few months away you'll be back with renewed interest. Rinse and repeat; it's the circle of the Elder Scrolls. Skyrim also represents a broad platform for fans and content creators alike. When so many other companies are shying away from modding tools, Bethesda continues to support them wholeheartedly. The same tools used to make the game are available to you at the click of a button. Granted, they do take some time to master. But the limits are sky high.
Professor Chaos Invetigates!;-;Could very well be the best game I've ever played. The story is epic and the landscapes and characters are beautiful. I dont think I could ever get tired of Skyrim. 10/10.
Harievilozanini;-;It runs through my veins! :D
Becoming_I;-;There's nothing more visualy enchanting and gameplay challenging than this epic Elder Scrolls installment. Roam through the endless land of Skyrim , participate in quests , take sides , conquer kingdoms , betray and betrayed but most of all be the one that fullfils the prophecy. Be the Dragonborn!!! The Lengendary edition is a must have , because it brings all the enhancements and the extra content that this title needed to be one of the most rewarding and challenging RPGs i've ever experienced
Dean Side of the Moon;-;Absolutely stunning game. Fantastic graphics. It's not every game that you can say "I just got arrested for stealing an old woman's sweet roll."
Mini;-;I would recommend this game to any fan of Bethesda or Elder Scrolls games!
HeyHoLetsgo;-;FUS RO DAH that is all
ShotgunRage18;-;Realy just the best game i ever played. it look's nice it's play's nice you can play YOUR way that is what i like about this game
KingFarOut;-;Bethesda did it again! A fun RPG that you will spend countless hours into, 100% worth the $60 I paid. Plus on the PC version you get so many epic mods by the many communitys of mod makers. 9.5/10 GOTY RPG 2011
F3tusF3ast;-;I very first started with a barbaric Nord who weilded 2-handers and dawned heavy armor and completely smashed everything in sight. I next played a Redguard Conjuration Mage Thief who dual wielded conjured weapons. And now I'm an Orc Werewolf Archer who is really good at pick pocketing. There is really no end to the amount of customization this game gives you. The player has complete and full control of who and what they want their character to be. I've played through this game so many times (originally had it for 360) and I STILL find all new areas to explore. I've never had so much fun with a game. 10/10 for a game after 3 years since it's release and still holds my attention for long periods of time.
[HTT] Kirisaki Chitoge;-;This game can be very..very..very..long if your OCD for sidequests like I am..(i dont even know if i have the main story in my quests) and worried about walking into the infinate looping sidequests. The game has a few bugs in but its nothing game breaking, its enjoyable to RPG fans and obviously to elder scrolls fans. The 1st dragon kill can be very satisifiying but after like 10 of them it just feels like a normal enemy since the random spawn is so common.
FreX;-;Let's be honest, best game ever made, you can't go wrong here. also modding this game makes it twice better. 10/10.
GameExpert;-;i recommend this game because its an interesting game its a well known famous game everyone seems to love this game so much i played it for 2 years or more.
Kiang;-;I drink to my youth, to the weeks come and gone, For my hours of Skyrim are just about done. I fought off the Stormcloaks, ran Imperials through - As an Arch-Mage and werewolf and Guildmaster, too. Long live Ulfric! Or kill him or whatever. I've fought the war twice and not one side is better. I'm the hero of Skyrim; everyone's in my debt - But if I kill a chicken, they'll all want me dead. Now it's Alduin time, and I'm finally prepared, My friends have all left me, but I simply don't care. (10/10, would rhyme again)
EbonHawk;-;OH what a game!!! So many choices, so many things to do. Follow the quest, run off on sidequests, or just wander aimlessly to your heart's content... It's all in there. Focus on magic, be the best mage you can be: favor destroying stuff, become a Destructionist mage and burn, freeze, zap everything in your way. Like to protect yourself, specialize in the Alteration school. There are other schools as well; something for everyone. Or, just do a little bit of everything. Doesn't matter, you can tailor your playthrough to the way you want to play it. Fancy yourself a sneaky type? Focus on stealth, put everything in powerful daggers and level up backstabbing, and nothing will stand in your way. Want to snipe enemies from the shadows? Just start putting experience into bows and enchanting and take down targets' health, stamina, or magicka level from a distance so that one or two hits from your dagger or sword will make short work of them. Find or craft you a soul-trapping weapon and you can gather an infinite supply of souls to recharge your magical bows or melee weapons to keep doing massive amounts of damage. Burly warrior or wily agile fighter... you pick. The sky's the limit as you can basically do anything or be anything you want to be. Spend hours, days, months even, just exploring. Make a career out of hunting wild animals and gathering their pelts to sell for money so you can afford your own place, so you can even get married and adopt some kids. Just wander, if you want, as there are thousands of places (towns, villages, lone cottages, caves, mines, and mills) to enjoy, interact with, take on a job just about any place. I don't see how this game could get any better or do it better so that you can enjoy playing it your way... Oh wait, there are literally thousands of mods that do just that: from hundreds of new weapons, armor types, loot, potions, poisons, capes...it's just endless. And then there are all the mods for improving the low-quality objects found in the vanilla game, texture enhancements, gameplay enhancements, crafting overhauls, hundreds of new followers, creature types... it's just incredible what you can do. I don't see how anyone could NOT like this game. It's phenomenal.
Admastvia;-;Having played over 200 hours of this B-E-A-UTIFUL game, I can safely say it is one THE BEST games I have ever played.
Phant0m;-;Amazing,ING AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!,stats,weps,texture,amazing journey to stop dragons from returning :DDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDD
Yoshi;-;--------BREAKING NEWS----------- I am bringing this report from various sources stating that Bethesda Game Studios have accidently released a product that has become so addictive that people are refusing to leave their computers. Persons having used this product have reported that they only played 30 mins but have awoken to a different day altogether. Reports of 3 -4 hour warp times are common with some users experiencing what seems to be a 6 hour jump in time. It seems after use, players become severely disorientated greatly yearning for sleep. However we have confirmed reports that this product is also quite addictive with reports from players seeking to finish one more quest but then relapsing into exploring this land that people have dubbed Skyrim. Experts are warning against the overuse of this product however it seems there is no stopping people wanting to experience more of this product as supposedly people have been experiencing a high when they find about stronger equipment in this game. Indecisive people are strongly warned about its addictive nature with one expert claiming that modded with ENB and other files found in the workshop and Nexus, the potency of this product can be extremely addictive with time jumps of 24 hours. Thats all from me today, back to the studio.
Dawkey Ross #SexyBeast;-;This game is the epicest in my gaming history. Well the giant spiders are scary as the  for me because i have arachnophobia but i can remove them with a mod. So if you like the weapons of the medieval ages and some spells then buy it, you won't be disappointed! :D
runewarden;-;Excellent, open world RPG. In my opinion, not as pretty as Oblivion, and far easier than Oblivion - thus more accessible. Immersive, beautiful title, play your own way. Can easily log hundreds of hours just exploring side quests. DLC are fun, though not as good as Oblivion DLC (horse armour aside!). Played extensively and completed on XBox.
681342-754689-Oskar;-;I won't write long and serious text here like other "experts" ( or  if u like ). Just want to say: ORKZ IZ ROKKIN'!1 P.S. Seriously - why the  all ppl choose nords?
N-}- Mecha-Warrior;-;Amazing! I never thought a game could be this big and open. Lots of fun and I totally recommend to all my friends!
Totaly not a squid.;-;One of my most played RPG's other than Dark Souls. I've spent hours apon hours playing, moding, and just having a blast. I would recomend this game to anyone who enjoys RPG's, good lore, and killing dragons.
LunarPie;-;Excellent game. Very well put together and I love killing those dragons!
Redwagonjce;-;i think it a very amazing game
gerawar;-;It's a great game, I have dedicated many hours especially on Xbox i pc. It is a game which is to create your custom character i discovering landscapes in a colossal map, enemies, dungeons, in my opinion, the highlight are the missions. There are also political comflictos and battles, guilds of thieves, assassins, knights, and a big immensity of missions, I myself xbox 517 hours I could not finish. What I really like about this game is, the large number of objects that are i the freedom it gives you this role, I found no such thing in Assassins creed. The atmosphere of the streets, comversaciones on the market, this well heco. I there are beautiful landscapes, impressive i. Pity, i I consider an error of the game, is that there is online, but the story is very well cast. Another incomveniente are many physical errors, for example, sometimes a mammoth flying or is fallin from the sky. But overall it is a high quality game i being the 2011 is very well. Warning: can be very adictiovo. The fun is to play without cheats. This is my experience as a veteran i review Skyrim.
Swimmy McDongles;-;It's like oblivion got better graphics then  all over itself and tried to hide it by screaming, "DARGRONBURN." 5/5 bretty good.
P3ngu1nAssas1n;-;Most beautiful game I have ever played. A true masterpiece. To anyone who has not played it i would highly suggest it. 10/10
Thymoniak;-;Legendary Just Buy !!!
Chris Benoit;-;a vast world where there is always something to do. that alone gives so much play time...add mods and before you know it. your in 2024. still having fun in this game...its a MUST BUY!
Jerrux.;-;I really freaking love skyrim! I love this game because it is beautiful, humorous, fun to play and simply amazing! Also, you can use the game with/without mods and you still won't get bored! I love the fact that you can create your character to be what you want them to be, make them get better at certian things. I'd reccomend this to anyone who enjoys medievil/fantasy RPG games.
Bhutanmagleesh;-;The closest thing we have to a fully fledged duck simulator! Embark on the most vivid 300x300 reseloution treasure hunt you could ever imagine! Perfect for gamers who never want to lose , Skyrim offers a vast land of snow for you to have snowball fights with dragons and other foes! And for you sneaky fellows out there, Skyrim sneak realism is incredible, you will be able to live out all your dreams of being completley invisible! Boasts a gigantic cast of 3 voice actors, guiding you through this incredible tale of god versus the little lizards trying to end the world. Skyrim also takes the cake for the most snow in a video game ever! FIlled with rediculously fun quests and activities that make you say "What a terrefic game, it is not easy at all and very rewarding , also i think the sneak system is very balanced and realistic and not op, oh and the winged salamanders are challenging with fun mechanics" The vast arsenal of weapons and tools provided for the player is almost on par with bad rats, simply incredible. In conclusion IGN rated this game a 9.5/10, but i think they are wrong this game deserves a solid 10/10 and should be in every household, it has achevied classic status nearly instantly with its griping sneak mechanics , incredible stealth and flawless sneak mechanics making it the game of the year for every year. P.S The best part about the game is the fact that the blonde haired blue eyed people are incredibly racist, and sneak
Solly: Panparam;-;You'll find yourself surrounded by crazy people, monsters and bugs. And they wont go easy on you. You can do whatever you want tho, enjoy yourself. dont try to climb a mountain, it wont work Mods are free, catch 'em all. The plot is pretty good but it's not the most important thing in this game. You are dovahkiin. Nobody has any ideas how you were born, but there you are. Now do your awkward stuff in order to kill Alduin, the world eater. (such creativity) Fun facts: You can be a thief vampire werewolf cannibal shield-brother/companion blacksmith artisan archmage imperial stormcloak assassin potato dovahkiin. Yep, you are totally AMORAL. (join multiple groups, nobody actually cares). 9/10
Lord Limon;-;when i poo i think of skyrim when i do another poo i think of oblivion which one is better only you can find out warrior
Hodor;-;Utterly beautiful graphics, vastly more content than you can shake a hundred sticks at, visceral combat, awesome dragons and absolutely worth playing. However, it's not without some significant flaws. If you're familiar with the magic system from the previous Elder Scrolls games, prepare for disappointment. The range of effects is vastly reduced (there are only three types of Destruction, for instance), and there's no spellmaking. Although you have the awesome ability to cast two spells at once (one from either hand), they completely missed the opportunity to make spell combinations. It all feels generic, dumbed-down and consoley. Though there's a million and thirty side-quests, they're pretty much all identical: go to X dungeon and kill a bunch of identical undead. The thieves' guild quest doesn't actually require you to steal things. People treat you exactly the same when you're level 1 as they do when you're master of all the guilds and wearing a dead dragon on your shoulders. Definitely get it - but be prepared to get a little jaded faster than you might have imagined.
wokeupanoptometrist;-;It's pretty late to write a review for Skyrim, but here goes anyway. Skyrim is a game where you are a person/creature called the Dragonborn, and hunt down dragons. The Dragonborn can absorb the souls of dragons, killing them permanently, and using the knowledge from that soul for your own strength. You learn different "Shouts" (Powers) from ancient walls with dragon language on them. These powers are the main element of the game. As for the options, you can be a powerful mage, a mighty warrior, a sneaky thief, a skilled craftsman, an alchemist, or a mixture of everything! You can take on huge side quests, such as joining a guild of thieves or assassins, a tea party with a madman, visiting a museum, or ending the current war going on. There are several ruins to delve into, bounties to collect, cities to live in, and trolls to kill. Of course, you will need a decent computer for this to run smoothly. There are quite a few bugs, but never enough to break the immersion. Hours upon hours of gameplay, but as far as the Main Quest, is lacking. There's just not enough. But all the other things you can do, make up for it. The possibilities with this game are endless! Final score: 9.5/10
daimyo;-;This game will damage your life socially. However it is a must have for anyone who plays video games. This game is like a LoTR game that is actually amazing and you can do whatever you want. The base game itself already has a million more and the mods add about 999999999 other things you can do. I highly recommend it. EDIT: Level 81, still have misc quests and other things to do.
VremurileTrecute;-;Great game. Countless things to do and amazing character progression! You have the most freedom that can be offered by a free roam game!
skyst;-;SO MY ORIGINAL REVIEW OF THE MAJESTIC FIFTH INSTALLMENT OF BUTHESDUH'S AAA HIKING SIMULATOR SERIES WAS, "ING COMBAT QTE'S!!!!!!" WHICH STILL HOLDS TRUE. OH WELL YOU HAVE TO DEAL WITH IT I GUESS RITE? SOME GOOD THINGS HAVE BEEN PATCHED INTO THE GAME LIKE THE INFINITE DRAGONS CAN NOW FLY BACKWARDS AND ALSO THE GAME CTD'S A LOT BUT IT'S OKAY IF YOU RUN 3 SAVE + AN AUTOSAVE FILES LIKE A BRO. THE GAME WORLD IS HUGE AND THERE ARE 57,612 QUESTS (YEAH I COUNTED( BUT THERE IS NO C&C TO BE HAD YOU EITHER DO QUEST LIKE THEY SAY OR U JUST LEAVE IT IN YOUR LOG LIKE A QUITTER AND QUITTERS NEVER WIN. TBH I HAVE A LOT OF GRIPES ABOUT THIS GAME ANDF I WISH IT WERE A LOT BETTER THAN HOW IT TURNED OUT AND IT IS INCREDIBLY SHORT SIGHTED AND FRUSTRATING AT TIMES BUT YOU KNOW I STILL PLAYED IT FOR OVER 100 HOURS FINAL RATING 11/10.
Juan Carlos Batman;-;Far better than Pacific Rim.
Han Solo;-;GET IT.
IceMuncher981;-;1 Word ...Epic!
Hefferz;-;Amazing game, amazing graphics, amazing gameplay and amazing combat - get. it. now.
GeneralCodex;-;Best game I have ever played. If you have money buy this. If you don't you HAVE to save some and buy.
Eyeless kidney;-;So fare, this game is the ONLY game I have played with alot of blood in it... I'm sure I'll be changing my mind soon
Vail Esprit-WinterLune-;-;Want hours apon hours of hacking, slashing, magic and betting your virginity for gallons of skooma? This is the game for you ~Skrim 4 Eva~
Maverick;-;Lyke Farcry wth swords,
suss.;-;Pretty good game, haven't played it much though.
The Black Knight;-;I can kill Nazeem and Heimsker, which is the obvious point of this game. 10/10.
Shiny Scraggy (2nd Profile);-;My reaction when I first played Skyrim: Wow. Not even wow- I was speechless. I had never played a video game so immersive, complex, and interesting before. The motto of the series, "you are what you play", definitely holds true with the balanced races and playstyles. Want to play as one of the Khajiit, but don't want to deal with ridiculously pointless racial boots? Don't worry, it doesn't really affect your gameplay in the long run. A legend among RPGs, great for long-time fans of the genre, or someone completely new to RPGs. One of the best games since the N64. 10/10.
olek;-;This is a great game. 7/10 It does have some bugs and glitches (can be fixed with mods) but in general, it's an awesome game. I've spent dozens of hours on this game and I can say, if you don't have the game yet, you're missing out.
Broken;-;I can't understand how people wouldn't want to play this game. I suppose everyone has their own tastes, but if you don't like some of the quests, or the quality of graphics, go to Steamworkshop! They have grass, water, snow, ember, fire and general foliage improvements, as well as dozens of quests and new areas, items and followers. The game in itself is stunning, and I should really play it more often. Edit- hahahahahaha it's all i play
Huni;-;10/10 I have no social life since I play this game.
DrwHem;-;If you're not playing Skyrim what is wrong with you?
Chippas;-;One of my favourite games of all time. There is so much to do in this game and the mods also add so much into it making the already amazing game even better than it already is
BUTT HOOOOOOOOLE;-;Soo, i was walking around, happy that im the new leader of the Thiefs guild, and whaddaya know, my new employee tries to rob me. Geez, looks like they are desperate for money arent they. So i just gave him a bonus, in Daedric Arrows. 10/10
LT__THUNDER;-;skyrim is a fun game for new pc gamer's the mod's are realy fun!!
MALL COP;-;Awesome game, huge beautiful world. Best part is all the mods out there, go explore!
XXshootingStars;-;It's Skyrim, why don't you have it already!?
HeyItsBlu @ Computer crashed;-;I used to be vanilla like you then i took the Nexus mod community to the knee. 11/10
[FHP]-Pooptrain Conductor-666;-;Skyrim is for sure one of the best games I have ever played everything about it is awesome and for what ever it lacks there is always a mod for that... just trust me I know
Buster;-;Truly beautiful game.
1st Lt. O'Connor [325th GIR];-;With Mods you can keep playing for years
V;-;do you know what you can do with workshop things in this game it's just amazing
2560x1600@120hz;-;Brothers and sisters are like natural enemies, like Imperials and Nords or Bretons and Nords or Argonians and Nords or Nords and other Nords! Damn Nords! They ruined Skyrim!
OgreSexual;-;Ran my horse into a dragon, died about 2 seconds later. Still trying to get better armour than iron. 11/10
Gio the Galactic Dictator;-;After helping return an item to someone, you can put a kettle over their head and take the item back, despite this, they still thank you for returning said item as if you never took it. 10/10
xBestFriend;-;One of my favorite games of all time. The modding community is great, but the game doesn't even need it. It is a very immersive game, that doesnt restrict you on what to do when to do it. If you dont want to do a quest, you can simple ignore it. You are Dovahkiin(Dragonborn), you find that out after you fight your first dragon. The story is rather short it makes up for it in the countless hours on shenanigans and lollygagging. Your character seems unrealisticly special throughout the game. What I mean by that is you become the top of every class and yet you are still just another adventurer. The game is beautiful, and just worth your time. This game was release 11-11-11 and it still is one of the best games of the decade. The game is a must buy, even if you don't like RPG's genre. I am sure you may come out of your shell and let your inter nerd come out and become all powerful! Youre going to try to sell me something. Well, I aint interested. Olda 10/10
Sterben;-;The best RPG of last 2 years) You must have this masterpiece)
Seabear;-;I punched a child in the face and nobody even batted an eyelid. However, I stole a tomato and the whole city tried to kill me... 10/10
MattyPEES;-;GREAT GAME! I don't understand why you have not bought this yet...
Banned on Television;-;the point at which I screamed at my computer " OFF DRAGON I AM TRYING TO PICK FLOWERS," was the point at which I realised this was the best game ever.
OUT FUCKING STANDING;-;I yelled at a cow and it died, then punched a chicken and suddenly the entire town was trying to kill me, later I rode a horse off a cliff, killing the horse and I thought myself too until I stood up and brushed the dirt from my pants. After that, I punched a moose in the balls and it died, so that was a thing. Then I fought a dragon that tokyo-drifted into the side of a cliff. Afterward, I shouted at a goat and it fell down the mountain like something out of goat simulator. All in all, 12/10 would dickpunch livestock again.
A Bus Full of Children;-;I rode a horse up a 90 degree angel. I tried to marry a vampire. I joined a cult. I did drugs. I've killed countless people. Buy the game.
FireTheWolfGirl;-;Spawned in a lot of lockpicks and gold while in the middle of the room... got stuck in the room. Best game ever!!
Squirting Mongoose;-;very guud game this is, yes buy u 2 vill :3
xnihil0;-;I feel the biggest problem with this game is that the primary gameplay feature is exploration, except the world levels up as your character does. This includes the loot that you find as you adventure, so there are very few opportunities to find something interesting as you explore. There are a few locations that yield neat gear, like the Daedric shrines, but overall I find that this is one of the biggest problems with this type of RPG lately: you will always be fighting something your level and they will always drop something level appropriate. This mechanic dissolves the feeling of tension that should be part of exploring the unknown. The story arc also ramps up to epic levels too quickly, denying any feeling of having earned any prestige. I prefer the slow burn of something like Morrowind, where your humble beginnings provide context for your climb to becoming a mythical figure. I also find that there is too little diversity in the types of spells you can cast, and the melee mechanics. For a game that deals so much with swordplay, the melee feels vague and the crash of combat lacks any sense of feedback. The ragdoll physics also feel weightless; bodys are merely hollow forms with no mass that sail through the air before sliding down the rugged landscape like greased sleds. These issues often turn a serious high fantasy adventure into an unintentional comedy. I'm not saying that this is a bad game by any means, in fact I strongly recommend it. However, when I compare the story arc and game mechanics to something like Fallout 3, I feel like alot of the intelligence and pacing was replaced with instant gratification so the game would better appeal to the average joe. In closing, comparing Skyrim to Morrowind feels like comparing Dragon Age: Origins to Baldur's Gate 2. One is visually superior, but all of that visual polish can not make up for removing the features and stoytelling that provide so much richness to the experience.
KR_SpEcTEr;-;Best RPG ever!!! But seriously, the story line is really good no mather what people say to try and make it sound typical but really it's unique and immersive, with so much side quest's that will keep you playing forever with an amazing modding community. The Graphic's are amazing even if you can't afford to run an enb for this huge open world game and you will never get bored with all the mod's avaible.. An action packed RPG for anyone. It is the greatest addition to The Elder Scrolls Series.
MasterStef;-;*Warning* This game will take away months off your life and destroy your social life. *Play at Own Risk* This game is one of the best single player RPGs ever created along with Oblivion and Morrowind and will offer you 5000+ hours of gameplay and community mods guarantee endless replayabilliy value. 11/10
.Hyouteki;-;Hey, stop looking up the dictionary for the definition of "Legendary". It's right here.
SilencedSniperRifle;-;dude.....1 word DOVAHKIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIN no seriously buy it....like...now....and add mods....
SharpIcee;-;Review This Game Yu know what why this game good cause this game can mod the mission not make me boreding buy this this is so epic !!!!
Merchant2006;-;Skyrim is glorious. Yes. It is. My first character has logged almost 300 hours into the game. On my first playthrough. I have to admit that this is the first Elder Scrolls game I actually sat through from start to finish and attempted to explore every single cave, location and gather as many books as possible. I love books. A lot. They are great. My entire playthrough was livestreamed on Twitch.tv and looking back there are a lot of fond memories that I have created during my time spent in Skyrim. The storyline is enjoyable, but over too quickly. So being the type of gamer I am, I did as many side quests as I could before progressing further into the game. That way it felt like a longer journey and it wasn't over so fast. That's how I play. Skyrims visuals are standard at this day and age. Mods really do kick up the visuals and make them look beautiful, with ENB, HD retextures and added visual features which highlight the fact that it's the modding community which have made Skyrim what it is today. I played Skyrim on a vanilla playthrough but I realised I could not do without a couple of mods to fix the game in order to make it playable. (Combat music fix, skyrim script extender, Skryim User Interface i.e. SkyUI etc). Anyhow, I digress. The gameplay is very addictive, crafting is enjoyable as is upgrading weapons. Enchantment is BRILLIANT and exploration is a solid 10/10. Yes, I loved exploring Skyrim as the world offers so many new things to see. Please, buy this game. It's always on sale and definitely worth it. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim along with all of the DLC installed makes this a truly great RPG, one which you will keep coming back to play all the time :)
corpid;-;I have a dream... that one day I will see the ending of Skyrim.
4WIP;-;This game. THIS GAME. Holy  after playing this I wasn't sure if I will continue to have a life. Just got all DLCs and now I'm pretty sure that's confirmed. 10/10 would lose life again (but still stuck playing the current one)
LimeIsFruit;-;This game is utterly stunning and I am able to run it on medium with shader mods and advanced world mods when I my laptop only has 4GB ram and a duel core prossesor :D I got so caught up in the free roam and doing whatever the hell I want that I have played (At this time) 19 hrs of the game and have only just learnt fus ro (roh) so yea... Get this game :P
Napkinboy;-;What can I really say that you don't already know? If you don't/ haven't owned this game yet, you should probably go jump off a cliff... in-game, once you buy this... because of my review.
Commander Riley;-;Skyrim is one of the best games i have ever played. The modding community adds humour and graphics to amazing to describe.
SuperArkonis - Natsu;-;Oh Skyrim, with your wondrous landscapes and your lovely wildlife and inhabitants. Skyrim is an excellent game with SO much to do. Become a thief, a warrior, anything you wanna be. You can do all the quests you want or go around each town and slaughter everyone. The possibilities are (relatively) endless. My only qualm about the game is the menu system in-game. It seems a little clunky at times and annoying having to scroll through heaps of items sometimes just to get one thing. Luckily there are mods out there for that, and I definitely recommend them should you feel the same way
Thorn;-;In their toung,He is Dovahkiin,DRAGONBORN! FUS RO DAH!
yrmama;-;I love this game! Making stuff, like you do in Minecraft, but amazing scenery & lots of quests.
jackthehunter11;-;I recommend this game for anyone who likes fantasy and magic. The moment I saw this game I knew I was going to like it because I have always liked Bethesda games and by far, this one was the best!!
*iSS*E;-;100% replayability even after 10 years to come !! You won't bored to death rumraging across skyrim !! Massive multiple story creation with endless sidequest !! plus superb character/item creations !! +1 must have for your Library
polarbehr76;-;If you like getting sucked into a game only to find that you spent the entire weekend inside then buy this game!!!
Stapanovitch;-;10/10, becomes flawless once you get a few mods.
Fred (30-50 fps);-;fanstic game 5 out of 5
teck72;-;Macho man randy savage dragons. what else do you need?
XxREDxZON3xX;-;An amazing game to have and I cannot wait to see what the next Elder Scrolls will be like for the next the GEN Consoles! One game will be for the record books once more!
=ENG= Razuul;-;Thank you steam for letting me buy both DLC's this morning, before the sale. Really nice of you to help me spend more money. Thanks alot...
[TeW]Scan tewclan.co.uk 18+;-;The finest game i have ever played.
East_Coast_Col;-;Of all the games I play.. this is the one that always has a cozy fire and a hot cup of steaming chocolate ready to welcome me back. It's the game that welcomes me with a big friendly smile and open arms. Even when I keep playing away it says, 'come on home' and gives me a nice warm hug. It must surely be the best game of all time. I don't know if I will ever finish it - but then, I don't really want to. I have it both on PS3 and here on PC. I have restarted it several times playing different characters. It has not dated at all, in no small part due to a large modding community, many HD updates and a friendly community. There must be more mods for this game than there are devious politicians. If you don't already own it you need to correct the error of your ways immediately or expect to be disciplined! You know who you are and you know you want it. Should you get the legendary edition? Look into my eyes, what do you think. Just say "Yes Miss"
Scars Windblade;-;You want to build a house, and never live in it. Make that Three of them!! THen buy this game!! But there's more! You'll find that every city you visit throws a house at you!!! And all you end up doing is becoming a horder!! Release your inner klepto and stash it in one of the many houses you own, and never use it again! Want to eat twenty 10 pound cheese wheels with no ill effects at once... THEN DO It my friends. This is the game for you! For you will get sucked into the world of wonder where you can do so much you wished in your life. Sleep standing?! Posh! WHO needs sleep!! You can run for weeks, and never tire!! You can become a Werewolf or Vampire... Once you destroy the Sun you never have to worry about the pesky burning feeling. FISHING!!!!!!!!!! ITs all in this game. Including that NAGGING WIFU YOU WANTED!!!!!!!!!!!! DRAGONNNNNNNNNNNSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Granny Gumjobs;-;This game is amazing. It contains tons of lore and unique questlines. Also, got killed by a mudcrab. 10/10.
Albojones77;-;INCREDIBLE, but I felt that some of the main questlines could have been better, but WHO PLAYS TES GAMES FOR MAIN QUESTLINES!
walspeed92;-;I havent showered in months. 12/10
clintoncdotson;-;Amazing game. Liked it so much, I bought it on here after playing it on PS3 and have modded the snot out of it. Highly reccomended.
Yric;-;Best RPG in my opinion. Large range of modifications from new player homes to better graphics. The original game however is still beautiful, fun and huge open world with dragons, thieves, giants and even seals. Storyline is perfect and can be very cheap when on special. DLC worth having a look at when on special. Large variety of weapons, clothing, enemies, NPC's and locations. Quests are plentiful and trading cards and achievments exist as well. 9.8/10
Chocodaze;-;Skyrim is an AMAZING game. I've put 109 hours into this masterpiece and do not regret it. The story is a bit short IMO but the side missions and the open world bring you a whole lot of stuff to do. Run up mountains. Enter dungeons / Caves. Ride a horse. Kill a dragon. Buy a house. Get married. etc. And btw, 10/10 for using consolecommands and changing my name into Jesus and flying up to the skies. EDIT: Played a bit of Skyrim last night, went on a horse. And had the power to fly...Incredible 11/10
The Splendid;-;Love it 10/10 !
NeonNoodls;-;This game is awesome!
Mr Cloud;-;wow what a amazing game i mean it's like so cool and flashy like a man waveing a gun in ur face and like if u move i will blow ur brains out so yer as i was saying its so cool because it's so reolistic because u shout a people and they go oh no! then a thing comes out of ur mouth and it makes them go flying i mean i can do that also i can fly any geting back to the point AAAA! OMG there's a talking crow in my room AAAAA! run, run for the hills. Hey wait ru still reading? most people get bord by now and then play skyrim and go oh look at me i have dadric armor lalala! oh yer reading all this is a mistake because i have no opinion so lol u just wasted a min of ur life reading this crap!
Durzan;-;Truly an amazing game. If you a fan of fantasy this is a must play. ALso with the amount of mods available you make this our own.
LeeroyTheGeek;-;One of the few games you spend 200 hours on to complete only then to decide to start again whilst looking forward to it. Ive now completed (and brought it with all the DLC) on PS3 (Twice), Xbox360 and most recently PC (Total usage on all platforms over 1000 hours) and still believe its money well spent. Cant wait for the next installment
Yal Yager;-;This game redefines masterpiece. I keep typing and backspacing because I am at a loss for words, because trying to describe this game makes me think about how amazing this game is, and I can't think of what to say. Yep. It's the game of my dreams. The ultimate roleplay experience. Pretty much everything I could wish for in a game. Never a roleplaying game so very long-lasting. Whether you play as a badass, or a simple person existing in the world... you'll still feel awesome. Replayability value is extreeeeeeeemely high. Never a game so beautiful and IMMERSIVE in every way possible too. I always turn the volume way up. I cried even on the main menu because it was so amazing and the music and the awesome. There is not a more amazing game series than the Elder Scrolls. I have played the first four TES games, and this game just sent my fanboy heart and turned it into a Viking.
Jake;-;Most Epic game of all time ! Use the mods :D
anus friends;-;Skyrim is an amazing game where you can be the dragonborn, cast shouts, do magic, and defeat the neverending waves of evil in the land of Skyrim. You can do outstanding things like dying repeatedly, sitting in your desk chair for hours trying to farm your smithing skill, killing innocent people, and if you have mods, killing children, and fapping to naked women! What else could you want from an amazing RPG game where you're the ultimate badass *to an extent*? 10/10 It was ok
PolitikZ;-;"Like Far Cry 3 without guns." -ign
StingingVelvet;-;If you like questing in a fantasy world and don't own this game you might be insane. Say whatever you like about simplified mechanics and action combat, Skyrim takes you to a world like few games do and is fun from begining to end.
DangerousC04;-;Skyrim is one of my favorite RPG's of all time. You play as a speacial Hero known as the "DragonBorn" meaning you have the blood of dragons within you, and you can use the speacial words of power. As you adventure through the massive land of Skyrm, fighting monsters, bandits and Lengandary Dragons, you learn more about the land and its dark and instresting secrets and story. This game is worth any price.
OVA Kakyoin;-;you can eat bees.
monkeypus;-;Got to live out my fantasy of being a lizard 11/10
sinnFeiN;-;Perfect! The most epic world of last gen... And one of the best RPG-worlds ever made... not for people with little time!
dreadfallen85;-;Decapitated a Dark Elf with a child's Wooden Sword. 11/10 would murder with a toy again.
Hallowed Be Thy Name;-;hmm Khajiit thinks Obilvion was better............. Anyhow Skyrim is still a great game plus a great modding community. Compared to the previous 2 games Skyrim is a little lacking in quest writing, varienty in enemies, bright vibrant colour scheeme is gone. I prefer the leveling system of say Fallout or Oblivion more but there is nothing wrong with it works well. The main quest is alright was never really that excited about any of the quests in it though and that brings me to my next point. Many quests are dull in this game usually go get this or go kill that same with most other rpgs but there are no variety in eneimes to go kill or items you go get and the diolauge makes me not even want to help these people. The diolauge in this game is something to be desired you will find that most people are  in Skyrim. Most conversations and quest givers other than the main quest or faction quests are just dull, and leave me not wanting to help these people except for the reward. In comparison to Oblivion where I accually wanted to help these quest givers out because the diolauge was written like they needed the help badly in some cases. The items you go get are usually just the same model of sword or weapon already in the game like iron, or steel etc. just with a different name. The faction quests are pretty good wish they were longer and more drawn out. Joining the Companions and being harbrindger one week later seems kind of unrealstic and breaks the immersion I tad bit. A better system would be like Oblvions where you had 2 quest givers in different cities and you had to wait sometime inbetween a quest for both of them and a larger quest from someone higher up in the guild. The civil war questline is meh. Its fun for maybe the first seige but its the same thing over and over again go take this fort. and after it is over does not really change anything except jarls. A joinable thalmor faction could be really fun (as Khajiit and High Elves are my two favorite races I like the Thalmor) but both factions play the exact same and its the same fort taking mission over and over again not that great. Dragons! The most wanted feature in a TES game well they are cool at first. They will quickly become a nusince as you progress and beat the mainquest. When you beat the main quest dragon spawns are at their highest spawning. People who walk everywhere will quickly start to fast travel as stopping every 5 minutes to fight the same dragon battle over and over again. Dragon battles provide little diversity in between dragons except how stong they are or if they breathe fire or ice. but they all behave the same. I eventually just downloaded passive dragons mod and only faught the dragons I wanted to/had to. Level Design is better in most areas I did not find that the cities to be that fun to explore but thats manly because poeple are dull to talk to. The cities look very good and are fine even if some are rather small. In caves and other dungeons the alternate exits usually hidden but not hard to find are nice to save from backtracking. The caves are sort of linear not going to aruge that its bad the ones in prvious games were also pretty linear. Dwemer ruins are not linear however, they are massive and easy to get lost in I know I have and as the level map leaves something to be desired It is sometimes easy to get lost. Combat is the concept of all all Modern TES games hack and slash. My only issue with combat is that it is easy. I hardly ever died on my first playthrough on normal its just not hard. I know play on Master with a more hardcore combat mod and that provides an adquit challenge in some parts. On the plus side combat is a lot more balanced for the user if you want to be an all caster or mage guy you can do it if you want to be an archer you can in skyrim. In oblvion do to what I think was a more difficult game It was hard to just be a mage or an archer. none of my only magic classes ever worked out as they are just to weak when eneimes get close. Archer can work later on when stealth is up there in level. In skyrim I found that magic is more excesible for most spells. Spells are lacking though there is not near close to amount of spells in skyrim as there was in oblivion (not that you could cast many of these spells) and morrowind. which is sad but they were not really needed. Stealth is just as overpowered as Oblvion haha. When your stealh gets past 50 you will hardly ever have to fight again if you so choose. In my opinion stealth should be more realistic with higher damage done to enimies but if you shoot someone they should always be on alert and be actvily looking for you, since their buddy just got shot they are not going to say must have been hearing things and get back to their normal activites. I get that this is not a stealth game it was just a suggestion to make stealth more interesting and challenging. Leveling. Leveling is streamlined in skyirm. you no longer have skills like willpower strength endurance, and the others from oblvion. Instead you have health staimnia or magicka.kind of dummed down but it works. Than you have your skills like one handed, two handed, archery, light armour, heavy armour, stealth, crafting, enchanting and there is more. every time you level you get one point to spend in any of these trees to unlock new ablities. The problem with this system is that some skill trees are just useless. I have never put a point in enchanting, pickpocketing, whatever that persuaion speechcraft one is. There is just no use since I have never enchanted an item in skyrim in all my hours of playnig it. Enchanting could be usefull if combined with spellcrafting. Spellcrafting is gone from oblivion. Spellcrafting wasnt very usefll except for creating spells that do nothing to power level your charaters magic ablities. But it was fun and a good feature to try to find the right combination of spell the problem with it in oblivion was soul gem limitation though. With skyrims better magic system or more powerfull magic system that feature could have shined. I am still mixed on the magic takes hands to use for mage charaters I do not have a problem with it but you have to hotkey your shield or the spell so you can go back to blocking if you say were healing yourself, which is a little inconvientient on the difficulty I play on but it works amazingly for casting spells the dual wielding spells is just fun and the fact that it makes the spell even more powerfull or combining two spells is a really great feautre. DLC The DLC expansions are great they both offer more weapons and armour, quests, and more eneimes to slay. Hearthfire is a little lacking but for the price it sales at its not bad. Its cool building your house ingame but as have used the Construction set to build houses or castles before It is not needed for me. Otherwise good DLC in the way DLC should be released as expansions that add alot of good content not tiny little packs of say a weapon set. In summery the lesser diolauge, poor quest writing, less varitey, and other minor gripes makes in my opinion Oblivion to be the better game. in my opinion enviroments look better in Oblivion while not high texture the bright and vibrant colours makes Oblivion just more fun for me to explore. While not game breaking to skyrim the dark colour scheme that many games today are adopting is just dull with a greyish tint. Sure mods fix this but this was a review or vanilla game. Skyrim is still a good game with 300 plus hours I still have not done everything the game and the DLCs have to offer. And with close 170 mods installed it adds even more content for me to enjoy and for everyone to enjoy. really big thanks to bethesda for continuing the excelent mod support. The construction set is great and easy to use, and I thank you for that. 9/10
Tropyklia;-;Skyrim, there, that's more than what you need it, grab it, now. Really, why haven't purchased it? Do it! Really bro! Do it! Really, do. it.
Jack From Lex;-;IT IS FUN
DuckofInsanity;-;I can't even count how many hours I spent on just vanilla one on my xbox and then I made the greatest decision to buy it on Steam like I should have in the first place and with mods it is all completely new again. And the DLC adds a lot of content. 10/10 would ruin social life again
Regulator;-;A modern classic. If you enjoy RPG's at all you owe it to yourself to give this game a try.
SlySynn;-;Phenominal RPG game that takes on a whole new look at the Elder Scroll series. Out of ten, this game should receive a 9.9.
How can feet smell with no nose.;-;Epic gameplay and highly addictive... 10/10! :D
CrazymanJr;-;The Best Game that i have bought from the steam store! The graphics are just stunning and the gameplay experience was over my expectations!!!! To the people that are thinking of buying this game...GET IT NOW! :D Good Luck
E-swizz;-;I love this game. Its simple beauty lies in the amount of control the player has over how they play. Skyrim is a different game for each person, whether you like to play as a mage, a warrior, or a thief. With seemingly never-ending quests and objectives, you'll never grow bored of this game, because even if you can't find anything more to do, creating a new character creates an entirely new game and a new series of adventures. Trust me when I say it's really hard to get tired of this game. To top it off, the graphics are amazing, and Bethesda's new engine is gentle even to some underpowered systems. I can't recommend this game enough.
Glass_of_Water;-;In total i have played 181 hours on the pc and a good 250 on console and if theres one thing i learned from 300+ hours of gameplay...It was probably the best 300 hours of time i ever wasted...that is until elder scrolls 6, I mean....I DIDNT SPOIL ANYTHING. NOTICE: all who have read this review are to be terminated under athority of bethesda code of conduct and are to be terminated by bethesda agents within the next 48 hours, and yes they have black suits sunglasses and an earpiece, and yes they will kick your door down like the bosses they are
Spare Change;-;Your life means nothing until you play this.
Dino Dan;-;Like Far Cry 3 with swords
Nanako;-;I, as a dragonborn, cannot waste my time to write this  review. I gotta go to kill those dragons and honor my guild!
Honorius Chisurius;-;Lot of mods with fetish armor ^^
Enderphin;-;Awesome game, it has lots of quests. It's very interesting and exciting and have nice music.
GeneralOfficerSabo;-;One of the best games ever!!!!
Morakou _'wMw'_;-;This game is so epic i can do whatever i want to do
Jesus Christ;-;"An Introduction to RPGs" Thinking of getting into RPGs? This is it. If it's on sale, I strongly suggest you buy it. It's so addicting that it will take you a long time until you have nothing left to do, and even then you can just download mods and additional content for this game. The spending/hour ratio is incredibly good. Only criticism is the amount of bugs. Make sure you have bug cancelling mods before playing extensive hours of this game.
Lagertha;-;Probably one of my favorite games EVER. It's open world, full of magic, fights, dragons and it's beautiful! A lot of choices of who you want to be, gender and free to do what you want...if you can deal with the consequences of your choices, of course! The soundtrack makes everything even better!
lightningwolf36;-;This game is alot like pokemon. You make your way to a city and after a series of trials you are awared Lydia, your first follower. You can level up and get armor for your Lydia and let it fight other people. You can also trade your Lydia for another follower with diffferent skills. Lydia herself has no skills except almost getting killed several times a quest making her a good distraction. Adopt a lydia today and she comes with a free set of gear tand ons of room to carry around the crap you want to keep but don't want to have in your inventory.
Daft Behemoth (S`A);-;Skyrim does a very good job of giving you a huge world to explore, unfortunately the scale might be its greatest downside as well. It feels like not enough butter spread over too much bread. There are little to no memorable characters besides dragons and there are very few genuinely interesting quests to partake in. In my 81 hours spent wandering the lands of Skyrim, no particular moment truly stands out to me. I find this to be rather disappointing after playing Oblivion... I'll never forget my skooma escapades or my quests for the Madgod, but my memories of yelling at some wrinkly old men on top of a mountain are already fading.
Dack1270Boyee;-;Elder Scrolls V Skyrim is by far one of the best games i've ever played. This game is well rounded, well wrighten and the game play is the best of any elder scrolls game.
HeavenLegioner;-;So what i can tell about BESTGAMEEVERIMPOSABLEANDPERFECTDRAGONSKNIFSKINGSBLOODINGALDUINANDTITIS! i thing thats all :DDDDDDDDDDDDDD 99\10
Jewish Pancakes!;-;It's ing skyrim. 100/100
Yukinoshita Yukino;-;I'll never see the sun untill i finish this game...
Jbot;-;It's Skyrim. You should know if you want it or not.
lolthedragonkiller;-;One of the best games I've ever played !!
Blaze;-;very good, great gameplay, great graphics and extremely good background music!
TommySalami69;-;LEGENDS NEVER DIE UNLESS THEY CHOOSE TO
Truepaw;-;Mod it and it will look like its a next-gen game. Same goes to Fallout: NV.
s;-;This game is awesome. It has endless gameplay and mods just make it even more endless. I would highly recommend to anyone. Worth every cent.
Tornqvist;-;Skyrim may be the game with most glitches that bethesda has done but that doesn't remove it's beauty and memorable enviroment. My likings of this game wasn't because of the main story nor the sidequests. I like it because it gives you the opportunity to choose whatever you want to be and do. Morrowind did the same and oblivion but they didn't have that detailed enviroment that i crave. Nostalgic elder scrolls gamers hate skyrim because it is light for the gamer and remains easy, i find it easy aswell even on higher difficulties. But let's not forget that you want to have power in a world like this and you want to rule. If you reach level 20 ingame then you are all set for kings road in skyrim. The game offers alot of quests which can give you up to 100+ gameplay depending on how fast you are going through them, of course that's just quest hours aswell. When i play i like to run around and discover the world blindly. I have played through the game 2 times and now i am on my third walkthrough. I have tried going Mage and Warrior and now i am focusing Archery (which is extremely good) and every walkthrough has been an adventure even though i have seen it all before. I have approximately 190+ hours on the game. If you want that beauty and peace in a game then you should get skyrim, it will rock your world! If you are an oldschool gamer that likes challenge and hard work to get things done i recommend Morrowind/Oblivion. Although i didn't find Oblivion that challenging it's definately more challenging than Skyrim and it also has the best dlc ever created (According to myself) "Shivering Isles" where you get to met the prince of madness, Sheogorath! Of course i recommend all 3 games if you are a variety gamer but mostly Oblivion and Skyrim since i am a relaxed gamer that doesn't wanna do too much in order to get my reputation in a game. ;) Hope this review can help you on your purchase! Have a good day.
Captain James Sparrow Teabag;-;If u want a game with great graphics, Intense Story telling if you choose too, a massive amount of side quests, slay massive monsters or cause trouble among castles, a character completely unique, and a massive open world map for you, then this is the game :)
Ice Maiden;-;very fun open world rpg tons of quests! you will have so much fun playing time will just fly by with all mods out on the workshop and skyrim nexus you can change so much you will never get bored ;)
19tangerines;-;The Elder Scrolss V: Skyrim......oh boy....This here ladies and gents, is the game you buy and play if you want to lock yourself up in a room for 267 hours worth of you life dedicated to doing all the crap in this fantasticly fantasmic world of Elves and Orcs and intelligent walking dinosaurs. Skyrim is big. REALLY...big. And that's not just accounting for the world map I'm talking about the quests, weapons, skills, MODS (very important btw. Once you use mods you can never go back to vanilla skyrim again.), and pretty much everything the game has to offer is downright amazing. But I do have a few nickpicks. Don't get me wrong though reader of my little review here, Skyrim is my favorite in the series of The Elder Scrolls, but that might be because it's the only ES I have ever played in my life O_o anyway, the game does suffer from some things here and there. The modloader is great in all, but the MAJOR problem I have with it is that it doesn't tell you what mods are conflicting or not, so you'll be playing the game and it just closes for no reason. If there's a setting that you can adjust so you can see the conflicting mods then plz send me a PM and regard my last statement as irrelevent. Skyrim also suffers from an extreme amount of what I like to call "Grey effect." What does this mean? It means Skyrim looks very bland and washed out. Nothing really stands out unless you use mods like Increased saturation boost or Increased contrast boost and other types of shader mods. Another thing I have a nick pick with is that fact that at the end of the game, the cool armor you once wore like Nightingale, Shroud armor, Thiefs guild, etc. become incredibly inferior to the dragon versions. IMHO I really don't like the look of the dragon armors. They give myself of a sense of character. It makes my interesting dragonborn not so interesting. The last topic I have to cover is mages. I...HATE....MAGES.......Pretty much one hit kills once you reach level 28 and above if you don't have like level 80 enchanting so you can have resistances. They are broken. And the player version of a mage is just not worth it. It's just not worth it. But it does add a bit of challenge fun here and there. That's my review! Hope you enjoyed it! I definitley recommend this game to anyone who is a fan of open world games and RPG's. Peace-
Drake_the_king;-;I have never loved a game or played a game as much as Skyrim. It is by far the best game that has ever been made and will give you an almost endless amount of content and fun.
"Black Leg" Sanji;-;This game has like 500+ hours to play. A giant Open World and a feeling, that reminds me of "Lord of the Rings" makes this game to one of the best at its genre.
CalmTiger;-;I am Jesus. Buy this game.
drb0907;-;AWESOME game one of the most fun ive played, also it is chalenging i know i spelled that wrong but ime to lazy to research it. when you first enter this spectacular RPG you think I AM GOING TO HAV SO MUCH FUN PLAYING THIS GAME and your right,it is over all the best game ive played, ps you realy haf to pay atenchen to diolect. i ame sory for miss spelled words.
SuperNinjaOctopus;-;You can haz sweetroll
Kapaw;-;I have used up 30% of my life on this game
Sherlock Van Helsing;-;Just one thing: open world game with IN HORSES!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! SCORE: 97/100
TornApartPaperYoYo;-;I Believe that the Elder Scrolls: Skyrim is one of the best games I've ever played. This game has An unlimited amount of detail, fun, and story. Even more counting the DLC and the Steam Workshop. This game can easily top many games that will be made in the future that are "supposedly" more advanced. Whenever a new open world RPG is released they just do the same thing that Skyrim does but with less detail. I hope the next sequels of the Elder Scrolls franchise will maintain the Fantastic feel as the one you get playin Skyrim.
Nik;-;I'm sure you know why I'm recommending this
Brummbrummquietsch;-;Well, first of all this is a review, meaning it's my personal, subjective opinion of this game. So please keep that in mind before attempting to make a negative comment with bad language. Thanks. Second to mention, this game is absolutely overrated and overhyped. The Good: - Even on my not-so-leet-machine this game runs pretty good and solid. Only crashed twice in 50+ hours of gameplay. - The game itself, which will serve an insane amount of play hours. - The amount of details (books to read) and things to discover is insane. - The replayability. Dozens, if not hundreds or more combinations to build your character. - For any price below 15 Euro it's worth every penny. - The voice acting and overall presentation is superb. The Bad: - Game seems sometimes a bit unpolished and clunky. But only sometimes. I play with the help of the UESP Wiki which states that a lot of quest can be stuck because of bugs. I personally haven't encountered so far any of those, though. The Ugly and the things that kinda ruins it: - Your actions in Skyrim don't seem to affect anything in any way. No matter what fraction you choose, you'll end up doing all the quests (more to that in the following point), get mediocre equipment and that's it. I hoped to be (in the end) an overpowered thief / assassin after completing the quests from the Thieves' Guild and The Dark Brotherhood? Nada. You don't even get great equipment or stuff. You even can join fractions which are hostile to each other and nobody seems to bother. Killing everything or doing anything, nothing seems to change. RPG? No, more like a game with endless possibilites, only that nothing matters. - The quests are very repetitive and purposely serve to to prolong gameplay time. You always have to (for example) find a item at the complete other side of the map and your actions are not connected, meaning your actions in Skyrim don't matter. And the quests are absolutely dull; for example to get a final achievement for the Thieves Guild, you have to do 125 (!) quests and every single one of them is the same. Steal a thing, place a stolen thing, change numbers in a book. After stealing 20 times in a row the same object you kinda loose it (no pun intended). - The leveling system is WAY to prolonged. I don't mind spending a lot of hours in a game, especially a RPG, but come on, one has to spent a whole eternity to actually become a badass character in even one skill. By the time you're (for example) a 100 level Marskman you've already finished all the fractions you're interested in. - The necessity of mods. I don't know WHAT stuff the developers smoked during testing, but the interface of this game is probably the definitively worst I have ever encountered. Even after installing the mod SkyUI its HORRIBLE and slow as hell. Absolutely horrible. Like I mentioned in the beginning, this game is completely overhyped and overrated in every aspect. In conclusion this game tries to have and be anything, but isn't. It's like jack of all trades, master of none. Still, if you have 15 bucks left, buy it.
Epic0verFlow104;-;There's not a game I'd rather play until I die than Skyrim... It's simply glorious
Cryo - Trading - Commend? :);-;It's Skyrim. Why wouldn't you get it?!? You can make it into whatever game you want with mods. The only reason not to get it is if you do not have some free time to spend in Tamriel, cause you will be there a while.
Captain "you'll be in" Crutches;-;How does one review a game that never ends? Gameplay wise, the game is tightly designed, and very effective. but it is not perfect. The plotlines are hit or miss. There are some real gems in characters here. You have the Jarls, each of which is well developed. The guild heads are just as well(if not better.) However some characters are simply dull or annoying. by the aforementioned information, you may think this a mediocre RPG. oh, you could not be more wrong. When you enter the game, you enter a new world. This game is truly an accomplishment in Open-World storytelling. the different reigons of the Province all feel different, from Swampy Hjallmarch to the colorful forests of the reach. The game presents you with an intersting world to explore, with interesting dynamics with regards to the Imperial-leaning western reigon and the Nordic-Leaning Eastern reigon. to give you an example, we can look at whiterun, the center of the game's action in it's main questline. you have a king who can't decide which side of a war to join, but who wants to do right by his people, you have an aspiring shopkeeper, a landowner who needs an axe to the skull, a shopkeeper who only wants to care for her daughter, two brothers running a Tavern and a shop, a healer, a evangelical preacher of an illegal religon, a smith who wants to prove herself, and others. These characters have personality. It is a step up from Oblivion's inconsequential NPCs. The game looks great, and has its own artistic style which works well. As other reviewers have said, the open world is perfectly crafted, down to the troll who killed your horse. It is not a perfect game, the civil war and dragon questlines are lackluster, and the magic system is lacking a large selection of spells and any intersting flavor. The combat can be clunky at times. Is the game good? Yes. Is it the messianic game? no. Should you buy it? yes. Oh, and also, mod the hell out of this game.
megageeklizzy;-;Skyrim is a great game for anyone who enjoys fantasy RPGs. With a huge, open world containing hundreds of locations, Skyrim offers hundreds of hours of gameplay to dedicated players, who can choose how to explore the world as they develop a character to match their playstyle using any combination of the game's diverse skill trees. With a decent storyline, good RPG gameplay, and a lot of customization, there isn't a lot to coml=plain about in Skyrim. Of course, for those who do find something to complain about, the Steam Workshop has plenty of user-created mods that can change almost any aspect of the game.
WINDIGO105;-;I love Skyrim, it is one of the main reasons I transitioned to PC. It runs so much smoother, cleaner, and there is just so much more to do. There is so much more detail than 360 can make. My eyes were burnt by the detail. My eyes are not conditioned to graphics like you can get in skyrim. The storyline is awesome, especially if you either know or learn about the lore. I can literally play non stop for a day, maybe two. Sleep, then wanna come back to immerse again. Probably one of, if not my favorite game. I've put in more than 300 hours of gameplay on the 360, I'm betting between mods, easter eggs, and discovering new stuff or stuff I missed I'll exceed that now. I would highly recomend this game to anyone with similar interests. The controller compatability is making the transition to PC alot easier too.
Hipster Luigi;-;If you like Chivalry, then you should like this. Skyrim takes place in the fantasy world of, well, Skyrim. You can customize you character and have specific skills, like alchemy (you can make potions) or theft (Pickpocketing, sneaking, lockpicking). There is a engrossing story with life-like characters and many armor and weapons for you to customize. Although you can make one mess up that can have a big impact that will make you want/have to make a new game, but other than that this is a very good choice for something to buy. I give this game a 4.5/5
Panzerfaust;-;It's honestly hard to describe how amazing this game is. From the moment you end the first mission you are given the freedom to go anywhere and do anything. Want to go and fight in a civil war? Want to fell dragons in epic (possibly an overstatement) battles? Want to spawn a thousand wheels of cheese in someone's bedroom and watch as they blankly stare at you while they wade through an ocean of dairy products to their bed? You can do all of this and more in Skyrim. Combined with the epic landscape, immersive gameplay and fantastic attention to detail Bethesda studios pay to their games, it's hard to overstate how much I love this game. 10/10
Iron Sand;-;Get. It. Now. Go.
iPaolera;-;One of the best role playing games I have ever played. This game should be owned by if not wanted by everyone.
Crossy;-;Doing this for the bages plus great game xD
explodingwaffle;-;Always been a big fan of RPGs, and finally I managed to buy it with the steam summer sales! Was worth every cent, and as good as my friends said it was. Literally, cannot stop playing!!!!
Stroudy;-;Mods make everything more fun :P
Mantle's Approach;-;Possibly the most time consuming game I have ever played, and that isn't a bad thing :D
wow;-;gr8 game m8 8/8 so gr8 dont w8 this gam 8nt no 8 so f8
[CVG]Anton;-;This is an awesome game, lots to do and so much many hours of enjoyment. Dragon fighting is the best and crafting your armor when you get the materials is equally fun. If you picked this up durring any of the Steam sales you won't be disapointed. This game is worth the money and time.
Demon AH;-;Puting mods on this game make it even awesomer to play.
LordBaron;-;A game with literally no end! Even after almost 3 years People still play it like it came out yesterday. 10/10
Companion Cube;-;Much Gud. Very Not Suck. Such Reccomendation. Bui tis gem.
nickmcpwnage;-;More fun than a barrel of... anything really.
Vorral;-;Addictive, engaging, a depth that will rarely be rivaled. Skyrim delivers a journey unlike most found in modern RPGs, an ability to go where you want, when you want, and more importantly *how* you want. With modding at the forefront of the game, it retains a freshness that stays long after others have fallen by the wayside. Spend time with Skyrim, and you'll find out what everyone else has so far: there's not enough time for both Skyrim and other responsibilities. But those other responsibilities can wait a few more minutes.
Mopper Rod;-;Within an hour of starting Skyrim, I'd decided this was the pinnacle of the Elder Scrolls series; 144 hours in, I'm not so sure anymore. There are diminishing returns in the game as the quests become sparse and your character becomes an unkillable god that can strike enemies down with a single blow. Morrowind for all its flaws felt so much larger and more open somehow. Maybe I'm just older or maybe all the locations and journal entries and achievements aren't quite the same as being forced to roam a giant world and make your way with no knowledge of what was to come or what was left. Regardless, it's still one of the greatest games of all-time and I don't think anyone will consider their time wasted after they wander the hills and mountains of Skyrim.
Pacer;-;I recommend this game.
Caine VanScythe;-;One of the most enjoyable gaming experiences I have had. The base game is amazing enough, though the main quest is rather short and gets less exciting every time you start a new game. The DLC's add quite a bit of gameplay and new content, and don't forget about the tens of thousands of mods to choose from to further enhance the game. It removes many of the spells that were in Morrowind and Oblivion, but replaces them with new powers and "Shouts". There is no Acrobatics skill, so jumping height is very limited, but replaces it with a sprinting function. Many things are missing from previous title's character development, but there are mods to remedy this. After many hours of playing Skyrim, you'll learn that many of the game's wondrous encounters, NPC's, and environments (towns, cities, dungeons, etc.) start to taste a bit sour, and get repetitive and boring. But with mods in tow, you'll never have a bad experience while playing this game. Skyrim is an amazing game, but loses much of it's robust taste with every play-through, and soon becomes saccharine. But with the 30,000+ mods available to you, and the Official DLC's, this game will never get old, or lose any of it's grizzly wonderfulness that you experience the first time around. All-in-all, Skyrim (with lots of mods installed) is a must buy for any lover of this game style. Highly recommended, and worth every penny.
Your Local Fuck Boy;-;this game is "hands down" the best game ever!!!!!!!!!!
Irkaja;-;Excellent game with many thing to do. Besides main story line there are many beautiful side stories. In game you can perform quests, collect weapons armors and other things, and finally try mods from other players. I spent many hours playing this game and all was full of quality fun.
Yung Hots;-;Love the game, fun storyline! :D
lazytuna;-;This is the best game that I've played yet. It takes you back to medieval times, when people fight using swords and not guns. The main story is about dragons who got resurrected and they want to conquer Skyrim. Many people asked "Can you beat this game?" You can't. Only the main story takes 1-2 weeks to complete, and there're TONS of side quests available. This game too can be dangerously addictive. The soundtrack is amazing, the graphics are great and even low end PC's can play the game. If you're bored, try installing mods. It will cure your boredom and there are plenty of awesome & crazy mods out there. I would really recommend it, 10/10!
[OST] Ostwind;-;One of my favorite games, if not my favorite. You can do anything in this game, and it's story aswell as playabilty is phenomanal. If you've never played Skyrim, you have not lived.
TeeMan;-;32 hours in, yet to kill my first dragon, and I think I'm just about ready to start the game proper. Content rich much?
Grief;-;Open-world enormous scale Action RPG with immersive gamplay and modding.
Speeds;-;Probably one of the weaker 3D Elderscrolls games, though I didn't get to play Oblivion enough to compare it to that. It's not bad, just not as good as Morrowind, and Oblivion felt a little better. I'd give it a go if you can get it for $7.50 on a daily deal in one of the larger steam sales. I'd also recommend modding it, as it makes th experience better.
[SSG]SerTimko;-;its amazing expecially the danguard dlc
<=~J_DAWG~=>;-;No review required... PLAY IT NOW, and ALL questions will be answered.
Prickly;-;its good
DrunkenScoper;-;Skyrim is an absolutely outstanding RPG. I'm 166 hours in and still haven't beaten it because I keep getting distracted by all of the side quests, caves, and dungeons. It's even better once you start modding it and adding things like even higher resolution textures and more dramatic, dynamic weather.
Lord WoffingShire;-;It's like real medieval Norway but with dragons!
MadeInCroatia;-;This game is just phenomenal, have great story and surrounding and so many things you can do either in questing or in the world of skyrim. This game is must buy for every single RPG fan.
Dunecat;-;Thanks to the modding community, I'm nowhere close to being tired of this game.
It's Adventure Time;-;Absoluteley outstanding!
CJChristi;-;So I have owned this a while but finally have taken the time to sink into it (nothing like waiting a few years right) and let me say, I am loving it. I think it does have some hit or miss marks in the skills as opposed to class/ex[erience rpg system but I do love this game. Buy it, buy it all!!!
Bender B. Rodriguez;-;If you need a review to tell you to get this game, this is it. I started on xbox then moved to PC. Skyrim is, well, too much awesome to put in words. It is a masterpiece on its own, and one continually in the making. The reason I say it is continually, is the modding community. The modding community has added so much replay value to an already amazing game. For example, the Unofficial Skyrim patch is a community effort to make all of the official Skyrim and DLC bug-free, and it has fixed tens of thousands of things. Not to mention all the mod choices out there. You can have ones that change gameplay, add spells, armour, weapons, houses, add entirely new stories and quest lines, make the game 4x the quality of the HD DLC, or help you run it on an older machine. There are simply too many to mention here, but if you are looking for something, chances are there is already a mod out there for it. As for DLC, they are all excellent. I recommend them all, but I especially have a love for Dawnguard. Probably because it was the first I owned.
Samuel Hartley;-;Fus Ro Da! This is the best game i have ever played! Thousands of times better than any large scale MMORPG such as World of Warcraft...The only thing this game is missing is a multiplayer system and this game is a perfect unbeatable one! Hopefully when The Elder Scrolls Online comes out...My hopes will come true...
Vino [Olive Garden];-;A great game, but you don't need Vino to tell you that. Come on, dude. What are you doing reading my review of Skyrim? Go out and do something with your life. Or play Skyrim. That's what I'm doing.
vzr;-;It was worth all the money, I love what this game offers. Each mission contains a mystery, surprise and a perfect history from my point of view.I like how thieves get out of the bushes and try to steal your money,you won't see it,might scare sometimes and a lot more to love abouth this game,I write here, but it would mean a lot to read.You would not find a game like this for a while.Show if you like RPG,try Skyrim best of his kind.
Rolem;-;amazing defintily worth it
Captnjay;-;Great Game 5 Stars, kept me busy for a long time.
DirtyJewFish;-;dargons and  yo
Ominiscience;-;Learn powerful shouts. Shout in everything's face. Blast them away. Pickpocket people, shout in their faces, they don't mind. Dragon attacks you, shout in it's face, ride it. You hate an ugly thing, shout in it's face, it dies. You wanna see something fly, shout in it's face, see them fly. Shouts for everything. Also nice-looking armor ftw and good graphics, but very buggy.
Cory is now in the house;-;The most finest entry in the Elder Scrolls series. The mods are very very fun to  around with. I'd highly reccomend this game to any Elder Scrolls or RPG fan, but admit you bought it already.
don't let your dreams be memes;-;This game is so good that whilst playing it I prolapsed:-)
Ryguy12321;-;You could play this game for 100s of hours and still have stuff to do (game is pretty much infinite with mods) definitley one of my favorite games
Kappa Keepo;-;Can't believe I still haven't recommended it. It is not Morrowind, you are not going to draw your own map, write your own little guidebook, get lost, but you are going to have a lot of fun with it. Unlimited ammount of mods speak for itself. Skyrim still has over 50k different players a day on steam. That is probably highest number of singleplayer game played at this very moment. Unbeaten for 2 years straight no other single player game from 2006+ can compare, noone will prove me wrong, especially not Bio-Finished it in 10 hours and uninstalled-shock Infinite which couldn't even beat Skyrim on release day.
Siduakal;-;They've taken the series to a new high. The only gripe is the menu system is touchy at times, clearly made for consoles. However, that said, it's fantastic. Things that worked for them in Fallout 3 have made their way over and the game we know and love is back bigger, badder, and full of dragons.
Cruc1al;-;What more needs to be said. It's Elder Scrolls.
LyricalGenius;-;HOLY  MY  FELL OFF 9/10-IGN
DillJuice;-;I just have three litlle words about this game " Buy this game" thats really all I have to say about the game
MadZec;-;Okkkk cant believe that I didnt alredy made recomend to play for Skyrim... I mean it is darn Elder Scrolls game.... IF you like RPG and IF you like felling to have shivers down your back when you get dragon down, game gives you total freedom to do what you wanna do... and to approach quests way you like (you can convince a fella to stop stealing from the girl, or you can kill him... orrr you can kill the girl and rob her of all her gold) choice is yours.. question is which choice you will make???
Twiggz!;-;Provides hours of fun! Great game alone or with workshop mods!
ibu666;-;My personal game of 2011 - An absolute blissful experience, now I can experience it on PC with a plethora of mods. I even wrote a few words about it once upon a time... just google: half hearted gamer a tale about a fox
shortbus_98;-;Skyrim is a great game with excellent graphics and story mode, despite all of its wonderful glitches it is still a very easy and smooth game to roleplay.
The Joker;-;this game is so addictive if playing with mods!!! mod make me wanna play again,again and again. many mod that will make this game perfect!! maybe best game forever for me
The Metal Gaia;-;I have recommended this game because it is indeed a fun game. I sank hours into it on my Xbox and at least one hundred more with mods and the like on PC. I do also, however, advise that if you are a fan of The Elder Scrolls past games, that you consider not buying, or at least, relying heavily on mods after you do buy this game. This game is not really for past TES fans. It does what it does well enough, which is to throw you into the familiar world of Vikingland - I mean uh, Skyrim - and let you do whatever the hell you please, whether that be kill hordes of bandits or search for treasure. But, as I've said, this game is not for TES fans past. It is for the new age of gamers, who just want to play a game and not have a worry in the world. This is not so much an RPG as it is an action game with some slight focus on RPG elements like crafting and raising and acquiring skills. There are quests, yes, but they are repetitive. There is a story, but it is very basic. You wouldn't think to look at it, but Skyrim is in its own newer category of semi-RPGs. And therein lies the problem. The Elder Scrolls was always about being who you wanted, creating a deep character with an interesting story, having awesome quests to do and plenty of unique treasures to be uncovered. Sadly, depth is all but gone in this game. Its paper-thin at best. There are mods for that, but you shouldn't have to use mods to add something so standard to RPGs to this game. Combat is completely reliant on your skill, not your character's like in previous games. The perks make a difference only much later. If you have ANY kind of ranged damage available to you, you win. Essentially that is how combat works. If my archery skill actually mattered, I would slowly begin to see an increase in how much weight I could put into my shots or maybe higher chances to cause bleeding effects with my arrows. You see my point? Perks eliminate the purpose of your character's actual skill. They do add a sense of "bettering" yourself, but at what cost? Simplifying combat and removing depth in the sense of your character's skills actually making a tiny difference in terms of gameplay. Character development? Forget about it. All characters in Skyrim are essentially copy-pasted NPCs, and boy are they generic. Sexy Nord females abound. Oh yeah, and tons of guards that say the same things to you with sub-par voice acting, no less. Granted, some features such as the option to marry are welcomed, but they do not fill the void that most TES fans might be looking for. What this game does have going for it, though, is exploration and discovery. It feels good to explore the map, and if you want the best reward, don't fast travel. It seriously ruins any explorative tendencies in the game. But yes, it does feel good to explore, and discovering dungeons and caves is really fun at times. If only all the dungeons didn't feel the same, it would be even better. While I may have many gripes with the game, it is enjoyable. If you want hours of mindless adventuring and hordes of mods to improve the experience overall, then get the game. If that isn't what you want, and you want the original Elder Scrolls experience, than you probably already have that with Morrowind, or Oblivion. tl;dr This is a good game, but it is not a good RPG. Recommended to adventuring fans, not recommended for Elder Scrolls fans that want the experience they love.
RacingAce66;-;Why are you still reading this review and not buying this game?
(  );-;i killed myself with a cooking pot and a cart of cheese 10/10 would do again
ngel;-;If there was a option to recommend to someone to buy a game straight away and say it would be a must have in their libary, it would be this game. Just buy it.
lostlabyrinth;-;Vanilla Skyrim is great and all, but download some mods that overhaul graphics, combat, AI, difficulty and atmosphere along with some new quests to play through and it's almost like a completely different game and you'll have one hell of a time playing it.
Hell Gangster;-;Best game ever!!!! :D I could play this for several hours without stop! (As a matter of fact I already did! :P )
woody;-;During my first run through Skyrim, I played as an Argonian battle mage. I know this seems strange, but things were going well. When I played the main quest "Diplomatic Immunity" and I went to the Thalmor Embassy, I forgot armor. I was a naked Argonian, fighting mages who used frost spells... As you can imagine I was unable to continue, and I had no saves before I gave my gear to Malborn (I also forgot I was a Werewolf lel). This frustrated me to the point where I was up late one night, contemplating of greater things, my final decision was to delete my character forever. I was crushed that this was the only way, so I had a huge falling out with Skyrim, I started playing other games, such as Call of Duty. Call of Duty was filling the whole in my emotional roof that Skyrim had left, but there was still a leak. I realized that Skyrim was always there for me, through thick and thin, we were a team. That's when I rushed to the store, bought a new copy of Skyrim for myself, and 50 others to give out to strangers on the street. Now I am a happy man, do yourself a favor, buy this game, and buy a second copy to give to your future spouse, so when you inevitably divorce them to be with Skyrim, they too can have a copy to love and cherish. Happy Thanksgiving everyone!
Avaruusmurkku;-;Played about 150 hours on PS3 before buying legendary from steam. Still have not grown tired or touched the DLC content. A superior game. Also, mods greatly increase the lifetime.
Firefox;-;This game is amazing! Even if it came out in 2011, it is one of the best games I have ever played.
[PnG] {PHC} Captain Jack Sparrow;-;This game is super good if you like/love RPG's or the other Elder Scrolls games. On its own, it has hours of content. With the dlc, it has even more hours. With mods, it has an infinite amount of time.
RedPanda74;-;Amazing game! Whole lot to do, you will never get done with this game! Amazing graphics and gameplay. Mods are awesome too! 10/10
Tommy Wiseau;-;I role play as a butter with porn mods.
thehumanslayer12;-;Love this game! I stopped playing it though because of my PC's Graphic Card(ITS CRAP!). Just get the game and slay the dragon!
c0ntrol;-;By far the best out of the Elder Scrolls series. It has so much to offer and will leave you occuiped for hours on end. The graphics coupled with the excellent combat system switching between physical damage and magic seamlessly brings the player to a new level of RPG'ing. On top of a "main" storyline, the side quests and stories have a lot to offer, especially to those who are veterans of the series. There's a reason Elder Scrolls game get GOTY... go get it!
THETJRAT;-;great game and if you find it getting boring....steam workshop
dumbdog;-;This game is my life.
Vurczi;-;It's the first Bethesda game that actually a piece of the cake. The game has amazing Stories with good and bad missions and Long Gameplay! The Graphics is ok (There are games that has way better Graphics), Awesome and easy system, Huge Open-World, which is somewhere good, somewhere boring or even be bad. Recommended only for RPG Fans. 9.5/10 :)
misutov;-;The game by itself is good, a little buggy, but sets the bar for open world adventure. The real draw here is the modding potiential. I have close to 1000hrs in skyrim over multiple playthroughs, testing and playing with different mods that enhance and augment the skyrim experience. Mods add so much to this game that I don't know how to accurately convey it in one small review. Great game, Hours of fun. Would buy again.
Robin The Sword Master;-;O_o says: lots of time to play? if so this is the game for you.
CoolCool;-;Get this game really good and really cool
GiggaGundy;-;Beast game.
The1stDanMex;-;Great Game especially with mods, DLC is pretty good too but sometimes boring. but this game is definitely a good investment.
Yukari Yakumo SQL Master;-;Amazing game, tons of content!
Winterfinding;-;One of the most in-depth, visually stunning fantasy RPGs I have ever played. If you love fantasy RPGs like I do, you can't go wrong with this game.
ScaV;-;If you have a console and think about getting this game on console...don't.The game on the console is the alpha version of the game,the game on pc is where it's all at. You have a ton of mods to chose from and your game will look 10 times better than it does on console...or it will looke like a completely new game,with changed climate,landscapes and whatever you want to do to the game.
Gvaz;-;It's good but most of the mods are terrible garbage. Too much garbage loot in these games too
Hazer8;-;Just epic game, gameplay, music, crafting, building, story\multithreading, dialogues, MODS! There is no duch thing that you can't do in this game. 10\10
dmccoy1693;-;An exceptional Game. I love it and cannot recommend it enough.
Forte;-;It's very rare to find people that dislike this game, not trying to sound hush but if you dislike a true master art piece like this, then you most likely have bad taste in games, what ever you dislike about this, the game will most likely have 70% of mods to fix your problem in this. What not to like in this, freedom of exploring, quest, treasure hunting, anything you want, but this is game is not about doing what you want but living a life as a medieval style chracter.I will admit this game had a tons of bugs needed to be fix and still have some but not much to be notice any more but other thne that this game is almost perfect, this game is just to impossiable to hate and dislike, try it out, download mods and enjoy, for you people that dislike it, try giving it out shout to it agian with the dlc and mods, you may see that it's not bad as u think it is.
Shona;-;Skyrim is a very in-depth RPG game that you can spend hundreds of hours on and still have content left to complete. If you're looking to put a lot of time, and effort if you want, into a game then I would definitely suggest Skyrim. There are so many other things you can do which aren't part of the 'main' quest line. Even when you have finished the first quest line you are introduced to, you are no-where near finishing the game. That's one of the main things I love about it. Skyrim will always offer you something new to do; and when you get to the point of wanting more, that's when you can choose to mod your game. The modding community for Skyrim is very large. If you don't like something about the game, chances are, there's a mod to change it. If you feel like things are missing from the game, then there's probably a mod to add it too. You can pick and choose from mods to make the game how you want it to be. The Steam Workshop makes it easy to mod your game with minimal effort involved. If you want a single player game that you can lose yourself in, pick this one. In my opinion, you could never play this game and regret it. Pretty much the best RPG game out there
Papafitsoros;-;Well. What to say? This is a legend already. It is somewhat old now, but the good story is never old, you know :-). Just like in BioShock - you will want to know the end of the tail... And the world will turn your imagination on! Minor bugs are met, but they do not spoil the point. I really liked this one!
MagicallyBad;-;This game is worth the buy i play it non stop pretty much!
MADADE;-;The best game of my life. Fus Ro Dah!!
Ron_BlueDolphin;-;Very nice game
Phoenix Wright;-;Just.... Amazing!
DJ Pon-3;-;I love this game
KrabbyPatty;-;Lots of things to do.
LilSmilodon;-;I love this game. Bethesda did a nice job with hardly any bad bugs. One of my faverite things to do is launch lydia off High Hrothgar and find her still alive. This FPS RPG is great for adventureing,fighting and getting sent flying by giants. I much perfer to play this game on PC because the loading is much shorter than on PS3 or Xbox 360.
PL@Y-_^eR;-;Alongside with Dragon Age:Origins definitely the best games for me.If I had to choose one game to keep on my PC and delete everything else,Skyrim is my choice,no doubt!
Animatic;-;Hands down the biggest, baddest dungeon crawlinest Elder Scrolls game to date. Between modding and the steam workshop, the game has been expanded to include a rediculous amount of updrades to the lighting, textures, AI, NPCs, models, weapons, UI, and some even add entirely new locations and quests for hours of extra gameplay. A must have for anyone who enjoys RPGs.
Extreme Alex;-;You either die a hero or you play long enough to see yourself become the villain. 10/10
Smarba;-;played skyrim before on console, sucked complete a*s and I hated it. Played it on PC once and I fell in love. Definitely PC game over everything, i'm sure most agree.
Banquish;-;you already know this is a great game. why are you looking at reviews, stupid.
Musqetman1000;-;"knerw here's the thing, i am not a professional reviewer, ore werry good at "the engrush" couse after all i am speaking it as my 3 language so please, just listen to what i have to say and not bash it couse of how it is told. So skyrim is a awesome game... that is actually all...get it...KNERW!"
[AAO] Deadmano;-;400 hours have gone by over the past 3 years, yet this game still drags me in, WHY?! Over 600 quests completed, many of which include the never-ending "radiant" quests, and I've been loving every second of it! The latest installment to the TES legacy is NOT just a game, it is a way of life. You don't just run around killing things, there is a strategy to every thrust, a consequence to every cast and a reward far beyond that of your regular games, a reward that you know you're actually making a difference and you're being a part of it all, as this splendid world comes to life! Now if that alone isn't enough, the modding support for the game will blow your mind away! I've literally transformed the game from a Crysis 2 (whose graphics fidelity was splendid mind you) to that of a wannabe Crysis 3 with jaw-dropping reality, shading, AA and LoD tweaks. The possibilities are endless, and if you're anything like me you'll probably spend 100 hours on modding alone! I really couldn't recommend any other game that is more deserving of being played than Skyrim, so do yourself a favour and pick it up ASAP!
nyancatimusprime (Hardy);-;player.placeatme 00064B33 500 CHEESE! CHEESE FOR EVERYONE!
agb015;-;As someone who has grown up with Elder Scrolls from Morrowind on the xbox and Oblivion being my reason to buy a Xbox 360, Skyrim did not disappoint. Skyrim improves on almost everything that Oblivion brought to the table even if some mehanics are dumbed down. The environments are absolutely gorgeous with huge open landscapes to explore. The dungeons are all unique and have their own charms to all of them. There are many cities and villages to explore with different stories and adventures to discover in each one. Just walking between towns feels like an epic adventure. Skyrim is the best open world RPG to date in my opinion. With the steam work shop you can add mods that makes the game even better which makes it worth it if you already have the game on the consoles like I do. The difficulty can be adjusted at anytime for all types of players from hardened RPG players to people new to games in general. This is a game for everyone (except children of course). My only real complaint is the story doesnt feel as epic and important as the last Elder Scrolls games. The dragons seem intimidating but they are no real threat to you or the people of Skyrim even though they constantly tell you how dangerous dragons are. After beating the main story of Oblivion you felt like a true hero and even got a staue built for you. In skyrim they pretty much treat you the same way if you hadnt saved the world, thats right no staue at the end sorry for spoilers :P. But overall its great experience. 9.5/10 A must Buy
ratdog45;-;Three words: Buy. This. Game. Great plot, great characters, great gameplay, and the game is HUGE.
HalflifeA52;-;Simply epic
vixann;-;A Game that never ends,
readyplayer;-;The best RPG ever made YOU BETTER BUY THIS OR DIE!!!!!!!!!!!
Angerwhale;-;This game provides so many hours of gameplay that it is ridiculous. It definitely has a great replay value, you can decide what kind of character you want to be.
Poy Poy;-;The vanilla game is enjoyable, but I cannot recommend it, as it is nothing compared to the game where you employ mods. For those out there that either fear or detest the lore-breaking aspect of mods, I'm not asking you to download a school uniform or a XXXXXL bust size for your character. I'm asking you to look at the effort put in by the community of modders who strive to make the game a more enjoyable experience for all, like SkyUI or Falskaar.
Delon;-;THIS IS THE BEST GAME EVA OMGGGGG I LUF IT <3 <3 <3 <3 <3
Duck (M.I.A.);-;Four things: -Dual wield weapons -Fight dragons -Shoot lasers from both hands -Fus Ro Dah! P.S. This is PC version so mod this  or GTFO.
Fohmyn;-;Fantastic open world RPG. Best in the Elder Scrolls series so far. All gamers should play Skyrim, and that's a scientific fact.
Jenkins;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim has given me more pleasure in playing a game, than any other game has given me. As soon as you hit start new game, the graphics blow you away, even the loading screen with Alduin sitting on the word wall looks amazing. The dialogue matches them mouth movements, which is alway a plus, and the Voice acting is suberb (even though you tend to hear different characters with the same voice). As I said the graphics of this game are like no other you will see in a game made in 2011, however, the one critique I have is the water textures, as many a time I have come across patches of water that is invisible, but, the majority of the game is spent on land so that tends to not affect your gameplay. The Story is good, but sometimes it lacks a certain quality that you tend to notice. The one major problem I have with the game is the (SPOLIERS) Battle For Whiterun, it is suppossed to be a large scale seige, but it turns out to be 20 Stormcloaks charging at 30 Imperials. The Battle at either Solitude or Windhelm is only slightly better. Despite those problems I believe that Skyrim deserves the title of 2011-2012 game of the year. It extensive lore, its hours of leveling, its interesting (someties) story lines and its massive replay value make this game one of the best Role Playing Games made, you can easily sink 200+ hours into your first play-through without even finishing the main story line.
kapaya;-;I recommend this game.
Hootie;-;I liked it. You swing swords, you sling spells, you fire arrows, you yell... shouts? I dunno, it was a pretty good generic fantasy type sandbox thing, couldn't really hold my attention. I liked the water, and the waterfalls, and the world, and the villages, and some other things. I thought that claw quest was pretty neat. You know the one. 5/10
Stoneth;-;There simply hasn't been a game as anticipated as TES V: Skyrim. The latest entry in the 17 year old series, Skyrim brings the same free form RPG formula the series is known for and brings it into current generation hardware. Skyrim is more than a graphical upgrade, though. By removing the character stats and classes, Skyrim allows true freedom in play style by allowing characters to form based on what actions the player does the most. Any skillup contributes to level progression and a perk system allows players to excel at skills and learn new abilties without the need for stats or classes. Couple this with a world with so much to do and see, and it's easy to see why this game is so loved.
Biscuit factory;-;I enjoyed this game untill I had to fight the unicorns, cows were also overpowered, and the god damn potato knights one hit me all the time, I was a Cabbage wizard aswell, also When I used home teleport I was teleported to runescape and I got stuck there
Drew;-;Enjoy this game very much!
Jfamda12;-;awesome game i really liked it
Lambyjoe;-;Buy the game and stop reading this !
Mister Wintermoore;-;You can play this game your way; it's like Burger King, but without the calories! Venture forth as the mighty Dragonborn, crushing your enemies though use of powerful magics, Daedric artifacts, and devastating shouts, or jump on people's dinner tables and make them beat each other up while you steal their stuff! Though advanced gameplay mechanics, you will be able to advance your numerous skills so as to perform amazing feats never before seen to the folk of Skyrim. Advance your destruction skill and repeatedly stunlock your enemies by pressing both mouse buttons with the same spell, forever! Advance your sneak skill, and steal people's pants as they walk down the street! Advance your smithing and alchemy skills, and become almost literally invinvible through use of a complex process that includes potions, enchanting, and exploits! You will encounter a wide variety of intresting characters in your travels in the newest part of Tamriel, including cat people, lizard people, racist elves, drunk people, racist nords, bandits, assassins, murderers, cultists, drug dealers, corrupt bureaucrats, and more! Defeat powerful bosses like dead people, magic dead people, dead people with swords, people that make dead people serve them, a dragon that makes other dragons not dead, more dead people, dead people with shouting powers, flying magic dead people with masks, flying magic dead people without masks, dead people without skin, dead people with skin, vampires that count as un-dead even though they never were dead in the first place, to name a few. This game comes with three DLCs: Dragonborn, Hearthfire, and Dawnguard, which add the ability to fight the champion of Cthul-- er... I mean, Hent... no... oh, yeah: Hermaeus Mora, the first Dragonborn; the ability to get more houses which are occasionally attacked by bandits who kidnap your spouse because you can only build them in the middle of nowhere; and the ability to renact your favorite scenes of Twilight, but with more vampire hunting/human killing and less creepy "romance". Overall, I highly recommend this game. Now, if you'll excuse me, I need to go get some Burger King.
Kratos;-;Just get it...U know u want to ;)
JailerHUN;-;Totally recommend, great atmosphere, advanced character buildings and also moddable! Some gliches, that's all.
Arkandosquad;-;Just the best ing game..
MineBl0x;-;Nice game, one of the best so far. But seriusly, you have to buy the legendary edition, you won't regret it.
dru-remoh2;-;An excellent one player game, challenging at all difficulty levels, strategy requirements are impeckable, and the art work invested in the environment is absolutely awesome.
Weldaar;-;Good for around 20 hours and then you get bored and start modding it. Modding becomes a better part of the game. Play about with mods for more hours than you actually played the quest lines. Screenshot everything. Break your game with mods. Play another game.
meako117;-;This game on Pc best choice I ever made Love this game and Love the modding community.
TheRedViper;-;While Morrowind will always ba my favorite Skyrim nearly took that place with captivating gameplay, amazing graphics, and a wonderful community.
mask-inc;-;Hundreds and hundreds of hours can be put in that game and it will still be amazingly fun to play, well worth the bucks!
Salah-Al-Din;-;11/10 Enough Said .......... http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=257570807
Windermere;-;A fantastic game. Although the previous patches have fixed a lot of bugs in this game, I still recommend people use 3rd party mods to fix the bugs that haven't been patched up yet.
PepePadawan;-;My favorite part is raising the baby dragons and using combos during the Lydia sex scene.
DannyTwos;-;Playing Skyrim by the fire relaxes my soul
Joker;-;Good game but graphics needs work.
Bojangus;-;One of the Best Games to date! Elder Scrolls V is fun for any gamer whether you are a fan of the Elder Scroll series or not!
King Doom;-;I heard someone call this a mile wide and an inch deep once, and that's a perfect way to describe it. Bethesda is utterly amazing at building worlds, but when it comes to putting quests and characters in those worlds they fail, miserably. Take the civil war for instance. Skyrim is caught between the Empire (the good guys) and the stormcloaks (idiots one and all, and the bad guys. If they win, the real big bads, the aldmeri dominion who are basically magical nazi elves get one step closer to wiping out humanity altogether.) You can win the civil war for one side or another, and.... nothing happens. Sure some guards change pants and maybe two or three npc's say a sliiiiiightly different thing now, but that's it. Oh and you win the civil war by doing a fetch quest and then going to a city and killing waves of utterly identical faceless soldiers. four or five times. I guess what I'm saying here is there's no replay value at all. There's one way to do something and that's it. No choosing to do it a different way later in another playthrough because there is no other way. Oh and if you care about sane, coherent plots, DO NOT buy Dawnguard. The only possible way that could make sense is if your character literally becomes temporarily . Full on window licking wearing inflatable waterwings in the bath so you don't drown .
aboss2000;-;Its a great game, lots of bugs, but when you get past that there is a fantasy world to explore.
Aaresm;-;This game is good.
Sladidad;-;lets see, skyrim; what can i say for a review about that game called skyrim... well, now looking on it, i feel my situation explains it pretty well: as i write this, the time is 2:30 AM 2 days after i got it; and i already have 12 hours on this. and as i explore the world and view its life in every corner, i know i have only scratched the surface on the game. what can i say; i love the arnold schwarzenaeger voice for the guards.
Kiana;-;Skyrim is good the end.
Selm Lrlene;-;One Epic game must buy. Why? -Fun with / without MODs -Lores are always surprices -Random Questions often intriguing, mostly happen during daily routine/ on the way to a dungeon / keep / dwemer ruins / caves -Dragons just awesome. -Even after World Eater defeated - there're still much more to be explored! -Definitely a worthy one for Achievement Hunters - like myself as one.
jronguitar;-;My wife and I have poured hundreds of hours into this game. 10/10
The FireOpal;-;There are mods that give you amazing boobs! 5/5 Stars
BRUH;-;Played this game till I encountered the massive spiders, only  once. 10/10
Regulator;-;A modern classic. If you enjoy RPG's at all you owe it to yourself to give this game a try.
SlySynn;-;Phenominal RPG game that takes on a whole new look at the Elder Scroll series. Out of ten, this game should receive a 9.9.
How can feet smell with no nose.;-;Epic gameplay and highly addictive... 10/10! :D
CrazymanJr;-;The Best Game that i have bought from the steam store! The graphics are just stunning and the gameplay experience was over my expectations!!!! To the people that are thinking of buying this game...GET IT NOW! :D Good Luck
E-swizz;-;I love this game. Its simple beauty lies in the amount of control the player has over how they play. Skyrim is a different game for each person, whether you like to play as a mage, a warrior, or a thief. With seemingly never-ending quests and objectives, you'll never grow bored of this game, because even if you can't find anything more to do, creating a new character creates an entirely new game and a new series of adventures. Trust me when I say it's really hard to get tired of this game. To top it off, the graphics are amazing, and Bethesda's new engine is gentle even to some underpowered systems. I can't recommend this game enough.
Glass_of_Water;-;In total i have played 181 hours on the pc and a good 250 on console and if theres one thing i learned from 300+ hours of gameplay...It was probably the best 300 hours of time i ever wasted...that is until elder scrolls 6, I mean....I DIDNT SPOIL ANYTHING. NOTICE: all who have read this review are to be terminated under athority of bethesda code of conduct and are to be terminated by bethesda agents within the next 48 hours, and yes they have black suits sunglasses and an earpiece, and yes they will kick your door down like the bosses they are
Spare Change;-;Your life means nothing until you play this.
Dino Dan;-;Like Far Cry 3 with swords
lostlabyrinth;-;Vanilla Skyrim is great and all, but download some mods that overhaul graphics, combat, AI, difficulty and atmosphere along with some new quests to play through and it's almost like a completely different game and you'll have one hell of a time playing it.
Hell Gangster;-;Best game ever!!!! :D I could play this for several hours without stop! (As a matter of fact I already did! :P )
woody;-;During my first run through Skyrim, I played as an Argonian battle mage. I know this seems strange, but things were going well. When I played the main quest "Diplomatic Immunity" and I went to the Thalmor Embassy, I forgot armor. I was a naked Argonian, fighting mages who used frost spells... As you can imagine I was unable to continue, and I had no saves before I gave my gear to Malborn (I also forgot I was a Werewolf lel). This frustrated me to the point where I was up late one night, contemplating of greater things, my final decision was to delete my character forever. I was crushed that this was the only way, so I had a huge falling out with Skyrim, I started playing other games, such as Call of Duty. Call of Duty was filling the whole in my emotional roof that Skyrim had left, but there was still a leak. I realized that Skyrim was always there for me, through thick and thin, we were a team. That's when I rushed to the store, bought a new copy of Skyrim for myself, and 50 others to give out to strangers on the street. Now I am a happy man, do yourself a favor, buy this game, and buy a second copy to give to your future spouse, so when you inevitably divorce them to be with Skyrim, they too can have a copy to love and cherish. Happy Thanksgiving everyone!
Hackis Bell;-;Best game ever! This game will give you hundreds of playtime, side-quest and amazing story line. Absolutely worth of money but don't forget to buy all DLC's - they are better than basic game :D
iLoveBabies;-;Best game. 11/10 would bang again
Marshal Raynor;-;This game will ruin your life.
Spectral;-;Skyrim has got to be one of my favorite games of all time. Bethesda always delivers in their games and does an excellent job enriching their open worlds with so much to do. I highly recommend this game to anyone who loves RPGs, or even those skeptics.
ZaK821O2;-;its an ok game i would not buy it when it was $40.00
Claire_Redfield;-;Very good game, and there's a lot of things to do in Skyrim (and a lot of people to talk!). Be patience and explore this extensive game.
OnTheTree;-;EPIC FANTASY REBORN The next chapter in the highly anticipated Elder Scrolls saga arrives from the makers of the 2006 and 2008 Games of the Year, Bethesda Game Studios. Skyrim reimagines and revolutionizes the open-world fantasy epic, bringing to life a complete virtual world open for you to explore any way you choose.
Gary Busey;-;If you dont own this already I want you to cut a hole in your wall, go in it, patch the hole off, and live there forever, crying, for the rest of your life knowing that you never owned one of the best games of all time. Im sorry for you, honestly.
Buttstallion;-;Mods, Mods everywhere!
Jekk;-;Absolutely fantastic - a game set in a completely open world, you carve your own adventure or follow the paths set for you. Choose your own race, class, skillset and go from there. The possibilities are endless with what you could achieve. Lizard Mage? Done. Orc Homekeep? Done. Lazy High Elf who only earns money by stealing off others? Done. In a setting that is expansive, gorgeous, with so much background, I highly recommend trying the Dovahkiin way of life, even for a little while.
Kyrie;-;Great game, amazing scenery, lots to do. Lost my soul for awhile, had to back off. I have come across some quest glitches, but all in all love this game. Well worth the money I paid for it.
Taffy-3;-;Yelled a chicken to death. 10/10
Jellybean;-;Super amazing game, I love the indepth class choices and playstyles you can have. The free open-world is what really makes it fun though! I probably spent 20 hours just exploring half the map itself haha :P I reccomend this game to all!
Romantic Pickachu and Batman;-;Skyrim, a detailed game about a prisoner who is making his way downtown , walking fast, faces past and he's homebound.
Dr Strangelove;-;Most definitely an easy time-sink, it is easy to spend hours playing this game without even realising it, there is always new tasks to work on, loot to find, locations to explore, skills to obtain and much, much more.
MiniMidget;-;I have enjoyed this game for years on console, only to be blow away by the community support and mods this game supports. A purchase I wont regret.
MrSeduce;-;Man is it atmospheric! Keep your eye on the clock, because the hours will slip away. My only qualms in an otherwise incredible game: - Can get repetitive as most interiors are generally the same just rearranged - Little variation in voice dialogue. - The difficulty settings handicap the player rather than make the AI more skillful or strategic. Would have loved: - Greater ability to change the story/gameplay based on the decisions you make/don't make. Icing on the cake: - The Score. It's become one of my all time favourite sountracks. 8/10
Louise;-;Enjoyed this game way too much!
Vikter;-;Dont get me wrong, Skyrim is GREAT, An epic RPG fantasy game. But i gotta say, im a huge fan of the elder scroll series, and this one just dont give me that elder scrolls feeling, I can surely tell there's a good amount of people who played this and never even heard of oblivion. Go play oblivion and then go back to this and you will know what you've missed. Good game, but NOTHINIG compared to oblivion, or morrowind! Still a great game. 8/10
Richard(thewarlock);-;Probably one of the greatest rpg games you will play. Get it because of this and also because workshop and nexus
Idyll;-;This is a game that I always seem to be able to get back into after years of playing. After making the switch from console to PC, it was one of the first games I wanted to buy again. It has great replay value. Though it is a little buggy from time to time, the glitches often just make me laugh and are easily fixable if they get in the way of gameplay (with the use of some commands). I can waste hours just messing around or actually play the game seriously, and that it the beauty of most open-world games. Overall a great game.
[Karmacode];-;No one should have to convince you to get Skyrim, you should already have Skyrim.
Avee;-;Awesome game, love it.
Mustache Rodriguez;-;Skyrim is the one of the best games to play, able to capture the attention of any that play it, difficult to be fun, but not difficult to be annoying, Plenty of Quests to do as well as just explore the massive expanse that is the world of Skyrim. Makeing the deal of buying the game sweeter, working with Steam Workshop allows you to create a whole new world through the power of mods. Great Game, if get it on sale even better.
Mr Frstie;-;I don't know what to say But this game is good.
| Wonder;-;One of the best games i have tried!
Tangy;-;Yet another great game to add to the Elder Scrolls Series. Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is even more action packed than the previous games, with many features added. You can play anyway you want: Assassin, Mage, Warrior, etc. Have countless hours of fun with side quests, guilds, DLC, or the main story. I would highly recommed this game to anyone who enjoys RPG's or even if its your first one!
heroward;-;I originally played this game on a Playstation 3 console right after its release due to my pc not being able to handle it. After putting up with numerous bugs/glitches I shelved the game completely. Bought it to start playing again on pc and its so much better. Helps that I am a fan of games of this genre. Need to finish this title, but so far, its amazing. A must play for anyone.
Yeapal;-;You use swords and chop bad guys. 10/10
Leo Machiavelli;-;So much skyrim, worth it to skyrim some more.
Chaos;-;What more could I possibly add about this game... Great adventure, great game play, expansive world, and a seemingly endless mod community. If you see it go on sale, you should probably pick it up, because I guarantee at least 200 hours in game play and that's just the beginning.
Ish AHkAviz spidur ch33f 69;-;Loads of bugs and tons of crashes. 10/10
MagicallyBad;-;This game is worth the buy i play it non stop pretty much!
MADADE;-;The best game of my life. Fus Ro Dah!!
Kaosimir;-;Fantastic game. 11/10. Mods just make it better. Speechless.
Martyn;-;Fantastic, love this game
Hellguard;-;Because this game is just freaking awesome, an quite very beatiful if you play it on ultra!
Donzo;-;This game doesn't even need a review, it's absolutely beautiful and amazing.
Jazzerse;-;Wonderful game with an extremely complex and inspiring storyline, hundreds of things to keep you going all day, and a huge fanbase with tonnes of mods to choose from. Recommended strongly.
Armas52;-;Amazing action-packed game, really recommend this game. Though I have only played 33 hrs on the PC, I have played more on consoles. Five stars. :)
Bloodshotshady;-;This Is Absolutely The BEST Fantasy game I've ever played!
totalhavoc10;-;I got to have sex with a little bunny after killing it several times and after resurrecting it, and killed it again
Lana;-;Possibly the best game I've ever played, second to none. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is without a doubt one of if not the best open-world role playing games of this generation. Endless replayability, an unsurpassable amount of mods, a unique experience and countless hours to waste away enjoying the immersion this game has to offer. Bethesda truely excelled previous Elder Scroll games with this release. The Pros; > Open-world, beautifuly designed. > Detailed Character creation and Arcehtype building. > 300+ hours of playable content. > Extremely Lore based. > Truely immersive storyline. > Excellent Audio. > Well designed game mechanics including combat, leveling, perks. > Vast array of Weaponry, Armor, Spells, Potions and much much more. > Mass amounts of mods, ranging from graphic, gameplay, item, house, and character mods. > A substantial amount of enemies ranging from dragons, bandits, draugrs, thieves to vampires. The Cons; > Voice Acting is repetitive. One several occasions you will notice NPC's voiced by the same actor with the same voice. > Replayability is much lower without the use of mods. > Some areas of the large open-world seem reused. There seems to be little variation to open world textures and dungeons. > Questing can sometimes seem repetitive. Go to X, get Y item, return to Z. To finish this up I've put over 500 hours into Skyrim across three systems (Xbox, PS3 and now the PC), I've never felt as immersed into a games storyline, open-world and lore - it is truely a different experience to any other open-world RPG. The Character Creation and Arcehtype building is perfect for this type of role playing game. Want to play through the game from a stealth approach, done. Want to tank more damage than a German Panzer in WW2, done. Want to fire, frost and electrify your way through every bandit camp and dungeon in the vicinity, done.There is literally no limit, don't want to stick to a specific arcetype? Done, Jack of All Trades. With 10 playable races, you're able to customize your character to your own liking and fight the way you believe you should. With 18 skills ranging from Archery, Lockpicking, Two-handed, Destruction, Restoration, Smithing and many in between there's plenty of variety. Leveling never feels monotonous, level at your own pace or powerlevel before you've even started the main quest. Play the game your way. With over 270 quests, including the main quest, side quests and sub quests, there's never a dull moment. You'll be lucky to even finish half of them before you take an arrow to the knee. I could not recommend this game more highly. If you even have the slighest interest in RPG's or open-world games take the plunge and pick this game up.
Herzog;-;3 Words Fun As Hell
Sima;-;Mod it until it breaks.
GumpBoy;-;Hoard massive amounts of cabbage. 10/10 would buy again
(VGW)SCHNEIPER*LB*;-;got 10 large homes using mods and killed the jarls, i feel like high king now. would recommend 2000000/10
FalconTR;-;Best RPG game ever made. Also has got good mods.
RadioKillr182;-;The biggest open world single player game to date. Have on PS3 and PC. All the DLC at a good price on PC make Skyrim a No Brainer.
Ethannat;-;An excellent game for trying out different styles of combat and really getting involved in the world. My personal favorite is archery -- taking pot shots at Draugr from across the catacomb and actually hitting them is the best feeling in the world! The game is apt to bore you after a while, but that's often only because you're not in the right mindset to play it. It's not for fooling around in; you'll get the most out of it by actually exploring the world and being your character.
Bumbefly Sony Test;-;Bethesda games are awesome. I recommend the Elder Scrolls Saga to all who get more crazy becouse of medication, then they were before they took that medication. Believe me when i say that being hooked to Bethesda games realy draws your mind away from worse addictions and/or psychiatrical problems.
dogmai;-;A wonderful game and a true testament to the Elder Scrolls Series. Not as big as my beloved Daggerfall or Arena, but complete immersion into the environment is still possible. An easy to use skill system (though I do miss the in-depth ones of old) and a great character generation system make the game easy to play your way. Above all I love the customizability of the game itself, leaving it to the end-user to shape the game as they see fit. A great and immersive set of stories to go through, with DLC expanding it to many hours of enjoyable fun. This is by far one of the greatest games that I have ever played, and continue to play!
Grackle;-;Skyrim is one of those games you could play constantly for weeks, or even months and it's still fun. Then even after you get bored of it you can return months later, start a new adventure and have just as much fun as last time, if not more. Throw mods on top of it, the game just gets even better. The open world exploration is fantastic and there is always something new to discover, it's truly an adventure game and I recommend it for anyone who likes fantasy games and open world games.
mparsons666 [[Matt]];-;10/10 with mods, especially immersion mods, however even without mods this game is excellent.
Khaash;-;Simply incredible. And there are tons of mods that allow you to enjoy the game again even when you were getting bored of it.
Breaded Chicken;-;An amazing game with an awesome story/stories. There's so much to do that you can easily put 150+ hours in without touching the main plots.
Mobilizer;-;Stop reading my recommendation and go buy the game already!
Flarey ( - );-;Ok. My second review. Skyrim. Thats all I need to say. Bought it in England and started and I could'nt get enough of it. I searched every nook and cranny for items and crafted items such as the Daedric armours. The diversity of the 9 holds and the annoying meme make this game really great. And then enemies. With a good enough battle plan you can kill without even being suspected or even just run in and slash them up or crush their skulls. Oooooooo. The shouts. Holy . Those shouts. FUS RO DAH!!! I loved the shouts. My favourite is the dragon aspect or the cyclone shout, and I'm not saying the unrelenting force because cyclone flings them further and high in the air and dragon aspect because, 1. you look ing badass and 2. because when your health reaches around 1/3 there is a chance for an ancient dragon borns spirit to appear to help you out. Not only does it have great power, it will shout. Say what you want about this game but it will always have a place in my games library. Plus the modding allows more fun such as the whiterun camp attached to the wall is great for a beggining player that needs a good place to store their new and inventory filling items such as foods and weapons in special specific and overall very usefull chests. I rate this 100/100. (Nord accent)"I used to be an adventurer like you, then it ook an arrow to the..." (Me)"FUS RO DAH!!!" (Nord accent)"No lollygagging" (Me)"I'm at the in' shop. Leave me ALONE!!! Jeez." (Nord accent) stop shouting. You're shouting is, making people nervous." (Me)"Well  this *Stabs the guard shouts his body*. Well now that that has been taken care of, i can finally...OH !!! *Gets tackled by commander Caius* (Caius)"You're under arrest* (Me)"Ah crap"
Iron Sand;-;Get. It. Now. Go.
iPaolera;-;One of the best role playing games I have ever played. This game should be owned by if not wanted by everyone.
Crossy;-;Doing this for the bages plus great game xD
explodingwaffle;-;Always been a big fan of RPGs, and finally I managed to buy it with the steam summer sales! Was worth every cent, and as good as my friends said it was. Literally, cannot stop playing!!!!
Stroudy;-;Mods make everything more fun :P
Mantle's Approach;-;Possibly the most time consuming game I have ever played, and that isn't a bad thing :D
wow;-;gr8 game m8 8/8 so gr8 dont w8 this gam 8nt no 8 so f8
[CVG]Anton;-;This is an awesome game, lots to do and so much many hours of enjoyment. Dragon fighting is the best and crafting your armor when you get the materials is equally fun. If you picked this up durring any of the Steam sales you won't be disapointed. This game is worth the money and time.
Sima;-;Mod it until it breaks.
GumpBoy;-;Hoard massive amounts of cabbage. 10/10 would buy again
Courier Six;-;How can you not love this game. you can literally play it forever don't get me started o the mods :P mods make pc skyrim the best ever and cane enhance gameplay and make it last so much longer
Colonel Austin;-;First time: HOLEE SHEIT DEM GWAPHICS (Jontron) First hour: Stop attacking me Hadvar! Dammit what the hell is wrong with this guy. 10 hours: Novice robes for 1300 gold?!?!?! 30 hours: Wasn't I supposed to kill a dragon? 100 hours *spams creation of daggers for smithing* 150 hours: How did I end up on this island 175: I've defeated Alduin! (Finally) 200: Mirrak you son of a  that was my dragon soul 250: Hello there shopkeeper, would you be interested in my vast asortment of baskets and plates? You can have all 8967871234 of them for just 1 gold a piece. P.S.Get an Nvidia card, ditch your 290X, it's so unfinished EA tried to publish it.
CMillions;-;10/10 would review again
Ron_BlueDolphin;-;Very nice game
Phoenix Wright;-;Just.... Amazing!
DJ Pon-3;-;I love this game
PepePadawan;-;My favorite part is raising the baby dragons and using combos during the Lydia sex scene.
\\ ~ DARK ~ //;-;My first Elder Scrolls game that I've played, what can I say?! It's just Awesome!!!
Ibram Gaunt;-;Like Oblivion, with more facial hair.
DennyS;-;Amazing Game, highly recommend to play and is fun. 10/10
Admiral_WoW;-;what can i say that hasn't been said about this game? nothing really. Well put together and a solid game well worth the buy. However, I can see this being a obession so that might be the only problem.
[SoC]SirVival;-;Keeping up the Bethesda TES tradition Skyrim was as much as if not more fun than Morrowind and Oblivion.
GokWanIsErotic;-;Forgot it wasn't a sequel (it was so good): 11/10 would bang.
Ethannat;-;An excellent game for trying out different styles of combat and really getting involved in the world. My personal favorite is archery -- taking pot shots at Draugr from across the catacomb and actually hitting them is the best feeling in the world! The game is apt to bore you after a while, but that's often only because you're not in the right mindset to play it. It's not for fooling around in; you'll get the most out of it by actually exploring the world and being your character.
mayhog2002;-;reminds me of playing kings field just with lot better graphics
fuckhands mckoop;-;It's like Oblivion with more draugr
kinkymuffin91;-;I have this on PS3, 360 and now PC, I cannot get enough of this game, theres so much to do you'll never truly do it all. Buy it, love it, and tell your signifigant other you still love them, just... that you'll need a few weeks, or a month or four.
Saxony;-;Hundreds of hours of open world gameplay with a slew of different races, armours, weapons and spells to use. If you're looking for deep complex story, this isn't the game for you. It's as wide as an ocean but as deep as a puddle. However, the modding community has made this game worth spending even a hundred dollars on. Many mods for many different things such as quests, races, spells, equipment, new lands to explore and even entire games such as Morrowind. Highly Reccomended.
The Marvelous Breadfish;-;This is the best "Throwing Goats Off Cliffs With Your Voice" simulator money can buy.
wazaaaz;-;One of the best games ever!
Deranger;-;Greatest game in history ^^ I think they shouldnt've stopped making DLCs for it tho.It had alot more potentional and would just be neat to have several other DLCs,3 are not enough for such a big game :P
Sharpy;-;Brilliant game, recommended for everyone who enjoys RPG games or bethesda fans. 8/10 would have been better if you had a better leveling system and more items.
JoseWeiners;-;Waldo Approves (   )
Old McWeaver;-;Really great game where bandits come to mug the guy who just killed a dragon and absorbed his soul, whoever doesn't buy this game is a milk drinker
DuCane;-;I keep trying to quit you, but you keep pulling me back in.
RiKu;-;BUY THIS AND PLAY IT TILL THE DAY YOU DIE!
Ekusudesu;-;The Elder Scrolls is one of my favorite RPG series and Skyrim is no disappointment. An open ended world, great voice acting, deep character customization, solid gameplay mechanics and the freedom to pursue the kind of character you want to play make this a choice game for any fans of action RPGs and there has always been a great community surrounding the series with talented modders who take the game to a completely different level, creating a deeply replayable experience.
@FlatchestedMaid;-;Feel like being an adventurer? Feel like killin' some dragons? Feel like being the most bad- looking negro hero ever? Now you can with The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim.
Micbran;-;Great game. Very good. Such wow.
xChocolateCowx;-;Best. Game. Ever. I purchased this on my xbox, I just recently purchased this on PC. Hands down best game. How can you dislike such a massivly beautiful game?! This game does have those tiny glitches but you wont know know them unless you look them up and they arent obvious glitches either, if thats what you're worried about. This game is worth the money! Ive played many games throughout my life and i've got to say when this came out, i wasnt too intrested in it until I actualy took my time to play it. And now that I have... NO REGRETS :D!! Took my life.
JokeMX;-;After getting it I know why everyone loves it so much. A really great game and I highly recommend it! It's a true "must-have" for every RPG fan.
[#] Veto;-;Who hasn't played Skyrim yet? Nothing but perfection in this game.
[UGL]DarkFire;-;This is one of the best if not the best game I have EVER played!
J;-;3 years old game and still fun with amazing graphics
SmokeyJoe;-;Theres a reason ive almost sunk 1000 hours into this bad boy, its the best Elderscrolls game yet.
iHATEvalv;-;If you don't own skyrim, please uninstall life!
Aod1st;-;One of the best games I own.
Clambert;-;This game, is so much fun! From just running around killing things, to downloading Mods turning Dragons into Thomas the Tankengine. If you liked any of the other Elder Scrolls then you will hands down love this game just as much if not more!
Luke eH! Afk;-;Honestly I have to say this is one of the best games I have ever played in my whole entire life . I own it on Xbox 360 and I loved it so much I had to buy it on steam. If you buy this game and you have an Xbox or a PS3 I would recommend buying it on steam because you can download mods and fun  like that.
**Pyro$u$hi**(_);-;We all know this game and how  it was on the consoles. We all agree that this game is 100 times better on PC due to mods and enhancements that can be modified and added. This game is incredible in its own way. Yes, it has a considerable amount of glitches and bugs which can be fixed using Official Patches from the Skyrim Nexus. There are a lot of things you are missing from this game. It has incredible mods that you will never get to experience. Which is a shame since it is one of the biggest workshops on Steam. There are mods that add more killmoves, characters, races, weapons, armours, animals + beasts, immersive mods, enviroments, gameplay aspects, and more. There are ENBs which enhance skyrim IMMENSELY. Literarily, a brain . There are mods that can create better characters that don't look like hobos from downtown. This game is excellent for those who seek adventure, great mods, and roleplaying.
Stutification;-;Amazing game, ten out of ten :)
.cookie;-;I almost forgot to review Skyrim.
odr004;-;cool
Twitch.tv/Juulaar;-;Dragons Keep Killing me and stealing my sweet rolls!
Sipsco. Employee 100484802;-;An all-around fantastic adventure game. While the Elder Scrolls is famous for its RPGs, Skyrim feels like more of a fantasy adventure with RPG elements, rather than a traditional RPG. The Elder Scrolls III and IV both give the player more of a traditional RPG feel, giving your character special skills and increasing individual attributes such as strength or dexterity, whereas Skyrim allows the character to only build up skills such as smithing, destruction magic, etc. Undoubtedly, the quests in Skyrim have been made much more simple since Oblivion and Morrowind, but the action and basic story (if there is one for that particular quest) make up for the challenges of finding the location of the treasure/bandit camp, etc. Like most Elder Scrolls games, one does not simply "finish" it. There are mountains of quests and events for the player to find and complete, and you can easily dump hundreds of hours into it. With a growing mod community on Steam and Nexus, players can immerse themselves in one of the greatest adventure RPGs in existance.
yukirusenake;-;Love the game, its long story, and replayability make it very interesting, as well as not being even close to linear. My only problems were that its sandbox mechanic is severely lacking, but I'm sure mod makers will make up for it. As well as some seemingly unfinished questlines. ||SPOILER|| Like the College of Winterhold, you should actually be able to learn about the game's definition of magic, and its mechanic through this college. Instead, it may aswell be a small insignificant bunch of side-quests leading up to becoming arch-mage.
Deep-Space Hell Omelette;-;This game is good for those who like open world games and RPGs. Also, there are tons of mods if you want to change the game. Want to make that fus ro dah less boring? Change it to a mighty OBJECTION! So yeah. It's good.
Blackwolf_swe;-;Why didn't i recommend this game when i bought it? Because i was too busy playing it. After installing my 500th mod today i can still call Skyrim one of the biggest and best games i have ever owned. As stated by others the potential of this game is almost unlimited. You can even convert the whole game into a tropical forest now and play like you were in Elsweyr. Get this game NOW :D
Captain Mazda;-;With the right mods, this is by far one of the greatest games ever released.
Squirtle Carries for days;-;Yes but i have found a bug where it gives you the dlc when you do not own them and if you use anything from the dlc and save you can nolonger play that save till you get the dlc so i can not play anymore till i get dawnguard
MonacledPotato;-;do anything u want in this game 99/10
WinterDog;-;The best RPG of the last 2-3 years. That's all. ------------------------------     2-3 . .
Velociraptor The Greatest;-;Skyrim is the 5th installment in the Elder Scrolls series. I've played it on console and it is smooth and has very few bugs. The PC version is basically an expansion pack; you can download mods and have hilarious battle with a My Little Ponie Avatar against Thomas the Tank Engine! BUY THIS GAME!!!!
bigdawg4;-;Best game I have played in years
PwndTang;-;I've never invested as much time in a world as I have in Tamriel. The Elder Scroll series has set the standard for RGP's going back to the beginning but most notable with Morrowind, Obvlivion and now Skyrim. Skyrim is not just a game to be played but to be immersed in. It's an experience not to be missed.
SNiPEzz;-;Let me just say, BEST dragon, knight, whatever you call this game I have ever played in my life. You start out with awesome graphics, awesome story layout, and just an awesome game experience you have ever played, if you dont like this game, your just a total loser. I'm sorry but this game is currently the best dragon times game I have ever experienced on PC. I suggest this game to people that like dragons,knights, that kind of stuff. Nothing bad about this game, everything is running fine, no bugs or glitches I have had yet.. just an awesome game
Swede in;-;Why wouldnt you buy this game?
Heknon Darkflame;-;Do you recommend this game? You bet I do.
Oilver Scott Sykes;-;Amazing game!Dragons,bandits,thiefs and much more!Everything about this game is awesome! 10/10-Badass seal of approval
JasonoTheGreat;-;Skyrim Is probably the most Beautiful Elder Scrolls games ever, and one of the best games ever. The map is fun to explore with many different characters to fall in love with. Its one of the only games I enjoy levelling up my Miscellanious skills (Blacksmithing speech etc.) You Are not a gamer if you never played a tleast one of the Elder scrolls games , so If you haven't, Skyrim is the place to Start. Although, not even a year after buying the game I found that I was heavily relying on different mods and DLC. The story is basically the same no matter what and even though there are some small choices, there isn't a lot for an RPG. The choices all lead to the same out come (just some different dialogue).
Roranicus;-;Skyrim is truly one of the best games I have ever played! It has endless hours of fun in the base game, plus a huge collection of mods and three massive expansions! If you haven't taken the plunge into TES 5, do it now!
madgodXinsanity;-;Easily the greatest game I have ever played.
General Shi Xie;-;my gran was pro at skyrim before she embarked on a journey to find true peace and solitude with the greybeards please honour her and buy the game
JawZ;-;This is hands down one of the greatest RPG's of all time..... The Elder Scrolls V has proven to still be one of the finest pieces of art Bethesda has published and is still proven to be a masterpeice nearly two years on. Whether you quest for weapons, armour or just seek adventure this game has it all. In terms of gameplay, while the combat may be seen in some eyes as 'crap', there are many mods available on the workshop to tweak your game to perfection. The PC edition runs much quicker than PS3/XBOX and is greatly obtimised. Loading times are minimal and even old computers can run this game fine which is incredible considering the sheer magnitude of the game. Sadly this game is only singleplayer but don't let that get to you. Talking about it with your friends is just as good :) You will never get bored with the simply hundereds of quests to complete. Perhaps you can make personal quests for finding mighty armour or slaying some annoying beasts. Maybe you just want to use a dragon shout to knock a giant off a cliff. Anything is possible. This game has proven to be in my top 3 favourite games ever made (which is saying something. I have A LOT of games). The game is cheaper than ever on steam and has such an amazing community helping out by making and testing mods, giving feedback ect. This game certainly is playable without mods (you are not obliged :D) however, there is something in the workshop for everyone. James Wood-Dedicated Nord with a big sword.
Prism;-;An immersive adventure that once you start your journey, you're likely not to stop for a very long time. Your path will be rife with bandits, vampires and their thralls, draugr, and of course; dragons. The fifth installment of The Elder Scrolls series does not disappoint with its sandbox atmosphere and myriads of modding capabilities. There exists a modification for almost every facet of Skyrim, enhancing your medieval experience. Skyrim is one of the crown jewels of my game collection and rightly so. There is so much pure content in this game, it is excusable for the tens of hours that it will take from you. Some may describe it as a timesink, but it is well worth it because for every hour you commit to the game, it takes you further along in your journey and leaves you aching for more. Skyrim is undoubtably one of the best games its generation, setting a precedent for future games that strive to outdo what it achieves. Skyrim is the one to beat. The score for the game is also fantastic, full of astoundingly great work by Jeremy Soule. The music that accompanies the events is very period; it goes perfectly with the atmosphere of Skyrim. Your heart will literally be left pumping as you fight dragons to the sound of One They Fear or Watch The Skies. And the music of Sovngarde gives a perfect tone to the afterlife of the Nords. Overall, Skyrim deserves all of the positive acclaim that it garners. It is setting a standard in the gaming world. And renewing the belief in myself that perhaps there is still hope for storytelling in video games. Pros: + Hours upon hours of gameplay. When you think you're done, you're not. + Customization. Great character customization, and with mods it reinforces this tenfold. + Modability + Skill System + No Classes + Dialogue between NPCs. There are always things going on. Cons: - Initial game physics are a little irritating in places. - At first, it was difficult to find where I was going on the map, but this may have been an individual issue. - So much to do that you don't know what to do. My main gripe. xD
FUSRODAH;-;it's my game *-*
theREALdeanW;-;OUTSTANDDDDING GAME! endless fun with steam workshop
2fat2carry;-;It worth to play n good way to explore fantacy world.....
Beer0clock 24/7;-;spent lots of hours playing on xbox,pc version is way better and with steam workshop makes it 12 out of 10 'best rpg without a doubt,only thing that suks is no co-op,imagine playing this with friends
AllTheGoodNamesWereTaken;-;great game very addictive
JawZ;-;This is hands down one of the greatest RPG's of all time..... The Elder Scrolls V has proven to still be one of the finest pieces of art Bethesda has published and is still proven to be a masterpeice nearly two years on. Whether you quest for weapons, armour or just seek adventure this game has it all. In terms of gameplay, while the combat may be seen in some eyes as 'crap', there are many mods available on the workshop to tweak your game to perfection. The PC edition runs much quicker than PS3/XBOX and is greatly obtimised. Loading times are minimal and even old computers can run this game fine which is incredible considering the sheer magnitude of the game. Sadly this game is only singleplayer but don't let that get to you. Talking about it with your friends is just as good :) You will never get bored with the simply hundereds of quests to complete. Perhaps you can make personal quests for finding mighty armour or slaying some annoying beasts. Maybe you just want to use a dragon shout to knock a giant off a cliff. Anything is possible. This game has proven to be in my top 3 favourite games ever made (which is saying something. I have A LOT of games). The game is cheaper than ever on steam and has such an amazing community helping out by making and testing mods, giving feedback ect. This game certainly is playable without mods (you are not obliged :D) however, there is something in the workshop for everyone. James Wood-Dedicated Nord with a big sword.
Prism;-;An immersive adventure that once you start your journey, you're likely not to stop for a very long time. Your path will be rife with bandits, vampires and their thralls, draugr, and of course; dragons. The fifth installment of The Elder Scrolls series does not disappoint with its sandbox atmosphere and myriads of modding capabilities. There exists a modification for almost every facet of Skyrim, enhancing your medieval experience. Skyrim is one of the crown jewels of my game collection and rightly so. There is so much pure content in this game, it is excusable for the tens of hours that it will take from you. Some may describe it as a timesink, but it is well worth it because for every hour you commit to the game, it takes you further along in your journey and leaves you aching for more. Skyrim is undoubtably one of the best games its generation, setting a precedent for future games that strive to outdo what it achieves. Skyrim is the one to beat. The score for the game is also fantastic, full of astoundingly great work by Jeremy Soule. The music that accompanies the events is very period; it goes perfectly with the atmosphere of Skyrim. Your heart will literally be left pumping as you fight dragons to the sound of One They Fear or Watch The Skies. And the music of Sovngarde gives a perfect tone to the afterlife of the Nords. Overall, Skyrim deserves all of the positive acclaim that it garners. It is setting a standard in the gaming world. And renewing the belief in myself that perhaps there is still hope for storytelling in video games. Pros: + Hours upon hours of gameplay. When you think you're done, you're not. + Customization. Great character customization, and with mods it reinforces this tenfold. + Modability + Skill System + No Classes + Dialogue between NPCs. There are always things going on. Cons: - Initial game physics are a little irritating in places. - At first, it was difficult to find where I was going on the map, but this may have been an individual issue. - So much to do that you don't know what to do. My main gripe. xD
Geralt of Nipia;-;It's nip twistin
John Egbert (Shane);-;Awesome game especially with cool mods everyone HAS To get this!
[SNK] tototo31;-;THIS IS A MUST HAVE
Burnedimmortal;-;It's a really thought out and well detailed game, if you like FPS RPG's then you'll definitely like The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim! 10/10
kira007;-;Nice and realistic game . Everyone shoud try it :)
Commander Clusterfuck;-;This is one of the time consuming games I've ever played, the lore is fantastic, the scenery is awe inspiring, and the amount of freedom it offers is unprecedented. If you've got the cash, get this game.
Nostromo;-;While the actual combat animations are not suberb there is no weight to any swings nor wump to any arrows etc the world is superbly detailed and the sheer possibility for stories is insane this game is really what you make of it. Oh and I havent even mentioned the modding community.
Therasll;-;Aahh.... perhaps a little too late for this game's review but nevertheless. The Elder Scrolls series, a wonder of RPG games in the years. I've started the series with Oblivion when I saw it in a Cyber Cafe a few years back and see all the classic Table Top RPG element inside it. I thoroughly enjoyed the game of course and cannnot wait for Skyrim to come out, which was announced a few month after my discovery of Oblivion. Firstly, I was expecting its mechanism to stay but was a little disappointed in its simplicity instead. Everything is too simplified and for the NPCs.... the only good thing about them is their quests and nothing more, despite their somewhat colourful personalities. The role-playing this time focuses a lot on quests instead of a more broad purpose. It would seem that Skyrim is made for its combat system, which was never a strong part in the Elder Scroll series in my opinion and is not so impressive in here either. Swing, swing, occasional block and such. However, the finishing blow is admittingly the best thing to do in combat. Skyrim's environment however is what really makes it beautiful. To be able to explore the province of Skyrim in its fullest, Fast Travel is almost going to be unused.... almost. All in all, it is a good adventure game despite lacking in its Role-Playing.
Earthday;-;I used to be an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow in the knee. #10/10
Elian;-;skyrim is stupendus! is a better oblivion IMHO
sarelifrey;-;Let's just say that if I were trapped on a desert island that somehow got electricity and wifi and could only have one video game to play for my entire life I would choose this one. Because it is not humanly possible to do all that there is to do in this game in one life time and you will probably never get tired of it. Just when you think you're done, you'll get sucked back in somehow. It never ends. Ever.
RCMRampage;-;its a good open world sandbox game that goes with the rest of the elder scrolls lore.
LittleBoss;-;I climbed up a tree with my horse.
MisterMan-Senpai;-;Punched a child in the face. 10/10
OrangeCreamSodaBT;-;GREAT GAME BUY IT U FILTHY
Jago;-;Even after playing this game so many times it still has not lost any playablilty and this is due to the great work everyone is doing through the workshop.
The Dragon Master;-;Surely a game this massive in scale requires a review of similar proportion. Where do I begin? The graphics? The gameplay? The lore? I'll start at the beginning. First off, this game is nothing like Roller Coaster Tycoon. In fact, Skyrim and RCT are about as far away from each other on the spectrum of gaming as they can be. So if you're looking for a quality theme park building/management simulator (or any theme park building/management simulator), do not look to the Elder Scrolls series. You begin your quest as a lowly prisoner in the back of a wagon. The offense is border hopping, and the punishment is death by axe (sure beats a big ol' wall, huh U.S. government?). On the way to the execution you meet fellow prisoner Roggvir, a key member in a group of rebels called the Stormcloaks, who want to take back Skyrim from the Imperial Legion (the people who are executing you) and put the Nords back in command. When you arrive at the execution...place in Helgen, a guard asks you for your name. Now say what you want about the Imperial Legion, but these people have some patience. I sat there for 45 minutes thinking of a name and rearranging my race, face, and gender to my liking, and they just waited for me to finish. Finally I decided on Jikrel, a magician/juggler inspired by my hero, Penn Jillette. Properly named and pampered, I'm ready to get my head chopped off! Just before the axe comes down, however, a conveniently timed plot device* swoops down and proceeds to burn the city to the ground. It is at this point that the player can decide whether to escape with Roggvir, the handsome rebel with a cause, or someoneelseIforgothisname, a dirty Imperial pig. While the choice doesn't make a difference at this point in the game, it presents the player with the concept of choosing sides in a convoluted, almost entirely pointless side quest involving the great Civil War of Skyrim. Racist rebels or idiotic Imperials? The choice is yours to make (or not). Once you've escaped, you're free to go anywhere in the overworld you desire, do any side quests you want, tackle the main storyline, or just goof around and break the game's A.I. I opted for the latter. Don't get me wrong, there are a lot of things to do in Skyrim, it's just that most of them aren't fun or interesting. I tried to give the main quest a go, but around the seventeenth plot device* and ninth fetch quest or so, I just got sick of it and quit. I had to replace the stock plot device* fighthing music to a pitched-down rendition of Frank Zappa's "No Not Now" just to make it that far. I'm going to be honest here: the most fun I've had playing this game I've had roleplaying a psychopathic serial rap-ist/ene-ma bandit/murderer that slits people's throats, dry humps their still warm corpses and dumps them in the nearest river/crevice/humorous location he can find. What this says about myself, I don't know. But I do know what it says about the game's quests: they're not good. In fact, I found the game's quests were obstructing my overall goal of blindly murdering everything in my path. Ever since Oblivion, Bethesda has felt the need to make certain NPC's that are essential to the game's completion unkillable. I had to download a mod so that I could kill them and thus continue having fun. Oh, and don't get me started on the mods! Nude mods, "better female" mods, "sexy armor" mods, what is this a sick joke?! How horny are you people?! But I digress. To sum it up: Skyrim is worse than Oblivion because it is better than Oblivion. Bethesda don't seem to realize that their games are inherently goofy and are perfect that way. The more they try to make it "badass" or "epic" or the more bad face textures and A.I. bugs they fix the worse it gets. I don't even think the intended audience for these games takes them seriously considering the number of great dumb mods there are out there (Battletoad Rash!) All in all, I'd buy it because it's still a pretty enjoyable experience and I'm sure everybody can find something to do in this massively dumb role-playing action-adventure game. Oh, and the graphics are pretty good I guess. 7/10 *plot device=dragon
picee;-;what can i say really that as not already been said its a pretty awesome game
Fruit;-;fun.. As long as you don't mind running around like a headless chicken
Admiral Rodcocker;-;Syrim is the perfect mix between action and adventure. The creatability and choices make this game easily my favorite. the endles amount of quests and story make it a non stop joy ride. And the graphice? They can't be beat. I HIGHLY RECOMMEND
Jsmitty76;-;this is a great game
UglyShark;-;This is a very fun game but Eventually gets a little boring.. Until you fight some dragons!!!
mzda_grl;-;This game is sick. It is such a big and beautiful world with so many places to explore. 2 years later with new DLC installed and this game is still awesome to play. Plus the endless mods are always fun to try.
Captain Mazda;-;With the right mods, this is by far one of the greatest games ever released.
Squirtle Carries for days;-;Yes but i have found a bug where it gives you the dlc when you do not own them and if you use anything from the dlc and save you can nolonger play that save till you get the dlc so i can not play anymore till i get dawnguard
MonacledPotato;-;do anything u want in this game 99/10
WinterDog;-;The best RPG of the last 2-3 years. That's all. ------------------------------     2-3 . .
Velociraptor The Greatest;-;Skyrim is the 5th installment in the Elder Scrolls series. I've played it on console and it is smooth and has very few bugs. The PC version is basically an expansion pack; you can download mods and have hilarious battle with a My Little Ponie Avatar against Thomas the Tank Engine! BUY THIS GAME!!!!
WizKhaleesi;-;Wow! Skyrim is definitely living up to the ES series expectations! This is a great game with almost endless possiblities in game to keep you entertained, be sure to look into any sales going on!
John Egbert (Shane);-;Awesome game especially with cool mods everyone HAS To get this!
Kangriad;-;Simply the best game i've ever played ! 20/10 :D for 20$ now in the store ! if you are an RBG games fan YOU SHOULD GRAB THIS ONE !
Celebrimnar;-;Maybe is not the best action/RPG of this generation, or even the best Elder Scrolls game, but is the most amazing epic high fantasy experience you will find in any visual media. You wont play Skyrim, you will live in Skyrim.
LeHott;-;One day, Dragonborn was almost killed by a dragon. Than he ate a slice of goat cheese, and slained the dragon. 10/10 Would eat cabbage again
Ocean Grown;-;What can I say about Skyrim? Such a wonderful game brought to full potential on the PC because of mods and its active community of dedicated players.. Whenever I'm in the mood for a sandbox game Skyrim is right there waiting for me.
Grort;-;What can I say? It's a fun role playing game, you're quite free to ignore whatever quests you don't want to follow and build your character as you please. Playing as a redguard, 40hrs allowed me to finish the main quest, become a werewolf, learn to decapitate enemies, helped random locals, decapitated some bandits, raided a wrecked ship for no reason, removed the head from a sailor, saved a Stormcloak from some tribal attackers, before stabbing a sword through is back, and enchanting a sword. There is plenty to do, and well worth getting.
Shairen The Wolf;-;It's one of the best game I'v ever playes, and even if you have to fight against dragons, wolves, and other creatures (wich I love) it's awesome and give to the player a really great experience, everyone should at least try this game!
Cody;-;Why should I even write a review for this? 10/10
Albino (Back in 1-3 weeks);-;Amazing rpg you can do basically anything and explore everywhere and mod support which means doing anything and going anywhere is literal
Leonair;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim A game with a kickass story that you probably won't get around to finishing until you've finished fooling around with cheese wheel avalanches, sweetroll robberies and a lot of random murders. Yes..random murders. A game where modding addiction is a real serious thing. Seriously. I tried to pick up a spoon at home, subconsciously trying to press E and i realized that i was nowhere near my damn PC and this was the real life. The game alone, how it was made and despite all the bugs, is very enjoyable. You can sink a ton of hours just looking around, exploring, immersing yourself in the skyrim environment and the radiant quests. Character customization is better than it was in Oblivion but can be further enhanced by mods. Basically the whole vanilla experience of Skyrim is superb and it is improved by the addition of mods. The Voice acting cast seems to have expanded as compared to Oblivion. The guards still assume someone stole my sweetroll. There is apparently a sweetroll thief on the loose. There isn't much else to say. Its a great game. If this review isn't enough to convince you to get the game, watch a few playthroughs, read more reviews, ask your friends, ask their friends, ask strangers on the internet and then decide. If that is still not enough or you just don't wanna pay full price (that is completely understandable by the way.) Wait for a good sale but i tell you, it is well worth full retail price. 10/10 I am no longer considered criminal scum. Now I am that which has committed crimes against Skyrim and her people.
SNS l Robin;-;I can feel tht half of my soul have been trap in this world! Once u start playing....Say GOODBYE to your previous game because u might not play them anymore......THIS game is worth for 59.99!! Everything in this game is almost PERFACT!! Grapghic,Song,Theme,Gameplay,Environment,storyline and whatever in this game! Thanks for my FRIEND out there(Lim Dong Yun) because he gave me this SUPERIOR AWESOME game XD
Biohazard39;-;Great game. The best open-world game Bethesda has made yet in my opinion. Now with the DLC's the game seems endless, and you will spend many dozens of hours just questing alone even before exploring all of Skyrim. Hope you have a lot of extra time on your hands. ;)
Shantae;-;You play as Luigi and you must save the Mushroom Kingdom from dragons. Mario was turned into a dragon but he good dragon. Luigi shouts really loud cause he is scared of dragons. Luigi can't fit dragons in a vacuum so he stabs them with arrows and swords, and his own fists. It's a pretty good game, everyone calls me some dragonborn I stab them and then say I'm Luigi.
[GND] Jester;-;dis gayme sux. obviously it was trying to beet black ops but it just cant. it aint even up 2 bf3 standardz
No shit, Sherlock.;-;Game Review: The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim. It's an RPG Open-World game, it's pretty exciting and it's really easy to get into it. In this game you're the Dragonborn, a person that can use the power of his voice to fight dragons that are trying to concquer the world once again, you are able to travel the world, fight mystical creatures, learn Magic and free the world from Dragons.
UnhappyWalrus;-;Completely ruined my life and stole at least 13 days of my life away from me 10/10
Rayman;-;I played through this game on console and it was epic, good story, lots of side quests and levelling to do. I purchased this for PC for the mod support, and there's ton of mods for skyrim, from some of the visual mods that leave you spending more time staring at the environment to rediculous mods that leave you laughing, having mods breathed new life into a game that I already compled. Overall if you are a fan of previous elder scrolls games or even rpg's with a good story this is worth picking up especially with all the steam sales. 9/10
\\ ~ DARK ~ //;-;My first Elder Scrolls game that I've played, what can I say?! It's just Awesome!!!
Ibram Gaunt;-;Like Oblivion, with more facial hair.
DennyS;-;Amazing Game, highly recommend to play and is fun. 10/10
Admiral_WoW;-;what can i say that hasn't been said about this game? nothing really. Well put together and a solid game well worth the buy. However, I can see this being a obession so that might be the only problem.
[SoC]SirVival;-;Keeping up the Bethesda TES tradition Skyrim was as much as if not more fun than Morrowind and Oblivion.
GokWanIsErotic;-;Forgot it wasn't a sequel (it was so good): 11/10 would bang.
Izumi Sena;-;an amazing game that everyone should get :)
Wolf;-;Approved by the Wolf
Hadley;-;Best Game of 2011 :D
Hammerlock;-;one of the best games I ever played...this game is amazing, the texture and the graphics are bad, but this is not something that should bother me. this game is a whole world, you can do anything in this game, the DLC's are amazing too. And if you like RPG, magics, fantasy and a huge lore, this game is for you.
Pr3stige;-;Excellent game overall as positives outweigh the negatives Good points: Fantastic visuals, breath taking views of the landscape. Missions in dungeons are thrilling Lots of replayability Well written out lore Feels almost like a sim rpg Bad points: Stale dialogue missions can get boring overtime Rather glitchy
AJ_Ayer;-;Very good game. Enjoy it a lot. Best game ever, I don't think I'll play another game ever again. 4/10.
Tred;-;If you like roleplay fantasy games, this is your game!!!
Juice-;-;UNLIMITED QUEST ! EPIC GAME !!
CocaineBear;-;Best Singleplayer Game (with mods) ive ever played in my life. :3
Jack;-;A great game, so many different combat styles and things to do you can play it for days on end and never get bored. Shot a chicken, town filled of elderly women stabbed me to death 10/10
Ya boi Franku;-;I don't know how to put it in words but this is one of the best games I've ever played. And with the mods you can do just about whatever the  you want.
Fally;-;One of the most beautiful, immersive and epic games of all time. In fact, it's THE most. There are no contenders. It almost feels like a waste of time recommending Skyrim, because anyone with a machine capable of playing it is likely to have done so already. Some of the mods are also well worth installing if your setup can run them, including retextures, graphics extenders and more detailed character creation. Goodbye real world, Tamriel is much more appealing!
Spage;-;Four characters and 570 hours later...what am I doing with my life?
uncle ramba pirate king;-;all i did was punch one cow and everyone wants to kill me? like come on cows are not as cool as me right? right? 420/10
()Maaya();-;skyrim belongs to the nords!
Sgt_Prof;-;If you've played previous Elder Scrolls games, glitches and oddities don't come as a surprise. Nevertheless, Skyrim feature tighter combat, fewer bugs, improved graphics and so on. If there is anything to complain about in this game, it would be the user interface, inventory taking up A LOT of useless items, SOME bad acting, as you level up, the creatures you fight take FOREVER to kill by hitting them 30-40 times, and finally its replayability value. Creating characters is nice (even though it takes a very long time to get what you want done). Finding and completing quests is solid. I said all I disliked. The game succeeds in comparison to Elder Scrolls IV, and I am addicted to this game like a... person... playing games! Replayability value is hard to get back to though if you leave the game for a month or more. Anyways, great work on the game, this is more than I expected it to be with little to no struggle to get "used to". Postives: +Tons of content +Fun combat +Huge open world to explore +Modding tools +Deep character creation tools +A lot of side missions and long/endless gameplay +A lot of ways to improve graphics Negatives: Bug-free Horrible voice acting Poor character animations Overall: 9/10
Sparawk07;-;This game is so excellent that I don't even feel worthy enough to review it. Suffice it to say that "the bar" in terms of Role Playing Games is just a plaything for Bethesda Game Studios. They can put it wherever they want and it will stay there until they come back for it again. Nobody else will even come close.
TyGetic;-;a very entertaining and addictive game
Philosleon;-;Personally the best action/adventure RPG game I've ever played. You can play the game over and over and over again, and you still wont get bored of it because there is simply too many choices too make, too much quests to finish in a large variety of ways. 10/10
Arcani|Wolf;-;9/10 I Love this game, and everything that goes on in it. I Bought it for my PS3 when I lived in an apartment, I also own it on PC (obviously). Can't say I regret ever having bought this game. Everything is worth checking out. The DLC is amazing, and brings new things that help improve the game even more. I would advise checking out mods. This game has replayability and definitely a chance to get your moneys worth from it. I still have a hard time believing I invested 1,300 some odd hours of my life into this game. Aside from that, some negatives is probably the fact it is older, and may not meet new standards of graphics for some people who are all about pretty pictures, but if that is not a problem for you, as it isn't for me at all, you will love this game.
Tweak;-;it cool
Ace;-;This is probably the best game I have ever played. It is made by Bethesda so already you know its gonna be good but the detail and depth of the game is just staggering. There is so much too this game and you could spend 100s of hours on it and still find amazing hidden quests wherever you go. If this isnt enough for you, there are hundreds of mods to give you extra missions and the modders have put alot of time into them. I find that the vanilla graphics of this game are pretty awful but there are many many mods that are simple to install and will combine to give you an amazing experience. Overall this game is definitely worth your money and thanks to the help of modders who can improve graphics every year, I am sure that it will last for a very long time if not indefinitely and I would recommend it to anyone who has a decent PC and alot of free time. 10/10.
darthpaxis314;-;I mainly played this on my Xbox 360 and I loved it then and I love it even more on the PC. Modding Skyrim is some of the most fun I have had gaming in awhile. I never found myself at a al loss of what to do while playing Skyrim, The combat, while not the high point of the game, really set the tone for the game itself. Skyrim is about the atmosphere and what you are feeling as you play it. I can count about a dozen times when I would just stare at the sky in the game at night. The story is phenomenal as well and this is a great buy for anyone wanting a Epic Fantasy done right.
Lynnford;-;its Skyrim... do you really need a recommendation???
Strajder;-;Skyrim, the game which rocked the world. The unforgettable, Max-von-Sydow-narrated, Jeremy-Soule-music-powered trailer that radiates awe. An open-world experience of leading a virtual life of "high adventure" in a fantasy world. I admit, this was the first Elder Scrolls game that I played. Somehow, all of the other games eluded me, and I first seriously considered Skyrim watching it played by the popular StarCraft II caster Day[9] . This game (as I later found out) continues the Elder Scrolls formula, which was evolved through several incarnations: Arena, Daggerfall, Morrowind, Oblivion. Perhaps its main defining characteristic is that instead of the experience system common for most RPGs, your skill levels determine your character leveling, and skill levels are raised by using them. If you want to be a mage, you will use your spells and level up, if you want to be a warrior, you will pick up your favorite type of weapon and swing it, pick up a shield and block. If you want to be a stealth character, you will sneak. Simple and intuitive. Quests are as non-linear as possible. What this means is that you are most of the time not forced to do them, or follow a specific order when completing them. Besides several larger questlines, there are many small, unrelated "radiant" quests, which help flesh out the game and provide an even greater variety to already exciting core questlines. There is a small caveat though. The dark side of Elder Scrolls games are the bugs. They happen to be something of a tradition with Bethesda games, and are even considered a fun factor. Many bugs were solved through various patches and expansions though, and there are unofficial patches which are available through modding sites, such as Skyrim Nexus [www.nexusmods.com] . Speaking of which, another major aspect of Skyrim are mods. From different armor and weapons, to textures and shaders and user interface, this game has inspired many people to write dozens of mods since its release. Browsing through a plethora of available mods on some mod site alone could take you hours. Not that you will mind, though! Skyrim is, without any doubt, one of the greatest RPGs and one of the greatest games made. Pick it up on a Steam sale and play it. You will completely lose track of time, and you will love it.
Rawtuna;-;This is my one my favorite games. With modding you play forver. Woul highly recommend
Sickologist;-;a beautiful and emmersive game, but crippling bugs and accidential ( yes, accidental) exploits make it infuriating.
Peeble;-;As someone who had never played a TES game before, this was a very fun experience. I had never given RPGs a chance until this game. It sucks you in and the modding scene just adds so much more to it.
sherrill.keith;-;This is one of the best games ever created!
lordstryker15;-;Best game ever. Unfortunately my wife thinks so too, This means I get to play whenever she isn't around. Still worth it!
Lord Nerevar;-;Great game. It really lets you do whatever you want, including killing dragons and stuff.
heroward;-;I originally played this game on a Playstation 3 console right after its release due to my pc not being able to handle it. After putting up with numerous bugs/glitches I shelved the game completely. Bought it to start playing again on pc and its so much better. Helps that I am a fan of games of this genre. Need to finish this title, but so far, its amazing. A must play for anyone.
HackerManiac;-;Best Elder Scrolls game in the series. And the whole series is really good!
Earl of Sandwich;-;TESV Skyrim is the best open world RPG in gaming to date. The amount of freedom and openness is stunning, and the game is truly stunning if you have a graphics card capable of handling it. The mod community for this game is among the most active thorughout gaming, in spite of Skyrim's age. Mods are constantly being released and updated, allowing for nearly endless replayability. The main storyline is very good, but the sheer amount of dungeons and side quest will almost always attract your attention. You will likely spend hours traversing the wilds while dungeon crawling and hunting for loot. V Very few of the side quests feel like fetch quests. Each side quest has a uniqeness and fun all on its own. In addition to the main story and side missions, there are several unique factions that demand your services, each with its own fully fleshed storyline, characters, and perks. In conclusion, the world, errr Skyrim is your oyster filled to the brim with hundreds of hours of story, loot, and fun.
Mrbigmak;-;This game is fantastic.
Meeseeks' Ghost;-;It's like Oblivion, only with beliveable characters, and a good story, and fun gameplay, and unique locations to explore, and reasonable system requirements, and all those other things they forgot to put into Oblivion because they were too busy masturbating over shaders and poorly optimized textures. So it's like Oblivion only good.
@FlatchestedMaid;-;Feel like being an adventurer? Feel like killin' some dragons? Feel like being the most bad- looking negro hero ever? Now you can with The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim.
Micbran;-;Great game. Very good. Such wow.
xChocolateCowx;-;Best. Game. Ever. I purchased this on my xbox, I just recently purchased this on PC. Hands down best game. How can you dislike such a massivly beautiful game?! This game does have those tiny glitches but you wont know know them unless you look them up and they arent obvious glitches either, if thats what you're worried about. This game is worth the money! Ive played many games throughout my life and i've got to say when this came out, i wasnt too intrested in it until I actualy took my time to play it. And now that I have... NO REGRETS :D!! Took my life.
Geralt of Nipia;-;It's nip twistin
chosen01uk2002;-;Love it, can play play play, then leave it and come back again and again. love the mods you can get.
darthpaxis314;-;I mainly played this on my Xbox 360 and I loved it then and I love it even more on the PC. Modding Skyrim is some of the most fun I have had gaming in awhile. I never found myself at a al loss of what to do while playing Skyrim, The combat, while not the high point of the game, really set the tone for the game itself. Skyrim is about the atmosphere and what you are feeling as you play it. I can count about a dozen times when I would just stare at the sky in the game at night. The story is phenomenal as well and this is a great buy for anyone wanting a Epic Fantasy done right.
Lynnford;-;its Skyrim... do you really need a recommendation???
Strajder;-;Skyrim, the game which rocked the world. The unforgettable, Max-von-Sydow-narrated, Jeremy-Soule-music-powered trailer that radiates awe. An open-world experience of leading a virtual life of "high adventure" in a fantasy world. I admit, this was the first Elder Scrolls game that I played. Somehow, all of the other games eluded me, and I first seriously considered Skyrim watching it played by the popular StarCraft II caster Day[9] . This game (as I later found out) continues the Elder Scrolls formula, which was evolved through several incarnations: Arena, Daggerfall, Morrowind, Oblivion. Perhaps its main defining characteristic is that instead of the experience system common for most RPGs, your skill levels determine your character leveling, and skill levels are raised by using them. If you want to be a mage, you will use your spells and level up, if you want to be a warrior, you will pick up your favorite type of weapon and swing it, pick up a shield and block. If you want to be a stealth character, you will sneak. Simple and intuitive. Quests are as non-linear as possible. What this means is that you are most of the time not forced to do them, or follow a specific order when completing them. Besides several larger questlines, there are many small, unrelated "radiant" quests, which help flesh out the game and provide an even greater variety to already exciting core questlines. There is a small caveat though. The dark side of Elder Scrolls games are the bugs. They happen to be something of a tradition with Bethesda games, and are even considered a fun factor. Many bugs were solved through various patches and expansions though, and there are unofficial patches which are available through modding sites, such as Skyrim Nexus [www.nexusmods.com] . Speaking of which, another major aspect of Skyrim are mods. From different armor and weapons, to textures and shaders and user interface, this game has inspired many people to write dozens of mods since its release. Browsing through a plethora of available mods on some mod site alone could take you hours. Not that you will mind, though! Skyrim is, without any doubt, one of the greatest RPGs and one of the greatest games made. Pick it up on a Steam sale and play it. You will completely lose track of time, and you will love it.
agb015;-;As someone who has grown up with Elder Scrolls from Morrowind on the xbox and Oblivion being my reason to buy a Xbox 360, Skyrim did not disappoint. Skyrim improves on almost everything that Oblivion brought to the table even if some mehanics are dumbed down. The environments are absolutely gorgeous with huge open landscapes to explore. The dungeons are all unique and have their own charms to all of them. There are many cities and villages to explore with different stories and adventures to discover in each one. Just walking between towns feels like an epic adventure. Skyrim is the best open world RPG to date in my opinion. With the steam work shop you can add mods that makes the game even better which makes it worth it if you already have the game on the consoles like I do. The difficulty can be adjusted at anytime for all types of players from hardened RPG players to people new to games in general. This is a game for everyone (except children of course). My only real complaint is the story doesnt feel as epic and important as the last Elder Scrolls games. The dragons seem intimidating but they are no real threat to you or the people of Skyrim even though they constantly tell you how dangerous dragons are. After beating the main story of Oblivion you felt like a true hero and even got a staue built for you. In skyrim they pretty much treat you the same way if you hadnt saved the world, thats right no staue at the end sorry for spoilers :P. But overall its great experience. 9.5/10 A must Buy
ratdog45;-;Three words: Buy. This. Game. Great plot, great characters, great gameplay, and the game is HUGE.
HalflifeA52;-;Simply epic
vixann;-;A Game that never ends,
readyplayer;-;The best RPG ever made YOU BETTER BUY THIS OR DIE!!!!!!!!!!!
Angerwhale;-;This game provides so many hours of gameplay that it is ridiculous. It definitely has a great replay value, you can decide what kind of character you want to be.
Poy Poy;-;The vanilla game is enjoyable, but I cannot recommend it, as it is nothing compared to the game where you employ mods. For those out there that either fear or detest the lore-breaking aspect of mods, I'm not asking you to download a school uniform or a XXXXXL bust size for your character. I'm asking you to look at the effort put in by the community of modders who strive to make the game a more enjoyable experience for all, like SkyUI or Falskaar.
tri-force;-;If you dont have this game. You porobibly have a girlfriend or somthing. yuck
FUSRODAH;-;it's my game *-*
theREALdeanW;-;OUTSTANDDDDING GAME! endless fun with steam workshop
2fat2carry;-;It worth to play n good way to explore fantacy world.....
Moon Moon;-;Do you not already own this?!?! How have you been surviving. Sure you got food, water, and shelter, but THIS, this is a real neccessity. It is an open world ready with secrets to discover and adventures to travel on. Fighting dragons is but a part of your quest to be the best warrior in Skyrim. But only if you want to of course. Being a thief, or assassin is just as amazing for portraying your incredible stealth, unless you plan to be the Archmage of limitless magical powers! Casting fire and lightning on your quest to kill the high king of the land! There is always combinations if you prefer spreading your bard-like knowledge. So go on! Fulfill your quest, and become a true DRAGONBORN!!!!
GatorChow;-;This game is great, but has it's drawbacks. It feels more like an adventure game than an RPG, it's more about doing than filling out level sheets. Which I must say I prefer. I found it tedious in Oblivion to allocate skills into things I ended up not using because I didn't know the plot of the game the first time. It didn't feel like I was playing a game, it felt like homework. Skyrim is simplier, but it's streamlined nature is what makes it so enjoyable to play. I feel like I'm going on an adventure, and getting stronger using skills that come natural to me. The characters look pretty, and the open world is really quite astounding. I found myself simply looking at the scenery, knowing that someone had to envision it. It is probably one of my favorite games, but I don't like to compare it to the other Elder Scrolls games, because it breaks the mold with a new leveling system.
[rorupan];-;A whole world, full of beautiful friendly people with their broken knees. And dragons, lots of dragons!
space guy;-;This game is very good. I highly reccomend the mod "s of Skyrim". It adds some much needed length to your playthrough.
Sean Douglas;-;One of the best games I have ever played.
The Rice King, Servant of Allah;-;This game is totaly worth the money. Gameplay and graphics may not be it's strongest areas but besides that the game is truly one of the best I have played in a lond time. Huge openworld landscape with lots to do and see. All three expancions are great extending the epic adventure that the game has to offer. Plus the game's modding community is one of the richest that I have seen, with thousands of great and new mods comming out daily, from adding new and exiting weapons and races to making an extreme inprovement on both graphics and gameplay. Skyrim is gaurintieed to give you an exiting taste of the TES adventure and give you hours upon hours of an exiting and novel experience. Since the last game skyrim has made tremendous inprovements. In skyrim the UI has been tremendously improved with smarter sorting, new options and overall better looks. Players can now gain a veriaty of new blessings and powers and not to mention, shouts! Shouts are the main new aspect of the game allowing players to absorb the souls of dragons and use their powers against them. One other new inprovement is the dual weild option allowing for players to equip weapons/magic in to the left, right, or both hands making for new and dynamic combat stragities. The game's graphic atmosphere is much more "rugged and dirty" where as Oblivion's was almost cartoonish. Although the new engine is a disapointment it still works fine giving us great graphics that can compare to many modern games. The modding community also brings high resolution texturepacks and encredible HD lighting and shader mods called ENBs. The story, as always, focuses on a prisioner who becomes an emportant person in tamrielic history. In this installment of the TES franchise your charater escpes exicution when the dragon god Aulduin attacks. Later you find out that you are the dragonborn of legend and are destined to save tamriel from the wrath of the dragons. By defeating Aulduin and restoring the peace of skyrim the player will have a great expericnce with this exiting game.
Mr Lord Mr;-;Refusing to stop, the Elder Scrolls franchise's newest entry, Skyrim, goes down kicking till the very end. Admist civil war, the eater of worlds, or 'a bad- dragon' decides to come back to add to the turmoil, and why not? It would seem that the time is ripe for dragons to come and gourge on the souls of our world. However, as luck would have it, there is (as in all fantasies) one person who can stand in the dragons' way. Watch out Keanu Reeves because a new chosen one is in town, get ready to hack, slash, burn, freeze, stun, scare, eat, stab, punch, shoot, throw, shout, claw, jump, and fling your way to victory past racist guards, foolish bards, crappy elves, drunken nords, or legendary monsters of epic proportions. Hoprfully you do not have a girlfriend or 8-5 job, because if you do, you will not have the time to "one-hundred percent" this game. I mean, have you seen the hit short film "Dragonbored"? Some amount of stars that amounts to 5.
Prego Magic;-;Love this game.. So amazing and with the workshop and some of the mods it makes it just a blast to play.
Manny Manny Man;-;One of most addictive game I've ever played. It's simply impossible to get over the quest. You start thinking you are running out of quest, and suddently come across dozen of it ! Lots of thing to do and discover. And with the mod this game become amazing.
Waminator;-;The love of my life
Peter Parker;-;This game is awesome. I can play anytime and the mod provides me lots of more fun.
xeroja;-;Its skyrim it never loses the appeal I love it so much , this is what a real open world game is supposed to be like
Harievilozanini;-;It runs through my veins! :D
Becoming_I;-;There's nothing more visualy enchanting and gameplay challenging than this epic Elder Scrolls installment. Roam through the endless land of Skyrim , participate in quests , take sides , conquer kingdoms , betray and betrayed but most of all be the one that fullfils the prophecy. Be the Dragonborn!!! The Lengendary edition is a must have , because it brings all the enhancements and the extra content that this title needed to be one of the most rewarding and challenging RPGs i've ever experienced
Dean Side of the Moon;-;Absolutely stunning game. Fantastic graphics. It's not every game that you can say "I just got arrested for stealing an old woman's sweet roll."
GameExpert;-;i recommend this game because its an interesting game its a well known famous game everyone seems to love this game so much i played it for 2 years or more.
Kiang;-;I drink to my youth, to the weeks come and gone, For my hours of Skyrim are just about done. I fought off the Stormcloaks, ran Imperials through - As an Arch-Mage and werewolf and Guildmaster, too. Long live Ulfric! Or kill him or whatever. I've fought the war twice and not one side is better. I'm the hero of Skyrim; everyone's in my debt - But if I kill a chicken, they'll all want me dead. Now it's Alduin time, and I'm finally prepared, My friends have all left me, but I simply don't care. (10/10, would rhyme again)
EbonHawk;-;OH what a game!!! So many choices, so many things to do. Follow the quest, run off on sidequests, or just wander aimlessly to your heart's content... It's all in there. Focus on magic, be the best mage you can be: favor destroying stuff, become a Destructionist mage and burn, freeze, zap everything in your way. Like to protect yourself, specialize in the Alteration school. There are other schools as well; something for everyone. Or, just do a little bit of everything. Doesn't matter, you can tailor your playthrough to the way you want to play it. Fancy yourself a sneaky type? Focus on stealth, put everything in powerful daggers and level up backstabbing, and nothing will stand in your way. Want to snipe enemies from the shadows? Just start putting experience into bows and enchanting and take down targets' health, stamina, or magicka level from a distance so that one or two hits from your dagger or sword will make short work of them. Find or craft you a soul-trapping weapon and you can gather an infinite supply of souls to recharge your magical bows or melee weapons to keep doing massive amounts of damage. Burly warrior or wily agile fighter... you pick. The sky's the limit as you can basically do anything or be anything you want to be. Spend hours, days, months even, just exploring. Make a career out of hunting wild animals and gathering their pelts to sell for money so you can afford your own place, so you can even get married and adopt some kids. Just wander, if you want, as there are thousands of places (towns, villages, lone cottages, caves, mines, and mills) to enjoy, interact with, take on a job just about any place. I don't see how this game could get any better or do it better so that you can enjoy playing it your way... Oh wait, there are literally thousands of mods that do just that: from hundreds of new weapons, armor types, loot, potions, poisons, capes...it's just endless. And then there are all the mods for improving the low-quality objects found in the vanilla game, texture enhancements, gameplay enhancements, crafting overhauls, hundreds of new followers, creature types... it's just incredible what you can do. I don't see how anyone could NOT like this game. It's phenomenal.
Admastvia;-;Having played over 200 hours of this B-E-A-UTIFUL game, I can safely say it is one THE BEST games I have ever played.
Huni;-;10/10 I have no social life since I play this game.
DrwHem;-;If you're not playing Skyrim what is wrong with you?
Rhiakath Flanders;-;Don't play this game!!!!! It will ruin your social + sex life! You will walk around the streets hoping you could just get your double daggers out, and stab away, and build stuff, and.. and... Just... Don't... When you start thinking "ehhh, ok, let me just complete one more side quest", then you're completely lost to the world...
Khormid;-;November 11, 2011 was a great day, because Bethesda graced us with one of the greatest games every created. Skyrim is the 5th installment of The Elder Scrolls series; and oh boy does it ever take it to the next level. What does Skyrim have you may ask? In depth character development, player housing, kill-able NPCs, anything that isn't nailed to the wall or ground can be stolen, tons of weapons and magic spells, play as a werewolf or vampire, hundreds of quests, an enormous world, and oh yeah DRAGONS! Skyrim is an RPG that has a great main story with tons of side quests that either have nothing to do with the main story arc or have everything to do with it. I couldn't stop playing the game as every corner, every road or just over that mountain had something new to do or experience. And the experiences were increased exponentially with the environmental detail and sound that made you feel like you were in the world itself. Do you want to be a heavy armor wearing archer, a dual wielding wizard, a vampire, or maybe you just want to be an assassin; your choices of character combinations are extensive. Each aspect of your character has a skill tree and actions like merely sneaking around will improve it's skill and unlock a skill point with each passing level that can be used to specialize that ability even more. And after you spend time specializing your character, you have to move on to customizing their gear. Skyrim is a must own for RPG lovers, gamers who enjoy open worlds and if you love DRAGONS; how do you not already have this game? + Beautiful Visuals + Great sounds and music + Detailed and engrossing stories + Great combat + Open world and very customizable character progression - Can be overwhelming for people new to the series - Some glitches during combat (Very Minimal) Score: 10 out of 10
Chiefox;-;This game is probably one of the BEST moddable game i have ever played. There are so many, many things you can do and you can be anything you want to be on skyrim. It has almost never-ending quests and a big place to exploring around. This game is for the true adventure lovers. I would totally recommend you to buy this game! 2 Thumb up! SKYRIM 4 LIFE!
MalibuStacy;-;A MUST HAVE! So many possibilities and endless quests! I rly love the game even tho it's the buggiest i've ever played! Looking foward to Elder Scrolls Online!
Viinturuth;-;Housecarls, Greybeards, Dragons, Oh My!
Scoots;-;One of my all time favourite games. When i first played this i was stunned by the beauty of the icy mountains, rolling forests, lush greenlands, and flowing rivers. Then learning that i was a character unique to the world but had served great importance for many years before as a symbol of Tamriel's Empire was the next best thing. Story is good, looks amazing, and the adventures are once in a lifetime experiences. 9.5/10. A definitely purchase!
prna;-;It's pretty good if u like dragons, if u don't like i recommend wolrd of warcroft
Lactose the Intolerant;-;Shot a dwarf in the face with an arrow. He shouted at me. 10/10
Stormhawk777;-;THIS GAME IS SO BONERS RIGHT NOW!!
Vibe;-;"Mod It: Until It Crashes."
Fjara;-;So, Gabe... are you going to sell some real life now? i could use one... but after this "LAST" dragon!
Say_My_Name;-;Best RPG game of this generation, setting the standards for every RPG game made.
Spirit;-;Brilliant game. Amazing and gorgeous with mods. Always something to do game of its time.
ArmyMan0070;-;This game is great. There is so much to do and so much to explore. I have put quite a bit of hours into this game and I know that there is always something new around the corner....and Dragons. 10/10
Professor Pyg;-;Most Addicting game ever! I have played older games like Oblivion and Morrowind but I think Skyrim is better than them Morrowind: Best Storyline Oblivion: Best Gameplay Skyrim: Best Graphics
monkeypus;-;Got to live out my fantasy of being a lizard 11/10
sinnFeiN;-;Perfect! The most epic world of last gen... And one of the best RPG-worlds ever made... not for people with little time!
dreadfallen85;-;Decapitated a Dark Elf with a child's Wooden Sword. 11/10 would murder with a toy again.
Condroma;-;Promised myself i would be a warrior with zero sneak kills... well... maybe next playtrough... or maybe the next... or the next... thieves guild here i go again.
WingedArc;-;It's like Skyrim but with Skyrim
WASTEDWAR;-;horas y horas de arrows in the knee
Loneliz;-;mod it untill you get 59 fps, then uninstall all of the mods
Yung Hots;-;Love the game, fun storyline! :D
It's Adventure Time;-;Absoluteley outstanding!
CJChristi;-;So I have owned this a while but finally have taken the time to sink into it (nothing like waiting a few years right) and let me say, I am loving it. I think it does have some hit or miss marks in the skills as opposed to class/ex[erience rpg system but I do love this game. Buy it, buy it all!!!
Bender B. Rodriguez;-;If you need a review to tell you to get this game, this is it. I started on xbox then moved to PC. Skyrim is, well, too much awesome to put in words. It is a masterpiece on its own, and one continually in the making. The reason I say it is continually, is the modding community. The modding community has added so much replay value to an already amazing game. For example, the Unofficial Skyrim patch is a community effort to make all of the official Skyrim and DLC bug-free, and it has fixed tens of thousands of things. Not to mention all the mod choices out there. You can have ones that change gameplay, add spells, armour, weapons, houses, add entirely new stories and quest lines, make the game 4x the quality of the HD DLC, or help you run it on an older machine. There are simply too many to mention here, but if you are looking for something, chances are there is already a mod out there for it. As for DLC, they are all excellent. I recommend them all, but I especially have a love for Dawnguard. Probably because it was the first I owned.
Samuel Hartley;-;Fus Ro Da! This is the best game i have ever played! Thousands of times better than any large scale MMORPG such as World of Warcraft...The only thing this game is missing is a multiplayer system and this game is a perfect unbeatable one! Hopefully when The Elder Scrolls Online comes out...My hopes will come true...
Vino [Olive Garden];-;A great game, but you don't need Vino to tell you that. Come on, dude. What are you doing reading my review of Skyrim? Go out and do something with your life. Or play Skyrim. That's what I'm doing.
vzr;-;It was worth all the money, I love what this game offers. Each mission contains a mystery, surprise and a perfect history from my point of view.I like how thieves get out of the bushes and try to steal your money,you won't see it,might scare sometimes and a lot more to love abouth this game,I write here, but it would mean a lot to read.You would not find a game like this for a while.Show if you like RPG,try Skyrim best of his kind.
DillJuice;-;I just have three litlle words about this game " Buy this game" thats really all I have to say about the game
MadZec;-;Okkkk cant believe that I didnt alredy made recomend to play for Skyrim... I mean it is darn Elder Scrolls game.... IF you like RPG and IF you like felling to have shivers down your back when you get dragon down, game gives you total freedom to do what you wanna do... and to approach quests way you like (you can convince a fella to stop stealing from the girl, or you can kill him... orrr you can kill the girl and rob her of all her gold) choice is yours.. question is which choice you will make???
Twiggz!;-;Provides hours of fun! Great game alone or with workshop mods!
General Rubenski;-;Do I really have to give a review? You know what it is...ing Amazing! 10/10
Razzle Dazz1e;-;I've dropped more time into this game than almost my entire steam library. So much fun!
Dr. Licori;-;===Edited as of January 2nd, 2015=== It's not as good as Morrowind or Oblivion if we start talking about storytelling and immersion, but Skyrim is a hell of a game, and it won Game of The Year back in 2011 for an obvious reason: It's great, and I know it really is, when after 230 hours of game I still dicovering new places and things about it. Even now in 2015, if you ask me if you should buy it, I would say yes without thinking twice, it's a must-play along with the rest of The Elder Scrolls series, and just like any other Bethesda game, when you start heavilly modding it, it'll become another game, and then another game, and then another game again, and in the end it'll be like you have bought a pack with at least 5 games, and not just one.
Nahx;-;since paid mods cancelled i change my review to positive
Zbrojny120;-;Paid mods have been removed, hail TES.
Blue Pebble;-;Skyrim... Need I say more? Well yes, kinda. It is the best RPG made in my opinion and set the standards for all other RPGs. Should you buy this game? Yes. Should you buy the DLCs? Not for $19.99. Wait until they're on sale and then buy them. In the meantime download Falskaar/Wyrmstooth if you get bored.
Arherumor;-;The Elder ScrollsV: Skyrim is the BEST game ever made. Buy it, even if you do not have money, BUY IT and you'll be happy! Btw it'll steal your life
Chia;-;You cant describe this game you need to play it. I have more then 200 hours and i still play it!
Bread;-;Adventure Euphoria. Explore where you want, when you want. Customize your character however you want. Awesome environments and landscapes. A Must Play. Pros: Open World Exploration. Crisp 1st person medieval combat Create your own fighting style and improve abilities through usage. Massive amount of non-linear content to explore. Tremendously large modding community. Lots of excellent expansions. Fantastic Soundtrack. The bread looks delicious. Extremely dedicated mod community Cons: The default inventory system is kind of a mess, but mods can fix this if that sort of thing bothers you. On rare occasion you'll run into a bug, like mammoth's falling from the sky and such.
Burn;-;Well, needless to say that Skyrim is one of the best games around. Statistically it's the most played singleplayer game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=438761906 http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=437323008
Lenry;-;Skyrim My most played game ever, played with only one character, yes these hundreds of hours were played with the same Nord. Pretty addictive gameplay, immerse graphics, beautiful music and most importantly: unique, unmatched atmosphere. You really feel, see, smell those mountains, the snowfall, the cold, the whole world. I spent many hours just wandering, travelling, and never got bored. If you like inexhaustible sandbox games, and have LOTS of free time to enjoy it, then this is your game.
Avaruusmurkku;-;Played about 150 hours on PS3 before buying legendary from steam. Still have not grown tired or touched the DLC content. A superior game. Also, mods greatly increase the lifetime.
Firefox;-;This game is amazing! Even if it came out in 2011, it is one of the best games I have ever played.
[PnG] {PHC} Captain Jack Sparrow;-;This game is super good if you like/love RPG's or the other Elder Scrolls games. On its own, it has hours of content. With the dlc, it has even more hours. With mods, it has an infinite amount of time.
RedPanda74;-;Amazing game! Whole lot to do, you will never get done with this game! Amazing graphics and gameplay. Mods are awesome too! 10/10
Tommy Wiseau;-;I role play as a butter with porn mods.
thehumanslayer12;-;Love this game! I stopped playing it though because of my PC's Graphic Card(ITS CRAP!). Just get the game and slay the dragon!
DoobieKeebler;-;If you need to pay for mods, skip it. Without mods it's just blah.
miticludus;-;boring. oblivion is muck better. all the mission are the same: talk kill repeat
Arthurz;-;A lengendary story, starts from an arrow in my knee, ends with death of a chicken ....... You can steal a man till naked 10/10
Fort_Oink;-;If This game was a potato it would be a good potato.
Swag-7;-;Spent 100 hours playing it on a PS3. Just completed the main storyline on PC spending 75 hours, and ready to spend another 750 hours. Once you start playing it, there is no turning back. 11.3/10
Scooterook;-;Everyone should at least try one of the Elder Scrolls games. :]
Nicholas D Wolfwood;-;I waited to play through this game and get both DLCs prior to writing a review. The graphics hold up today, with mods added. If not still very beautiful and emmersive. A+ The story of multiple different quests had me enthralled from start to finish. Though you have to find the quests that you specifically enjoy. (Examples) I came across a Walking Dog that led me to it's talking deity that then ended in me deciding the dogs fate. I joined a legion to defeat Vampires, and then betrayed them. By becoming a Vampire helping the Lord of Vampires himself. I became the "Guardian" of Solitude before joining a rebellion to overthrow them. I walked across a ice lake in a different dimmension, that then led me to have to fight two dragons. I summoned a dragon to aid me fight, and it led to one of the most enjoyable scene of a realtime battle mechanic I have ever seen. I usually fade in fantasy style video games, but the immersive possibilities allowed me to still want more. Over a hundred of hours of quest experience, and can have more added with mods. Different race aspects, and many different styles of combat you may play. This is a must have for any form of "Gamer". As well as something a casual should ATLEAST give a try. One of the best purchases I have made, and I will be continuing to come back to this game to this day.
Winterfinding;-;One of the most in-depth, visually stunning fantasy RPGs I have ever played. If you love fantasy RPGs like I do, you can't go wrong with this game.
ScaV;-;If you have a console and think about getting this game on console...don't.The game on the console is the alpha version of the game,the game on pc is where it's all at. You have a ton of mods to chose from and your game will look 10 times better than it does on console...or it will looke like a completely new game,with changed climate,landscapes and whatever you want to do to the game.
Gvaz;-;It's good but most of the mods are terrible garbage. Too much garbage loot in these games too
Prickly;-;its good
Heaser;-;It's awesome! 10/10 will kill all of tamriel again.
Arjuna;-;It's a genuine open-world sandbox with breathtaking visuals and endless encounters. It's a simple yet fluid combat system that leaves fighting both balanced and challenging. It's a bottomless pit of lore through dialogue, interaction, and honest-to-God in-game short stories that brings a new meaning to "total immersion." It's a variety of options to remind you that the first two letters in RPG stand for "Role-Playing." It's using your voice to shout a dragon out of the sky, then stabbing it in the face with an enchanted sword you personally crafted. It's the Elder Scrolls. It's Skyrim. And now it's 5 dollars. It's waiting for you.
Thuggies eat chicken nuggies;-;Bethesda is the driving force behind the monetized steam workshop that is going to be the final nail in the coffin of PC modding, do not support a company that wants to strangle their player base for every ent they can.
JakeFromStateFarm;-;Killed a chicken whole ing village flips  and stabs me to death; 11/10 IGN WOULD DANK AGAIN!
Go watch firefly again.;-;Play this game. You've seen the hype. Now give in. There's a reason skyrim content still routinely makes the reddit frontpage: TENS OF THOUSANDS OF PEOPLE STILL PLAY THIS and think it's good. You want example, boy? You can place buckets on people's heads.
Keegan;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a colossal and immersive world of exciting possibilities, interesting places, captivating adventures and emotionally fragile Scandinavians.
KAMAKAZI LIZARD;-;Chicken blew me up 10/10
Mm;-;Paid mods? "The future is so bright i don't need my eyes too see it"
blvke;-;-tier game until my folder becomes 500+gbs then it's worth it, 5/10
AnklesTheSpeedrunner;-;i watch furry stuff on website i get virus i download mod with bestiality i no get virus 10/10 use protection
Robin [Hertig];-;FIrst game to introduce DLC contents and steal from content creators. I would not recommenc this game.
Balrog9;-;Due to steams practices of selling mods other than creating a button for donating i must give this a negative review in protest.
XIX The Sun;-;Paid mods. Wow. Just wow. Who in the world thought that was a good idea. Add a donate option as apposed to selling the mod and taking all the profit. The only reason I bought this game on the computer is so that I could mod the living crap out of it. Shame on you Valve and Bethesda.
Specter214;-;Avoid like the plague, this is now a DLC simulator hiding behind the mask of a way to help content creators when they barely get any of the profit.
ToxicHyperspace;-;Less content than either Morrowind or Oblivion. You used to be able to increase content with mods, but now they've nickled and dimed that away.
WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you keep on doing it. 10/10
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
Typhlo;-;"oh look a new dlc for Skyrim! oh wait, wtf is that?" -Me about the paid mods
lara.mik7137;-;I love skyrim because it is the best RPG up to date but I will not support the new pay to mod pratice. I won't be part of the group destroying the gaming community would you be part of it?
Chroma;-;I rly love this game its so amazing in different ways and even more fun with the mods made by the skyrim community. Well that was the past, now the developers want to make money by made mods that you must pay for it. Seriously guys this is ******* *t why the hell someone want to pay for a game that they already bought thats for a single player only game. And they get 75% for every buying, thats not even fair trade jeez. Gj guys you ruined the modding community.
|LZ| Caleb;-;Really? Turning free mods - free since every TES game - into a corporate cashgrab? If it was a donate function, there would be zero issues because the creators deserve it. But buyable mods? And only 25% of the cash goes to the pocket of the creator? And in STEAM CASH? :D Incredible.
Rollie;-;Mods now behind a paywall.
DeepDarkFantasy;-;Support workshop creators or support your greediness?
Milo-;-;Skyrim will go down in history books as "That game that killed modding despite it being the only thing keeping it afloat". RIP PC gaming, you had a good run.
XenoSenpai;-;After playing many MANY hours of this game, I come to find out that they are charged for paid mods, the LIFEBLOOD of the game was free modding. I took this game off my favorites and uninstalled it, it's a damn shame. Donate button should have been given instead of what they have today. They had a great community like a week ago, now they split it in two just like that.
Sir Ryuma;-;paid mods now, huh. what a disgrace
The Letter Z;-;Bethesda and Valve are most likely testing this new mod pay system so they can implement it into Fallout 4 with little resistance. Ask yourself why they would do this with a game that has been out for so long, because by the time Fallout 4 comes out they assume the internet will have moved onto the next big thing to complain about. They now have a system in place where they can continue to make money off of the modding community while not investing any extra work or money. Valve and Bethesda share equal responsibility for this cash grab of greed. If Valve and Bethesda wanted to make sure the modders were able to ask for money a simple donation would work, but with that system Valve and Bethesda are unable to take a cut of the profits. This also leads to support, if I buy a product I expect a certain a mount of compatibility/support what guarantees does Valve and Bethesda give me? Is there a review process for the mods to insure compatibility? What about future updates/patches/DLC that could render mods useless. Does Bethesda or Valve guaranteed those will always work in the future? Lastly, I'd like to a quote and reply from Gabe Newell's QA on Reddit yesterday: - Originally posted by GabeNewellBellevue : "Actually money is how the community steers work." - Originally posted by one_long_year : "Funny, the community successfully steered modding work in Elder Scrolls for about ten f***ng years with nothing but goodwill and thanks, before you guys got involved." Quick review of the game - Pretty boring without mods and customization, too easy, and not much variety in spells and fighting.
Tobiascus;-;mods behind a paywall. Didnt think valve would go the way of EA..sad day
Aquos;-;paying for mods just ruined this game for me.
Winterwolf;-;Paid mods ruined this game for me.
Bob;-;Downvoting because of paid for mods - Bethesda is trying to make money off other peoples hard work! I recommend nobody support companies who try to profit from this!
UnKn0wn;-;This game was great it still is But now since mods are for "sale" it has become very annoying and I would not recommend this for the mods unless they become free.
Overseer108;-;With mods, 10/10, without mods 8,5/10, with payed mods 0/10.
Snarf;-;Sets a horrible precident for terrible paywalls.
R';-;Paid mods is going to be the new gaming culture cancer, and it was all started here.
Kameron;-;Putting community content behind a paywall and treating modders like slaves isn't how you treat your community. I've loved valve for years, but this is . Get ed, gabe. Fix this.
MrZestyFresh;-;Nope
Nocturnal;-;Paid mods - It sold its soul.
Kujo;-;They release an unfinished game and expect mods to fix the problems. But now they are even charging for Mods! you have to buy the game and 3rd party DLC just to make the game playable.
furean;-;Bethesda, I am disappoint.
Hyyy;-;T i t s <3
Darkness;-;Was a great game, but then paid mods came out. Nuff said
mcfly;-;I used to mod games like you, but then I took a paywall to the knee.
Sergio Wan-Kenobi;-;Was a solid 5 before the paid mods, but now Valve's greed has hidden a lot of quality content for this mediocre game behind a paywall. I cannot recommend this game because without mods, it's a mediocre borefest. Don't buy it.
aaginskiy;-;Skyrim is a pretty good game concept, but requires a lot of mods to both fix issues and improve game play. Now that Steam is actively putting mods behind paywall, I really cannot recommend this game anymore.
KissyKissyBangBang;-;mods that aren't free
Mykiio;-;Was a great game, singlehandedly ruined with the introduction of legally questionable paywalls for fan-made mods. Many modders have pulled their works from public as others began to steal them to turn a profit on steam, and most of the money made from it goes to Bethesda/Steam rather than the creator themselves. A shameless and blatant display of greed that is beginning to tear apart the modding community and pushing away people who genuinely liked and wanted to make this game more fun.
SpyroCoolLP;-;Simply put: http://web.archive.org/web/20150426143713/http://www.reddit.com/r/skyrimmods/comments/33qcaj/the_experiment_has_failed_my_exit_from_the/
BlackHawkXS;-;Paid mods and stuff?
ZAPcon;-;I'm just here for the mob mentality.
samferber3;-;the game was okay a few years ago and is kept interesting with mods... to bad those are not free anymore.
Envy the Jealous;-;1. It is changing a system that has been working fine. Modders aren't an oppressed class working without benefit. Modders choose to work on mods for many reasons: fun, practice, boredom, the joy of creating something. And gamers appreciate their contributions. While, some gamers may feel entitled most understand that if a modder is unable to continue the mod may be abandoned. Donations may or may not help but they are an option. This system has for years made PC gaming what it is. Modding in my opinion is the primary benefit of PC gaming over console. Changing a functional system is dangerous and could have unintended consequences. 2. Now that people are paying for mods they will feel entitled for these mods to continue working. If a free mod breaks and isn't supported that is fine because there is no obligation for it to continue working. If someone pays though they will expect the mod to be updated and continue working as the base game is updated. Furthermore, abandoned but popular mods are often revived by other people; if these mods are paid then the original creator may not want people to profit off of updated versions of their mod. 3. Related to the above paid mods may reduce cooperative modding. Many mods will borrow elements from other mods; usually with permission. Having paid mods will complicate things. Someone who makes a paid mod will be unlikely to share his/her work with others. What if someone freely share's his/her mod and someone incorporates it into a paid mod? Does the first mod's owner deserve compensation, does the second modder deserve the full revenue. This makes modding more politically complicated and may reduce cooperation. 4. This may reduce mods based off of copyrighted works. There is a very good chance that any paid mod based off of a copyrighted work will be shutdown. Modders could still release free mods of this nature but it complicates the issue. Many mods based on copyrighted materials borrow (usually with permission) from other mods to add improvements. If these other mods are paid then the original creators likely won't let them use it. Additional many modders may now ignore copyrighted mods in order to make mods that they may profit on. 5. Steam/the developer are taking an unfairly large portion of the profit. Steam and the Developers are offering nothing new to the situation. Steam is already hosting the mods and the developer already made the game. They now wish to take 75% of all profit from the mod. If the market gets flooded by low-quality paid mods, the modders will likely make very little and the quality of the game will not be increased. However, Steam and the Developers will make money off of no work on there part. Until all mods are free again I will no longer support either company. Please reconsider.
rohallmd;-;Having to pay for mods will ruin the community that made this game so great and unique.
Ilyushin;-;It will be a cold day in oblivion before I pay for a mod..
silkielemon;-;P4m - terrible idea, ruined what Skyrim had going for it - mods.
DaJeroen;-;Negative until paid mods are gone. Ridiculous that Bethesda agreed to this.
Cipisek;-;A must have game for all open world RPG fans, fantasy fans and even for your girlfriends. They can decorate houses, adopt kids n' stuff (WARNING: Hearthfire (3,3 - 4,99) and a girlfriend (???) is needed). All the quest lines were different, original and not repetitive. Sure you will face some minor glitches and bugs but there are no big deal at all and they shloud not affect your gameplay experience. "M'aiq is tired now. You go bother somebody else" PS: The people of Skyrim are more open-minded about certain things than people in other places which means SAME-SEX MARRIAGE IS POSSIBLE in Skyrim!
Somberlain;-;The entire game is based around the idea that you are special. Everything is very easy, to the point where you could mindlessly aim at a creature, click your mouse buttons, and win the game. You are powerful in a world that is made for you, and can't really challenge you. If you change the difficulty slider, you are basically making the game unplayable as creatures will take forever to kill, but kill you in short order. This does not make it interesting, it is boring. The world feels empty, and does not offer much at all. As a huge fan of Morrowind, for me this game is a huge disappointment. Because this game is such a disappointment, I tried using over 100 mods to fix the many problems I have with it. The fact that other players made mods to fix these problems proves that I am not alone in feeling that this game is inadequate. I appreciate all the hard work modders put into this game, but Bethesda and Valve do not deserve to be paid for someone else's hobby.
Twombly;-;Very exciting game once you start off, but unfortuately you realise the simplicity and lack of depth as you play more and more. Combat is hack and slash, many quests are cloned 'fetch' or 'complete this dungeon' quests, and dungeons lack true diversity because there are so many. Paraphrasing TotalBiscuit, the game is the size of an ocean with the depth of a paddling pool. It is a shame because the game has potential. Mods can definitely improve your experience if you're willing to experiment but it can take time to compile a list and install them for your perfect experience. I've been wanting to do this for a while. Although my review appears negative, Skyrim will provide you with many hours of enjoyment before it gets repetitive even without mods, so I do recommend it.
frostycakes;-;Stock Skyrim: 7/10 Modded Skyrim: 11/10 Paid Modded Skyrim: 0/10 Won't be buying another Bethesda game any time soon.
Smashhacker;-;This is . Why do I have to pay for mods just to use them? Why do I have to pay a dollar just to try out a poorly made sword skin? What if the mod looks like crap or is poorly made and crashes the game? How would I get my money back? If it is there to support modders, then why does Valve get 75% of the cut while the modders get 25%? Wouldn't a donation button work better? Valve and Bethesda are just a bunch of greedy s.
Mantis;-;I like skyrim, but getting in on this mod fiasco by downvoting since there's not really a better way to punish this whole paid mods thing.
Kill Joy;-;Down voting cause of the paid mod support. Would gladly change to positive review if no such thing was involved.
Backflip;-;Ive been playing Skyrim since i first got it back on November 11th, 2011 for the Playstation 3. I immediately fell in love with it and when i got it on PC (although i havent played it a lot) I loved modding as ive done with Fallout and other games in the past, mods just made the game better, but if theres one thing to say, SAY NO TO PAID MODS.
Lab Rat;-;Half- game that needs mods (sole saving grace) in order to be playable, thats to begin with. And now, if you want those mods, you will have to pay for them?
NightlyDark;-;I'm just here to dislike a great game because everyone else is doing it.
vaporware-wolf;-;got on my horse, merged with my follower, shot up into the sky, fell back down, and died. three seperate times.
WiddlySkuds;-;Don't support this cancerous game developer.
DeltaVii;-;Don't support Bethesda until they remove paid mods. Skyrim is a great game, and the modding community has let it live this long. Hundreds of hours of content has been made by mods, but it goes against modding to put them past a paywall.
Pathos;-;Shame on Bethesda for trying to greed the  out of the modding community. Shame on Valve for agreeing to this . Modders fixed your broken game, now you try and give them 25% of their efforts. Profiting from your own bloody laziness, and in doing so ruin the entire ecosystem that PC gaming was built on. I hope this bites both companies in the .
CrimsonTear;-;Looks like valve found their new cash crop, by taking the hard work from the vibrant modding community that has flourished for nearly 4 years without "outside" intervention, and then decide it's their right to make money off of it! Putting mods behind a paywall is the worst choice this company has made, and reflects poorly on bethesda for allowing it to be done to their game. Let's see what their grubby little hands can get a hold of next.
Ninjew;-;PAID MOTHER ING MODS Game is Amazing Would Buy
Tora;-;Paid mods where the modders get 25% yay!
Equilibriant;-;This game was great when I could afford to mod it, I don't think I'm going to go back and play it again with 300 mods at 99p+ each though :D
Mr.Happy;-;Congrats on the master strategy of destroying the modding community so you can sell your 30 tons of DLC that you'll have planned the next game Go fu-ck yourself. both Zenimax and Valve
OGMudbone;-;I love this game. However paid mods ruined it. screw you valve/bethesda, i thought you were better than this.
tessellated.;-;For the cause.
iDestroy;-;Payed modding? I don't think so....
Waclaw83;-;This game was almost a masterpiece when it came out - a vast world full of quests, places to see, people worth talking to. It was a beautiful stone, a true gem which was a bit rough around the edges but people enjoyed it. And then came the mods. They polished all that needed polishing, made a game that was so great to many as to be called a true masterpiece. Up to this day, there are always more than 30.000 people playing it almost constantly (74k when I'm writing this) and it's not just because the game is great - it's because the mods made this game close to perfect. Change whatever you want, however you want and share it with fellow gamers. This is what gave the game a 93% approval rating from gamers across Steam platform. That's how it used to be... Now? We see a peculiar system where mods get a "pay what you want" price tag, and you don't really know what you're paying for since you can download those paid mods AFTER you buy it. We are already getting mods that say they are a "work in progress" and "more content will be done when it's ready", one mod taken down for using content made by another modder without the approval (even though the borrower of content says he was told from Steam people it's ok as he's using free content...), and this is just the start of what we'll get in the near future. We are seeing the modding communities already being shattered because of how absurd this "paid mods" idea is. Mods are becoming nothing more than DLCs, only made by external subcontractors instead of the developer, and the latter taking zero responsibility of the end products. The industry will surely benefit from this, maybe some modders as well, but we gamers will loose in the long run. Is Skyrim a bad game because of this? No - it's a great game (8/10 for vanilla, 10/10 with my favorite mods), and will remain such regardless of what will happen. This negative review is to show my disapproval for the above mentioned practices, and those were introduced by no other than Bethesda (series owner) and Valve (Steam owner). And unlike what other people who write negative reviews because of this claim, mine will remain negative regardless of what happens to the "paid mods" idea. As a boundary marker, as we have crossed one and it seems there will be no turning back. To sum it up: Skyrim - 8/10 Skyrim modded to one's liking - 10/10 Paid mods de facto DLC - a fat 0/10
Rebite;-;The game is actually pretty bad. It gets a good with mods but those are going to cost money. Would not recommend. 6/10
Jeazus;-;This game is made legendary by mods. It's not Bethesda who should be profiting from them.
Demotico;-;I was willing to spend 400 hours playing this game, and willing to spend 400 more hours just to explore the diverse, and beautiful world of skyrim!
Master Dragon Rider;-;I love this game so much the graphics are really good i played and completed the story about 10 times and it was still fun because you can be a mage or a warrior or a assassin and a archer or whatever you want. I was a mage at first i was a mage who was really good at healing so i let lydia do all the work next i played as a battlemage i used a steel sword and fire and then i was a archer then a assassin then my fav a warrior just going in and killing people like it was nothing they were like don't kill me and i was like nope and about 5 mins later there was a camp of bandits with no heads and it's just really fun. The dragon battles are fun but i wish they where more common i have only met about 6 dragons in the wild the dragon shouts are amazing fus ro dah and you could send someone off a cliff so i would give this game a 9/10
bisoN;-;Paid mods, just add a ing donate button to the mod maker. Why would bethesda get ing 75% either?? way too much
Slushee99;-;would love if my pc could run this without PAINFUL lag great game though ten outta ten except for ing payed mods, thats just horse
dog;-;Pay for mods isn't really inline with the how I feel 3rd party gaming mods should be distributed.
I bet ya like white bread;-;Paying for mods is .
Tediak;-;Shame on Valve and Bethesda
Lebron's Forehead;-;Gaben why hast thou forsaken me
Diamond David;-;Microtransactions that cost more than a AAA game are a terrible choice and consumers will never be receptive to this. Producers of content in mods should implement a donation button at their own page, or they can not charge at all.
thorgod8;-;Paid mods are BS.
Argie86;-;Paid mods =  move.
Birdperson;-;wow pay to play
Flyingv;-;Something about money and reddit
Asdkmoga;-;Used to be really cool because of its modding community. But thats gone now.
Cboxhero;-;Paid mods and only 25% of the money goes to the 'developers' (a lot of these are stolen). Screw that noise.
Chippendale;-;Paid mods are not mods. They're DLC.
AnselmBlackheart;-;ZeniMax, I am dissapoint. You shoulda known this was gonan go bad, and that Valve was feeding you honeyed words.
NinjaKnight2015;-;Why cnt i play it! i hav e it in my libary! i got it for free before!
Enjoi_Sense;-;buys game for 5 bucks for game, pays 20 on mod. 10/10 ps. really gabe, really?
Greenbird;-;No paid mods.
danwass;-;Paid Mods will be the downfall of this game and the gaming community. Do not stand for this nonsense!
Siper;-;Game is pretty bad without the mods, which are free of course.. except on steam and steam takes 75% of the sales. They also have to meet a minimum number of sales or they keep 100%.
GrandpaNugget;-;Best game ever made cant wait for online
L4dynem;-;It was great until they added paid mods to fix their own problems.
Capt'n Topslayer;-;Letting steam and Bethesda charge 75% on what should be modder's money, is beyond ridiculous. Modders deserve money for their mods but what's the point when so much is being taken by valve and Bethesda? Boycott this.
Vehk;-;Don't buy this. A dumbed down game driven by extremely questionable business ethics. Even without the controversy, Morrowind is the better Elder Scrolls game in just about every way, but Bethesda and Valve have dug the grave deeper with their greed. If you want a modern fantasy RPG, buy Dragon Age: Inquisition or The Witcher 3, and preferably not through Steam.
Valient Thor;-;I disagree with paid mods, some of the mods cost more than the game itself... Plus the quality of the mods are lacking.
Gibby;-;NOT PAYING FOR THIRD PARTY DLC.Thanks But No Thanks.
Kupa99;-;add a donation option for the mods
faustable;-;Donations would be fine, but just plain charging for mod's is just bad business!
Fred (30-50 fps);-;fanstic game 5 out of 5
teck72;-;Macho man randy savage dragons. what else do you need?
XxREDxZON3xX;-;An amazing game to have and I cannot wait to see what the next Elder Scrolls will be like for the next the GEN Consoles! One game will be for the record books once more!
=ENG= Razuul;-;Thank you steam for letting me buy both DLC's this morning, before the sale. Really nice of you to help me spend more money. Thanks alot...
[TeW]Scan tewclan.co.uk 18+;-;The finest game i have ever played.
East_Coast_Col;-;Of all the games I play.. this is the one that always has a cozy fire and a hot cup of steaming chocolate ready to welcome me back. It's the game that welcomes me with a big friendly smile and open arms. Even when I keep playing away it says, 'come on home' and gives me a nice warm hug. It must surely be the best game of all time. I don't know if I will ever finish it - but then, I don't really want to. I have it both on PS3 and here on PC. I have restarted it several times playing different characters. It has not dated at all, in no small part due to a large modding community, many HD updates and a friendly community. There must be more mods for this game than there are devious politicians. If you don't already own it you need to correct the error of your ways immediately or expect to be disciplined! You know who you are and you know you want it. Should you get the legendary edition? Look into my eyes, what do you think. Just say "Yes Miss"
Scars Windblade;-;You want to build a house, and never live in it. Make that Three of them!! THen buy this game!! But there's more! You'll find that every city you visit throws a house at you!!! And all you end up doing is becoming a horder!! Release your inner klepto and stash it in one of the many houses you own, and never use it again! Want to eat twenty 10 pound cheese wheels with no ill effects at once... THEN DO It my friends. This is the game for you! For you will get sucked into the world of wonder where you can do so much you wished in your life. Sleep standing?! Posh! WHO needs sleep!! You can run for weeks, and never tire!! You can become a Werewolf or Vampire... Once you destroy the Sun you never have to worry about the pesky burning feeling. FISHING!!!!!!!!!! ITs all in this game. Including that NAGGING WIFU YOU WANTED!!!!!!!!!!!! DRAGONNNNNNNNNNNSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Granny Gumjobs;-;This game is amazing. It contains tons of lore and unique questlines. Also, got killed by a mudcrab. 10/10.
Albojones77;-;INCREDIBLE, but I felt that some of the main questlines could have been better, but WHO PLAYS TES GAMES FOR MAIN QUESTLINES!
walspeed92;-;I havent showered in months. 12/10
Obama's Left Nut;-;Its like a first person Zelda that decided to be emo. 9.5/10 Stars.
Mr. LobaLoba;-;The Best ..
The Doctor;-;This game i amazing. but sometimes when things popup while im in game,it freezes the game but other than that its fin
Grandok;-;Amazing game worth money spent and even more!
Very Bulgy Muscle Man;-;Okay I can tell you that if you have played Oblivion you would have most likely gone for this game aswell if you liked it or if you are not sure or want to know what they changed here's what has changed, the oblivion main quest was absoultely brilliant and this one...well it is not as good but there more features and some new creatures at the cost of old ones and there are some satisfying killmoves in the game that make you feel more like you just killed them - you destroyed them! However some of the quests in this are quite bland and far to rewarding for the task E.g spoke to a guy in a bar and started a quest for him to deliver a message or something and the person he wanted it sent to was sat right next to him - no joke - and I got 250 gold for it, in Oblivion you would have to slay a  entire town full of imperial guards (oblivion version) to get that kind of money so half of the time in Oblivion I would become right criminal scum and would try pickpocketing, search barrels for anything to sell and would be over the moon finding 1 gold coin because cave raiding was certain doom for low levels and people of bad equipment in skyrim finding a gold coin is like finding a free potato, you may not need it but will still take it and add to the forgotten pile. What they did right: - made it easier to level up in skyrim (you could only level up on certain skills you picked on oblivion if your alchemy went up but was only a minor skill, well tough  you are staying level 12) - Guards are much easier to defeat (in Oblivion if you stole a potato and didn't have money or want to go to jail then be prepared to be hunted down relentlessly and cut down like the criminal scum they come across daily, also they won't randomly dart at you from a field in the middle of nowhere and question you about it) - fighting things are easier (oblivion had some really tough battles in them and at least once you would have to run away from a fight and would die at least several times if not then you are a god at Oblivion and I salute you) - civil war, choose a side and fight to the death ( gotta love getting revenge on those imperial guards if you played oblivion) - the graphics are really good ( and better with some mods) What was wrong? - The main quest is just quite bad to other titles in TES (in Oblivion you were protecting the cities from huge gates and hellish creatures and retaking cities from the evil with the town guard which feels like an achievement on its own) - There isn't as good factions or faction quests (oblivion had some really good faction quests especially with the dark brotherhood not gonna spoil but things keep flipping and so much drama happens there was also the fighters guild and mages guild and there was an arcane college but you had to get recommendations from all the guild halls in all the cities to get in which made it feel so much more challenging than just casting a spell to the woman outside.) all-in-all this game is great I have fun using a bow and other inventory I would suggest getting legendary editon for more quests and armors Etc. at the end of the day this is my opinion of the game and I find it great to play and have so much freedom to do what I want in it but try it for yourself.
Infen Zenex;-;Good lord, the sheer amount of things to do is enough to make one's head spin. This game rightfully deserves to be heavily played years after its original release. I know I'm not breaking any new ground by speaking highly of it, but I've certainly gotten my money's worth and then some.
E Thug;-;This is a Keeper this game has given me hours if not Days of fun and keeps giveing more and more
=KingDadongo=;-;Rating: Tubular, Dude! This game summs up all together a game that I would most like to play. It's got the lush landscapes ranging from Snowy ice caps to heated boggs, It's got the emmense gameplay that keeps you hanging on wanting to see more, and it even has the traditional Elder scrolls lag after you've downloaded too many CBBE mods. I simply love this game, and can't wait to see what else Bethesda can crap all over us to make money. Although, I'd rather play Super Mario brothers 2.
Viking Batman;-;Ive spent 300 hour sin this game on Xbox and maybe 100 on pc, its still Worth my money today. If you like to kill dragons and Explore the big world of skyrim then this is the game for you
Stonebones;-;I will never recommend this game while there are paid mods in the Steam Workshop.
Lyn;-;While I understand trying to help modders (and yourselves) to get money out of things that (some) work very hard on. There is no way I can support going from mods being free for a very long time too putting them behind a paywall.
Cat Loaf;-;How to play Skyrim - Immersive Edition: -Install game -Spend 7 days downloading and installing mods (8K textures are essential) -Load Game, if possible -Take Screenshot -CTD -Try again in 6 months
divsky;-;I can't support this game as long as Bethesda works with Valve with their pay-for-mod system which will destroy the modding community.
So Hot Right Now;-;How to ruin your public image 101
n0thing^G;-;Valve Really paid mods? come on get a grip of yourself
Venture;-;This is the game that ruined modding for everyone.
Squeaky Wheel;-;paying for mods is dumb as hell
WhitePrism;-;Ok so id like to point out that this game is amazing, the storyline, the quests (and sidequests), the land available even without any dlc will have you hooked for hours. Then the dlc come which are exceedingly good and worth every penny.... Then it comes to the bad... Mods (Well paid mods) the mods themselves are amazing, getting chased by the trololol troll while riding flutter from my little pony is something that never gets old. However paying 5 for a mod on a 7 game is an absolute joke, there are many other ways around this which im not allowed to Nexus *ahem* talk about. If you dont own this, get it, but do not for the love of god pay for any mods, the devs have always done ths out of the kindness of their heart and have always said you can donate to them. Great game 10/10 would take an arrow to the kneww for. whereas screw paid mods.
Guinness;-;Remove paid mods and the game is perfect, until then I cannot support this game.
Qu1n;-;Hitting the dislike for Bethesda's attitude toward the Modding community. They have been perfectly comfortable letting modders fix hundreds of still present bugs, Improve their graphics and textures and let them develop new content. That was fine, but now they are planning to steal this to improve their own bottom line. Its Immoral.
Vinchenzo;-;Forcing payment for mods.
d.thompson12315;-;if only mods were free :(
Harpuajim;-;Same as everyone else. Make it a donate option and call it a day.
Polishmafia;-;*Insert mad about selling mods rant*
Pieh;-;Skyrim is an excellent RPG capable of suck many hours from your life. It tells numerous engaging stories and delivers an immersive experience in the frozen nothern lands of Skyrim. If you've played other Elder Scrolls titles you have a decent idea of what to expect, if not you're likely going to be pleasantly suprised. The Steam Workshop mod support for this game open up a contanstly growing database of new, east to install content. Well worth the money.
Metal Gera;-;Negative review in support of the removal of the paid mods system.
{SuN} BitBananna;-;One of the deepest RPG experiences ever and does the Elder Scrolls franchise justice, The story is creative and unique and excellent. combat isn't as deep as games like Witcher 2 however its easy combat system allows for the game to be accessible to all. The modding community & scene within the game is amazing, if you are looking for a way to change the dynamic of the game or just a aesthetic change there will most likely be a mod for it, weapons, armor, quests its all there. the Graphics are still quite good especially with the HD texture pack and combined with a ENB the game looks glorious. its a MUST BUY.
Brood;-;Great game. Loved it for years. Community holds it together with mods. And then Steam gets a little too greedy and wants to charge money for previously free, player made mods...
Arepa;-;I love this game and have spent more time modding the game than actually playing it but paid mods are a big no for the whole PC community due to mods being more like personal projects in which thousand of hours have been spent individually for each mod just for the sake of improving the game and adding more content where you can spend extra hours (or your whole life) into, because the immersion is where this game excels at, and traditionally, mods have been released exclusively for free and of course, many modders deserve to be compensated for their hard work but Valve executed a really bad plan just to address this unnecessary issue where putting a donation button could have been a simpler solution. The game itself is good even without mods but i do not endorse the monetization of mods by any means nor does anyone else on the whole community.
SXPredator;-;Greedy little pigs
JawlessBullet;-;Just reviewing to voice my concern regarding paid mods.
Whoritiquisha Giv2meNetflixpls;-;Even though I got this game for free, the person who bought gave their money to creedy corporations. At least you're not thinking of making an Elder Scrolls X: Modern Combat 2
Scrooge McDuck;-;It is very sad to see a good game being ruined by the greed of corporations. Valve and Bethesda are now charging money for mods with the mod creator getting only 25% of the cut. This goes against the very nature of mods and can cause alot of issues. Many of the modders may stop supporting the paid mods, and players will be left with a paid digital paperweight. There is also the issue of people stealing mods from other sources and claiming that its theirs in order to earn easy money. We all know that money sours relationships, and it only took Valve a couple of days to destroy Skyrim's modding community. Many of the mods were removed, and many modders have packed their bags and left the Skyrim modding community. The tightly knit modding community has been reduced by people with the lust for money and it may never recover. Imagine if mods are paid back when Valve was still a small fry. Dota 2, CS:GO, and Team Fortress 2 would have never taken off to what it is today. Valve would simply be another small fry that could be crushed easily by big companies. The modding community gave life to Valve, and they can also take life away from Valve. With that, I have lost all respect for Valve and GabeN. Even EA couldn't come up with this idea of paid mods first *clap* *clap*.
Doctor Death;-;......._ ......./\ ....../..N.\ ...../O\ .....|||||||||| .....|P| .....|A| .....|I.| .....|D| .....|||||||||| .....|M| .....|O| .....|D| ._-"|S|"-_.......................... ].... ] |=========|...\/............. ..../#####\...........................Il]...Il] ...."""""""""........../ \........................ Down with paid mods! Fire off the missiles! Send in the armies! Bob will save us from tyranny! Copy and paste for WAR !
ItsJustJordan;-;Great game, extremely questionable profit building schemes!
Rawrski;-;Paid community mods were a pretty terrible idea, can't run the game without paying. Don't recommend to anyone especially with little replayability and how  it's becoming.
MetalMetroid;-;With the mod community in decline I would not reccomend this game
niaiserie;-;I highly recommend this RPG.
Saint_of_Eden123;-;Fantastic game with awesome mods, the only problem is they're trying to make people pay for those mods. Don't fix something that's not broken. Keep mods free.
OrkGold;-;Crappy game that only was "good" because of the modding community, Bethesda even screwed that up. RIP. 0/10. Valve wants your money and so does Bethsda, don't give them it.
drewjmorris1;-;Congradulations on ruining such a great game and community! I do not nor will I ever recommend this game or platform to others as long as this paid modding scheme is in effect. It's disgusting you try to profit off of others work. Remove the paid mods. Thank you and have a pleasant day.
JuiceboxHero;-;Bethesda has a great track record for releasing buggy games. Just take a look into the artwork page to see. Heck within the first 5 minutes, you could have carts flying halfway across the screen. To fix this, you'll need mods. Oh yeah, for 4 years now, they've been free, until Valve and Bethesda decided to get greedy. Yeah, that changed it all. So those essential mods you'd want to "fix" your game and make it awesome. Guess what, you're paying for unsupported DLC now. So, not able to recommend this game now.
bennits;-;Down with paid Mods
Tyanpu;-;Let's see you buy a positive review mod, Bethesda.
Ambition;-;Pays mods, still get arrowed in the knee 0/10
I'm Indubitability Jesh;-;Gabe Jewell pls
MCJeeba;-;Too much Horse Armor.
audi4444player;-;Screw the greedy s at valve and bethesda, I support creators, not those who hold out their hands and expect a cut of other peoples work.
BasedGod;-;Feed the hate! Paid Modding = DLC. Paid modding =/= community/workshop
Nak Be Nimble;-;Paid mods are awful. Pretty much kills the game.
Aurekta;-;Well it used to be a good game. Back before the modding community was introduced to the concept of greed rather than being allowed to freely collaborate without the fear of retribution from DMCA claims. Now they can't use the shield of Fair Use Doctrine.
Jiraiya;-;Gaben is trying to monetize something that should be free. Screw you Gaben
MiddaPhofidda;-;Decent game, too bad you have to pay for the mods.
Aviator A-via;-;I implore everybody not to buy this game in its current state. Valve and Bethesda have come together in order to dime and nickel us for every mod they can squeeze by convincing modders that it's a good idea to sell their games in the Steam Workshop, all while claiming 75% of their profits, leaving modders with the measily remains of 25%. Do NOT support these practices, as they ultimately lead to lazy developers relying on modders to fix their game, a fragmented modding community (thus less mods) and no guarantee of proper future support for said mods. If you truly want to support modders and believe they should be paid thusly, ask them what methods you can use in order to donate money to them directly. Support modding, but for the love of all that is logical, do NOT support THIS.
Forretress, The Bagworm Pokemon;-;Mods make this game great, and to some playable. Steam/ Valve would be nothing without mods. Nearly all of their games are based off mods. If they want to impede this proccess than they're only hurting themselves.
UnquietEmu;-;Great, now you can buy completly broken mods for this game. I want whoever is profiting from the mods to provide me with support on anything I download.
Komrade Dakel;-;Since Bethesda decided to charge for mods, I literally cannot afford to play it now.
JonJon;-;Very fun, best game ever without mods. With mods... can't even fathom. However devout worship of gabe has been crushed due to his beliefe in paying for mods. Gabe... why?
Shallow;-;Adding microtransactions to a four-year-old singleplayer game? Boo.
Liekki;-;Game itself is good if you disregard the limitations of the engine with the lack of graphical options that are easily accessable from within the game. I cannot, however, recommend this game anymore due to the recent move towards monetization of mods which are pretty much what keeps Skyrim playable after so many years. The fact that Valve and Bethesda take 75% of the cut is not acceptable so I would advice for everyone who would like to contribute towards a modder to donate via different means.
whowhatwhenwatch;-;what do we say about the game with massive amounts of free mods going to paid mods? not to day ers.
HaTeMe;-;I don't think Valve or Bethesda really realized it, but somehow they thought paid mods would be a good idea. I don't really know why they even thought that, because both companies would never be where they are now without mods, the entire TES series since Morrowind was so good BECAUSE of mods! Especially with Oblivion the base game got a lot worse than it was before and I never would recommended them without it's modding capabilities either. Valve should also know it better, most Valve games are all based on certain user created mods and it's questionable if Steam would have been in this position without them as well. The whole thing isn't supporting mod authors either, first of all there is a 75% cut off so the guys making the mods would only see 25% of that money. But the main thing WHY this is bad is because mods always were a thing FROM the community FOR the community! People put their heart and soul into those mods just to make their beloved game better WITHOUT any thoughts about profit and how to maximize that. Now it's just a question how to get the most money out of people with as less work as possible, there is literally no quality control here and a lot of the paid mods have shown to be bad already while another big portion of the uploaded paid mods are not from the original creators. If Valve really would have cared then they would have given us one or more options to donate to the mod authors via the Workshop, other mod sites already have such a feature and there is no reason why Steam can't have it as well. It's also really sad to see that Gaben himself got a very weird view on the whole topic (as shown on Reddit), he's literally acting like he's the king of the internet and now not understanding why everyone is so angry at him. Now, I can't really go without Steam since most of my games are here, but I can buy them somewhere else in the future if they don't revert this back, and I don't see why I should get any more Bethesda games as well if they keep going this route (and this comes from a person without Origin & UPlay).
Trauma_Zulu;-;This game was great, until Valve and Bethesda's greed overcame their respect for their customers.
OneLife;-;Game is fantastic thanks to the mods...some of them, now, behind a paywall. Not happy.
Bender180;-;A PAYWALL FOR ING MODS?! HAVE YOU FORGOTTEN THAT YOUR MOST POPULAR GAMES WERE GOD DAMNED MODS?! For christs sake why not a optional donation button, Valve?!
Kanayo Moryam;-;xxxmlg xxxcashxxx money sim, spend 13 minutes in a modelling program? boom, illuminati pays 25%, got dat cash flow doe. $$$$.
Duhwald;-;Paying for mods now? No thanks.
ReaperCrew;-;Writing this review just to help downvote Bethesda for attempting to make more money off of its fan base. Gaben the False God.
TheBigD;-;Honestly, Skyrim is a great game, but trying to make money off modders is a horrible idea! The cut is 75% for Valve+Bethesda and the remaining 25% goes to modder - why not vice versa? or atleast 50:50? I understand that Valve would like some money for hosting and such, and Bethesda of course want some cut for making this game and including the Construction Set.
ITS'aME'aMARIO!!!!;-;Paid mods aren't mods anymore. They are DLC-addons. I am really ashamed of Valve for implementing so many atrocious microtransactions throughout their games and games on their distribution service. And even more ashamed of the people who bought them and supported this practice. The thought of what kind of  microtransactions Valve will try to peddle with Half-Life three makes me want to vomit.
pvpv;-;Way to go destroying what made PC gaming the wonder it is. To anyone considering, do not buy this game. In fact, do not buy anything on Steam or from Bethesda right now. These companies has sold us all out.
Raltsh;-;Skyrim will now go down as the game that killed modding.
kamura;-;can't recommend supporting a developer who want to profit off the hard work of the modding comunity
Pivit;-;I do not support their views on paid mods.
Carloss Barbadoss;-;Skyrim "PREPARE TO BUY MODS EDITION" thankfully had a recent update rollback. For now its back to buisness as usual, more or less.
CargoPantsGuy;-;It is over, sons and daughters of Skyrim. The paywall for mods have been lifted. We won. Praise Talos!
WYPIERDALAJ STD CHOLE;-;Super addictive, fun, and worth the price
ImSoAw3some [No Monitor];-;Not sure why I'm writing a review for this game when I could be playing it.
Gandalf Your Lord And Savior;-;Skyrim is a game i would recommend to all players it has amazing graphics a good story and plenty of fun and dangerous quests to play through. The beggining is no different from most Elder Scrolls since once again the story starts with you being in prison or arrested. But past that Skyrim opens you to a new world full of caves,dungeons,cities,camps,and houses all throughout the world. But I also have problems with the game since th PC version is very glitchy. I sometimes take armor off a armor stand and put new armor on it then come back to see the old armor has duplicated replacing the armor I had put on there. You might think oh you now can give that armor to your followers or sell it! But this happens nearly everytime you leave your house and it is very frustrating. The game also glitches on quests causing me to go back to previous game files which is bad and is something that needs to be fixed. But in all Skyrim will always be one of the best games to ever be made. I have never seen any game like it and never will. 9/10
BadAndy;-;I just NAILED two Dragons at the same time in this game. I hate to admit it but the feeling was better than the feeling I get at the end of coitus. If you have a job, you're going to get fired. If you go to school, you're going to get F's. If you have a girl/guy, they're not going to hear from you for about a week. If I had to chose between doing coke or playing this game I would do coke because it seems like the less addicting choice. Best game of the decade by far.
Gunchap Red [T|S|F] MR'R;-;If you're looking for an amazing RPG well then POLICE,POLICE THERE IS A MAD MAN SHOPPING FOR A ROCKET LAUNCHER!But seriously if you don't have this game all i can say is why.The graphic look stunning,the controls work really well,the story is a big upgrade from oblivion and when i say big i mean BIG,And th gameplay is so fun you could sit at your computer for hours,also the game is modable.Enough has been said.
Nascu :D;-;It is SKYRIM why would you not recommend this game! IT GIVES OUT FREE INTERNAL ORGANS!
Honorwolf;-;Murdered a whole family and was fined 240 gold 10/10
^ . ^;-;Best game ever, too many good points about this game that this would go on forever. My favourite game, incredible adventure's. So buckle up your horse and run up mountains (if that exicites you). Buy it, now!!!
AireY;-;I will just say SKYRIM
SAM WOLFSJNGE;-;It's like if sex and Nutella had a child in the form of a video game
Xyos;-;One of those games you will remember and perhaps play 5-10 years after it came out. Skyrim shines by very early on letting you into a vast open world where you can go anywhere. You can pick a direction and go. Along the way you will find all sorts of interesting quests, NPC's, treasure, etc. The game is an RPG where you level up based on the Skills you use. The more skills/talents you use, the more exp you gain. You gain perk points upon leveling up to increase skill trees related to almost anything you can think of in an RPG (Warrior, thief, lockpicking, armor, etc). Combat is a little simple, but still fun. There are vast amounts of weapons to choose from, you can use magic, you can use quick or heavy attacks, you can block, and parry to stun. First and 3rd person cameras are available. I could spend pages describing the different weapons and spells. Its got a great story, good graphics, and almost infinite gameplay. The real magic comes from the modders. There are so many amazing mods out there for this game. From the quality of life changes like SKY-UI, to graphical encancement mods (ENB), to full new areas and quests added you can find almost anything you want. The game is all about the adventure YOU create for yourself. My only negatives to note would be the combat. Its fun, but I just wish it was a little deeper in strategy. I still enjoy it, but if there was one area the game is lacking a little its the combat (just a little bit lacking). A must own game and a MUST MOD game. Just remember use Skyrim nexus and not Steam workshop. Nexus does not censor any content, most big amazing mods are only on the Nexus, and their mod manager is very useful.
SomeCallMeNomad;-;Definitley a breakthrough in RPG's.
muscular poops;-;Like Skyrim with- Oh wait.
Excla;-;I read a book in this game...
blue8751;-;It's ing Good
Cevirhir;-;BEST GAME EVER 5M/10.... soo much to do! if you run out of things.... MODZ. Nuff Said
jim;-;see that mountain? you can awkwardly walk/jump up it at an unreasonably slow pace
Powerd By Bears;-;good game have been playing for a few years now beat the game about 2 times and still havent finished it yet i love this game !
DarkAngel;-;Great game! have it for console too.
DMX;-;you can ride a dragon 69/69 would ride again
<Team Maus> Mcdonalds;-;This isn't just a game, this is life! No really, I do not know of what one could dislike about this game. Whilst it does scream "like me" as a game title, you can't help but love it as much as it wants you too. The storyline in Skyrim is amazingly immersive the first time you play through it. While I played through it I felt a since of Urgency to stop Alduin and save Tamerial from him. The only real downside to this game is that there's not really the ability to be an evil character per example, why not rule beside Alduin instead of killing him? Why not kill the greybeards once you've the ability to or kill all the jarl's and declare yourself King of Skyrim? The lack of options in those specific area's are a downside to it. However there's so much content here that you'd be an idiot not to buy it. This game is to me, the definition of perfection easily the best game I've played through and then it gets even better with mods. Case closed this is a 10 out of 10.
Vexelon;-;If you havent played this game, then i feel sorry for you. This game isn't for everyone but it is a great game. It has a great storyline that made me feel like I never ran out of things to do. You dont have to do the story because it is open world. You can go any where and the map is huge. There are lots of weapons and spells to fight beings and dragons. Oh wait i forgot to say it has FREAKING DRAGONS. If you wonder if this game is worth it, well it is. The graphics look next gen, but the game was made in 2011. That is impressive.
Pig honey;-;Pros: Probably one of the most enjoyable games I've ever played! Graphics 10/10 Gameplay 10/10 Cons: You don't have a real life after you play this game lol
sporks5000;-;As a person with attention deficit disorder, I generally find that ten hours is the best that I can dedicate to a game without getting bored of it. I'm well past that in skyrim and am still enjoying the gameplay.
Kingy;-;I can't stop playing someone please help me...
TheKDub;-;Amazing game, lots to do, if you have never played this game then you have never lived.
BOMBMELTER;-;The complete medieval-era game, with gorgeous features and breath-taking moments
Terminus;-;Although it reeks of the Fallout new vegas game still the best Elder Scrolls yet, I prefer to it ESO! Love the story and it fits in with DF MW and OBLV well.
batmaniac2001;-;it was intense in a good way
(AO7) BBepic;-;This is an epic game!!!!!!!!! Its one of my favorites but not my absolluter favorite. The great thing about is mostley NEVER LAG.
MetalBeak;-;Amazing game. If your computer can handle it, the graphics look AMAZING. I would not recommend playing vanilla, add some mods! Spice it up a bit! The gameplay is good, controls are good, has 1 to 1 headtracking. Hours and hours of fun. If you are reading this and you have completed every quest in Skyrim ever, I congratulate you. If you have just bought Skyrim, I encourage you to finish the main questline at your own pace, not right away. Anways, the game is great, totally worth the money.
The Little Seal;-;This game is Ca-Ray-Zay
Toasted Bread;-;The Best Game For Messing Around
ED13;-;"I AM THE DRAGONBORN WEARING A HAT WITH BADASS HORNS"
Dari the Nimbusi;-;So, I'm not much for reviews but honestly this game needs one written by me. This game was one of the games I really wanted but never laid my own eyes on for awhile then I obtained it for my Xbox as well as my computer. The first time playing it I felt like throwing my computer out of a window because I didn't understand the mechanics. Then I learned to love this game. It has loading screens sure! But they're entertaining to read because they will give you a 3D model to play with and some lore related hints as well as very helpful hints. The main story was interesting but scary, In a good way like you're randomly called to arms as the "Dragonborn" and you have to complete the prophecy of killing one of the strongest enemies tamriel history. And if you're like me then you will shiver the first time playing this. But it's good that it feels so real. Everyone watches movies with someone called at an impossible task and you're like "I wonder what it feels like to be the hero like that?" this is the game to find out what's it's like. Plus them game is beautiful, Insanely beautiful. I play alot of RPGs and I have never encountered one just like this. It's utterly unique. This game will make you raise higher than you have ever been. It will also will lower you lower than you have ever been. You can go from saving tamriel and trusting the greybeards then go to sovngarde to slay the world-eater or You could betray the greybeards and help the old and powerful blades on their conquest to serve the dragonborn. You will either be the hero that obeys the laws, save the innocent and slay the evil or you could be the villian that slays the innocent and serves the evil dremora. Or you could be entirely neutral! Either ways it is YOUR decision on everything. It's entirely your decision on who you want to be. You could be a friendly orc that gives people golden rings or you could be a high elf that burns down villages. You can serve any of the gods that suites you best. Hell, you could even serve a daedric prince! You could be the general of the stormcloaks or the legate of the empire! Then if you want to be an archer so be it! Find yourself a bow and some arrows or you could be a powerful mage! Or maybe a bit of both. The customation is limitless! You don't have to just be a fighter, You can be a smith or a enchanter then again you could be a alchemist. You can have a wife or a husband depending on who YOU want to be. The game never ceases to amaze me. The difficulty never changes the creatures will scale to your level then some will just be hard the rest of the game as well as some monsters like wolves are just there to say "Hi". So keep in mind who you're dealing with. Maybe if you are about to fight something strong do some research. This game will show you what it's like to be the "Chosen one" to save a planet. The DLCs cost much but are certainly worth it. One you will learn what it means to be Dragonborn by fighting the very first dragonborn. Another will let you live life with your family in a house and a child. Then the last one will make you shiver as you fight vampires or become one. Thanks to this game having a workshop you can even expand the world. This game will teach you that life is what you make of it. You can either make lemonade with your lemons or throw them back at the world! You can break the law at your own will be you will learn there will be a punishment. You can help the people of skyrim and feel the greatness of helping someone out the reward will not matter to you just the smile on their face as you give them back their prized whatever it is. Or you can help people just get some coin in your pocket either way it doesn't matter. You can be the best blackmailer or the nicest person alive. You can learn the history of skyrim, heck you can even learn the history of all of tamriel! If you haven't and or don't want to play the previous titles no problem! They have hidden books all over skyrim that tell you the story of Oblivion and earlier titles. If you love a game that isn't too much for you to take in and love a customation at the same time being your own person then this game is for you. If you love slaying dragons with just three words and terrorising villages you will love this game. If you want to save people from the evils of the planet and gain some new friends this will be your standing stone of glory! I heavily recommend this game for any of those people out there that want a new adventure that will change your life!
Nostradumbass;-;It's neato
Mhartuz;-;It's a big open world game, that doesn't feel boring or just filled with randomness. It's a great gaming experience as a whole. It's especially a wonderful game if you're an RPG fan, however it appeals to most audiences. Positive: - A world filled with great places to explore. - Main quests and side quests that feels fun to carry out. - Great combat that challenges your skills. - A fine story and not just a lot of filling boring chitchat. - Fast loading, rendering and saving. Remembers where things are left in the world etc. Negative: - The puzzles are adding to the whole of the game, but they could have been more fun and challenging. - Sometimes the animations are a bit stiff. The characters could have had better facial expressions. - There are still bugs and glitches in the game. - Only singeplayer. There could have been co-op for missions and/or pvp. However not every game necessarily needs MP. My verdict so far: 10/10.
Coykoi;-;When I first entered the world of Skyrim, I was immersed in a fantasy setting where I was quickly thrust into a position of power and entrusted with the responsibility to save the world. This is where the fantasy stops. Similarly to any human suddenly gifted with immesurable power I proceeded disregard the responsibilities of my newfound abilities and proceeded to instead enact horrible deeds on the city's guards and townsfolk. It begins to become painfully clear that Skyrim is not as much of a fantasy game as it is a digital exression of the depravity of humans when given the means to enact their deep and twisted desires. An excellent existential simulator questioning the depth of vileness to which a human soul can delve into, Skyrim poses many deep philosophical points such as tyrrany, racism and the uselessness of having a %based pickpocket system if you have quicksave and quickload and reaching the ultimate conclusion of 'f*ck it, if you kill dragons you must be right'.
Wilson102;-;Skyrim oh glorius skyrim. This game could be my favorite of all time. I must have made 20+ characters playing this game because I was so curios as to the different options to choose from. Going in to it I had no idea the lore or universe of the scrolls franchise but immediatley delved in. The lore is intereting and makes sense. The universe of the game feels somewhat freindly as you step into the open wilds of the tundra but talk to npc's and as you complete quests you begin to notice really how many insane problems Skyrim has. The game invites you to be a strong nordic viking, a stealthy theiving cat, or an expert mage. In all honesty though it encourages you to mix and match and do whatever you want. For example like being an elf who wears heavy armor or a nord who slits throats with dual daggers. It dosent really have many boundraies unlike some of bethesdas other games like fallout which is also one of my favorites despite bugs or flaws. I dont have a counter but I've put a lot of hours into this game(if you look at steam playtime it might be realtivley small because I used to play on 360). There are a number of things you can do like: -Finish the main quest -Get the best weapons and armor through smithing(very tedious) -Complete the companions quest line and other spoilers that I will not say -Complete the mages guild quest line -Complete the theives guild quest line -Complete the dark brotherhood quest line or destroy it by talking to Commander Caius -Choose sides in the great war and complete the quests to restore order for your chosen faction -Investigate the forsworn consipacy -If you have Dawnguard, Dragonborn, or hearthfire dlcs defintley do all you can in them -Do quests for the many daedric lords -Fufill side quests for the trobuled people in skyrim -Get as many Thu'um shouts as you can and kill as many dragons as you can -If you can get mods GET THEM the modding community has very talented people in it -And most inportantly have fun in the world and FusRoDah any guard that says he took an arrow in the knee 10/10
Drasek;-;i do recommend this game
Hawk;-;Huge sandbox game, with awesome storyline and lots of side quests and small puzzles to do. Epic adventure awaits you in this game.
Angry Dog;-;Saw an offensive pornography modification on the Skyrim Nexus and I had to analyse it on its level of sexiness. I was required to enter the angle of penetration and divide it by the cosine of x. I then weighed the apparatus used appropriately, so that the shlongs used were more than apt for deep penetration. I then 3D printed a model of this modification, and use it to compensate for my extreme height and lack of pornography (which I reject to watch - pigfilth the lot of it). To conclude, do not buy this game. It is a pornographic game with a sick twisted community that will only purchase it for the bouncing breasts and buttocks. Highly recommend. -Henry Mellor 2015
Vik;-;Skyrim, without a doubt, is one of the greatest games ever created. It has a lush open world that is ready to explore, every customization option you could crave, robust and intelligent quests, memorable moments and secrets hidden deep within if you are willing to look (DARK BROTHERHOOD). For example, I have clocked 25 hours and am still nowhere near completing the main story or finishing a fraction of the side quests, I would be surprised if I finished this before clocking 100 hours and I wouldn't be surprised if I end up clocking 1000. Worth the money, worth the time. Every person should treat themselves to this experience.
Sam Hyde;-;Ran around, saw a deer, killed the dear. Ran around, saw a wolf, killed the wolf. Ran around, saw a bear, killed the bear Ran around, saw a bandit, killed the bandit. Ran around, found a ruin, found a bunch of drauger, killed the drauger. Ran around, found a dragon, killed the dragon. Ran around, found a chicken, killed the chicken, arrested for killing chicken. Ran around, found a fox, followed the fox, fox led me to a saber tooth cat and it killed me, I now kill foxs. Ran around, found a giant, shot a arrow at the giant thinking I was a boss, giant than hit me and sent me flying like a plane. Ran around, found a dragon skull popping out of the ground, no seriously it was like a dragon plant or something. Ran around, found a Khajit called Kharjo, Kharjo is now my best friend who helps me fight dragon plants. 10/10 would play again
- Phozon;-;Very good game really appreciate ! thx.
Tanglewreck;-;I love this game!!! so endless!! the music, the quests, everything...can spend hours just exploring and go and kill some draugr, deathlords, spiders, etc, so many things you can kill too xD or make friends...For me there was little bugs, so I was really happy about it. I really recommend, if you like to explore and just have fun doing side quests, some are like fetch this fetch that, but on the way you can talk to certain people and get more quests! its fun overall :3 Really recommend this to everyone ^_^bb <3
FlyingKiwi;-;This game is just as great as it was 3 years ago, and with the contribution of the countless mods on the workshop and nexus, it is still way better than alot of recent games. It has an unlimited replay vaule with loads of different play styles, meaning there will be new stuff to find in every playthrough. 10/10 BRING ON ELDER SCROLLS 6!!!
Kai;-;This game is by default, Amazing. I recomend this to all and every gamer because there is no doubt that they will like it.
Nutcracker;-;Recently started playing again, and immediately I was greeted with that old beautiful engine. Added some mods and then it got even better. With the addition of various Immersion mods, it really feels like I am right there in Tamriel. The snow feels cold and the rain wet. Can't wait for the next installment.
Dedphyre;-;Excellent game. Worth every penny spent for the hours of entertainment value gained. Also, happens to be one of the less buggy Bethesda products.
Hello,World!;-;buy and feel the story of the game.
Phantom.Nishoba;-;How does this game keep getting to the top selling games everytime it goes on sale? How is it possible that people don't have this game already?
piketrcechillas;-;The only shortcoming of this game is that everyone, every NPC, has a Zero Tolerance policy: try to pickpocket Ralof and you will regret if you haven't saved earlier. Other than that, this game is perfect. Anyway... children shouldn't come here to avoid nightmares
The Hash-Slinging Slasher;-;I can mod willies flopping around everywhere. Nuff said.
Herrowholes;-;It's okay
Don Lino;-;Definately one of my favorite games in my collection, I have little over 150ish hours in this game just on PC. Yes, I know that this is not a long time, but i have near 1000 in console. If you like open world games where you are pretty much free to do anything you choose, this game is for you!
aunt joemima;-;This game is fun with friends!
Warm Deep Fried Lizard Testicles;-;This is a game that no one has ever heard about, just kidding. Great game, good follow up after oblivion and never gets old. Even if it does get old, theres hundreds of mods
WaR_SPiRiT;-;So much to do, endless hours of replayability with mods.
Sly Serpent;-;This has to be 1 of the best games created, how can it be so addictive ?
AGreyFoxx;-;One of the best modern rpgs. You can really lose yourself in this type of game. Hundreds upon hundreds of hours can be poured into this game. The game is molded to how ever you want to play it. Your skills and weapons are your choice. To reach the maximum flexibility and fun of the game I recommend to pick up the Legendary edition and get modding! You can add quests, new lands, Armour, weapons, creatures, textures and even make yourself a regular joe in skyrim. 10/10
evancanning1;-;Hours of Fun!
GaMerY;-;This is just an amazing game, there is just so much to discover. Just AWESOME :) :D
godofgames;-;Amazing game as always.
MadtownFresh;-;One of the greatestt games of all time
The Raven;-;So damn addictive.. played till 5 am in the morning.. got up at 11:30 and started playing again :D .. Dayum!!
Walter White;-;this game is so much better on pc then it is on ps3 i love it
Lemmy;-;Without a doubt one of the best games I've ever played! It's practically never-ending, and there's always something to do. If you like to play a game for a long period of time, this is definitely the game for you!
Row Row Row;-;I first played this game on xbox 360 and completed the entire game and DLC. I then purchased it on my computer and have had an absolutely wonderful experience on my second play through. I have over 200 hours of game time into modding alone and still havent finished the main quest. The modding community has put the game into the beyond ps4 era if you have the hardware. I have nothing but good remarks and can honestly say this may be my favorite game of all time (Zelda is a close second). If your on the fence with this one, delve into Skyrim because you can make this game better than anything that will come out in the next five years if you have the patience and determination. Don't believe it, check out my screenshots.
$lender_Gh0$t;-;This game is totally BADASS! I loved Oblivion and i love Skyrim too, i definitly recommend this game to all RPG fans... Stay awesome Bethesda!
FedoraBoy;-;Still one of the best RPG's you can get! Got a total playtime of over 600h and still can't get enough of it. Graphic is with the HD Textures and mods amazing. The Mod community is just great and if the normal game bores you, you can always get some amazing mods and the game will be as amazing like when you played it for the first time!
DxIxN8;-;BEST GAME EVER,Lost My Life Becuse of This Game,99999999/5 stars
shaboigin;-;Love it! Havent jumped into all the DLC yet but so far so good.
Bluemoon Wolf;-;I love Skyrim and I will be playing TESO as well. If you ahve not played any of the Elder Scrolls games please give them a try.
lich83;-;Quite a good game in default. Level scaling is not as much obvious as was in Oblivion. For best playthrough, I suggest of using some overhaul mods which makes it perfect
OrangeCreamSodaBT;-;GREAT GAME BUY IT U FILTHY
Jago;-;Even after playing this game so many times it still has not lost any playablilty and this is due to the great work everyone is doing through the workshop.
The Dragon Master;-;Surely a game this massive in scale requires a review of similar proportion. Where do I begin? The graphics? The gameplay? The lore? I'll start at the beginning. First off, this game is nothing like Roller Coaster Tycoon. In fact, Skyrim and RCT are about as far away from each other on the spectrum of gaming as they can be. So if you're looking for a quality theme park building/management simulator (or any theme park building/management simulator), do not look to the Elder Scrolls series. You begin your quest as a lowly prisoner in the back of a wagon. The offense is border hopping, and the punishment is death by axe (sure beats a big ol' wall, huh U.S. government?). On the way to the execution you meet fellow prisoner Roggvir, a key member in a group of rebels called the Stormcloaks, who want to take back Skyrim from the Imperial Legion (the people who are executing you) and put the Nords back in command. When you arrive at the execution...place in Helgen, a guard asks you for your name. Now say what you want about the Imperial Legion, but these people have some patience. I sat there for 45 minutes thinking of a name and rearranging my race, face, and gender to my liking, and they just waited for me to finish. Finally I decided on Jikrel, a magician/juggler inspired by my hero, Penn Jillette. Properly named and pampered, I'm ready to get my head chopped off! Just before the axe comes down, however, a conveniently timed plot device* swoops down and proceeds to burn the city to the ground. It is at this point that the player can decide whether to escape with Roggvir, the handsome rebel with a cause, or someoneelseIforgothisname, a dirty Imperial pig. While the choice doesn't make a difference at this point in the game, it presents the player with the concept of choosing sides in a convoluted, almost entirely pointless side quest involving the great Civil War of Skyrim. Racist rebels or idiotic Imperials? The choice is yours to make (or not). Once you've escaped, you're free to go anywhere in the overworld you desire, do any side quests you want, tackle the main storyline, or just goof around and break the game's A.I. I opted for the latter. Don't get me wrong, there are a lot of things to do in Skyrim, it's just that most of them aren't fun or interesting. I tried to give the main quest a go, but around the seventeenth plot device* and ninth fetch quest or so, I just got sick of it and quit. I had to replace the stock plot device* fighthing music to a pitched-down rendition of Frank Zappa's "No Not Now" just to make it that far. I'm going to be honest here: the most fun I've had playing this game I've had roleplaying a psychopathic serial rap-ist/ene-ma bandit/murderer that slits people's throats, dry humps their still warm corpses and dumps them in the nearest river/crevice/humorous location he can find. What this says about myself, I don't know. But I do know what it says about the game's quests: they're not good. In fact, I found the game's quests were obstructing my overall goal of blindly murdering everything in my path. Ever since Oblivion, Bethesda has felt the need to make certain NPC's that are essential to the game's completion unkillable. I had to download a mod so that I could kill them and thus continue having fun. Oh, and don't get me started on the mods! Nude mods, "better female" mods, "sexy armor" mods, what is this a sick joke?! How horny are you people?! But I digress. To sum it up: Skyrim is worse than Oblivion because it is better than Oblivion. Bethesda don't seem to realize that their games are inherently goofy and are perfect that way. The more they try to make it "badass" or "epic" or the more bad face textures and A.I. bugs they fix the worse it gets. I don't even think the intended audience for these games takes them seriously considering the number of great dumb mods there are out there (Battletoad Rash!) All in all, I'd buy it because it's still a pretty enjoyable experience and I'm sure everybody can find something to do in this massively dumb role-playing action-adventure game. Oh, and the graphics are pretty good I guess. 7/10 *plot device=dragon
picee;-;what can i say really that as not already been said its a pretty awesome game
Fruit;-;fun.. As long as you don't mind running around like a headless chicken
Admiral Rodcocker;-;Syrim is the perfect mix between action and adventure. The creatability and choices make this game easily my favorite. the endles amount of quests and story make it a non stop joy ride. And the graphice? They can't be beat. I HIGHLY RECOMMEND
Jsmitty76;-;this is a great game
UglyShark;-;This is a very fun game but Eventually gets a little boring.. Until you fight some dragons!!!
mzda_grl;-;This game is sick. It is such a big and beautiful world with so many places to explore. 2 years later with new DLC installed and this game is still awesome to play. Plus the endless mods are always fun to try.
Meeseeks' Ghost;-;It's like Oblivion, only with beliveable characters, and a good story, and fun gameplay, and unique locations to explore, and reasonable system requirements, and all those other things they forgot to put into Oblivion because they were too busy masturbating over shaders and poorly optimized textures. So it's like Oblivion only good.
chosen01uk2002;-;Love it, can play play play, then leave it and come back again and again. love the mods you can get.
WALL-E;-;Reallt fun game..... be a Dark Elf!!!
dlconnolly;-;Look no further. This game is AWSOME!
AfflictedSoul;-;What else do I have to say besides one of the most addicting games on the planet!!!!!!
Lord Franko;-;One of the manliest RPG games on the planet duh you have to buy it!
ToastyMicFunBuns;-;if you love a game full of adventure and modding along with blasting ppl with a shout this is a game for you xD
Aceage;-;Although I only recently purchased skyrim, I must thank a good friend of mine to give me his copy. I accumulated over 600hrs since 2012, and I had to buy the game for myself. Skyrim is not without its flaws, suffering from a bland main plot and some bugs. But this is one of those games that you will never put down. Like all other Elder Scrolls games, the world and lore is giant and immersive. After completed the main storyline quickly, I was a little disappointed. The main storyline leaves much to be desired, but that is not what kept me playing Skyrim. There are multiple story arcs that you may complete that do not necessarily contribute to the main storyline, some are great, others are tetius. I only put maybe 30hrs into the main storyline, and after that is when Skyrim really begins to shine. Exploring Skyrim is amazing, reading lore, discovering dwemer ruins, participating in a civil war, it never gets old. At this point, modding is a great idea. Installing an ENB makes it look better than some games released in late 2013, mods that add quests and expand on the world, with mods the game is truly endless. I will never stop playing Skyrim. 9.5 Near Perfect.
Milkyshakes;-;Really worth spending my cash on. But only one word can describe this game, and that is "Amazing". I Mean the graphics, the storyline, the fighting, its just breathtaking. Definitly Recommend buying this game when you have the chance!
MageTurtle;-;BEST GAME EVER MADE BY THE LEGENDARY EDITOIN WORTH IT BUY NOW 10/10
KaL;-;In this game ye get tae stab people
#lovewins;-;ruined my non existent life. but i love it lewl
[S.C.P.];-;The way it is with all Bethseda Games: Beautiful world, great setting, short main storyline, interesting side story, many many sidequests, much to see and much to do - the other side of the coin? Bugs - bugs everywhere. Glitchin through objects and gettin stuck - NPC's glitchin around, quests not starting, some quests become stuck and can't be completed, random CTD's and so on - thanks to the Community, there are Unofficial Patches for the game and the DLC's and boy, they are needed - Bestheda, one question - What would you do, without the Community that loves your games? Let me answer that question for you - You would be out of business in 6 months. And for the enhanced game experience, go get yourself a lot of mods. But be careful of the random CTD's.
Progression;-;Now I have a girl playing Skyrim with me. I love her, I love myself and I love Skyrim. We'll both be adventurers.
Osbornia;-;Had it console, got bored after 300 hours, got it on PC now I have an infinite time waster due to mods, this game's gunna ruin my life...
SCORP;-;This game is like another world. The atmosphere is perfect, combat flawless, and graphics astonishing. Along with workshop addons it doesn't get much better than this.
Nytraz;-;Skyrim is one of the best gaming experiences of this generation, if only for the amazing array of mods that have been produced for it. Do yourself a favor; take the time to mod this game, you won't regret it.
DaFragger;-;While Oblivion in the original game better and made with much more care than Skyrim but mods are what make the game making the ropey vanilla visuals to Crysis-level graphics,improve the gameplay,add items,add stories,add maps,add quests,add characters,skins,weapons anything is possible! 10/10!
{[=NR=]} Bell Cranel;-;One phrase....While the game is already AWESOME I found that a mod here or there really made the game alot more enjoyable.That is until i went crazy with the mods and i had like 50 mods installed and the game still did not lag..ANYWAY its an amazing game.I suggest it to anyone who likes to use a sword,sneak up on people and shoot them with a bow in their  or if you like magic
Dj;-;A bear killed a dragon. 11/10
SyKoTom;-;This game rocks. An RPG that is totally explorable. It is so big you get lost in it
Gaskank;-;This game is never ending, it will take over your whole life. Don't even bother getting the dlc, because it will just pull you in even more. Till one day you wake up to see a dragon hovering over you.
Jragghen;-;An absolutely wonderful timesink. First time I've played a game in this series, so I can vouch for its accesibility, and the mods available for this game allow for a truly varied experience from person to person. It is a first person action medieval warfare game where you go on quests in an open world. Easily one of the best games of the last few years. All of the DLC is a little overpriced - getting the Legendary Edition is the way to go, but Dragonborn is worth $10 or so, Dawnguard about $5, and Hearthfire only about $2.50. All of them warrant a look if you enjoy the game, though.
Gourmet;-;Great Game , Great History , live another life , be another hero , be a villain , you choose !!! The most important part of this game for me was the history , that u can modify every moment. Divine parts of the game that make me love it , and one of them was the end of main history that makes u feel complete with yourself . Some npcs are dumb , but others are really smart that makes the game equilibrated . Every choose can have different reactions . This is art in pixels , this is skyrim .
Firearm2112;-;This game is truly amazing. It is worth every penny. This game has mod support, and there are thousands of mods out there, that make this game never get boring. This is a must buy.
(DVGE) ColPancakes;-;This is maybe the best RPG game, if not the BEST game of all time. The map is HUGE and it has many side quests and random quests and you can really just do whatever, from Murdering citizens to riding dragons!
Jentskin;-;This is one of the best RPG games i've ever played. 9/10
stevechepp;-;Bethesda has outdone themselves yet again with Skyrim. Perfecting the open world genre and building upon their previous games, Skyrim is a perfect open world fantasy action-RPG. There are a limitless amount of side quests and a plethora of primary quests and guild missions. This game will keep you busy for at least 100s of hours, maybe more depending on your play style. The game supports multiple play types and character classes and is one of the few RPGs to allow you to multi-class. This game is completely worth the list price and in my opinion, is the best fantasy game on the market today.
Oliv6062;-;I played this game for almost 500 hours.
OTS Cryo Dash;-;good game lots of fun cant wait for elder scrolls online
|MG| adward;-;Top class open-world RPG. In terms of content, scope, and general ambition it's incredible. Worth every penny.
Shikaru777;-;Wonderful game if you want an open world with quite a bit to do. The expansions add more to the wonderful lore that is Elder Scrolls. A great game, but fairly glitchy, even with mods. Recomend going to Nexus to find mods that interest you.
Bruce McGoose;-;It's never too late to buy this game. Buy it right now. Now. NOW. NOW!
JasonoTheGreat;-;Skyrim Is probably the most Beautiful Elder Scrolls games ever, and one of the best games ever. The map is fun to explore with many different characters to fall in love with. Its one of the only games I enjoy levelling up my Miscellanious skills (Blacksmithing speech etc.) You Are not a gamer if you never played a tleast one of the Elder scrolls games , so If you haven't, Skyrim is the place to Start. Although, not even a year after buying the game I found that I was heavily relying on different mods and DLC. The story is basically the same no matter what and even though there are some small choices, there isn't a lot for an RPG. The choices all lead to the same out come (just some different dialogue).
Roranicus;-;Skyrim is truly one of the best games I have ever played! It has endless hours of fun in the base game, plus a huge collection of mods and three massive expansions! If you haven't taken the plunge into TES 5, do it now!
madgodXinsanity;-;Easily the greatest game I have ever played.
General Shi Xie;-;my gran was pro at skyrim before she embarked on a journey to find true peace and solitude with the greybeards please honour her and buy the game
baghera;-;One of the best singleplayer open world RPGs I ve ever played.
Oberain;-;To be honest if you're reading Skyrim reviews it's not because you're on the fence about actually buying the game so I don't feel the need to write some form of lengthy review of the most well known RPG of the past decade. **EDIT: Apparently Valve removed monetization of mods...for now. I am keeping my editorial rant up but changing my recommendation because, frankly, Skyrim really is just a damn fine game. The language of the PR release, however, suggests that they are going to come out something else, so becoming complacent in victory would be an extremely bad idea. For a sense of context I want to point out I am all for mod makers being compensated for their work through donations. I have no problem donating money to mod makers if they provide me with a worthwhile addition to my game and give this addition free of upfront charge. I understand the amount of work some of these people put into their mods and I wholeheartedly think they deserve SOMETHING for their passion and work. Turning mods into DLC is, however, insulting to not only me as a gamer, but the mod maker as they become an exploited worker. This doesn't have to be the case. They can all make money and make people happy at the same time if they weren't so f*cking greedy to start with. If Steam RADICALLY changes the system to be ONLY DONATIONS; ONLY DONATIONS taking less then 20% for themselves and Bethesda, then all involved would make far more money total and come out of this looking flawless from a PR point of view. As an example I have bought premium currency or what have you from GOOD free to play games I have enjoyed. As you can see in my profile, I have played a LOT of Warframe and have donated a LOT of money to the company (by now it's probably a few hundred of dollars over the years which, yes, is a lot of money to most people) because they are offering me an ever improving game completely free and I think they deserve something. If Warframe had demanded a subscription or money up front, they would of made nothing off me as I never would of played it to begin with. There are a lot of gamers like me; Gamers that have funded plenty of free to play games like Dwarf Fortress, have given money to the humble bundles FAR exceeding the "minimal" amount and funded plenty of games on Kickstarter due to nothing more then altruism and a belief in a fellow gamer's passion to improve the industry. A modding paywall, however, feels as though Valve, Bethesda and even a few modders themselves are  on the very notion of what makes PC gaming great. It is insulting to me as a gamer. It is insulting to us all as a culture and it is something that should not be tolerated. With the way the system exists now (Or rather how it existed before the rollback), I will not be buying games through Steam unless I have no choice and I will NEVER pay for a mod. Ever. I am more then happy to send a donation to a few modders who do exceptional work (Interesting NPCs comes to mind) but any modder who hides their content behind a paywall will lose my respect and any chance of EVER getting money off me. I'd also like to point out that monetizing and releasing total conversions which create an entirely new game using an existing engine such as Gary's Mod and DayZ are NOT the same thing as paying for Skyrim mods. I can't fathom why certain people involved in THIS side of modding the need to voice their opinion when they clearly have no idea what they're talking about.
Hellishtomb;-;It was pretty good ngl
sTimBud;-;Words cannot describe how much content does this game have, and the modding community, OH the modding community!
Sp33dy_Gonzalis;-;Hands down the best game i have played, so much to do, random events on the roads and the such make it quite interesting at anytime, the game also has a strong modding community so if you got absolutely everything finished in skyrim you can download custom quests and whatever! if you are thinking about buying it. do it. 10/10
Deika, Toa of Fire;-;this game is so much fun, i love it, the reason why i got this game is because of this awesome mod called legend of the toa, it adds 6 races of biomechanical warriors that are heroes known as toa.
Donald Trump Nightmare Fuel;-;Ah, Skyrim, what a wonderful game. Time and time again I have found myself returning to the snowy, beautiful landscape that is this game's portrayal of Tamriel, each time making a new character, and finding new ways to play. The game looks astounding. The dark feel creates an atmosphere like none other, but it somehow remains silly with all of the bugs never fixed. The enemies are unique, not so much in their abilities, but in their style. In the open landscapes you'll find necromancers and wolves, but in dungeons and caves you'll Draugr (the equivalent of zombies), skeletons, and sometimes machines made by the ancient race called the Dwemer. Things like this make environments special and interestingly varied. The one complaint I have with the beauty is that the great mountains you can see in the distance throughout your travels aren't always so spectacular. When trying to traverse the countryside, the mountains usually just get in the way. Travelling around them is the easiest option, but by using the aforementioned bugs you can run up vertical slopes and clear them, if not entirely easily. The Elder Scrolls series is praised for its customization, and Skyrim offers the same amount as any other. Each type of weapon has its own skill tree, and combining certain powers can make the game exceedingly fun. An assassin is not limited to blades, oh no. There is a school of magic that can aid in sneaking, and can come in handy when difficult situations present themselves. Or, you can be a battleaxe wielding mage if you so desire, using Conjuration and Alteration magic can grant defense and weapons without the toll on your inventory that real armor takes. More examples exist, and playing the game can reveal them. Quests are more fun in this game than most others I feel. While in many RPG's quests are there just for the sake of having them, Skyrim was built around them. Bethesda got voice actors to record lines for dozens of questlines, and the quests themselves consist of more than "Kill that thing," or "Get that other thing." They have plots and unique impacts on the world, making them much more substantial feeling than those of, say, Pillars of Eternity's, which are vaguely intriguing at best and soulless at worst. Every time I hear the iconic song that plays on the main menu, I think of adventure; of wonder; of fun. Skyrim isn't a perfect game by any stretch of the imagination, but whether you're looking for an RPG to get involved in, or just a time waster, this game has something to satisfy everyone.
Book;-;Skyrim is somewhat of a downgrade from previous games in the series. The environment is dull and lacks diversity. I get that it's a northern environment but it could still look so much better. The UI is terrible for PC. Skills aren't balanced at all and the combat is boring and repetitive. If it wasn't for mods, I wouldn't really bother with this game.
Stinger;-;This happens to be a game that i wanted to play for a long time. When I got it I was amazed at how customizable everything is. If you are a fan of Lord of The Rings or anything midevil or middlearth this is a game for you.
NeBuLa;-;10/10 has ruined my life, completely absorbed all of my attention from my family and has genuinely turned me into a potato. You can shout at people and make them fly away, 10/10 would play again. Great game, buy it; And mod the  out of it. {NEED A DECENT PC TO MOD} gg
Izza;-;A really Amazing game! :D
Fish-Frog;-;The Elder Scrolls games were always good base games that became great after the modding community got a hold of it. With the introduction of paid DLC, as opposed to some form of donation that the user can choose, I would not recommend this game at the moment.
Jr;-;Hahaha, oh boy. Valve, Bethesda... you guys ed up bad with this one. Game's great, (free) mods are fun, but the pay-for-mods thing is super gay.  that , man. Helps nobody but Bethesda suck up more money for doing jack .
raqun AFK FOR 2 MONTH;-;This is the really legendary game, you must play it!
King Crocodile;-;There are very few bad things to say about this game, I can't even think of any right now. One of the best games I have ever played. Don't be fooled by my hours in the game, I have just recently bought the game ;) Absolute recommendation for everyone. Even if it's not on sale, worth every penny.
Page > Hendrix;-;this paid mods
Nikenemesis;-;The world of Skyrim is huge and immersive. You are a Dragonborn. Your actions will shape the land. Your shouts will be heard. Beasts to Battle. Dragons to Slay. Books to read. Secrets to be unlocked. Destiny is in your hands. I highly recommend this game for anyone who loves adventure. 9/10
RedEyedJames;-;Definitely recommend, had it when it first came out on Xbox and then got it for PC cos mods. The skill system is done very well, can create so many different types of classes and experiment away. Unlike on Oblivion, the Stealth system actually works, and the sneak perk tree is amazing. The amount of freedom and things to do in its open world is just... Gawd, you get me so wet Skyrim bby. Never run out of things to do whilst free roaming, once sat down for a pint with a stranger, woke up in a temple of Mara and had to re-trace my steps. Long story short, I married a hagraven, gave someones goat to a giant and got  with a ing Daedric prince. Smithing and Enchanting are hard to level but extremely rewarding. I usually dislike RPG's that don't hide the best loot in a tiny percent chance to find in a random enemy, but the system is just done really well. Gotta be honest, swords/close weaponry combat can be dull but the rewards of smithing and enchanting make up for it. Also, if you use close weaponry you gotta go for that Palading restoration alteration buld or git gud. Magic skill trees make me ing wet, and getting the master level spells made me . Could ennchant armour to make it free to cast destruction magic but at the fourfeit of enchanting slots. Obviously when you get highest level enchanting you can do this to two things though. But I prefer to mix it up and spread myself in Resto, Alt, Destruction and Conj doe <3 Amazing game, buy it. Especially while its on offer.
i taught the mirror to admire me;-;Skyrim is a Single player game based in medivalish times with a massive map to explore. I think this game is good for anyone wanting to take on dragons, murderers and bandits on by themselvs. I would rate this game 8.5/10
Dundee;-;Magic, Assasin groups, Huge axes and swords, amazing DLC what more can i say. Game was made in 2011 and still in my top 3 games of all time
ArcherMedes;-;I killed a dragon with my voice, shouted him apart. And dragons sometimes fly out of the ground. BEST GAME EVERERER 10/10
Doomangel;-;BEST GAME EVER !! This game has over 500 hours of content : Check This game can be mod : Check The OST is really good : Check It's an open world : Check THIS GAME IS WORTH YOUR MONEY :CHECK !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
antonuuu;-;It'sa wery guud becauze mein english ist gut! und crafting ist gut too! M'kay,
CHAIN_HEAD_FV20;-;this game is pretty much the most playable pc game to excist especially with over 37,000 mods available on the nexus website alone id definitly recommend this
PeC;-;You can't get a better singleplayer on Steam i double dare you! It's seroiusly 10/10
Zeloszalis;-;I always feel like its pointless to write a review for a Bethesda game as the rule of thumb is; "whatever you don't like, you can remove. whatever is missing you can add" due to the very strong mod scene presence surrounding the games. But I'll try to clarify that Skyrim if not for mods would have been the weakest entry in the TES series to date, and was largely saved by its mods. Skyrim tries to wow people over with flash, the promo videos are very guilty of this with how they played up dragon combat. It is far far less epic in game than the videos made it out to be. The questlines were some of the worst of the series in my opinion. though the main questlines is somewhat better than Oblivion's just as a guide point. probably the funnest questline happens in the Dlc Dragonborn and that is mostly due to the realm of Hermeaus Mora being unique and entertaining. If it wasn't for mods this game would be trash I had to get that jab out because while the mods thankfully exist, it should not hold Bethesda completely unaccountable and these days I feel they release games in the complete hope that the mod community will fix it for them.
Mkgt7axe;-;Great gameplay, countless quests, lots of possible playthroughs in this RPG game, Skyrim is sure to make you hooked as you unveil more and more of its outstanding and carefully made story. The fact that it high is in the top 10 of the most played games on steam surely has to mean something, i don't even know if there are any negative reviews about this masterpiece Another reason to get this game is that despite it being a 2011 game its Modding Community is still really active and it is one of the best modding communities if not the best. So what are you waiting for? get this awesome game. NOW Oh, and i don't even need to mention the meems and Fus Roh Dah........
Kresh;-;Even if you don't play RPGs, this game will be worth it to at least try out. It has a lot of content, is very addicting and will also be worth the price. You don't even need to play the quests, only exploring the world is still something you can have fun with. The main quest can easily be completed in about 20 hours, but I have over 100, because there are numerous other side and miscellaneous ones. And if all the dragon slaying, shouting, pickpocketing, sneaking, time travelling, bandit killing, gold hoarding and number of deer you can shoot in the butt wasn't enough, you can still install mods. Hundreds. Of course, you should be aware that this may cause unwanted crashing, so make sure you can handle them all. From graphic mods to DLC sized quests, there's sure something you will pick. My only problem with the game is the ing mountains. 9/10
Blinded by the light;-;Hey, valve, guess what. NOBODY WANTS TO PAY FOR ING MODS.
Brutal Kush Lord;-;i harvested a potato 69/69 would buy again
Cirrus Tavio;-;Awesome game that is quite addictive to play. However, don't burn yourself out while playing it!
A Poor College Student;-;Killed a man for cheese 10/10 would cheese again
[IF] Stylin' Sloth;-;I recommend this epic game ( if you can call it that ) to all of my Steam friends
Syndicate #DinosaurMoustache;-;Stand in a furnace, nothing happens Jump on a wooden wheelbarrow, instant death 10/10 Would parkour again
Cmasterc4;-;its good but dont overload your skyrim game with mods, if you do it will screw up your data. if you want mods i would suggest picking no less then 4 mods i recommend inigo alot if you like talkitive companions
FaCeLe5s;-;MODS ALL THE MODS!!!!!!!!!!!!
JohnnyBoyMF (   );-;Don't buy it, you will get addicted and you will never see sunlight again.
ZorviaGames;-;Skyrim is one of the best games i have played, Here is why! 1. Skyrim has good graphics for its time. 2. There are alot of Quest so you allways have something to do. 3. The story is not the best i have seen, but i think it has a decent story. So i give Skyrim a 9.7/10
Vespertilio;-;Watched free porn. Got a virus. Bought Skyrim for the nudity mod. Didn't get a virus. 69/10, would fap again.
Cursedviolentj;-;Farengar secret-fire thought he was a boss, sending thugs after a vampire thief assassin. All was well for him besides the occassional feeding on him in his sleep (unbeknownst to him), until came the creation of a wizard. Now, this was no ordinary wizard, it was a wizard of the undead variety known as a lich. As anyone can tell you, a lich is a being of pure hatred and despair, doing as he pleases with anything or anyone unlucky enough to cross paths with one. Having heard of this wannabe "wizard", the lich set his sights on the jarl of Whiteruns' home of Dragonsreach. It was late that night when the lich hovered silently through the doors of the halls of Dragonsreach sensing Farengar nearby. He found Farengar asleep in his bed, not knowing the terror that hovered over his slumbering form. The Lich raised his hand as he awoke and tried fleeing in terror, but he knew there was no escape. The Lich banished him to the realm of nightmares that changes itself with each lightning strike making it a worse existance than before, known as the realm of Quagmire. He wont be sending thugs after anybody else. 10/10 would banish annoying wizard to nightmare dimension again.
Loose-Moose;-;Vanilla Skyrim is a great game. Worthy of all the accolades and  that it got when it released. Now, though, there are so many mods that help make it into a truly complete experience. I still love this game, and its crazy how I can come back after a year and spend another 40 hours in the world like it isn't anything.
ariesstone;-;It's the best open wolrd game Bethesda has made yet. Actually makes play styles beyond swinging a sword not only playable, but fun. As always the map is made to be explored, and the best experiences are off the beaten path.
deaddillie;-;i remember when i got this game, i went and got mods. i played so many mods for so long, i forgot to play the game. now, all i can think is how valve has fallen. NO PAID MODS NO PAID MODS NO PAID MODS wait for their return....
foxzs;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is an open-world MMORPG set in the dark ages in a magic-filled universe. Skyrim has many features to offer and has very long gameplay to keep you engaged for hours on end. Featuring a variety of areas to explore, many quests/sidequests to complete, and many items to find/craft is what makes Skyrim such a great game. There are many cities you can visit and explore; each city having different designs and looks makes it very diverse. When you start playing you have the option of customizing your character. You can choose from a multitude of races ranging from a Nord (warrior type) to a Khajiit (sneaking type) and change the looks and builds of the character. The price of the game is great and even better if on sale. I'd say this game is worth around 50 Canadian dollars. I have to say the game looks amazing graphic-wise and considering it was released on 2011 makes this a well-made game. The game works quite smoothly even on lower-tier computers. One of the most, if not the most, good thing about this game is the modding community. There are thousands of fan-made mods out there which improves your game in many different ways. Want the game to look vivid and realistic? Get a graphic mod. Tired of your weapon? Get a weapon mod (bows, swords, axes, etc.). Mods are also free and can be easily implemented into the game quickly. Sounds are pretty good and the soundtrack is just pure godly. Did I mention it's open world? I did? WELL, it just got better. There are a ton of guilds you can join ranging from the Thieves to the Dark Brotherhood (each with their own pro and con), there are many skills and spells to learn and improve, and there are many women you can marry in all of Skyrim. Overall, this game is jam-packed of epic fights, tense moments, and tabbing.
LOFTY;-;PAID MODS HAVE BEEN REMOVED PEOPLE!! I remember a time when Skyrim had ~98% positive reviews, I now see that it has only 87%. This is extremely saddening, especially considering paid mods where OPTIONAL for the mod creators. Nevertheless paid mods have been removed. Everyone can calm down now and revert their reviews.
Moonfang the Spore Overlord;-;Modding simulator. You will get mods, have the game crash, fix mods, get more mods, have the game crash, fix mods, and then the cycle repeats. 11/10
The Christian Apologist;-;And on the 5,110,000,000,000th day, God created Skyrim. God looked upon what he had made and said that it was very good. -The Missing Chapter of Genesis
Kid's Got Some Penis On Him;-;The same reason some U.S. soldiers hate the Red Cross; don't charge for something that was once free.
Patrick Bateman;-;trash game, buy morrowind for a real rpg experience.
Sir Kensworth;-;Thanks Valve. Like, seriously. Thank you for listening. Skyrim is a fantastic game. Buy it. Mod it. Live it. Sincerely, Sir Kensworth
Jag Blade;-;Pay for mods? False god. Addendum: Before anyone blows a gasket about how many hours I DON'T have on Skyrim, it's because I cracked mine so I could use it and Xfire at the same time, so my hours aren't being tracked. Anyone who still uses Xfire knows that some steam games instantly crash to desktop when you launch them if you have xfire in-game enabled.
Vanical;-;Very good game to jack off to... Graphics 8/10 Mods 9/10 Gameplay 8/10 Story 5/10 - there isnt really a story Download some nude mods~Skyrim will be your main hoe
{158} Mcnolty;-;One of the best games of this generation made better with mod and Workshop support. An excellent purchase no matter what the price.
Krats;-;Like Skyrim with dragons. 10/10
M3;-;I have owned this game for 2 days and already clocked 24 hours. Help my soul
Murthles;-;Skyrim offers an en epic adventure that will take you to the most memorable places around the map. The world of Skyrim is beautiful and has a really good atmosphere including an awesome soundtrack. In Skyrim you are a Dragonborn and you must stop the invasion of dragons and defeat the legendary dragon Alduin. You can customzie your character pretty well and you can defeat your enemies in many ways, ranging from seperating their heads from the rest of the body to incinerating them to nothingness.
Bandit Kieth (FHR);-;One of the best RGPs Ive ever played !
loenor;-;What can I say...I have played all the TES games...from Arena..Daggerfall....Battlespire...Redguard...so on and so on. No matter what anyone says, this is a masterpiece of a game. It is another world to get lost in and never come out. I have to stop and just take in the sites sometimes. Yes, it has some small problems,,,but I don't even feel like going into them because the game as a whole is so good. If these guys screw around and focus on the money pit the TES online will end up being and ignore thier real cash cow and fan base it will be ashame. Time to come out with TES VI ....don't let the real TES single player fans down!
WELCOME TO THE RICEFIELDS MOFO;-;I killed men, women and children. Stole gold, plates and cheese. Slayed many dragons and modded more than I played.
Faith;-;Four years ago, Bethesda made this game and I had never been more hyped for a game ever. Back when I actually enjoyed the majority of the games I played was a time when life was fun. These days I remember Skyrim for all the times I've been screwed over by bugs and glitches that would hinder me in completing quests. But those 200+ hours were not completely wasted, partially but not completely. Also don't buy the dlc unless they are on 99 % sale or something... Considering they cost more than the base game and add maybe 5 hours extra content and a few useless items for gear that is not even better than the crap you farmed for a hundred hours in the vanilla game!!!!!!!"#!#!" 8/10 - Oblivion was better (don't kill chickens)
10000% elven apostate garbage;-;You can marry an arachnophobic werewolf mercenary. Do you really need any other reason to play this game?
Nycto.;-;Masterpiece! Best RPG, best open-world, best stealh, best hunting simulator, best waifu simulator, best mod support (Nexus+Mod Organizer) and mod offering (thousands), good graphics, fine controls, big world, never ending quest supply and endless replayability. Skyrim is pretty much what you want it to be. First person? Do it! Third person? Do it! Mouse and keyboard? Go ahead! Controller? Oh yes! Vampire simulator? Live the life of an medieval alchemist? Be an Orc bandit? A rogue Mage? Check! Check! Check and check.. The base game alone provides countless ways of playing and thus earns the rare right to be called an open world and sandbox RPG, with thousands of mods to create a unique experience. Skyrim has no direct competition on the market and that's a sad fact for us gamers. 97/100
RYan;-;you could play for hours! the music is dead good.
Philosophical Goat;-;Paid workshop mods. :)  off. Ok, they actually deleted paid mods so i can recommend this game again. Full review coming soon.
Leevoh;-;It was 8 PM when I started, now its 9 AM.
Razor;-;Despite the attempt to cash in on the hard work of modders. and the subsequent realization that they had made a horrible mistake, Bethesda has a solid game in Skyrim. I remember when it first came out I was so excited for it, and instantly bought it and played for hours and hours. Good gameplay, solid mechanics, excellent storyline. Some bugs, though most are fixed by unofficial patches released by the loving mod community. I seem to quit for a few months every now and then but I always end up coming back and playing some more skyrim. I'm pretty sure I still haven't discovered everything even after several playthroughs. There's always more and more, and with mods you could play this game for the rest of your life without running out of content.
Danielhrz;-;You can punch a giant metal robot to death 10/10
david haselhoff;-;you can kill dragons but when ever im tryin to kill a bear i get killed 10/10
Bikini;-;If you have time, you will lose it
CamouflagedCow416;-;Must own for RPG fans, or dragon fans... or any fans... or anyone with a computer, Xbox360, or PlayStation 3... Update 3/1/2015: Just beat the Dragonborn DLC... This is the second (?) time you go to Solsteim (I didn't spell it right) off of Morrowind, as you also go there in TES 3: Morrowind as DLC. The characters were fleshed out, while maybe not emotional, but you could develop a slight bond with. The new island you can visit is awesome and the new Shout is bada$$. Worth $20.00.
BetaBomb;-;Really nice open world RPG with gorgeous nordic landscapes. The biggest downside is that quests and the charracters are a bit "flat". I wish I would care when I kill some random farmer in the world, so I guess the immersion is lacking here. But you get distracted enough by other things that you kind of forget it. If you've played past Elder Scrolls game, expect the same experience, for some people it's good, for other it isn't. Most important thing : Mod it, mod it, mod it. This game is day and night with mods and it fixes a ton of issues Bethesda did not care to fix.
clintoncdotson;-;Amazing game. Liked it so much, I bought it on here after playing it on PS3 and have modded the snot out of it. Highly reccomended.
Yric;-;Best RPG in my opinion. Large range of modifications from new player homes to better graphics. The original game however is still beautiful, fun and huge open world with dragons, thieves, giants and even seals. Storyline is perfect and can be very cheap when on special. DLC worth having a look at when on special. Large variety of weapons, clothing, enemies, NPC's and locations. Quests are plentiful and trading cards and achievments exist as well. 9.8/10
Chocodaze;-;Skyrim is an AMAZING game. I've put 109 hours into this masterpiece and do not regret it. The story is a bit short IMO but the side missions and the open world bring you a whole lot of stuff to do. Run up mountains. Enter dungeons / Caves. Ride a horse. Kill a dragon. Buy a house. Get married. etc. And btw, 10/10 for using consolecommands and changing my name into Jesus and flying up to the skies. EDIT: Played a bit of Skyrim last night, went on a horse. And had the power to fly...Incredible 11/10
Spyke;-;It's just Skyrim with swords
Iiljohn;-;This game never ends, it is almost perfect.
mischivousmic;-;Played through on 360, beat regular skyrim. Playthrough 2 on ps3, dabbled in legendary, long way to go before complete. Got legendary on pc, testing the limits of modding and console commands is really making this more exciting than the last 2 play-throughs. Especially finding the room that has 1 of everything that you can console command coc to, I've done all these f'n quests before, it's great to be able to just go grab all the game's keys and super special items so you can just enjoy your play-through without trivial bs. Also, thomas the truck.  yeah. Oh, one more thing, it looked good on 360. it looked great on ps3. It loads a billion times faster and plays WAY smoother on PC. Got my ps3 controller wirelessly hooked up with motionjoy and this is the best skyrim experience I've ever had.
WiG_WaMM;-;There's not much I can say about this game, just that it (and it's soundtrack) are amazing. It has around 20 hours of quests (with the DLCs) and the enviroment is beautiful, but it's safe to say, without this game's soundtrack, it wouldn't be half the game it is now.
Hornet;-;Hundreds of hours of fun to be had, especially with the multitude of amazing community mods.
Ice;-;Skyrim is a great game! Everyone should buy it, I abouseloutly love it. The dlc's are great, I just wish Bethesda would fix some of the bugs. Everyone should play it at least once.
_Ballsy_;-;Hands down best game i've ever played. Logged over 700+ hours on PS3 version (with all 3 DLCs). Now starting from scratch on PC version. The graphics of Skyrim PC has all but converted me from console to PC gamer!
Tsi Tsu;-;Stealth Killed a Dragon. 20/20
agent 47;-;this game is amzing!!!!!
Denmo;-;If the fact that I've played over 300 hours of this game doesn't convince you, I dunno what will.
Cacauette;-;Very powerfull game, great story and great environment.
DreamKiller;-;Very good game . Sometime glitchy but still good
Monsieur Aarth;-;"Mod it till it crash" great statement it is... been 3 years since the release the vanilla version itself are great but not complete w/o mods thanks to the 9gag community that introduced this game to me... appreciate that..
Teamscream[NL];-;Truly The best game ive ever played in my life. if you want a game that lasts long buy it!
Element Zero;-;Well, I used to be married in real life. Then I discovered the joys of magical force yelling inside fully furnished homes. Now I just travel the land sending dishes and dinners and books flying. In all seriousness, if this showed my PS3 playtime, I'd probably be embarassed - I have the platinum trophy, and then some. It's an amazing game, and mods breath new life into a game I thought I had played out. For anyone who played it previously and loved it, give it a shot here. It's worth it.
EnderSteve;-;I don't even know what to say about this game....... Oh wait.... There are no watermelons. 0/10 Wait.... I can get a watermelon mod? 10/10
StealthRevealed;-;I really don't know if I like this game yet...
Doc;-;One of my favorite games of all time. Truly an experience.
jeppe6721;-;OMG THIS IS AWESOME!!!
VSS-Elite Jocky the High-Hitter;-;I died by taking a spear to the throat 10/10 would pillage and plunder again.
Mr Fox;-;Paying for mods will kill this game
Arren;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is the new blockbuster RPG from Bethesda. Is it the "ultimate RPG" all the hype surrounded it portrayed it as? No, it is not. But that's because no single RPG is for everyone. If you're looking for Dragon Age or The Witcher in Skyrim, you won't find it, as they're different kinds of RPG. If you're a fan though, and you're mainly looking for more Elder Scrolls, you can't go wrong with this. Much like the previous game in the series, Oblivion, it offers a mindbogglingly huge amount of content from the get go. Content that will take hundreds of hours to completely go through. And by then, you will have forgotten such a big part of it that a second playthrough doesn't seem like such a bad idea. Unfortunately, just like Oblivion, at the end of the day there isn't a huge variety of dungeons and once you've seen one of a said type, you've pretty much seen them all. Skyrim has tried to correct this somewhat, adding flavor to most of the dungeons in order to make them unique, but it can get tiring once you've faced the same enemy 70 times. Combat in this game is the best in the series. Third camera mode is actually viable, and while you cannot pick classes in the previous games like you used to, you can now level up freely by gathering enough skill levels, with enough skills for you to be able to create a specific, personalized character. While this deep personalization remains in Skyrim, some aspects such as spellmaking and custom enchantment creations are completely gone. While some may say this is to avoid your character being a fearsome god of destruction, Skyrim almost makes it too easy for you to do this anyway, allowing even the strongest opponents to fall easily. This includes dragons. Before Skyrim released, Bethesda made it seem dragons were the most fearsome thing on Nirn. And while the first few times you do get to fight them they will put a decent challenge, Bethesda's scaling works poorly to keep it that way as you level and gain vastly better gear. Add that to these encounters being quite common at times, they completely lose that "epic feel" of the fight and just become an annoyance, pure and simple. This wouldn't nearly annoy me as much as it does if it wasn't for the fact that other, clearly looking weaker wildlife found actually put up a better fight than the dragons do. A Shadow of the Colossus or Dragon's Dogma approach to these encounters would do the trick, as those by comparison make the dragon fights in Skyrim disappointingly shallow. While the main quest for this game is mostly horrid, it is the sidequests that offer the most enjoyment. The Daedra quests are especially great. As with the previous games, factions such as the Dark Brotherhood can be joined, and through their storyline, you will eventually rise through their ranks. A minor detail that's bugged me since Oblivion is that these factions never take into account your actual skill levels. Suppose you'd join the Mages College in Winterhold, and the teachers may comment on your great talent, but really, they're just commenting on your lack thereof. You can fully complete its storyline, clearly aimed for mages, having no magic skills at all. I know Daggerfall's old by now, but even there they would check your skills to see if you were a suitable character to join their organization. Why did they not keep this in subsequent games? While these games can be extremely immersive, sometimes that immersion can be broken at times, either by bugs, which will always be present in such a gargantuan beast of a game, or by AI repeating the same lines over and over, notably the guards' comments when you approach them. It could be worse though, no longer will you find the world of Tamriel only having 5 voice actors working on it so there are still improvements. The graphics as well. Skyrim is simply a beauty to behold. Last, and by no means least, the modding community. They have always been a staple in the series since Morrowind, adding hours of playtime to these games. Skyrim has not changed in regards to this, and it fact made mod installation easier thanks to its addition to the Steam Workshop. Find a mod you like? Just hit that subscribe button and open the launcher to see the game download it automatically. It's ridiculously simple, and you'd be silly not to give some of the fantastic mods already released a go. It's almost a sin to want to buy the console versions, due to what they miss on. These are the kinds of games that, 10 years down the road, with their DLCs fully released, will still have people modding them, and that is quite special. All in all, I say Skyrim is a must-have for anyone with a remotely passing interest in the series. It's just that good. Complete with a deep customization, great setting, believable world and endless potential. Make sure you have a lot of spare time, this game will soul trap you for a long time, and you will more than likely thoroughly enjoy it, as I have.
Yogurtjack;-;Just joining the hate waggon
fastjetjockey;-;Bethesda and Valve are steering PC gaming down the wrong path by implementing monetized modding and they're using Skyrim as a spearhead. As such, I cannot recommend this game to newcomers, despite my love for it. At this stage of Skyrim's life, modding is what's keeping it alive for the vast majority that play it including myself. To put mods behind a paywall is opening up a huge can of worms that can only be detrimental to the future of the platform and must be stopped before it advances too far. For further reading refer the Forbes article on the most important points - http://www.forbes.com/sites/insertcoin/2015/04/24/valves-paid-skyrim-mods-are-a-legal-ethical-and-creative-disaster/
Domsterer;-;First off let me start by saying this is a fantastic game and has been potentially ruined by recent events. Now I do think that Mod developers should be able to receive money for their work I don think it should have been handled in the way it has. Why not simply add a donate button and valve take a 10-15% cut for doing all the hosting etc and then give the original Dev around 10% which would leave the mod creator around 75% of the money for 100% of the work. 2 weeks ago this review would have been positive but now, well see for yourself...
Deadshot;-;A one-time payment of $2.99 is required to access this review piece.
[BS] Misanq;-;The quality of the TES franchise has always been iffy, whether it be the poor combat of morrowind, dodgey iron sights in NV or the shockingly bad UI in skyrim, but at the same time free mods have always been around to fix up Bethesda's bad ideas and shameful lack of quality control. HOWEVER, now that valve and Bethesda are pushing to monetise the modding community with paid mods, it becomes difficult to recommend Skryim to anyone, knowing that at some point in the future the ability to fix Bethesda's numerous gameplay misteps and bugs might become what is effectively quite expensive third-party DLC. Moreover, paid modding is genuinely offensive in many ways, given that Bethesda (and valve) are taking 75% of mod revenue for essentially not only failing to make a good game, but taking away one of the key selling points of the PC version of this game after the fact. I would in no way recommend this game, nor future games in the TES franchise.
st0p3rr0r;-;This game supports paid mods; I do not. Vanillas Skyrim is a snoozefest.
wildfield;-;Paid mods. This is ridiculous.
[FL:RP] Barnack;-;Was good until they started charging for mods.
Jaixa;-;Protesting the clunky and greedy manner in which paid mods are introduced. Bethesda will go to no end to monetize Skyrim, including ripping the heart out of a community of fans who spent a truly staggering amount of hours improving the game. Be aware that your experience may change in an instant if Bethesda deems it profitable.
dankuso50 {blue};-;over rated and overall MEH.
Kyrios9;-;Paid mods are an outrage.
Dizzlectic;-;Paid mods WHAT THE F*CK??????
SchultzyX89;-;Bethesda have lost my respect. Valve have lost my love. While Skyrim is a great game (only thanks to help of mods) I cannot recommend a game whose developers are not just downright greedy but cause a community of unpaid people who saved their buggy mess of a game to be thrown out into the rain for their own profit, for shame. And to vlave who let this happen, they are even worse.
Mansworth;-;Skyrim- Paving the road fora future of paid mods. Shame on you.
Brownie;-;I sadly cannot give this game a good review... I will not pay for mods. I had hundreds of hours of enjoyment with mods that will likely soon have a pricetag, and for what!? It hurts to know something you enjoyeed so much now has a price. What's next? Adding content every few months to make more money??? Oh wait...
DA BIG CHEEZ;-;Wow. I don't believe it. Not only has Zenimax figured out a way to be even MORE lazy and ignorant in making a videogame, but also wants to ruin everyone else's fun by selling something that has always been considered free and from the heart. I understand that the videogame press has decided to defend this choice, simply put a 'paywall for mods', but when have they ever been right? I mean lets apply this to reality. We know that modders can code better than any Bethesda employee, see bug fixes and Skyrim Script Extender, but what if Bethesda was an automobile dealer? Ask yourself this question before you even consider purchasing this game, or any mods: should you ever have to pay to have a factory defect fixed on a car? If you answered yes, please consider celibacy and renounce civilization. You're better off swinging from the trees.
Chipotle;-;Down with this sort of thing!
Tammas;-;Review turned negative after the introduction of paid mods.
MaximusPrime3;-;with the new paid mods everything will go to
Fizzee;-;Whilst the game gives a solid platform and the core story is reasonably good, the real meat of the game comes from the extensive modding community. Whilst this has always been a huge selling point for PC gaming, Valve and Bethesda are currently attempting to turn this wonderful aspect of PC gaming into something they can exploit the community with for $$$ The idea of paying mod makers isn't a problem and should be encouraged, the fact is that the following: a) There is NO quality assurance. the mod can be utter rubbish yet until you fork out $$$ you can't know. b) The mod makers only get 25% of the profit... Yup The person who did 100% of the work gets a tiny fraction of the money c) If a mod stops working, tough luck. d) The mod must earn $400 before the creator sees a penny! if it only earns $399 then Valve & Bethesda get the lot!! e) This encourages both big and impressibe mods, but also cash grab nonsense. All in all, DO NOT SUPPORT THIS COMPANY!
piercen90;-;I'm not going to support paid mods, and as long as there's paid mods I do not recommend this game
(HpN)Zadeis;-;The changes in the modding community have ruined this game along with me finding the changes unacceptable and a bad precedent.
TrUeJiM;-;Pretty bummed i supported this game right before the whole mod debackle.
(LSG) Vynix;-;I now have to pay mods I've been using for years and have dontated for in the past. Blatant cash grab. Thanks for destroying the most civil and supportive community in pcgaming bethesda and valve.
une lgende putain;-;Skyrim is the ing GOTY of 2011. There's no reason not to get this game. And if you get bored with the game itself, THEN DOWNLOAD SOME ING MODS. Srsly though, this game is dope, it's super fun . But while this  is fun, this  is also buggy. :S
Ragman;-;The best
Varul lui mihnea;-;Like Fallout with swords.
auti$m;-;Like call of duty without guns 10/10 - IGN
LGamingGamer;-;This game is probably my favorite game of all time! The graphics arent great but if you get some graphic mods and bam it looks amazing. It has over 200 hours of gameplay with mods that add 100s of more hours to the game. I would recommend doing a vinalla playthough and then start watching some modding videos on youtube and getting starting with modding because that's where the game really kicks off.
Vik;-;Skyrim, without a doubt, is one of the greatest games ever created. It has a lush open world that is ready to explore, every customization option you could crave, robust and intelligent quests, memorable moments and secrets hidden deep within if you are willing to look (DARK BROTHERHOOD). For example, I have clocked 25 hours and am still nowhere near completing the main story or finishing a fraction of the side quests, I would be surprised if I finished this before clocking 100 hours and I wouldn't be surprised if I end up clocking 1000. Worth the money, worth the time. Every person should treat themselves to this experience.
Sam Hyde;-;Ran around, saw a deer, killed the dear. Ran around, saw a wolf, killed the wolf. Ran around, saw a bear, killed the bear Ran around, saw a bandit, killed the bandit. Ran around, found a ruin, found a bunch of drauger, killed the drauger. Ran around, found a dragon, killed the dragon. Ran around, found a chicken, killed the chicken, arrested for killing chicken. Ran around, found a fox, followed the fox, fox led me to a saber tooth cat and it killed me, I now kill foxs. Ran around, found a giant, shot a arrow at the giant thinking I was a boss, giant than hit me and sent me flying like a plane. Ran around, found a dragon skull popping out of the ground, no seriously it was like a dragon plant or something. Ran around, found a Khajit called Kharjo, Kharjo is now my best friend who helps me fight dragon plants. 10/10 would play again
- Phozon;-;Very good game really appreciate ! thx.
Tanglewreck;-;I love this game!!! so endless!! the music, the quests, everything...can spend hours just exploring and go and kill some draugr, deathlords, spiders, etc, so many things you can kill too xD or make friends...For me there was little bugs, so I was really happy about it. I really recommend, if you like to explore and just have fun doing side quests, some are like fetch this fetch that, but on the way you can talk to certain people and get more quests! its fun overall :3 Really recommend this to everyone ^_^bb <3
Vininn126;-;Help I'm stuck and I can't get our
Nuns N' Moses;-;First of all. This has to be one of the most fun games of all time. I think it is the only game I have ever played where it litterally does not end. You will always find a new cave, new enemy, new quests, new things to do, etc. If you are a fan of Lord of the Rings, you MUST get this game. Even if you dont like Lord of the Rings, you should get it. The story is so engaging and nothing feels tacked on or out of place. Everything has a purpose and everything has a reason for being there with their own story. Its Great! I have no idea why you would not get this game. Oh side note, the DLC for the game is GREAT even though I don't own it yet. I have played it on my friend's computer and they add even more content to an aready content LOADED game. In closing, IF YOU DON'T BUY THIS GAME YOU ARE A FOOL!!! A FOOL!!! It is way to good to pass up Rating: 11/10 Blows me away
Axeman;-;Oh, Skyrim. What a great experience. You start playing this game and you will never complete it. You will continue returining to Skyrim many times. You will spend countless hours exploring, hunting, killing bandits, and many other cool things. Add mods to the mix and you can customize and enhace the core game towards the perfect RPG. If you're a true gamer, you should never live without missing this one.
Yes Man;-;Skyrim is game that someone can get truly absorbed in. I have played almost 500 hours on console, but I love the game so much I also brought it on steam, just to be able to play it when my family uses the console. And I must say, it was one of the best descisions of my life. The community is one of the best in gaming, there are so many user-created drawings and mods, that when you start playing again, Skyrim is a whole new world, tailored to your liking. And the game in itself - devoid of any mods- is the single greatest gaming adventure I have ever had the honor of experiencing. I will most definitely come back to this game, time and time again.
Afoocosmic;-;became chosen one became a different chosen one met a talking dog 10/10 would become chosen one again
SilverFlame;-;Got hit so hard by a giant i went to space. 10/10 Would try to pickpocket his toe again.
viiniciuspaes /Torack/;-;One of the bests games i've played , so exiting , you will enter in on of the greatest medievals lore , with exiting graphics , and a unic way of playing .
The Hand Of God;-;downloaded a "my little pony mod" 10/10 oh and the vanilla game is pretty awesome as well
Atlas Fontaine;-;Wander the open world of Skyrim as you, the Dragonborn, use your awesome magical gift of the ancient language to: Steal cabbages, steal horses, pick pockets, pick locks, and even rob shops at night! Still be the hero as you kill off an entire empire such as the Stormcloaks or the Imperials. Hunt through the ancient ruins of Nords and fight through armies of zombies just to get bored in the end and murder everyone in Windhelm just for the hell of it.
[ATG];-;Pay to win on singleplayer game... nice.
The Gentleman Creeper;-;I enjoy Bethesda games. Especially when they open them up to the modding community. But then the paid mod thing happened and we find out both Valve and Bethesda are profitting over this. Modding, something that has been a free, community driven activity for thirty years is being monetized. Not donation driven, not a commission thing, but a market that is going to drive modding into the ground. "B-BUT! MODDERS ARE ALSO GETTING MONEY!" 25%. And that's if they make more than $400 if I'm reading things right and that money only goes to your Steam Wallet. Anything would have been better than this. I cannot in good faith say that you should buy this game and support the developers. EDIT Well, the paid mods system has been removed. For the time being. Valve has aready said that they are going back to the drawing board to figure out how to better implement it. I'm going to keep this negative review here as a reminder of just what transpired and a reminder so no one is surprised when it pops up again. If Valve implements paid mods again, yet they somehow work, /then/ I will change this review.
666UndeadKer666;-;I like skyrim for the mods I have and those that are still being made, im not NOT going to recccomend this game out of the whole paid mods thing... It has nothing to do with "is the game good" of course its awesome... I didnt like the paid mods thing but that doesnt mean that skyrim has gone from one of the best games ever to being crap because of it...
Beardog;-;You know all the Fun and such.
Plyr_L;-;overall this is a nice game to own...
SunkenCityHero;-;Loved this game on xbox 360 and love it even more with tons of mod possibilities on pc and freerom rpg games is where its at.
aya;-;Do I also have to pay to write this review aswell?
Electrized;-;This game is a very interesting one. I bought this game as it was on sale, and got very surprised for the very cheap game. I had heard a lot good about the game itself, and the mods. So i decided why not. So i started playing the story, and decided, that i need to have a few mods. So i downloaded some mods what make the game longer. The start is pretty boring, but when you get to have your free world, you shall be free. The world has exciting creatures and such, and you can always get quests. The story is interesting as well. Not to spoil, i wont tell anything about the story, but i can say. The story is good. Some quests have a lot of hardness in them, but some are just easy. Best RPG game i have ever seen.
Transistor;-;Time to recommend, what is probably the most hyped game I've ever played. First of all. It's good, that's all you need to really know. It is a good game. But it got some massive flaws. If I am to compare it to morrowind or oblivion, it is worse. In pretty much every way. First time playing morrowind you will notice that it' got some of the best music you can come by, and some cool gameplay. Oblivion was so good I never stopped playing it, until I had made EVERY mission. This game, skyrim, is a bit of both. only real problem with it - it's extremly repetitive. Every mission (pretty much) is the other alike. It got some really cool graphics, finally some decent voiceacting and some good missions every now and then. The dragons that were so extremly hyped are a bust tho. They do NOT live up to their name. They are repetitive and boring. Which kinda kills the whole "dragonborn-plot" So wait for a sale, then buy it. you won't regret it. it's good, really good, just not AS good as it's precursors. So it doesn't get full pot, but almost 9/10
deaddillie;-;i remember when i got this game, i went and got mods. i played so many mods for so long, i forgot to play the game. now, all i can think is how valve has fallen. NO PAID MODS NO PAID MODS NO PAID MODS wait for their return....
foxzs;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is an open-world MMORPG set in the dark ages in a magic-filled universe. Skyrim has many features to offer and has very long gameplay to keep you engaged for hours on end. Featuring a variety of areas to explore, many quests/sidequests to complete, and many items to find/craft is what makes Skyrim such a great game. There are many cities you can visit and explore; each city having different designs and looks makes it very diverse. When you start playing you have the option of customizing your character. You can choose from a multitude of races ranging from a Nord (warrior type) to a Khajiit (sneaking type) and change the looks and builds of the character. The price of the game is great and even better if on sale. I'd say this game is worth around 50 Canadian dollars. I have to say the game looks amazing graphic-wise and considering it was released on 2011 makes this a well-made game. The game works quite smoothly even on lower-tier computers. One of the most, if not the most, good thing about this game is the modding community. There are thousands of fan-made mods out there which improves your game in many different ways. Want the game to look vivid and realistic? Get a graphic mod. Tired of your weapon? Get a weapon mod (bows, swords, axes, etc.). Mods are also free and can be easily implemented into the game quickly. Sounds are pretty good and the soundtrack is just pure godly. Did I mention it's open world? I did? WELL, it just got better. There are a ton of guilds you can join ranging from the Thieves to the Dark Brotherhood (each with their own pro and con), there are many skills and spells to learn and improve, and there are many women you can marry in all of Skyrim. Overall, this game is jam-packed of epic fights, tense moments, and tabbing.
LOFTY;-;PAID MODS HAVE BEEN REMOVED PEOPLE!! I remember a time when Skyrim had ~98% positive reviews, I now see that it has only 87%. This is extremely saddening, especially considering paid mods where OPTIONAL for the mod creators. Nevertheless paid mods have been removed. Everyone can calm down now and revert their reviews.
Moonfang the Spore Overlord;-;Modding simulator. You will get mods, have the game crash, fix mods, get more mods, have the game crash, fix mods, and then the cycle repeats. 11/10
The Christian Apologist;-;And on the 5,110,000,000,000th day, God created Skyrim. God looked upon what he had made and said that it was very good. -The Missing Chapter of Genesis
Kid's Got Some Penis On Him;-;The same reason some U.S. soldiers hate the Red Cross; don't charge for something that was once free.
Sir Kensworth;-;Thanks Valve. Like, seriously. Thank you for listening. Skyrim is a fantastic game. Buy it. Mod it. Live it. Sincerely, Sir Kensworth
Jag Blade;-;Pay for mods? False god. Addendum: Before anyone blows a gasket about how many hours I DON'T have on Skyrim, it's because I cracked mine so I could use it and Xfire at the same time, so my hours aren't being tracked. Anyone who still uses Xfire knows that some steam games instantly crash to desktop when you launch them if you have xfire in-game enabled.
Vanical;-;Very good game to jack off to... Graphics 8/10 Mods 9/10 Gameplay 8/10 Story 5/10 - there isnt really a story Download some nude mods~Skyrim will be your main hoe
Bonzo;-;One of the greatest RPG's ever made. Incredible amount of content, fun game mechanics, great customization and great mithos. Seriously recommended
Benyed;-;when i first played this I was all like "ERMEGERD! ETS AMATHENG!" then I completed the "amatheng" main quest line and I was like "Oh, what now?" Then i started talking to everyone and did stuff for them, and that's the best part, there's hundreds of people in Skyrim, and they all have a story, and like, 75% of them have a quest, i've spent over 200 hours on this and i'm still not bored of it, and modding it is amazing too, not to mention all the other quest lines like the companions and thieves guild, don't forget the dark brotherhood, ooh! And the whole civil war thing going on. You can tell the creators spent some time on this, and the map is HUGE, and there's over 20,000 mods on the workshop alone, even more on the nexus and all those other mod sites. Overall, this game is, pretty much, LEGENDARY.
Irving;-;Great game. Legendary version is definitely worth it!
Sqgg;-;I would hesitate in buying this game if you haven't already. Think EA style microtransactions but ten times worse. Don't waste your money.
404;-;Good game, bad capitalists.
Cyrax;-;It is a fantastic game, but what makes it even better are the free mods. You can get almost exact experience you desire and if you feel for a challenge, you can attempt to create mods yourself. Skyrim is a game that will last you for years, thanks to the dedicated modding community and it definately deserves a positive review, despite the recent evets.
Memo_ria;-;One of best RPG games.
DadouXIII;-;Great game, thank you for removing the paid mods in their current form.
Biochemi987;-;Dragons? Check Awesome weapons and armor? Check Go to jail for running around in my underwear and punching people? Double check
thecakeThief;-;Brilliant game, especially with mods.
RYan;-;you could play for hours! the music is dead good.
Philosophical Goat;-;Paid workshop mods. :)  off. Ok, they actually deleted paid mods so i can recommend this game again. Full review coming soon.
Leevoh;-;It was 8 PM when I started, now its 9 AM.
Razor;-;Despite the attempt to cash in on the hard work of modders. and the subsequent realization that they had made a horrible mistake, Bethesda has a solid game in Skyrim. I remember when it first came out I was so excited for it, and instantly bought it and played for hours and hours. Good gameplay, solid mechanics, excellent storyline. Some bugs, though most are fixed by unofficial patches released by the loving mod community. I seem to quit for a few months every now and then but I always end up coming back and playing some more skyrim. I'm pretty sure I still haven't discovered everything even after several playthroughs. There's always more and more, and with mods you could play this game for the rest of your life without running out of content.
Danielhrz;-;You can punch a giant metal robot to death 10/10
david haselhoff;-;you can kill dragons but when ever im tryin to kill a bear i get killed 10/10
Bikini;-;If you have time, you will lose it
Russian Satan;-;Buy Skyrim. DO NOT BUY ANY MODS FROM THE WORKSHOP. Go to Nexus. Get all your mods for free. Donate if you like 'em. Live life as ye should. Congradulations, Valve and Bethesda. You split your own fanbase in a desperate grab for cash. Enjoy the Fallout! Cheerio, Shin
Moss _;-;I used to love this game and have over 150 mods installed. Now I cannot play it because some of my mods have switched over to paid only and resultingly malfunctioned.
robocop12;-;to bad theres no teleport spell in skyrim
artemussr;-;Please Make Another Skill. For Example, Mining, Woodchopping.
givemeagame;-;I had the game originally on the PS3 and had a bit over 100 hours put into it. The only reason I got it on the PC now is cause it was on sale for $5. Glad I did, cause I love modding it. Given that the paid mods thing are a thing of the past, I will not include it on the review. Worth the cost for the game, but if you're wanting to mod as much as you can, spend the extra 20 for the ultimate edition for all of the DLC. Have fun!
By The Way;-;One of the most epic games ive ever played,for that year when it was released it has amazing graphics,FP animation.But the most funny part of the game is those bugs.In some cases its big + then -
Verinen;-;>A wild paid workshop appears >community starts ruthless riot, downvoting skyrim with the power of thousand suns >Paid workshop gets deleted >Mfw them mod makers are left all alone with their updated mods >They have nothing better to do anyway, so they put new mods for free on nexus >10/10 would riot again.
Nightman;-;So dont let my hours tell you anything. I played this game one xbox 360 and have over 1000 hours. This game is probably my favorite RPG of all time. It's rare you encounter a game that has a single player that you want to keep going back to. It has amazing quest, it has hilarious jokes, and it has an impact on your life that everytime you hear the word "Skyrim" it makes you remember all those dragons that took 30 minutes to beat. I can't remember how many times i've taken arrows to the knee. 10/10 would waste life again
BeforeThePrologue;-;I haven't even finished the main quest yet.
Ghosty;-;Skyrim may belong to the Nords , but everything in Skyrim belongs to the Khajit.
The Trickster;-;I WOULD DEFINETLY RECUMEND THIS GAME!!!! worth getting, because i already beat the game it is awesome and my cousin told me some cheats too if you guys want to know some send mea message or friend me and ill tell ya. yet this game i pretty expensive but you should get it if youlike killing things on the electronics XD. LOVE THIS GAME!!!!!!
Margaery;-;The game is just fantastic,but there are bug issues... who knows why
doofer;-;its skyrim. its good. if you kill paarthurnax you are an awful person
veX_;-;Skyrim is a transcendent experience. It may not be perfect, but it excels in almost every aspect of design. There are games that you play and there are games that you experience, and this is the latter. It sucks you in, and you will get lost in its incredible depths. This is quite frankly one of the deepest, most enjoyable and most inspiring gaming experiences you will ever have had. You owe it to yourself as a gamer to play this.
Etwo;-;Mod it till it crashes!
anteri.;-;Overall, it's a pretty great game, but it just didn't have the level of immersiveness that I was expecting and it didn't end up keeping me hooked for that long.
GerbilFett;-;Skyrim is really good, but for those who have played Oblivion, Skyrim has simplified all the differant stores to just general stores, forges, and potion shops. There were only two cons (for me anyway), I got stuck in the world you travel to in the Dragonborn DLC quest, Started the quest but decieded that I wanted to go back to SKyrim and it wouldn't let me. The other con is I would like a two player co-op while walking through skyrim. The graphics have been overhauled since Oblivion, which makes Skyrim very beautiful. Also there is very little cut and paste like there was in Oblivion. I hope the review is helpful. Really, really fun. 10/10.
Kameradenschwein;-;After 117 hours i can say: Crap! Dont buy it! And dont buy any mod!
Otter of Toast;-;If you're a fan of fantasy, cats, ragons, (American) RPG's, or God knows what else-- Come to think of it, do I even need to write a review?? It's Skyrim!!!
Officer Nice;-;Normally I am not really a fan of RPGs and all that dungeons and dragons stuff. But damn it, do I like this game a lot!! It's a fantastic game to just explore the world and run into a lot of different encounters. There's so incredible many hours worth of entertainment in this game and it's definitely worth your buck. However. When you buy this, remember you're kind of just playing the console version on PC. Get yourself a user on nexusmods and experience Skyrim in all its glory in which it shines the most on this superior platform.
Panda;-;>No RPG elements > walking simulator >Draugr Tomb Spelunker 2015 >LMB2win combat >Other games have better waifus which require less effort to mod in >Paid mods Yeah it's pretty bad
BadWolf [BW], the Solid Wolfo;-;Not my favorite TES, but that doesn't mean it's worse. And it's TES. The Elder Scrolls will absorb you. There's just... so much to do! And then you add the mods! And then you turn them off! You try all the quests and loot all the caves! And then you try to roleplay the game! And then you start philosophizing about it with your friends! And then you discover the lore of The Elder Scrolls! And, then... Well, then you'll unfortunately be dead, as you'll probably end up playing Skyrim and studying TES lore for the rest of your life. To be honest, this game has bugs. It has flaws, and many of them. But, funnily enough, even after all those 800 hours, I really can't remember a single one of them. I do remember a lot of amazing moments I had with Skyrim though. Never gets old.
Becke;-;Its a great game
Bubbi;-;Greedy.
Mr.Crowley;-;It's the best game EVER !!!
doomsaith;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a great game. That said, charging for user-created content on a free content hosting platform is utter B/S. I'll be accessing my mods from more reputable sources from now on Steam, it's hilarious that someone on your team came up with an idea like this. It makes you look like one of those free mobile game vendors, charging for every bit of content you possibly can while still pushing the idea that the actual content is free. One of the largest draws of the elder scrolls series is the player made content, and if that remains a payed for feature, then you can definitely expect far less sales when the next game comes out.
WaxCommon;-;Paid user made DLC is stupid. This  should not exist.
SaunaChum;-;I miss the warm beaches of Elsweyr...
Shadzmazz;-;I've been an elder scrolls fan for the past 5 years, one of the most interesting, longest game I have ever played is Morrowind. Then came oblivion I could play out the game, but seriously, that game is nothing without mods, horribly boring conversations (Not like skyrim's any better... "... an arrow to the knee"). When skyrim came out, I was pumped for it, I had a reason: The game looked amazingly cool in the gameplay trailer, it was an amazing adventure. But if we look deeply into it, skyrim is just a bit better than oblvivion. Insanely boring conversations, oversimplified puzzles, if you play out the game for the 5th time, even the legendary difficulty is mouse crap in a sack of flour. Mods make this game even more beautiful (ENBs, Weather mods, W.A.T.E.R,), even more harder (Deadly Combat, Duel Combat Realism etc.), there are some interesting quest mods also. (Falskaar, Wyrmstooth etc.) I kinda stopped playing, never even heard of DLCs coming out, Dragonborn, Hearthfires, Dawnguard. I was excited about them, my favorite DLC was and still is: Dragonborn, a completely new land (Solstheim), with returning topics, houses. Netches, House Redoran, House Telvanni. And a dying Silt Strider ;( I recommend buying the Legendary edition, it comes with several bonuses: All DLCs, Legendary difficulty, when a skill reaches lvl 100, you can make it legendary and regain all perk points spent in that skill. I overall recommend skyrim for anyone who likes RPG adventure games or just likes Bethesda games.
destroyalldreamers;-;Game is okay. Would not recommend purchasing.
AfnanDestroyerOfWorlds;-;This makes call of duty look like a flash game
xodius80;-;this game is boring.
jubjub;-;Can we all just ignore this buying mods things please. The ony reason that paying was invented was so that people would work becuse if they didn't get anything out of it they wouldn't work, but modders does this for free so there's no need to pay for it. So to all modders, please don't make us pay for mods, and to all PC gamers, please don't ever buy mods becaue of you don't people won't make us pay for mods.
Sparktacus;-;I will pay for DLC content which adds alot to the game but to pay $5 for 1 simple change to the game?. I love this game and I love the modding community, but I don't support paying for mods.
left click only & never 1v1;-;If there is any game that proves studios do not need to release a relatively bug free, massive content filled game while still being overwhelmingly successful, TESV: Skyrim is it. However, Bethesda owes their success and high ratings to the kind and good willed people who "fixed" / modified Skyrim for nothing in return. And what does Bethesda do to reward these people? They endorse a laughable cash farm/paid mods system where they are doing nothing and taking the biggest cut. The only reason why this 4 year old game is still relevant and talked about today is because of the content modders created and fixed. Yes, paid mod system on Steam Workshop has been removed but Bethesda has left a burning scar on the attractive modding community with their actions. I have no doubt they would try and take advantage of their greatest undeserved asset again which is why I can't thumbs up this product. What I think of the game itself (without mods): GOOD - graphics/visuals are good (for its time), I like the combat, talent tree is nice, sprint bar! BAD - short quest lines (especially for guilds), dialogue/story writing doesn't live up to previous Elder Scrolls, dragon combat seems corny to me, not as many caves/dungeons as TESIV About the whole paid mods situation: -I'm not against someone making money for the things they create (^I've bought several early access games, this isn't even necessary to say^) -I'm not against giving my money to someone for the things they create -I have DONATED money to modder/server owners in the past -I am against Steam Workshop turning into a micro transaction nightmare -I am against STUDIOS making money on mods that "fix" a game -I am against STUDIOS having even less incentive than they do now to make an outstanding game because they would be able to sit on a cash farm known as paid mods
Opeth;-;Just helping others protest. Nothing to see here.
giantmagma;-;Simple the best game i've ever played.
dark magnetism;-;Thank you for hearing us out.
asmcint;-;I've had this game for less than a week and already have 63.4 hours on record. If that isn't a sign I love it, I don't know what is. Between the amazing combat, beautiful scenery, engaging storyline, and general feeling of badassery this game gives you, there's nothing not to love. That said, if you have a girlfriend, wife, or other person you live with and care deeply for, weigh your options carefully, as this game will suck away an unhealthy chunk of your life.
404Data;-;Mods are free again, all good for now ^_^.
Nightwing;-;Reverse your negative reviews! Paid Steam Workshop mods are being removed and this great game deserves an "Overwhelmingly Positive" rating once more! :)
VenoM;-;It's potentially one of the best games ever made, but you already know that and are probably just on this page for amusing jokes. 10/10 needs more dragons
stealth;-;people call you dragonborn. people worship chicken more than dragons. /10
Mordekai [Rocco Siffredi <3];-;I was dissapointed by Bethesdas latest Elder Scrolls. But the community of modders made this a really fun game. I recommend everyone to by the game used or from another site than steam, and using http://www.nexusmods.com/ for modding.
nonya0992;-;This game is OK without mods. This game is amazing WITH mods. It shows that the people will get what they want, even if they have to program it themselves. What Steam doesnt realize is they just killed this game. Mods are by people for people. There is nothing wrong with modders asking for compensation for their time and effort, but it needs to be propotional and unofficial. By Steam making it official then they take on a lot of the responsibility from the modders. What happens when one of my paid mods interacts negatively with another paid mod? Who will give me a refund? Steam? The modder? Now Steam has the liability of refunds and this could become a class action suit if there was a modder that took advantage of the system. I am officialy boycotting Steam untill this is redacted. I urge everyone else to do the same. Thank you for your time.
unca_laguna;-;A key advantage of PC gaming over consoles is FREE modding, which often outdoes paid DLC. "Well, lets fix that" says Valve and Bethesda, as they reveal that their plan for the Steam Workshop is really to make it into a paid service. Do not support this crap.
Questionmarkman;-;you Valve. You deserve all the contempt that is getting thrown at you for this.
El Grande Cajones;-;$30 for a red sword.
Raventuna;-;Meh, could be better, could be worse. Combat is pretty bad, feels like I am playing Minecraft with a HD texture
callmebeardo;-;having the option to pay for mod that complete cr*p
<hik> Dopefish;-;Suck D*cks Valve and Bethesda!!!
Eesollet;-;Never made a review before. I enjoyed skyrim as much as anyone else. Mods were of course the biggest factor, as with most bethesda games. This new thing with paid mods is just ridiculous though. It's an unnecessary paywall that will only hurt the mod community as a whole. The whole point of mods was free, user created content to help expand the game. What Valve wants to do though is literally make user created dlc and I don't think anyone wants that.
edjohnston7;-;Nice work Steam! This will not end well for you.
Kira;-;I had not played Pokemon games before--I was under the wrong impression that they were just for children and then there was a lot of media attention on Fire Red and Leaf Green--I was going on a long trip so I got Fire Red. It takes a lot of memorization skills to play Pokemon games WELL so adults can enjoy these games, in my opinion. For those who haven't played before, Pokemon are actually VERY intricate and there are different TYPES of Pokemon so you have to remember their abilities and what types can easily beat other types and you switch Pokemon in battle depending on their strengths and abilities. Of course the graphics on this game are very, very good. What I liked best was the ability to get ingame help and for some reason it just really tickles me to see the little hand pick up my Pokemon and move them to or from the storage boxes. I also like the fact that when I turn the game on it rehashes the last few things I did before stopping gameplay last time. This is really good for me because I don't get to play everyday and if too much time goes by, I do forget my last "moves". I also have Pokemon Crystal for GBC and, I think it is a little easier...so if you'd like to try Pokemon, maybe that is a better game to learn first...Both have been very fun and entertaining for this adult gamer. Gotta catch 'em all...
Sublime Leader;-;It pains me to do this after enjoying this game so much, but paying for mods ?! Are you freakin' kidding me ? MODS SHOULD BE FREE
g78;-;The base version of this game was amazing. It had the looks, a great story, tons of items, lots to do but then you start adding mods and it becomes legendary. If you dont own this game idk why, either you are a pleb or you hate RTS games. Buy it now!!!
Corrosive Pendragon;-;I figure since I have enough games to tower over a 6 foot tall man, I should at least give you the one i enjoy the most on my computer. The main reason I love Skyrim on the computer is because there is ALWAYS a way to get new content, without having to wait for Bethesda to spoonfeed it to you. I think that Skyrim is one of the besy RPG style games to date, and its modding community only adds to it. If there is one game I'm not ashamed to say that i own more than 1 copy of, and have dumped well over 700 hours total into, it's Skyrim. It's a game that every story-loving gamer should own, and is a prime example of an open world done right.
Jeman1;-;Probably one of the best games i have played. There is so much to do, and a lot of freedom. add mods from the Nexus and The workshop, this game can last a very long time.
DaemoN QueeN;-;Let me guess, did someone steal your sweet roll? What is it? Dragons? I used to be an adventurer like you, but then I took an arrow to the knee. My cousin is out fighting dragons, and what do I get? Guard duty. Gotta keep my eyes open. Damn dragons could swoop down at any time. Watch the skies, traveler. No lollygaggin'.
Dongerman;-;Soon enough I'll have to pay for this review too.
Arnold Bellomo;-;The game is fine by itself, and I do not mind modders putting a price on their work. But steam taking 75% is too much.
Alexraptor;-;Leave it to big business to take something good and cherished(modding for fun) and then completely pervert and corrupt it.(monetize it)
Hawerz;-;This parody has to end NOW. Bethesda and Vavle greed combined will kill the mods
Thanos;-;One of the main reasons I bought Skyrim was for the mods. I considered the mods to add a lot of extra value to the game. Now they became horse armor DLC and i feel cheated both by bethesda and by valve. It's like going to a restaurant and being told that adding salt to your food is going to cost you 0.99$. I will never buy any product made by Bethesda Software ever again because i feel that they will probably try pull the same dubious measures on their future games as well. It is very sad for me because i grew up playing TES games and now i will have to stop enjoying them because bethesda and steam became greedy and decided to kill the skyrim modding scene.
NecroVoid;-;Pay for mods? Just no, Valve ur turning into a new EA, just NOOOOO! What next, pay per month to play steam games? RIP PC Gaming ;(
D3agl3-Cross- I'm not an Addict;-;Honestly, if you have a console, just buy this game on the console. There isn't a reason now to own it for PC (besides slightly better graphics I suppose) now as you have to pay for mods. MODS for pc games, are really the only reason to buy the PC version of a game, because PC games are "mod-able" and console's are not. Well now that you have to pay for mods, that were previously free just a week ago, most of the fun that was to be had in skyrim on PC is pretty much moot, as the "must have mods" that fix stuff in the game cost actual real live money now. Take a Stand. Do not pay for this BS on the steam workshop. If you want a mod that costs money head on over to nexus, their mods are still free (for now until steam works out a way to tie the "pay" for mods to steam alone) and make sure you tell gabe, that as much as you love steam, and as much as you don't mind paying for stuff you like, you don't agree with paying for mods, that for the last 10 years, have been free, but now they decide they can make cash off it.
coscom20;-;I enjoy this game, but I don't support Valve and Bethesda's move toward paid mods.
Victory Panties!;-;Game is . Thankfully I can mod it good. Oh wait, that costs money. Thank you Valve. Would never buy another game from Bethesda again.
D33DAA;-;Oblivion, but with a less immersive world and story, but better combat and gameplay.
(DLG)ElmirexExtinction;-;Im married to a dragon and he gives me free gold and is my unlimited wight follower that murders people all the time. 10/10
Minalear;-;ANOTHER ANGRY REVIEW IN A SEA OF ANGRY REVIEWS! Paid mods and whatnot.
yearlink;-;fully sick aye
Grufle;-;No, not anymore
Quendorsof;-;Skyrim. It's an Elder Scrolls game, which means you're going to have a huge world to explore again and that really is the main feature of the base game. The combat system, if you want to call it that, is unimpressive and magic feels more limited than it did in previous Elder Scrolls installments and the main storyline is acceptable but not great by any standards. However what Bethesda did do right is the creation of the world all this happens in. Dungeons and ruins are more varied compared to what they were like in Oblivion and the outside world is huge in its own right and allows for days worth of exploration. So despite its flaws I'd strongly recommend this game. There is however a lot of snow. You probably should be looking at an other title if you have a phobia for snow.
The Federal Budgie;-;a paywall for mods is not the way to support mod creators, it is only a way to line the pockets of valve.
CiXe_;-;It's like a patato. A really ing good patato
Meyeteson;-;Paid mods Oh, how the mighty have fallen...
AARDonyx;-;Valve and Bethesda decided to profit off of the modding community, destroying it in the process.
PFC Gomer Pyle;-;Now I have Monophobia.
SquirtyQwerty;-;HOLY CRAP THIS GAME IS A-MAZING. skyrim has to be my favorite game of all time. i have beaten the game with every race and there is abolutely no end to the things you can do in skyrim. Bethesda created a masterpiece that should belong next to the mona lisa. PURE BAD ASSERY
cheapbuster;-;Great game! Hopefully the start of a whole new fantasy series! I can't wait for Skyrim 2!
=(eGO)= TheJollyRoger;-;Not supporting Steam or Bethesda until they completely change their business models. I can certainly survive without Slyrim, as Oblivion, Morrowind, and New Vegas are better games with FREE mods any way. I recommend that you who are reading this review do the same and shop only at GoG, Humble Bundle, and (dare I say it) EA's Origin. Valve needs more competition now. Edit: 4/27/2015 10:03 PM Welp, they finally did a 180 degree reversal with the policy for Skyrim. But in the official press release for this policy change, the official Valve employe who annouced this change implied that they would try again, just not for Skyrim. So no, I'm still not supporting Valve anymore. They are still a monopoly. They are still hypocrites. But what now for Skyrim and Bethesda? Should I now give Skyrim a positive review? No! It's my opinion that Zenimax and Bethesda Softworks (not Beth. Game Studio) still want some form of paid modding and were the main pushers for paid modding in the first place. Remember Horse Armor? Also, I have my beefs with Skyrim itself as a game. People really should play Morrowind, Oblivion, and New Vegas before spending hundred's of hours into this shallow game. I can't go into specifics at the moment, but there are plenty of reviews and videos online addressing concerns that I agree with. View Valve's statement here: https://www.reddit.com/r/pcmasterrace/comments/3434it/paid_mods_in_the_steam_workshop/ 4/28/2015 Bethesda gave their own PR twitst. http://www.bethblog.com/2015/04/27/why-were-trying-paid-skyrim-mods-on-steam/ Look at this particular statement: "Horse Armor gave us a start into something new, and it led to us giving better and better value to our players with DLC like Shivering Isles, Point Lookout, Dragonborn and more." They seriously believe that horse armor has helped not just Oblivion, Elder Scrolls, and Fallout but also the gaming industry as a whole? Horse armor did not "encourage" them to make epansion packs and dlc that were planned and were in development already. If they could without backlash, they would follow the scam-like behaviors of other developers like EA or Paradox when it comes to the most inane DLC's. They said to the effect: "Well mod sales were insignificant anyway. And people who use mods and make mods are very insignificant when comparing to all Skyrim players." Well, if it wasn't that significant, why risk your business and lose potential customers for future games you idiots? They also said that they began discussions and planning for paid mods back in 2012. They will not simply waste 3 years of planning because of this backlash. NO business plans something for such a long time just to do a complete 180 and waste all the wages to people who worked on introducing a new product or service and all the data and knowledge from analyzing the market. This will come back, one way or another. My positive review for Skyrim will not.
Appleorgasm;-;Kill a chicken get chased by the entire village like you're a serial killer. 10/10.
The Skeed;-;First there had been the expansion packs... And there were DLCs... And now there are MODs for sale!  you valve. Make HL3 already.
Jack;-;10/10 - highly recommend post Pay2PlayMod 0/10 - Not recommended with Pay2PlayMod "feature" 11/10 - Pay2PlayMod removed, donation button added(?)
Companion Cube;-;What can I say? Half-finished game that only survived because of modability, which will now be placed behind payment walls. While the decision is a good one for modding in the long term, the consumer is again shafted. I wouldn't recommend the base game Skyrim as anything close to being worth playing, however if you don't mind to keep forking out money for characters, weapons, minor patches, etc then this game might be for you. Was nice while it lasted, though! EDIT: Well, now that the paid mods have been >>temporarily<< put on hold, until they can put more legal bindings on them, I will refrain from changing the review, since it's only a matter of time before it's back. Also the damage has been done: the community is in shambles, modders are leaving and players are still spamming about it. I feel like the modders pulling their free mods is mostly because of the players who attacked the modders, more than the allure of potential profits. The playerbase attacked the wrong targets here, but everything's been done, now we just wait and see where this develops. Third-Party DLC, that the company is actually getting money for and then money from publishing it, is here to stay. There is nothing we can do. I'll miss gaming.
DSCO;-;paid mods, don't buy this game.
MisterWonka@Schubinator;-;This game is being sold out. What makes it so unique and awesome is the modding community and what both Bethesda and Valve are planning on doing here is selling the mods with a 70% margin. This will not only make it way more expensive for the player to mod the game, because priorly you could just download the mods from the modding forums for free, but it will also kill the modding community at the nexus forums. Therefore my review of this game is negative, as it is nothing without its mods.
Fraser;-;dont buy till paid mod issue is sorted.
Avizanski;-;An Epic Adventure probably the most awesome game on steam buy it now if you have a brain it's pure epic
cat snotril;-;10/10 would put half my life in again
Lheyto;-;was about to finally upgrade to legendary and enjoy the huge load of mods i've heard of Thanks Valve war saving me 10 ;) So sorry for all that creative passionate minds, whoms work will now get 'em a little cash but less downloads/recognition/love for the sake of art and grattitude
Fort;-;No doubt one of the best fantasy RPGs that has ever been made. Only a few problems. It's buggy in some places. For example, you often need to manually install a patch to fix the Esbern quest in the main storyline. The game can become very easy once you get full enchanting, alchemy and smithing, which is very easy to do. After that, you must ramp the difficulty up exponentially to feel any challenge. However, this is not to say you shouldn't buy this game. It's still an amazing game with nearly endless replayability, awesome enemies and great execution. Buy it.
Quiquex;-;It was a great game, ruined forever by Valve
GS.cz # Garlin;-;One of best games i ever played. Sometimes a little boring but when you get fireball :D :D ... Woohaaaa. I have to purge this world in fire ! I am happy that i bought it.
DenHus I'll be back the 26th!;-;What are you doing here, buy this already..
thebronywholikesponys;-;This is a good game but I AM NOT PAYING FOR MODS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
DeVi3nT;-;Was a great game, but just cant recommend it with this mod iz. Spend your money on something else. Dont feed into this now evil corperation. Uninstalled this game. 0/10 steam. You screwed this game over.
The Magical Box Of Rustling;-;Brilliant game, especially with the added mod support. Thats how it used to be until they made it so you have to pay for mods. " Pay for mods?, thats a thing?" you might be thinking, well it is now, and that has pretty much ruined this game. ( Sarcastic clapping) Well done bethesda and valve, your worthless idea is gonna get you now where, no ones gonna pay for something that they could have got for free.
Baky;-;All aboard the paid mods hate train!!
Openureyes;-;The game that attempted to single handedly ruin PC modding. I will never again buy a video game with the Bethesda name anywhere near it.
autoshotas newlastdaymmo.com;-;Valve too greedy. 0/10
NoahFlowaah;-;Paid mods? Im out.
Claus;-;paid mods, no thanks.
SubFormal;-;You know why...
EricTheNihilist;-;You used to be cool Bethesda. What happened to you man?
CriBz**;-;I have nothing against paying for a mod but if i do i want to give all the fee to the modder for a great mod not 75% to you money grabbing ers. You make me sick
Hegemon;-;Was an enjoyable game, but it is now involved in a money-making scheme that goes against the spirit of mods. Don't buy this game under any circumstances,
prometheus.mh;-;TES has always been a series that leaned heavily on externally generated content to sell copies. Almost all of us have used at least one mod to make the game better. Many of us use 50, 100, or even more mods. Unfortunately, Bethesda and Valve decided to take the community for a ride and allow mod uploaders to set a paywall for their mods, with Bethesda/Valve splitting 75% of the profits. This is absolutely unacceptable business practice, and I cannot recommend a purchase when the game can cost upwards of $200.00 for content that used to be free.
Nopalun;-;Selling Mods, now, are we? Well,  you, valve. I used to like you.
UnBelieveable;-;One of my favorite games once. A masterpiece ruined by paid mods. It is just a broken game full of bugs and CTDs without mods and unofficial fixes. Not recommended anymore. Helping the modders by robbing them 75% of the share. Nice move Valve and Bethesda. I am Impressed.
tedeybob (mad);-;Just why Valve?
Stug47;-;Although I like this game, mainly for the Emerson and mods not for the game itself. I am all for supporting modders so they can keep making great content but that money should be donated for good work or as pay what you want at least. But making mods a set price is a very worrying precedent in the gaming community, not only will this meat major criticism but will only help create a 2 tier community with piracy and legal issues destroying what is a tight nit community of creatives. And for that reason I have given this game a bad review for what Bethesda have allowed their game to become, the harbinger signalling the death of community modding. GG Steam WP
Ashiataka;-;2014: I remember when I spent 5 days modding Skyrim and never played it 2015: I remember when I spent 50 modding Skyrim and never played it.
OrangeNova;-;Great game. Paid mods are terrible though, game is uninstalled and never being reinstalled until they're gone.
Sondre;-;One of the reasons we struggle with transitioning to digital media, is becuase patent owners such as Apple or Google takes a cut when a newspaper is sold through their stores. The backlash has of course been huge, and slowly we are seeing big tech companies allowing the media to sell their products with tech companies taking a smaller cut. Now Valve comes along and learned nothing. They are taking a 75% cut for every mod they sell for Skyrim, a game only worth playing because of the fantastic mod community. I agree that modders need to pay their rent, but that rent is not getting paid when Valve is taking 75% of the cut. Stay clear folks!
Malibut;-;Crappy game with a small world, bad graphics, terrible voice acting, awful UI, poorly thought out mechanics and a developer that doesn't deserve your money. And now not even mods can fix this mess, thanks to greedy Bethesda and Valve.
StangaXD;-;Have you seen those warriors from Hammerfell? They got paid mods. Paid, mods.
Sams0n55;-;Was good till Valve mest it up with these stupid pay for mods garbage. tag: Pay to Play
Fruit Cake;-;So my previous review mentioned that I can only play this game with mods. That's changed since Valve added paid mods. GabeN is haram, Valve are greedy . To those complaining about the 75% valve takes to fuel Gabe's diabetus; they also take a ing unreasonable amount from each game sold on Steam 30% for each game is stupid, a healthy amount is 25% seeing as Valve literally do ing nothing to get their cut. Furthermore Valve hasn't even ing said anything on the matter, I cannot understand why they think this is a good idea, I would forgive them if they took it down instantly they realised it was a ing autistic idea and then said sorry, but hell nawww they're all like "We ain't gon' say  'bout our  up," Voting Valve for worst company of the year.
skaaates;-;why
parasemic;-;Cancer and cashgrab.
The_Joker;-;The game is fine but Valve and bethesda have gone the way of greed and are now charging money for what should be free content therefor i cannot recommend this game to anyone.
Iaconacoalsaurus;-;Don't buy this mess. Thank you Bethesda and Valve for ruining this great game.
BGC;-;Killing the modding community, one mod at a time
www.twitch.tv/randomgamingultra;-;This is an amazing game and has an extremely active modding scene but recently Valve have started charging for mods. This is not acceptable. Even though this game is amazing do not buy it until these payed mods are removed.
Apex_Phase;-;I love this game and put more hours in than any other game, but this paying for mods thing Valve cooked up is the worst possible idea for many reasons already articulated by others.
Locrin;-;Uninspired
Bouchaille;-;A shallow, if graphically impressive (for its time) game. It will offer a couple hours of fun until you get tired of fighting leveled enemies and finding leveled loot in incredibly bland and uninspired dungeons, which offers no incentives to explore as most said leveled loot is both random and plain bad. You will then wander from places to places looking at the most bland and average "not-medieval-scandinavia" setting there is. The gameplay and engine limitations are designed to be played on last-gen consoles and do not take advantage of such simple things such as a mouse and keyboard, or your hectocore 80gb ram top-of-the-line alienware. Moreover, there is a pletora of bugs that Bethesda simply did not care to fix. Most of its drawbacks can be negated by mods, but now you have to pay for these mods, and the first .75c of each dollars you pay directly fuel Valve monopolistic business practices and Bethesda legendary lazyness. Have fun!
David Duchovny;-;Great game, but I can't endorse it so long as paid mods exist.
potet;-;It\s like skyrim with guns, oh wait... 10/10 -IGN
Ronald McDonald;-;Gabe Newell has gone mad with power. Charging for mods is a shameful practice. Screw you Valve, screw you Bethesda.
ksharma113;-;Paid mods are micro-transactions by another name. Shame on you Valve
WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you keep on doing it. 10/10
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
Avizanski;-;An Epic Adventure probably the most awesome game on steam buy it now if you have a brain it's pure epic
cat snotril;-;10/10 would put half my life in again
Lheyto;-;was about to finally upgrade to legendary and enjoy the huge load of mods i've heard of Thanks Valve war saving me 10 ;) So sorry for all that creative passionate minds, whoms work will now get 'em a little cash but less downloads/recognition/love for the sake of art and grattitude
Fort;-;No doubt one of the best fantasy RPGs that has ever been made. Only a few problems. It's buggy in some places. For example, you often need to manually install a patch to fix the Esbern quest in the main storyline. The game can become very easy once you get full enchanting, alchemy and smithing, which is very easy to do. After that, you must ramp the difficulty up exponentially to feel any challenge. However, this is not to say you shouldn't buy this game. It's still an amazing game with nearly endless replayability, awesome enemies and great execution. Buy it.
Quiquex;-;It was a great game, ruined forever by Valve
GS.cz # Garlin;-;One of best games i ever played. Sometimes a little boring but when you get fireball :D :D ... Woohaaaa. I have to purge this world in fire ! I am happy that i bought it.
DenHus I'll be back the 26th!;-;What are you doing here, buy this already..
thebronywholikesponys;-;This is a good game but I AM NOT PAYING FOR MODS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
DeVi3nT;-;Was a great game, but just cant recommend it with this mod iz. Spend your money on something else. Dont feed into this now evil corperation. Uninstalled this game. 0/10 steam. You screwed this game over.
tackle70;-;Game needs mods to be great. Mods are now microtransactions. Play morrowind or oblivion instead... they're just as good and all their mods are free
Count Grishnackh;-;Don't buy or you'll support corporate greed. They now charge for mods on the workshop. Valve has shown its true face and it looks exactly like EA.
Wolfpaxx;-;Here is a prime example of a great game, turned to crap from Mirco-transactions. Really Valve, really?
Don Jon;-;I'm a review and I find this game offensive, paying for mods and , do you want the keys to my house too gaben?!!
NaCl coins and milk;-;Crashing this community With no survivors
NeonMaster;-;Great game fantasic experience messing around with mods
Hideo Kojima;-;Don't even think about it.
Top Doge;-;Paid mods?? MY PITCHFORK IS READY. ded game
Wreckage Brother;-;Game barely functions as an RPG. Barely functions as an Action game. Buggy as . Paid mods. Don't buy.
Cadian;-;I cant support any game or game company that is going to sell mods. the modding community has always been for free and for fun. I have modded a few games in my day and this just isnt right. And you sau modders get 25% of the sale. WTF IS THAT?!?!?!? valve your being a greedy prick
sforero305;-;Fun game, but the million micro transactions without continued support are something to watch out for
Stijnhero;-;Tried to launch skyrim found out that my subscribed mods needed to be paid for. Wtf.
rvnx;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim - Review $4.99 Buy Now
ebnic;-;Ridiculous idea to charge for mods. I'd gladly donate to modders, but paying money to turn a beautifull comunity into a ridiculous money making scheme and atracting all the greedy people is just unacceptable.
Flattens Airports;-;Paid Mods.
[89thRG] Cake [26thNC_G51];-;Great game and with mods, geez it blows my pants off!!! :D
Soapy Dicks [Liz];-;80% of my game time was trying to find the best boob:butt ratio body mod. The rest was getting my  wrecked by giants.
Swarfly;-;Right about now, N.W.A. court is in full effect Judge Dre presiding In the case of N.W.A. vs. the Police Department; prosecuting attourneys are: MC Ren, Ice Cube, and Eazy-motherin-E [Dr. Dre as The Judge] Order, order, order Ice Cube, take the motherin stand Do you swear to tell the truth, the whole truth and nothin but the truth so help your black ? [Ice Cube as Witness] You god damn right! [Dr. Dre] Well won't you tell everybody what the  you gotta say? [Ice Cube]  the police comin straight from the underground A young a got it bad cause I'm brown And not the other color so police think they have the authority to kill a minority  that , cause I ain't the one for a punk  with a badge and a gun to be beatin on, and thrown in jail We can go toe to toe in the middle of a cell in with me cause I'm a teenager with a little bit of gold and a pager Searchin my car, lookin for the product Thinkin every a is sellin narcotics You'd rather see, me in the pen than me and Lorenzo rollin in a Benz-o Beat a police out of shape and when I'm finished, bring the yellow tape To tape off the scene of the slaughter Still gettin swoll off bread and water I don't know if they  or what Search a a down, and grabbin his nuts And on the other hand, without a gun they can't get none But don't let it be a black and a white one Cause they'll slam ya down to the street top Black police showin out for the white cop Ice Cube will swarm on ANY  in a blue uniform Just cause I'm from, the CPT Ounk police are afraid of me! HUH, a young a on the warpath And when I'm finished, it's gonna be a bloodbath of cops, dyin in L.A. Yo Dre, I got somethin to say [cut and scratched x4] " the police" Example of scene one [Cop] Pull your god damn  over right now [NWA] Aww , now what the  you pullin me over for? [Cop] Cause I feel like it! Just sit your  on the curb and shut the  up [NWA] Man,  this  [Cop] Aight smartass, I'm takin your black  to jail! [Dr. Dre] MC Ren, will you please give your testimony to the jury about this ed up incident? [MC Ren]  the police and Ren said it with authority because the az on the street is a majority A gang, is with whoever I'm steppin and the motherin weapon is kept in a stash box, for the so-called law Wishin Ren was a a that they never saw Lights start flashin behind me But they're scared of a a so they mace me to blind me But that  don't work, I just laugh because it gives em a hint, not to step in my path For police, I'm sayin, " you punk!" Readin my rights and , it's all junk Pullin out a silly club, so you stand with a fake- badge and a gun in your hand But take off the gun so you can see what's up And we'll go at it punk, and I'ma  you up! Make you think I'ma kick your  but drop your gat, and Ren's gonna blast I'm sneaky as  when it comes to crime But I'ma smoke 'em now and not next time Smoke any  that sweats me or any , that threatens me I'm a sniper with a hell of a scope Takin out a cop or two, they can't cope with me The motherin villian that's mad With potential, to get bad as  So I'ma turn it around Put in my clip, yo, and this is the sound [BOOM, BOOM] Yeah, somethin like that but it all depends on the size of the gat Takin out a police, would make my day But a a like Ren don't give a  to say [cut and scratched x4] " the police" [Cop] [knocking on the door] [NWA] Yeah man, what you need? [Cop] Police, open now [NWA] Aww  [Cop] We have a warrant for Eazy-E's arrest [Cop] Get down and put your hands up where I can see 'em (Move , move now!) [NWA] What the  did I do, man what did I do? [Cop] Just shut the  up and get your motherin  on the floor (You heard the man, shut the  up!) [NWA] But I didn't do  [Cop] Man just shut the  up! [Dr. Dre] Eazy-E, won't you step up to the stand and tell the jury how you feel about this ? [Eazy-E] I'm tired of the motherin jackin Sweatin my gang, while I'm chillin in the shack, and shinin the light in my face, and for what? Maybe it's because I kick so much butt I kick  - or maybe cause I blast on a stupid- a when I'm playin with the trigger of any Uzi or an AK Cause the police always got somethin stupid to say They put out my picture with silence Cause my identity by itself causes violence The E with the criminal behavior Yeah, I'm a gangsta, but still I got flavor Without a gun and a badge, what do ya got? A sucker in a uniform waitin to get shot by me, or another a And with a gat it don't matter if he's smaller or bigger (MC Ren: Size ain't , he's from the old school fool) And as you all know, E's here to rule Whenever I'm rollin, keep lookin in the mirror And ears on cue, yo, so I can hear a dumb  with a gun And if I'm rollin off the 8, he'll be the one that I take out, and then get away While I'm drivin off laughin this is what I'll say [cut and scratched x4] " the police" The verdict [Dre] The jury has found you guilty of bein a redneck, white bread, chickenshit  [Cop] But wait, that's a lie! That's a god damn lie! [Dre] Get him out of here! [Cop] I want justice! [Dre] Get him the  out my face! [Cop] I want justice! [Dre] Out, RIGHT NOW! [Cop]  YOU, YOU BLACK MOTHER-ERRRRRRRRRRRRS!  the police! [x3] also  valve for being greedy and adding payments for mods which they get 75% of, how is that supporting the creators? Just make a new game already and cash off that instead of being like ea.
THUNDER999;-;Game is nice, but valve and bethesda have decided to ruin it by hiding mods behind a paywall.
Denk Meams;-;Great game, horrible developers. I have loved Bethesda but making users pay for mods crossed the line.
TheDiesel74;-;When this game first came out it was amazing, and the whole workshop thing was a pretty nice addition. After awhile in the game people made the most random mods that just ruined the game for me. instead of fixing this issue, they thought, "Oh hey you know what we should do to line our pockets more...make the players, (the back bone of our company), to have to pay for the only thing we had free on our game." i feel like they didn't come up with the idea to help the artists, they did it to help themselves, so they can afford the payments on their solid gold house and diamond infused car. so my honest opinion is that you should change it back the way it was and offer jobs to the artist to work for you. So relating to the game itself is amazing, and if you get it then i wouldn't touch the mods until they fix the colossal screw up they created with the workshop.
ulf.collin;-;The greedy decision to take the result of a thriving modding community and turn it into a micropayment rip-off feast is disgusting! The game is good, but this shortsighted decision will kill it off the reason to play it any more...
growbeetski;-;paid mods are ridiculous. I just redownloaded skyrim on my new computer and I can't get back any of the awesome mods I once used. the community was huge and thriving even without money being involved, but as always some money-grubbing POS at the top decided they could squeeze more money from the game. The same game whose popularity has continued so long BECAUSE OF THE FREE MODS. any money they make off of this scheme will benefit them far less than a game that stands the test of time. WAY TO GO
wdb-wookie1;-;Truly EPIC!!! Wide Open play! Phenomenal graphical environment! No path restrictions. You can play any type of character you want. You can mix up the styles you want as well. You can be a Worrier, a Thief, a Mage, or any combination of them. Prefer to fight from a distance, like a sniper, you have bows with archery perks (not to mention mods that can enhance that sort of play). Want to be a mage? How about a sword mage? Perhaps a mystical thief? Or, a thief that can stand toe to toe with your enemies, if need be. The potential of this game appears to be limitless. More quests and plots than you can easily count, and thats with the base game and the official DLCs. If those arent enough, Download and install a new mod. Want a new house, or mansion, or how about a cavern hideout. Would you like a Treehouse for a home? Or, a is a ship as your home more to your taste? Not enough challenges and quests for you? Get mods that make the game more difficult, or add new areas to explore and concur. Want to improve the graphics? You can do that. Want to add new NPCs? You can do that. Want to change the way the armor, or weapons look? You can do that too. With all the free mods out there, you can build your own game, giving this game nearly UNLIMITED POTENTIAL! Your imagination is the only limit youll find in this game!
Acerpacer;-;Valve get your  together and stop lining gabens pockets with 100 dollar bills, paid modding is such a stupid desicsion, especially with how the mod developers only gets 25 procent of the sale, how is that supporting them, thats nothing. 0/10
Puzzled Cheeze | trade.tf;-;Paying for mods? Yeah, no thanks.
YouKnowIt'sKrieg;-;EVERYONE TRANFER TO NEXUS MODS!!!! THEY"RE STILL FREE!!!!!
Gue'vesa;-;Hell no, Paid Mods HELL ING NO!. WTF are you trying Valve, you're already swimming in the dollars, Why try to  up community? To hell you morons. Capitalist pigs... And even more they adversite like ''Support modding'' then why the hell modders take %25 of the sale money? Just add a ''Donation'' button than
BrickermanPalooza;-;Having no social life has never been more fun!
duckman;-;Draugr, Draugr, more draugr. The game has a terrible lacking variety in what you face, you quickly learn to expect that oh, wow, here comes a draugr.
thatschris;-;The game is good when you have mods installed. Unfortunatley steam and bethesda want money for the mods, its all good in supporting the modderators but they only get 25% of the cut so... If you really want to support the modderators go to Nexus Mod (they have mods for many other games too) and donate, plus all their mods are free :)
Rock;-;>paying for mods This is the future you chose.
Pleb;-;"Look we're already milking customers dry for money, why not began taxing people for mods, which have been free for decades!" "Great idea! everyone will love it when the best part of their game is now costing them $5 each." "New ways to support developers my , IF THE MOD MAKERS WANTED MONEY THEY WOULD HAVE ASKED FOR IT, AND THEY DEFINETLY WOULD NOT ASK FOR 25% OF IT! its monopolizing on something that has never before been monopolized on! And without mods lets face it, the graphics are crap and the game is bland, mods are what was making this game live longer. already an ENB is a pay mod. That's one less graphical enhancer out there. It is really sad because some of my favourite mods that are amazing now are pay to use. I don't think I will touch this game again until the pay for mods is out of here, I'm disapointed because if any developer decides to do this, your mod will be taken out of your game without notice and youll have to pay some odd 4 bucks for it. I think the word valve needs to learn is "DLC".
Scummit1G #Road2MG;-;this game the addons cost money  you gaben
Smitty Werbenjagermanjensen;-;Paid mods are a load of
camlea;-;Skyrim overall is a ok game. There is good and bad. One of the main selling points to me has always been the massive modding community. Recent decisions have been made (Basically trying to turn the free thing into micro-transactions). I think this is a very poor choice and will have a widespread negative impact of what has been one of if not the biggest advantages to many of bethisida's game releases such as the elder scrolls series and fallout. Setting aside that those who make the mods (a process that can take countless hours) will only get 25% for what is primarily their creation. This attempt to monitise what has typically been absent of cost is a step in a direction that worries me greatly. It has all manner of issues (many mods are group efforts or use resources created to other modders for free, if you charge for a mod with things you do not own in it, what happens?). Over all I suspect this payed mods is going to stir up all manner of resentment, feuding, theft, plagiarism and hatred. I fear that this will have a toxic effect on the community and kill the goose that lays the golden egg (aka we had a good thing where nice people made stuff for the game, now there all gonna fight and no one will make good stuff any more).
Echo Truth;-;Don't support garbage policies. Game is 10/10. Valve and Bethesda paid mods -10/10.
JBarn;-;Mods should no go from being free for years to suddenly being put up for sale.
Mindless;-;Paid mods. I'm waiting to see how this turns out, but it might mean moving to the next big game delivery platform.
FireStarter;-;TESV is Dead.
Grumm;-;The only reason this game is still kicking is because of the modders. They spent alot of time fixing bugs that Bethesda refused to. The modification community of the game was a strong one with a deep passion for the Elder Scrolls. Money has thoroughly corrupted it thanks to Valve (Steam) and Bethesda with the implimintation of paying for mods. You can expect to spend a lot of money buying mods that make the game run as it was supposed to. You can also expect to purchase mods that are stolen from someone elses work. You can also expect to buy mods that will break the game or not function correctly, and you will not get a refund as steam will keep your money in a "steam wallet." For example one of the cornerstones of several mods involves a script extender. A certain program many people run on their pc will cause it not to work. This will in turn cause the mod you bought not to work. Again this game is incredibly buggy without modification, and it isn't right that you should have to do several microtransactions to get it there. On a side note, Bethesda makes a ludicrous profit off of the modders' work, work that Bethesda should have been doing in the first place when they released the game.
KilrBe3;-;Much as I love Skyrim, I can no longer support a Publisher/Dev who put mods behind a Paywall and split and cause fights within Modding community. No longer can support those who don't know what Modding is, and it's meaning. Therefore I have to say NO do NOT BUY THIS, TILL THEY CHANGE THEIR STANCE! Vote with your wallet and mind! Long live The Nexus for FREE MODS! Shame on you BethSoft/Zenimax, Learn your lesson.
MrYotsuya;-;Rge core mechanics of this game are awesome. I will not downplay that, however I cannot support this pay for Mod move when essentially mods have kept skyrim relevant for all these years. I played it on 360 then Migrated to PC just for mods.....and now this development has me smh. Valve and Bethesda, this was a very ill advised move.
Pirate Batman;-;Pay for extra cheese wheel DLC only 2.50
jaredjeya;-;Valve is greedy. When you hear the phrase 75:25 split of revenue for modders, you would assume that means the modders are getting 75%. Nope, Valve is only giving these modders 25% after spending weeks making this product, and pocketing the rest. Then, there's the issue of support. What if the mod breaks a week down the line after an update and the dev refuses to fix it? He/She has your money so why do they care? Plus, people are stealing free mods and rehosting them and profiting off them. Valve has also given unclear advice about whether mod dependencies are okay. When done in the correct way, this could be a great way to support modders. Allow modders to make the minimum price 0, so it's free + donation, give them at least 70% of revenue like Apple's App Store and make clear the copyright rules clear. And don't push steam towards microtransaction HELL.
HELLO IM CIA;-;mfw bethesda and steam singlehandedly kill the elder scrolls series by introducing paid mods
Rock_Hard_Brock;-;Paid mods are going to ruin this game. And drive people away from Steam. GG.
Reeddick;-;I hate video games.
Valas115;-;The CK is garbage. Papyrus' favorite thing to do is ctd. I use two mod organizers, tes5edit and wrye smash to get my load orders to work. To get animations in and out of skyrim I have to use 3 programs. The only work they're putting in to helping modding is taking a cut.
nomadss1;-;They turned modding into DLC that dollar you to death. I thought for a moment I was at Origin but to my horror I was at steam. What a dildoe move steam I will not be playing this anymore.
FArgHalfnr;-;There is no way I can support those who killed the modding community. Especially ironic considering that bethesda had always used mods as a selling point. Valve is also as much to blame as them. I hope that this cancer of an idea can be contained before it spreads to the rest of the industry. I just hope that they will both be remembered as those who ruined one of the last thing that made pc gaming worthwhile.
White Onion;-;Recently, Bethesda and Valve have decided that they want to corrupt and destroy the very community that makes skyrim a game worth playing. Both of these companies have lost my business because they have shown themselves to be utterly  and immoral in their desire for money. Hopefully this policy will be retracted soon.
Luftwaffles;-;Pay for mods? It's the only thing that keeps this game alive.
Bomber;-;Over the years it was a great game, but the developer changed to something worse than EA. Don't buy anything from Bethesda, they don't deserve your hard earned money.
Retrobabygamer;-;killed a chicken got wanted by every region gg
What2eat;-;The heretics who introduced paid mods shall burn.
[HT] Trollttorney;-;I have put in nearly 1,100 hours onto this game. 90% of that is thanks to a robust modding community that has provided endless patches, content, and quality of life game improvements. All of this means that I should realistically give this a positive review, but with the latest debacle over paid modding, I am revoking my endorsement. This whole thing is utterly shameful and Bethesda and Valve are wiping out any goodwill they've accumulated over the years.
garcialo;-;I've been playing the Skyrim Beta over the free weekend. Once they've fixed all the bugs, it should be really fun. I can't wait until this game is released!
kon is luv kon is lyfe;-;Game: 10/10 Paid Mods 0/10
SirLawl;-;Valve has taken steps to put mods behind a paywall. Most of this is understandable; however *75 PERCENT* of the profits go to Valve, for doing little to no work in the process. Regardless of what Valve gets out of it, from what I have seen almost all mods in the paid section are STOLEN. A  move, I believe, by both the perpatrators, and Valve, for allowing this to continue unmoderated. Noone wins except Valve. The workshop was already insurperior to the Skyrim Modding Nexus, now it's a no-brainer decision. Skyrim Workshop is now a meaningless thing, nothing but a nuisance with nothing unique of value to offer.
Cool345729;-;I love this game dearly, as I have had it for years and I have loved it modded or not! I've modded the absolute hell out of it and honestly, It isnt that hard with all the help from the modders and of course "mod organizer". If your deciding whether or not to buy this game or not, go with the sweetroll, trust me... always the sweetroll.
NimVind;-;It's been an awesome ride, but what really made this game a diamond in the rough was the help from people polishing the game in the form of mods. It's the mods that have kept the game alive this long, not valve nor bethesda... Thumbs down to the greedy s... "We are doing this for the modders" pfft yeah right.
Phaze;-;The recent addition of paid mods has been a huge blow to Skyrim's enjoyability and longevity. Modders have kept this game alive for many many years, and now it's only a matter of time before the best mods are locked behind paywalls and microtransactions. The worst part is that Steam/Bethesda are taking the lions share of the profits... SEVENT FIVE PERCENT! Vote with your wallet, stay away from any paid mods.
wow nick where did you find it;-;The Workshop is a place to share creations to increase the longevity of Skyrim, in essence putting price tags on user created content is killing the community, there is average of about 20 hours of content that you can burn through without mods, now I've got to pay! I have upwards of 300 mods on my game, are you gonna charge 300 for it! Valve has simply become an exploitive corporation whose priorities lie in the vault! 11/10 for the game though - thanks nexus x
Dr.Nick;-;I used to like, now I don't and you all know why.
Chomp;-;Mod-gate. Elder Scrolls games are only good because of mods.
Gwynbleidd715;-;I cannot, in good concious, support a company that is attempting to nickle and dime their once passionate fanbase via the practice of paid mods. I'm all for supporting modders who work on large scale mods (such as Skywind), but not like this Bethesda and Valve. Not like this.
|SC| Rooster.;-;In West Steamadelphia, born and raised, on this game spent most of my days, when a couple of , made a huge flop. starting charging mods in my workshop. I got in one little game and my wallet got scared, it said you're moving to Nexus where your money can be spared.
Marru;-;Awesome game, a little buggy but that'll be ironed out soon. Mod kit coming, so expect infinite replayability in the future :) Edit: I no longer recommend this game on the fact that it endorses paid for mods, with 75% profit ratio to the companies that own it. An example of one of the various problems is posted below (by Anonymous): This is an oft-overlooked implication. What happens when developers start making mods in their free time after a game goes gold? They have a leg up on everyone else in that they're intimate with the systems before the game even launches. Given the toxic, vile nature of the industry, chances are developers and publishers will even "encourage" their employees to do this. Encourage, in this context, means cut employees who don't. While I doubt any dev/publisher aside from the already caustic, obviously anti-consumer ones will purposefully gimp their game to make a profit on mods, it really does have some serious, negative implications for industry employees.
cpthiner;-;Valve can shove these mods up their .
Youmanity;-;A game with lot of similair content and it gets boring pretty fast. And when it gets boring you add a mod....right? Mods which make most dissapointing productions from the bigger game companies worthwhile regardless of their steep price...right? Well think again because you r gonna be paying for ech and every mod you donwload. If its up to Valve/bethesda you will from now on: First buy a bad half finished game for ca 50-60 euro's Second pay for ca 8 DlC another 50-60 euro's And than....you add fanmade content for free cause its already expensive enough..right...RIGHT??--> Nope....you are gonna pay for Fanmade content to, starting with Skyrim. Which often does not alter gameplay at all. Who knows what this will add up to. My advice: modDB. Superiour mods for free.
Jadow;-;Valve, Bethesda why? please stop this modding stupidity.
Air;-;I do enjoy it, but some aspects recently added I am not very pleased with.
ITSAPOLARBEAR;-;First ever review for me on steam, and to be honest I probably would never have made even this if Steam and Bethesda hadn't ed up so bad. Game is alright and with some mods even great, but I don't want to support their decision to implement paid mods. It's a straight forward "f*** you" to us customers. I would like to take that "f*** you" and say it to you, Steam and Bethesda.
Deepshit;-;Haven't got enough money to buy AK-47 wielding naked Harry Potter.. Uninstalled, undownloaded, unsubbed, unbought, unwatched, unlogged, unregistered, unplayed, unlived..
Seraphim;-;We are witnessing a great game and a great community die. Was fun while it lasted.
assassinrat;-;I'll start out by saying that I've enjoyed Skyrim. With the vibrant modding community, a game that on its own is an interesting, but very buggy and somewhat tedious affair has become an extremely enjoyable experience. All due to the efforts over the years by many people. However, with Valve now allowing others to sell mods, and even mods that have been free and downright /necessary/ for an enjoyable experience, such as SkyUI, I can no longer recommend this game to others. Even at the current discount price, buying this game now would support this atrocious move by Valve. Do not support the sale of mods by buying this game, and do not buy paid mods.
PsyCheR;-;You were the chosen one Gaben.
Placeholder;-;Bethesda and Valve have started chargin money for mods. Within two days this is already killing the modding community. Despite community outcries Valve changes nothing.
SnowLured;-;Devs and Steam sold us out with this paid mod garbage. This WAS the game to buy for epic modding possibilities, which is why it is still played so much years later. That has changed, and the REAL cost for a PLAYABLE copy of Skyrim isn't $20, after all the texture packs and add ons from the modding 'community' you're looking at a price tag of around $100. Pass on this, or prepare to crack open your wallet perpetually.
Ownzer99;-;If it was good it no longer is due to paid mods.  volvo and bejewsda for working together on this and their  jewing. The only reasonable way anyone is going to take them seriously is if they remove paid mods in general.
TenderTator;-;This is by far one of the best games I have EVER played, Its $20 right now but I honestly think its worth alot more.
Pleb;-;"Look we're already milking customers dry for money, why not began taxing people for mods, which have been free for decades!" "Great idea! everyone will love it when the best part of their game is now costing them $5 each." "New ways to support developers my , IF THE MOD MAKERS WANTED MONEY THEY WOULD HAVE ASKED FOR IT, AND THEY DEFINETLY WOULD NOT ASK FOR 25% OF IT! its monopolizing on something that has never before been monopolized on! And without mods lets face it, the graphics are crap and the game is bland, mods are what was making this game live longer. already an ENB is a pay mod. That's one less graphical enhancer out there. It is really sad because some of my favourite mods that are amazing now are pay to use. I don't think I will touch this game again until the pay for mods is out of here, I'm disapointed because if any developer decides to do this, your mod will be taken out of your game without notice and youll have to pay some odd 4 bucks for it. I think the word valve needs to learn is "DLC".
Scummit1G #Road2MG;-;this game the addons cost money  you gaben
Smitty Werbenjagermanjensen;-;Paid mods are a load of
camlea;-;Skyrim overall is a ok game. There is good and bad. One of the main selling points to me has always been the massive modding community. Recent decisions have been made (Basically trying to turn the free thing into micro-transactions). I think this is a very poor choice and will have a widespread negative impact of what has been one of if not the biggest advantages to many of bethisida's game releases such as the elder scrolls series and fallout. Setting aside that those who make the mods (a process that can take countless hours) will only get 25% for what is primarily their creation. This attempt to monitise what has typically been absent of cost is a step in a direction that worries me greatly. It has all manner of issues (many mods are group efforts or use resources created to other modders for free, if you charge for a mod with things you do not own in it, what happens?). Over all I suspect this payed mods is going to stir up all manner of resentment, feuding, theft, plagiarism and hatred. I fear that this will have a toxic effect on the community and kill the goose that lays the golden egg (aka we had a good thing where nice people made stuff for the game, now there all gonna fight and no one will make good stuff any more).
Echo Truth;-;Don't support garbage policies. Game is 10/10. Valve and Bethesda paid mods -10/10.
JBarn;-;Mods should no go from being free for years to suddenly being put up for sale.
Mindless;-;Paid mods. I'm waiting to see how this turns out, but it might mean moving to the next big game delivery platform.
FireStarter;-;TESV is Dead.
Grumm;-;The only reason this game is still kicking is because of the modders. They spent alot of time fixing bugs that Bethesda refused to. The modification community of the game was a strong one with a deep passion for the Elder Scrolls. Money has thoroughly corrupted it thanks to Valve (Steam) and Bethesda with the implimintation of paying for mods. You can expect to spend a lot of money buying mods that make the game run as it was supposed to. You can also expect to purchase mods that are stolen from someone elses work. You can also expect to buy mods that will break the game or not function correctly, and you will not get a refund as steam will keep your money in a "steam wallet." For example one of the cornerstones of several mods involves a script extender. A certain program many people run on their pc will cause it not to work. This will in turn cause the mod you bought not to work. Again this game is incredibly buggy without modification, and it isn't right that you should have to do several microtransactions to get it there. On a side note, Bethesda makes a ludicrous profit off of the modders' work, work that Bethesda should have been doing in the first place when they released the game.
Bttle Snil;-;Oh boy, I get to pay for half- mods and  cash grabs now! Bethesda is cashing in on people making content and I sure as hell don't support that.
Spike the Cowboy;-;DLC is ruining the industry. I don't make enough money in life to afford something that used to be free.
BallisticQuesadilla;-;Paid mods are ridiculous. This sets a dangerous precedent for the future of steam. Mods are by nature experimental, which makes them unstable. Customers are going to be paying for random crashes to desktop. You can make them as perfect as possible, but there is always going to be at least some issues. And judging by the amount of garbage that makes it through greenlight, you can be sure that a similar amount of trash quality mods are going to be put onto the steam paid workshop page. The game itself is amazing though.
linkaleq;-;What the  Valve seriously trying to make MORE money on content that should be free because: A) It is user created. and B) People buy the game on PC FOR THE MODS.They don't buy it so they could have the game. A good percentage of people have the console versions but switch in order to play Skyrim with a whole new feel but with out the incorporation of big business. You guys were champions of user created content and now look what you did you ruined it so you could make money. Well guess what you will make money but I hope that enough people see through this facade and you make nothing.
emkop;-;Negative review due to Valve introducing paid mods in the way that they have.
A#FeCOP;-;A DRM makes something that was previously free Cost money, ruining a community. Today is the day Mod Piracy becomes a thing. My suggestion Join the Crew you Landlubbers!
LemanJuu;-;no paying for mods
arjitj2;-;Bethesda, monetizing mods and keeping 75% of the revenue has to be the most outrageous thing I've heard surrounding your company. Congratulations, your user review rating has fallen from 98% to 92%. I hope you're happy with this.
Awkward Araragi -;-;I don't review that many games on Steam. But I will not be giving this game a thumbs up. With Valve and Bethesda looking to make some serious dough under the guise of "helping content creators," we now have a bit of segregation in the modding scene. Modders who list their mods as paid are only seeing 25% of the money despite doing 90% of the work. We also have stolen mods that are free from their original source being posted as paid mods for some quick cash. Worse are some modders adding nag screens to the previous free version bugging players to pay for the mod. I am personally okay with modders making some money off their work, much like I'm in favor of YouTubers making money. But if any YouTuber were to paywall their channel, they'd be shafted because it disturbs the ecosystem so much. Modders, you should consider asking for donations instead, and not let Valve and Bethesda rob you of those contributions. It's very much like how YouTubers use Patreon and other services to help pay for the time and effort put into their work. Make that the standard, and I'm sure people will gladly toss some change your way. But paywalling your content, and worse, nagging people about why they haven't paid for the new version yet, is really low and tacky. This is more of an ethics review than a review of the actual game, I know, since I don't have much playtime on the PC version. But since it is a decision that was endorsed by the developer, I think it belongs here.
rangerdanger81;-;I love this game, but I can not reccomend it to anyone else for purchase. That goes for any other Bethesda product, past, present, or future. I will never pay for player mods, and I will never support mod authors or corporations who ask me to do so.
Dylan;-;This game is truly amazing. However, these paid mods are a step in the wrong direction. They are atrocious.
DSJesterXII;-;So... Skyrim is a decent game. Not amazing. In fact, it's my least favourite of the TES games so far, considering how much of the game mechanices form the past have ben stripped form the game... But, that's not why I'm writing this. I'm writing this, because allowing the sale of mods is... ludacris. I have always been firmly against paying money for digital content that does nothing to improve the game, and I hold that stance in this matter. I feel that this is a huge mistake on Valve's part and a cheap delusion on the part of the authors.
Ewell;-;Mods have been free since the concept was first invented, I'm disgusted that Valve would do this.
DarkScorp;-;Paid mods for a game that's so old? Really Bethesda? Make some content yourself and don't leech of modders!
Smokey da Burrr;-;Is it aparent yet that paid mods was a stupid idea? The game is good, it always will be, Bethesda made it excellent. Then they gave us the tools to make it even better. Soon, modders who know they can make money stop posting to nexus. Then what? It's all over. Valve is just EA with a darker GUI.
Virginia;-;This is a great game with hours upon hours of almost endless fun. The game is also great for mods that add loads more hours to the game and you get way more out of fun out of it with lore friendly to just plain funny mods. Only bad thing really I can think of is at this moment in time you may have to pay for some mods which I say although mods are great they are mods not DLC and shouldn't be paid for. I do also however hate the idea of DLC as well unless it is something different and new to the game not just taken out then charged for later on to get and play. But over all this is a review of Skyrim and I would recommend buying the game even if its just for its normal play though no mods or DLC.
Excalibur (On Vacation);-;Guards of a castle told me not to go into the abandoned wing because it was haunted. Went anyways. Ended up being forced to help the daedric prince of madness and got a hipbone as a reward for freeing him to ravage the world. 10/10 Would help Pelagius again
Solarstrike;-;A monumental and obligatory slap in the face to all RPG's ever conceived. Skyrim is an outstanding achievement in game design, concept, and atmosphere. A harrowing journey across lands filled with no limits of imagination; a story foretold which is The Elder Scrolls. Magic, weaponry, and combat await in a new world to discover. Stories to be heard, quests to be conquered. and Dragon's to kill. No game can match this world, this time, this era which lives in Skyrim. With a large modding community, the game can only get better.
Spunkey Doodle;-;100% of paid mod profits should go to mod creators. Either that or no paid mods.
Goxon-der-Erste;-;pay2win in a dumb version. lol
TG sunset;-;Pay for mods!
Chaotic Lightning;-;This game is fine, really, but paying for mods? No thank you.
Relik;-;One of my favourite games destroyed by greed :(
Tuttle;-;Bethesda's abuse of modding makes me not want to support them
Vystas;-;Given that there has been a movement issued in from Valve (the distributor of Skyrim on this platform) and Bethesda (the developer) to attempt to monotonize on community modding that has made the Elder Scrolls games so popular, I cannot in good faith recommend this game for those looking for something with huge replayability value.
schrodinger4126;-;i been playing skyrim for years and it is my favorite game but because of bethesda's an valve monetizing modding comunity im voting negative
SPYderman;-;Pay $20 for good review Mod
Photon Titan;-;Skyrim... Could have been so much better, it's an average game... I feel Oblivion could've just had another expansion... It's not that great to be and elder scrolls game. Limited by obvious console diseases, some which can't be modded away. It's ridiculous that you need mods to have a game feel more complete, I finished this without mods. I can say that I am disappointed. Also with this new, pay for mod crap that just came out? Wow.. Just no. Play Gothic or something.. Or keep to Oblivion or Morrowind even... Better games.
Freadz0r;-;paying for mods is ridiculous.
Three Week Scrawny;-;I love this game. Skyrim is a great game but that being said I'm going to have to give a thumbs down. Skyrim use to be a great game thanks to the modding community. Thanks to Steam and Bethesda this games modding community has fringed which made this game 100x better than vanilla.
Skitzafit;-;Paid Mods... Do not support this new "feature."
alexmonthy;-;I used to love this game, but then I took a paid mod to the knee.
j0hnny2shoes;-;Will not ever buy a mod
Mike Tyson GOAT;-;ugh don't support paid mods. very disappointing
Shred;-;Prepare for free mods to become nagware.
biscuits;-;introducing paid mods was a terrible idea. just have a donate button where 100% of income or a high percentage goes to the developer.
Danny;-;Used to be a great game until paid mods came along
Darvius;-;No Valve. Paid mods are wrong. You don't have enough quality control to put mods for money. I hope it doesn't kill the community for 25% for modders...
worf65;-;Great game but taking away the mods and making them pay to download ruins it. If you don't believe in paid mods please don't give them your business, don't buy this game. You can debate weather or not the modders should be paid all day but taking away something many of us got for free and demanding payment for it is not right. If you really felt this was a necessary next step it should have waited for the next game at release and not interrupted what has been doing so well for so long.
Deadmeat553;-;Paid mods. Screw you Bethesda. Screw you Valve.
MB | Ghost;-;>implying anyone uses the workshop anyway kek
ChairmanMao;-;amazing, immersize game with plenty of content for you to explore. Slay dragons and follow the path of being the destined dragonborn or forget the prophecy and murder dozens of innocents. Choices are plenty and with the memmorable cast of characters, vanilla skyrim is a delight easliy lasting over 80 ours of true, immersize, gameplay. With mods, skyrim itself immerse you further into the lore or completley disregard it. Mods are very crucial to me and my experience, so if you get this game, then make sure to download mods from the workshop or nexus. good for: RPG fans, elderscroll fans, fallout fans, gamers who want and immersive story. Beware, like all bethesda games, glitches and crashes are common. 9.5/10
Oh Carbine;-;Abolsutley brilliant game. And never get bored with all the workshop items
CerealTwerk;-;Bethesda has had a long tradition of working hard through their development cycle to make sure that bugs are not fixed. It wouldn't even surprise me if Todd himself works overtime during the last few weeks to add more bugs in with how many one can find in not only Skyrim, but all Bethesda games. Not to mention Bethesda's tradition of removing features from each TES game. Remember spears and the multiple amounts of weapon and armour types such as short blade, long blade, blunt, unarmoured, light armour, medium armour, heavy armour, etc., in Morrowind? Remember how many of those were merged together or outright removed for Oblivion? Do you know how many are missing from Skyrim? Are you a grandfather that remembers that even Morrwind couldn't handle everything from Daggerfall? Fortunately, Bethesda leaves these games pretty wide open, and tons of modding communities sprouted up to not only fix all of Bethesda's lazy, half  attempts to release an unfinished game, but add in new content to add limitless hours of replayability. It's pretty bad when Bethesda's official patches don't do much aside from fixing FEW of the game breaking bugs and leaving everything else, and consumers have to rely on The Unofficial Morrwind/Oblivion/Skyrim patch to fix thousands (literally) of bugs that take only a few lines of code to fix. But I digress. As of April 24, 2015, the dream is dead. Valve and Bethesda have partnered to offer paid mods through the Steam Workshop, with little to no regulation at all, all while reaping a massive 75% of the profit, leaving mod creators with a measly 25%. While in the past, massive free overhauls such as Falskaar, the Unofficial Oblivion/Morrowind/Skyrim Patchs, the highly detailed armour sets, impressive new weapons, entirely new races could be found on many modding websites such as The Nexus with Bethesda's blessing, it appears that is no longer the case. For the low low price of your soul and dignity, you can get a bunch of cheap looking weapons from Dota 2 that don't even look like their Dota 2 counterparts, a HEV suit from Half Life 2 that absolutely fits into the culture and lore of Skyrim, and a Fishing Animation mod that's already been removed from the workshop because the mod creator hasn't been happy about how this whole debacle has been handled, but hey, it's not like fishing animiations should have been in the base game anyways right :^) Don't let this continue. Don't support  devs who can't release a finished game, then eat up their overpriced, paid mods that were made by community members that are offered for free on the Nexus. Bethesda has already done this once before with paid horse armour DLC for Oblivion. It was stupid then, it's even more  backwards now.
Hanz;-;Workshop needs to remove paid mods. Ruins the modding community, and the spirit of what modding is all about. Will change once this is fixed.
Derekrussell95;-;Charging for mods? The way the gaming industry is going is horrible. There will be nothing left worth buying in the future. All the games will go to the way of Paid DLC, which will end up being "The full game can be yours with Three easy payments for $30" since you have to buy multiple DLC to get a full game now.
Famous New Age Healer;-;This was a great game with a vibrant moding comunity, sadly do the the institution of a pay wall for mods, its unlikely to continue being the great game it once was due to the loss of its moding comunity.
Abby Ratso Lee;-;There are currently mods that cost more than the game itself. If paid mods continue, I will not buy Elder Scrolls VI, I don't care how wacky it is.
josh;-;Bethesda is greedy. Support the Modders by cutting out your massive royalties. Until they change to receiving less than the modder, I cannot support this game or company any more. No longer a good buy.
surfguy24;-;It was good before but now we need to pay for mods. I really dont like it. What the gullible i-d-i-o-t-s who are in favor - or neutral - towards this toxic practice completely miss, is that teleologically speaking there is a certain objectivity to what ends up being beneficial to everyone in the long run and what doesn't. This objectivity (of what is good and what is bad) is correlated with ETHICS and that is what ensued this incurring torm. The people who say that this practice is legitimate are the same who won't mind loads of DLC, cut-content, on-disc DLC, season passes, micro-transactions, early access and the like. Please, do notice that all the previous examples have one thing in common: To detach you further away from your hard-earned money in exchange for an ever lesser service. Paid mods will result in legal conundrums of epic proportions since most DLC infringes on various IP copyrights at the same time, and with publishers meddling in a world previously untouched by corporate lawyers and legalese experts, WE THE GAMERS, in due time, will see our mods reduce in quality, variety and spectrum. In due time, Modders will also be substituted: From being enthusiastic fans who want to introduce new content to the games, to being money hungry s from poor countries who want a quick buck selling tasteless re-skins. These new modders will  themselves out to corporate interests in exchange for a meager 25%. Yet again publishers win and WE lose. This new practice is completely outrageous, no matter how one looks at it. The idea of paid mods is also against the spirit of entrepreneurship, voluntarism, and capitalism. It symbolizes the ascension of monetarism, and the commoditization of every single aspect of content creation.
Roelath;-;Paying for mods? No thanks. I enjoyed my decade long time of a thriving community effort for content and I'd see it continue before the continuation of the DLC era extends to player created content. Rating the game a negative for this change.
CommieBastard;-;want your good review? there's a 5$ mod for that
Bryan;-;Bad business practices should not be rewarded.
Bryan;-;Bad business practices should not be rewarded.
Scout's Boston Creampies;-;"There goes the modding scene" Wat have you done Valbe. Stahp. Pls. R.I.P. Oh and btw you can eat my shorts Valvthesda.
Hachiman;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve. People can and should support mod creators via donations, and a 'Buy me a coffee!' button on the workshop page would be good, but putting them behind a pay wall is god damn atrocious. Hoping Valve and other responsible parties for this new practice will turn around.
Director of Pwnge;-;I spent a ton of money building a rig that could support a modded Skyrim, I don't want to pay for mods that used to be free.
Gundam;-;Not impressed with the new paid mods.
Astaritobril;-;This was a great game. I really enjoyed it. Community is really what makes an Elder Scrolls game and now that feeling is just, well, lost. Hopefully all this settles before Fallout 4, because I will not buy that game if I also have to purchase mods.
SLAG [DUKERS];-;The game is great, paid mods are stupid. Wouldn't recommend for that reason.
Aqul;-;Money grubbing on a 4 year old game? No thank you. As many hours as I have enjoyed Skyrim I can no longer play this game and enjoy myself seeing how far the platform and developer are willing to go to mees with the one thing that KEPT this game (and so many other buggy games) alive and still highly played well after their release cycle. With the new paid mods, so many efforts of the community which was fine with NO help from the dev or platform have been  down the drain. Skyrim is filled with bugs and some areas even unplayable without the use of mods. When a dev just leaves bug fixes to the community then trys to monetize that same community's hard work for their own game (75% of the cut really?) is it just disgusting. I will be moving all of my business to other websites and direct to the developers. Bethesda and Valve you had a good run but I really detest unherhandded business practices and blatant betrayal of the community. I will vote with my wallet until paid mods are fully removed. P.S. that "AMA" was so pandering and full of coporate double speak it wasn't even funny.
Havoc2061;-;Protest review
Krunkjuice34;-;Paid mods huh? Way to go Steam. We ing hate you.
Goldstein @topkeks;-;everything. You know all what this is about.
Blacknaught;-;Good game, mods made this game great. Bethesda and Valve decided to cash grab and paywall what made this game great. Don't buy it.
Zerfette;-;Yes, I recomend this game this game to anyone who likes a good story (stories) but also to anyone who likes to do whatever they please. Currently have 130 hours total spend into this game with more than 50 of the achievements; an addicting game over-all in my opinion. Because of this game I hae recently bought Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion to further continue the story (backwards). I recomend this game to any who wish to play a game involving levels, skill points and dragons (yes, dragons).
blughsadjsgjads;-;reddit told me to be upset about paid mods
Mayhem;-;This game honestly is barely passable stock. Tedious gameplay, horrible UI, bugs everywhere, some quests outright broken, etc. With mods, it can be a great game, but that can be a risk as well, since you will likely spend more time modding the game to make everything work together well, and even then you may run into issues further along in your gameplay which mean you're screwed. And that was fine for most, until paid mods through workshop became a thing. Paid mods, that have no QA, no support, and on top of that it looks like Steam has disabled comments/reviews for the paid mods. So you now have no way of knowing which mods are actually good, which may break your game (irreversibly is possible), which mods suck, which are copyright infringements, etc. Bethesda has long relied on the modding community to fix their games, and now that they make the lion's share of the profits from the mods, they have no incentive to improve their games, which means I will likely not be buying anymore Bethesda games. Too bad. I don't mind spending hours getting all my mods working together, working with TES5edit, wryebash, mod manager, screwing with load lists, install orders. But paying for the privilege of doing all that? I don't think so. If I'm going to pay for mods, they need to just work, just like DLC does.
Dustin Jayce Dickens;-;Gabe Newell approves of this game
Hadaka Shitsuji;-;You need to pay for mods now. Don't bother with this game.
zerosameri;-;The paywall for the mods ruins the game. Mods is what makes Skyrim.
Red;-;GABEN HAS BETRAYED ME.. THESE MODS, THE MONEY, THIS GAME IS DEAD TO ME.
david06;-;Paid mods? Heresy most dark and foul!
Devrionde;-;Absolutely sick of what the gaming world is turning into. Paid mods? On PC? Ugh. What was once usually passion projects or people simply tinkering around with a game they enjoy is now becoming yet another money grab by Steam. Whilst I certainly support modders being credited and rewarded for their efforts, in such a way as set prices seems downright wrong to me. What we have here is the modding equivalent of Oblivion Horse Amour. If such a system exists, it should be a donation only system and not a straight up marketplace.
MVP;-;While the game is still good, I can no longer recommend it to anyone because of the paid mods feature.
DougyM;-;A dangerous precedent has been set by Valve, Bethesda and those modders who choose to go pay to play, sadly the last Bethesda game i will be buying unless monetized mods are removed.
Mr Blade;-;I only have a little over an hour. This game doesn't grab me and I wouldn't play more if it weren't for the mods. Mods was one of the best parts of this. Paid mods? More like ugh.
Howdy;-;come on steam. you ed up
Beefalicious;-;Paid mods? Fail.
Stamos;-;Vanilla Skyrim: 7/10 Skyrim with mods: 11/10 Skyrim with paid mods: 0/10
JakeM;-;0/10 for intoducing paid mods.
Death Is Upon US;-;>:[ Why valve? why?
Sandor Clegane;-;I've played a lot of Skyrim. Here are some highlights; Paid mods Paid mods Paid mods *SPOILERS* Paid mods Being able to still have fun with a 4 year-old game. 1/10. Don't buy this or any of the "Mods" *cough* DLC *cough*
Ricochame;-;After a very long time of playing Skyrim, I have decided my verdict. Although it took a long time to come to terms with my self-deception, I believe I can finally give The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim an unbiased review. The gameplay of Skyrim is largely based on the Action-RPG genre, similar to the previous installment Oblivion, but different from Morrowind. You can choose to see the world through either the third or first person. Through that decision you use weapons that you can upgrade, but also grow in strength through your character's skill level (that is increased by your continued use of the type of weapon) to kill everything considered hostile without a second's thought. Item and gold management is largely useless at higher difficulties and is fairly pointless at lower ones as well. Potions can be spammed in combat by pausing the game world to access your inventory. Gold buys nothing you can't loot from the corpses you laid out on your journey towards wherever you happened to be going at that time. Using the smith skill, you can get all the best items for your level exactly when they are available and most times before even that. Dungeons are just a sequence of rooms with enemies in them that you have to kill to get to the end. After that you just take a conveniently stupid shortcut right back to the entrance. There is generally nothing unique about any of them. Just a single track to follow from the entrance to the end like something out of WoW. You can become the guild leader of all the guilds in a single playthrough after just a single questline each. Most of the quests are so boring and uninteresting that they just stay in your quest journal for the rest of time because you can't be bothered to complete them. The one's that are interesting are over in a half hour to an hour. The writing is stunted by lack of imagination, the world is horribly vanilla for a TES game (less so than Oblivion thankfully) populated with generic vikings, romans, and evil nazis. The main questline can be largely abandoned for the more interesting side-quests (and often is), and the implementations of dragons and dragon shouts becomes boring after killing a hundred or so. The skills system is also uninspired. I imagine it started with the idea that your skills improve the more you use them. This is true, to an extent. However, the fact that they still incorporated a leveling system along side the use-based skills becomes frustrating. They blended their new system with the old one and it becomes counterintuitive. Leveling up, you are given the choice of upgrading your health, magica, or stamina and you are given one point to put into whatever skill you choose. While the original stats system may be hard to grasp by newcomers to the series, the continued casualization of the series just feels like a betrayal to the crowd that helped build it. All of the things I have mentioned are all symptoms of Bethedsa reaching out to a wider audience. Just like they did with Oblivion. I do not agree with this practice. This is not to say Skyrim is a bad game. Just not the game it could have been.
Gapho;-;Why pay for this game, pay for its DLC AND pay for its mods? Because you're a shill.
zombiejonsnow;-;Great game, poor choice in trying to monetize mods
bprinny;-;Charging for mods is about the greediest thing you can do, and changes what was once done out of love and a desire to make something better into a cashgrab. All you had to do was implement a tip jar, Valve. That's all you had to do.
Dank Hill;-;Paid mods have ruined the game. It is something that should never have happened, and no one should continue to pay Bethesda for what they have done.
SCJ;-;So long as Valve are pushing paid mods for the game, I cannot give it a positive review.
Reformer;-;Thumbs down. You all know why.
floppnsnock;-;negative reviewing becuase of the money grab and community killing decision to take 75% of income away from mod creators.
DrMarianus;-;Monetizing mods for the majority profit of the dev is not cool in my book.
[!?] Archon;-;I simply cannot recommend a game with paid user created content
Dantae;-;I dislike the pay for mods. Making money off of modders is a joke
PurpleTangent;-;I disagree with piad modding. You are destorying the PC gaming community.
jmeds33;-;great game but i wouldnt have payed for mods...
storantVO;-;Valve introduced paid workshop mods for Skyrim, as a result changing my review to negative. You don't get to charge people for mods and try to sell them as dlc, Valve.
JeffyCZ;-;You can purchase this review for only 3,74, of those 2,8 goes to Valve.
Sovereign Individual;-;Paying For Mods? Valve and Bethesda is Crashing this game with no Survivors.
Spooky Action O.o;-;FUS ROH DAH all of the chickens. Put buckets on heads. Linear caves. Sell dragon bones. Download mods. break Quests. Uninstall mods. Break more quests. Visit limbo. Undo hours of progress. Spawn NPCS. Visit space.
Tanaboon;-;Adding paid mods takes away the essence of what made the game so great.
3rdEyeDeuteranopia;-;The game is not optomized for PCs, particularly with the User Interface. Bethesda making money off mods that fix issues that were created because they did not make the effort to make this game better for PCs is terrible.
KhevaKins;-;Paying for mods? No thanks.
chenyeric;-;This game is borderline unplayable without the mods. Now that mods are paid without any level of quality assurance, I don't see how I would play this game.
[XF]Clader;-;534 hours and counting Still haven't finished the game
_FaT_MaN_;-;BATHESDA: ITS IN THE GAME...wait a second......
Sad Drake...;-;Now that mods are monetized with no quality control or gurantee, would not recommend. Will not be buying future Bethesda products if they continue this trend. Vanilla was buggy and 6/10 at best.
Lt. Martin [47th AB];-;Putting in my two cents about the EA tier money grabbing.
RexAnglorum;-;Skyrim belongs to the mods.
Tentrek;-;Absolutely disgraceful. This is how I would describe how Valve and Bethesda are acting, and how much this decision to do paid mods has destroyed the community for this game.
The Shropshire Slasher;-;I can't in good conscience support what Steam is attempting to do with the Workshop. In principle, I think modders should have some means of being compensated for the work they do...but in practice, I'm extremely concerned with the way they attempted to implement this. I urge Valve to reconsider this course of action.
Hotjimmies;-;Needs a crapload of mods to work. Oh and the mods also might conflict with eachother resulting in more crap. Unpolished, buggy as hell, simplistic boring smash buttons combat system, shallow empty world,  tier quests compared to Oblivion.
SG. Allaria Striker;-;Paid mods have made this game all for the worse. Sad to see things go this way.
G2H_Hellbringer;-;I'm forced to pay for mods now? Why not give me the option to donate? Back to nexus.
SL1;-;Skyrim is a good game no doubt about it and the various mods that have been made for close to 4 years now are a testimony of that . Modding is about sharing and bulding a strong community , it's about passion for gaming , hiding mods behind a paywall will divide us . These types of practice are unforgivable and trying to bleed people dry will only justify pirating. Valve and Bethesda have open the pandora box and Skyrim is the first nail in the coffin of PC Gaming .
Dr. Strangelove;-;Do not support paid mods.
*O.B.C* Barry Burton;-;Morrowind was better Oblivion was better Skyrim was always a little "off" but alot of people made it better with mods, and I've heard that's down the drain now so oh well.
RipplingAdonis89;-;I love this game but paying for mods is BS!! put in a optional donation button!! not happy stEAm!!!
Inquisitor Zer;-;Would love to say that everyone should play this game, but because of paid mods, I'm changing my review to negative. Valve should not be hiding community made features behind a paywall. Why not just add a donate button to mod's pages? Because by putting them behind a paywall Valve can take money from the money paid from the mods. This is a shameful display of greed from Valve.
BurnedNuggets;-;Nope
AlpacaLips;-;I cannot in good conscience recommend a game when it is the flagship for an unreasonable expansion in DLC policy. Regardless of the quality of the game itself, its incorporation in the new scheme of paid modding is sufficient in my eyes to receive a negative review.
TheRedHand;-;Terrible policy of allowing mods to become paid. Clearly just trying to suck every last bit of profit from this game to support the millstone that is ESo.
zerosameri;-;The paywall for the mods ruins the game. Mods is what makes Skyrim.
Red;-;GABEN HAS BETRAYED ME.. THESE MODS, THE MONEY, THIS GAME IS DEAD TO ME.
david06;-;Paid mods? Heresy most dark and foul!
Devrionde;-;Absolutely sick of what the gaming world is turning into. Paid mods? On PC? Ugh. What was once usually passion projects or people simply tinkering around with a game they enjoy is now becoming yet another money grab by Steam. Whilst I certainly support modders being credited and rewarded for their efforts, in such a way as set prices seems downright wrong to me. What we have here is the modding equivalent of Oblivion Horse Amour. If such a system exists, it should be a donation only system and not a straight up marketplace.
MVP;-;While the game is still good, I can no longer recommend it to anyone because of the paid mods feature.
DougyM;-;A dangerous precedent has been set by Valve, Bethesda and those modders who choose to go pay to play, sadly the last Bethesda game i will be buying unless monetized mods are removed.
Mr Blade;-;I only have a little over an hour. This game doesn't grab me and I wouldn't play more if it weren't for the mods. Mods was one of the best parts of this. Paid mods? More like ugh.
Howdy;-;come on steam. you ed up
Stamos;-;Vanilla Skyrim: 7/10 Skyrim with mods: 11/10 Skyrim with paid mods: 0/10
JakeM;-;0/10 for intoducing paid mods.
Death Is Upon US;-;>:[ Why valve? why?
Sandor Clegane;-;I've played a lot of Skyrim. Here are some highlights; Paid mods Paid mods Paid mods *SPOILERS* Paid mods Being able to still have fun with a 4 year-old game. 1/10. Don't buy this or any of the "Mods" *cough* DLC *cough*
Ricochame;-;After a very long time of playing Skyrim, I have decided my verdict. Although it took a long time to come to terms with my self-deception, I believe I can finally give The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim an unbiased review. The gameplay of Skyrim is largely based on the Action-RPG genre, similar to the previous installment Oblivion, but different from Morrowind. You can choose to see the world through either the third or first person. Through that decision you use weapons that you can upgrade, but also grow in strength through your character's skill level (that is increased by your continued use of the type of weapon) to kill everything considered hostile without a second's thought. Item and gold management is largely useless at higher difficulties and is fairly pointless at lower ones as well. Potions can be spammed in combat by pausing the game world to access your inventory. Gold buys nothing you can't loot from the corpses you laid out on your journey towards wherever you happened to be going at that time. Using the smith skill, you can get all the best items for your level exactly when they are available and most times before even that. Dungeons are just a sequence of rooms with enemies in them that you have to kill to get to the end. After that you just take a conveniently stupid shortcut right back to the entrance. There is generally nothing unique about any of them. Just a single track to follow from the entrance to the end like something out of WoW. You can become the guild leader of all the guilds in a single playthrough after just a single questline each. Most of the quests are so boring and uninteresting that they just stay in your quest journal for the rest of time because you can't be bothered to complete them. The one's that are interesting are over in a half hour to an hour. The writing is stunted by lack of imagination, the world is horribly vanilla for a TES game (less so than Oblivion thankfully) populated with generic vikings, romans, and evil nazis. The main questline can be largely abandoned for the more interesting side-quests (and often is), and the implementations of dragons and dragon shouts becomes boring after killing a hundred or so. The skills system is also uninspired. I imagine it started with the idea that your skills improve the more you use them. This is true, to an extent. However, the fact that they still incorporated a leveling system along side the use-based skills becomes frustrating. They blended their new system with the old one and it becomes counterintuitive. Leveling up, you are given the choice of upgrading your health, magica, or stamina and you are given one point to put into whatever skill you choose. While the original stats system may be hard to grasp by newcomers to the series, the continued casualization of the series just feels like a betrayal to the crowd that helped build it. All of the things I have mentioned are all symptoms of Bethedsa reaching out to a wider audience. Just like they did with Oblivion. I do not agree with this practice. This is not to say Skyrim is a bad game. Just not the game it could have been.
Gapho;-;Why pay for this game, pay for its DLC AND pay for its mods? Because you're a shill.
zombiejonsnow;-;Great game, poor choice in trying to monetize mods
bprinny;-;Charging for mods is about the greediest thing you can do, and changes what was once done out of love and a desire to make something better into a cashgrab. All you had to do was implement a tip jar, Valve. That's all you had to do.
Dank Hill;-;Paid mods have ruined the game. It is something that should never have happened, and no one should continue to pay Bethesda for what they have done.
SCJ;-;So long as Valve are pushing paid mods for the game, I cannot give it a positive review.
Shibo;-;Don't buy this game until Valve removes this atrocious pay for mod  where they steal 75% of the profits.
RJinthematrix;-;Bethesda's cut for a 4 year old game they no longer support - 45% Valve hosts the files - 30% The modder that put all the work in, fixes Beth's bugs, makes original models/textures/etc - 25% Do you see a problem here? Don't buy - donate.
FlameAble;-;Another great game ruined by greed.
Rinso_de;-;Changing my review of the game to negative. I am not against the idea of supporting modders for their efforts but the newly introduced system on the workshop is deeply flawed, e.g. using other modders resources and charging for them, stealing content and outragous prices (base game for 5, starter pack of mods for 26)and taking a 75% cut between bethesda and valve for work they didn't do themselves. I recommend everyone to go to the nexus and support content you like through their donation system
Sproutmask;-;A gorgeous open world game, steeped in its own mythology, with sharp, tactile melee combat and satisfying archery (I've never got on with magic in Elder Scrolls games, but that's purely personal preference). Both the graphics and art design are great, making simply wandering around immersive. You can ignore the main questline if you wish - it's a so-so "you are the chosen one save us all" fantasy affair - which is not a problem as there is so much else to do. Personally I tend towards wandering and enjoying the harsh, wintry vistas that seem to be around every other corner, occasionally stumbling into a long-forgotten dungeon to explore and loot. When the novelty wears off and you start to see through the smoke and mirrors (simplistic NPC's and AI, small and underpopulated towns and villages, there's a multiplicity of mods for the game that do everything from expanding and populating the land, creating more realistic weather, improving textures, adding quests and characters (often fully voiced)... well, you see the point, it's an Elder Scrolls game, and it's the mods that are the big draw for a lot of players. And here's the rub. I'm not against donating to modders - these folk put their heart and soul into making games different, better, more varied, even fixing bugs... but the payment model being tested on Skyrim by Valve and Bethesda is both grossly unfair to the modders who receive only a 25% cut with the rest being pure profit for the companies, and has already led to some horribly perverse outcomes, with one paid mod taken down already for using others' assets without permission, and DMCA claims against another. Numerous mods have vanished from the Nexus website as modders pull their work for fear it will be stolen. Meanwhile it's very likely that the mod store will fill with dross put out to make a quick buck, and it is very unclear exactly what and with whom we as consumers are transacting, and hence what our rights are. What happens if a mod works as intended but is abandoned? Much like greenlight, the community is not going to be able to effectively police quality - the flood of rubbish into the Steam store recently is testament to this. Now it seems likely that modding, currently a wonderful and integral part of PC gaming, is going the same way for the sake of a quick buck. There's better ways to do this, so why can't modders, players, devs and Valve work it out, rather than have yet another ill-thought-through scheme forced on us?
Kradev;-;The game itself is great and the modding is fantastic, but now we have to put up with paid mods from Valve so I'm giving a thumbdown just for this. As if the Steam Workshop isn't  enough.... Serious, fire whoever the  give this idea a green light.
Taz 13;-;Pay for gamebraking  mods with no support.
White-T;-;You were the chosen one! You were supposed to stop the s Not join them
Chamdar;-;Skyrim Vanilla is at best a 5/10. The default UI is awful and there are thousands of bugs. This is not an exaggeration, the Vanilla game requires a lot of mods to be enjoyable. Skyrim With Free Mods is 10/10. The modders have fixed the game for the developers. They have done it out of love for the game. They have used free resources and free collaboration to make this happen. Skyrim With Paid Mods is 1/10. Now the developers wants the customers to pay them play a game that is not broken. Greedy modders now uses a paywall even though their mod was created in a system that shared information and resources with each other. These modders should be ashamed of themselves but money > shame.
Winjer;-;Beware of a game that rips of gamers and modders, for the profit of Bethesda and Steam.
Fung;-;Skryim is a good game, but what made it great was the mods. The decision made by Bethesda and Valve to monetize on mods I feel demolishes the great community created by the modders, had there been a tip jar with a better split of the money between the modders and Bethesda/Valve it would have been different. This just stinks of greed, so for now I recommend looking elsewhere for a great experience.
ha_de_ian;-;just to downvote paid mod
kirby;-;i punched a chicken and murdered a bunch of priests, mom ARE YOU PROUD OF ME?
Miss Stunshine;-;At this point, if you do not have Skyrim, I don't think there is any help for you. It's a game that needs to be owned by every Steam user, XBOX/Play Station player, and be in the dreams of every small child yet to have a gaming system. That's just the way it is, so buy this game - and don't cheap out - BUY THE LEGENDARY EDITION or you ain't nothing.
jason13;-;love this game theres no word to say .its just amazing the world is so huge. and endless thing to do 10/10 thumps up
Angry Spastic;-;"What's the best thing about Skyrim ?" "Its free mods" "Let's make not-free-anymore !" "Brilliant" -Some brilliant employees
kylling ct er venner ik fjender;-;vanilla skyrim: 6.5/10 skyrim with mods: 11/10 skyrim with paid mods -1/10
Ruiner;-;Paid mods will ruin gaming. Do not buy.
BOT Elliot;-;How to  off the internet: 1) Make people pay money for mods. 2) Give an outrageously small amount of the money to the actual makers of the mod. How to fix this situation: Make a very simple pay-what-you-want system that starts at 0, ZERO.
Fader;-;Had to sell my house so i could pay for all my mods
Trailqul;-;The vanilla, unmodded game of Skyrim, at its core, is mediocre at best. The mods and the modding community have made this game what it is, SO many years after release. The entire pay-to-use mod structure has ruined the game and the wonderful modding communities that had once collaborated without money in mind. Getting this game now is a MISTAKE. You will regret it. You will end up paying DOZENS times more for mods than the game itself costs. Don't support this horrendous, greedy system and don't buy this game.
PrimaxLite;-;This game is near perfect if you wish to ignore the "paid-mod" issue. However, I like many passionate gamers disagree with introduction of paid mods. What if free mods become ad-infested spyware like mobile apps tend to be? What if publisher decides to ban free mods in favor of paid mods? What if a mod you buy continually crashes your game? What if a mod you buy is incompatible with another paid or free mod? What if a paid mod developer decides to abandon a mod, leaving you with an incompatible broken mess? Too many "what ifs" to ignore.
ELiTech;-;This game has been kept alive with mods, these mods are the only reason I still play. Hiding mods behind a paywall is a horrible idea. The amount of money people would have to spend (and sometimes waste) only to have things not work, it's not worth it. Mods are part of the community not the market (I guess they are now one in the same).
Hipicleas;-;Was a great game until greed and avarice came in to the picture. Sad day for gamers everywhere.
moomoo;-;Bethesda relies on community modders for bug free experience. Now that they also want money for something that they should have been doing themselves at the first place, I can't recommend this game any longer.
Hassler;-;It's a great game, but I won't support paid mods.
SonnoMaku;-;It was fun for a bit but then it got boring. I decided to get some mods to spice up the game but upon further inspection they cost money which is complete . I don't know who thought it would be a good idea to sell mods for money but I would fire them, rehire them then fire them again. What a dirtbag. ~0/10 I would never recommend this trash to someone unless the paid mods cease to exist. GG Valve and Bethesda.
Sazen;-;Get rid of paid mods
[FLOT] SWAGxCode;-;NO...NO.NO.NONONO NONONONONONONO!NO!NO!NO!NO!NO!NO!!NO!!NO!!NO!!NO!!!!!!NO!!!!!!!!!!!! you can read the other 3 parts of my review for $1.99ea
Maze;-;I've always modded the  out of skyrim and the decision to take money for mods, i dont like to play it anymore
I voted for Io Arcana;-;Now that Valve is charging people for mods, nothing about the PC version is better. Go buy your ps3/xbox360 hard copy and enjoy the sh*tty vanilla version if you'd like. At least it won't be locked behind DRM.
Aeres;-;Thanks for payed mods
MorningSaint;-;Mods are now behind a paywall with only 25% going to the actual makers.Adding a donation button would be much more beneficial.
wheelbearo;-;Fantastic game, from what I thought was a fantastic studio. I'm not sure who is pulling the financial strings, but I am really disappointed in both Bethesda and Valve for trying to muscle their way into a community built by users, for users, and which functions solely on merit. Now it is turning into just another money-grab. Shame.
raiden2x;-;Skyrim without mods: 3/10 Skyrim with mods: 10/10
DSPhat;-;As a mod developer (albeit not for Skyrim) myself, this whole paywall BS is ridiculous. It has resulted in thousands of mods from Nexus being ripped off and put behind pay-walls by people who haven't even installed the mod. Now there will be people who do (for some god forsaken reason) pay for their mods, and they will now demand support for mods, as- well, mods break each other for at least one reason or another. Well done Valve, you've finally broken the camel's back. Greenlight? Terrible. Early Access? Well, let's not even bother with that. Maybe now PC gamers will see that the monopoly of Steam over PC gaming is not the best thing since sliced bread (and god damnit sliced bread is amazing), and will look into more ways of playing their games. Good work Valve. Good ing work.
Danny;-;G ING G VOLVO and BADTHESDA trying to make mods as DLC 2.0. Horse armors were the beginning of the end and here we are now...
EctoEntomologist;-;The world is changed. I feel it in the water. I feel it in the earth. I smell it in the air. Much that once was, is lost, for none now live who remember it.
M1CH437;-;Introducing paid mods? No thank you.
Bourbon_Cowboy;-;First Review I've ever done. Skyrim with mods: 11/10 Vanilla Skyrim: 5/10 Skyrim with mods you have to purchase: 0/10 would never play again. Hope you are happy Valve. I cannot recommend this game in good conscience.
The Necrodancer;-;I like to make mods as a hobby, simple ones that people can use for free. Adding Monetized mods are BS and you know it, Gabe. I won't be buying anything from steam until paid mods are taken off of the steam workshop and we get an apology.
KonstiPation;-;Valve really needs to get their  together, fix their customer support and first consult their player base/customers about these types of changes.
Flezhwing;-;Paying for mods and valve is taking 75%. Nice
Thumbtack Jake;-;It is a decent game (Still not nearly as good as Morrowind, you can check out my review for that if you're interested in my thoughts on it) at best. Without mods its a bland-looking, bug-ridden, click-spam combat hack and slash game. The story is mediocre and the "dumbing down" of the series shows. If you get it cheap ($5-$15 with all the DLC) then yeah it's worth it. I however bought it at launch, which I sorely regret doing. However! With mods, the game is certainly much better. From graphics, to gamepay, it's just all around better. But I am not reviewing Skyrim Modded, I'm reviewing Vanilla Skyrim, so I'll have to stick to my negative review.
Shafty McGlisten;-;Around the time I graduated high school, I found this great game called Morrowind. The story was engrossing, the world immersive - and, as I soon came to discover, the game was heavily moddable. This meant that even though I had already played through a good portion of this game and was soon to finish, I could replay it and have a very different experience. And I did. SO MUCH. I even created my own underground lair with the editor. It was amazing. Needless to say, mods and the modding community really set the scene for Bethesda's TES series and has been a major driver behind its wild popularity. Fast forward to Skyrim. I no longer have the time to sink into creating my own material these days, but I still run a little over 100 mods. These mods breathe a life into the game well beyond its vanilla experience such that I've sunk over 600 hours into play time. Would I have done this if all of these mods cost me a couple dollars each? Would I be so smitten with the series still even after all these years? Hell no. Like most folks out there, I am not made of money. I live on a budget. I am not going to pay two hundred, three hundred, four hundred dollars for a video game. I will donate to the community when I can - A community that has done very well for itself without this hairbrained forced mods-4-cash scheme so far, mind you - and I appreciate all the time and effort the modders have put into their work. Bethesda/Valve don't really seem to appreciate this effort quite so much, with their 75% cut off the back of folks who are breathing life into their games and keeping sales going for FAR longer than they would have if the games were locked to modders. In light of recent events and the hollow words of Gabe Newell on his Reddit AMA which seem to point to a continued mods fer' sale on Steam existence - I would not recommend Skyrim or the Elder Scrolls series going forward.
Simulacrum;-;Don\t charge the community to fix the game for you, plz.
Agonosvos.cz;-;Please consider donating to those creators of your favorite mods who declared all their mods will always be free. Those are the ones that deserve it. But do it in a way that gives them the majority, or even all of the money that you send.
NONOPUST;-;Game is alright with mods, but now with Bethesda and Valve's decision to monetize mods, I cannot recommend this game. Greed at its finest.
Ptolemy;-;Was once an shining example for what mods can do for a game.
Superior leader;-;A game about the Dragonborn in his quest to save the world from the end of the world. + Many questlines + Many quests + Interesting main story + Big map + Customisable + Offers the biggest amount of mods on Nexus & Steamworkshop + Interactive + Nice landscape + Offers great roleplaying opportunities + Classes + Great skill tree - First game to start with paid mods.
Sivalen;-;It's a good game but the new practice of selling mods is being handled without any form of consideration for the consumer, and as such I feel the overall quality of the game is going to suffer for this. Think about these mods in terms of quality, forget about the fact they've been made by an outside entity; you're essentially paying for early access DLC that might not even be compatible with other early access DLC. There's no form of quality assurance whatsoever, Valve have a no refund policy, and I'm not even sure what the legality of the situation is in regards to ESRB ratings. If you want to buy the game or any of the official DLC, go ahead, but stay away from the modding content with a price tag until there's some form of quality assurance.
Vicke;-;High definition horse genitalia, 99.99 USD! Man, i love this game.
dariussparkes669;-;It's quite apparent that the purchasing of mods is an unethical abomination.
Mistmane;-;Skyrim is a excellent game, if it was me it be awarded for the most mod friendly game yet to be released. RPG, free-roam, customization and good by default as well. It has a giant mod community with dedicated modders and endless content, you can make content aswell. When the game can get updated it will get pretty much timeless it's what I call one of the important aspects of a game that will stay and be remembered. Eventually it will become a classic.
Sperglord;-;You can run around in a fantasy world with dragons and stuff without pants. 10/10
[dr0id] Jamie;-;As much as I get wanting to support the mod devs, that's what the donate button was for, 75% of revenue to valve is not supporting the devs.
Dakota Ikiru;-;I loved this game until I had to pay for something that was normally free. Mods.
Eisenfell;-;Game is Good Payable mods not , not supporting moneygrubbing for no work of the company.
Sokami Mashibe;-;Paid mods ruins the game, and it ruins the modding community!
Yakitori;-;The accomplice to the crime of corruption is frequently our own indifference.
Woodkind;-;Stupid greedy  .....
mason_clark_source;-;No. If you support this paid mods , then disregard this.
varg;-;This was a  console port when it first arrived on the pc. Years of modding made it excellent. I will be happy to change my review of this game to good if Valve and Bethesda buy my 'inexplicably high ratings while screwing your customers and fans' mod, which by amazing coincidence is the same price as refunding me all 259 steam games I have bought over the years.
SmokinDragon;-;I have enjoyed Skyrim for more than 400 hours, no thanks to Bethesda and their bug-riddled pile of crap, but thanks to the dedicated modders that polished the turd until it was a gem. Enough is enough. I am not against modders earning a bit of cash for their work, but this implementation is insulting beyond reason. The ENTIRE reason that Skyrim is still one of the most popular games in the world is BECAUSE OF THE MODDERS, yet they only receive 25% off their work? The announcement and the secrecy up untill then, the lack of information, discussion, and the outright banning of dissenting voices in STEAM discussions speaks volumes of how much Bethesda and Valve value us a customers. All the Goodwill Bethesda had built with me by being one of the only AAA developers to offer extensive modding support has vanished, and I will not buy FO4, the next Dishonoured or other Bethesda games. GabeN's insulting AMA on Reddit where he did everything he could to do damagecontrol by the Corporate  book. In the past I have supported Steam by usually buying my games (so far more than 200) through this service, ven if alternatives existed, but NO MORE. I have already bought Witcher III on GOG instead, as a protest, and in the future I will never buy anything directly from Steam again. It will be NUUVEM, HumbleBundle or GOG when available A stand against Corporate greed and for the good of the modding community needs to be taken, and thus I can't recommend Skyrim at this time.
Kusanagi Motoko;-;How to kill a community: The Game
Wallace Wells;-;In Grand Theft Auto, you can hold up entire shops with a gun. In Skyrim, you can put a bucket on the shopowner's head and steal all of his belongings... 10/10 IGN
Sinon;-;I dont know why im doing a review on this as im sure pretty much anyone with a front door and an internet connection either knows about this game or owns it. But im going to do it anyway. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim = Game of the year 2014 and 2015 and 2016 etc. Seriously awesome game especially with mods. Very replayable game with pretty much no ending. There are different ways you can play such as: Sneak, Heavy, Mage etc. And with variations like only one type of spell like destruction or- I would finish this but i want to go and play skyrim. Not even joking.
[WNC] The one who knocks;-;screw valve and bethesda, your paid mods are gonna screw you guys!
Dr Death Defying;-;Paid for mods....How low can ou really get -_- very disapointing. Even if it is an option its still such as stupid Idea.
kylling ct er venner ik fjender;-;vanilla skyrim: 6.5/10 skyrim with mods: 11/10 skyrim with paid mods -1/10
Ruiner;-;Paid mods will ruin gaming. Do not buy.
BOT Elliot;-;How to  off the internet: 1) Make people pay money for mods. 2) Give an outrageously small amount of the money to the actual makers of the mod. How to fix this situation: Make a very simple pay-what-you-want system that starts at 0, ZERO.
Fader;-;Had to sell my house so i could pay for all my mods
Trailqul;-;The vanilla, unmodded game of Skyrim, at its core, is mediocre at best. The mods and the modding community have made this game what it is, SO many years after release. The entire pay-to-use mod structure has ruined the game and the wonderful modding communities that had once collaborated without money in mind. Getting this game now is a MISTAKE. You will regret it. You will end up paying DOZENS times more for mods than the game itself costs. Don't support this horrendous, greedy system and don't buy this game.
PrimaxLite;-;This game is near perfect if you wish to ignore the "paid-mod" issue. However, I like many passionate gamers disagree with introduction of paid mods. What if free mods become ad-infested spyware like mobile apps tend to be? What if publisher decides to ban free mods in favor of paid mods? What if a mod you buy continually crashes your game? What if a mod you buy is incompatible with another paid or free mod? What if a paid mod developer decides to abandon a mod, leaving you with an incompatible broken mess? Too many "what ifs" to ignore.
ELiTech;-;This game has been kept alive with mods, these mods are the only reason I still play. Hiding mods behind a paywall is a horrible idea. The amount of money people would have to spend (and sometimes waste) only to have things not work, it's not worth it. Mods are part of the community not the market (I guess they are now one in the same).
Hipicleas;-;Was a great game until greed and avarice came in to the picture. Sad day for gamers everywhere.
Positron;-;Pay for mods? Absolutely disgusting.
ShartS;-;Charging for mods is pretty weak.
|| sHOtGuN_WeAseL =-;-;Nice basic game, but the many different mods really make it shine. Now that Bethesta is trying to monetize the work of the modders while only paying them 25%, I dont think future players can have the same enjoyment playing that I had.
Shad0wIncarnate;-;The game itself is a masterpiece, the mods make the game 100x better. Why am i not recommending the game? Valve and Bethesdas' pay for mods program. What a load of utter . Valve, Bethesda, get rid of this  ASAP and replace with a donate button, similar to what we have on the Nexus. Do this and i'll change my recommendation to "yes".
Cturner;-;I still do not understand what good paid mods could bring to games like this. These games have always had a dedicated modding community that have pretty much made the game as popular and enjoyable as it is today. Within hours of its implementation, it has pretty much split the modding community, angered thousands of Valve and TES fans, and caused major damage to the modding community. I will not support paid mods, I don't want the modding community filled with loving, highly respectable creators to be turned into another cash cow just like games did once DLC started getting abused.
Vain;-;......................//) ....................,/../ .................../..../ .............//'...'/` ........../'/.../..../......./\ ........('(.......... ~/'...') .........\.................'...../ ..........''...\.......... _. ............\..............( ..............\.............\.. you bethesd
Ludo Friend;-;poor form changing the mods to paid. cant support this.
sbf2009;-;This game is unplayable without mods. Bethesda never bug checks or fixes any of their software. Imagine paying $5 for vanilla Skyrim, then $6 for a magic fix package (a la Midas Magic.) Don't take your chances. You are not purchasing a game, you are pruchasing a modding expansion base. If the mods are behind a paywall, you can easily pay hundreds of dollars just to bring the game up the standards it set with a fully modded installation.
Sibyrtius;-;just jumping on the bandwagon
Kimbie;-;Say NO to paid mods!
NINJ3AZ;-;Downloaded this game and was dissapointed at the very beginning when the guys in the wagon with me were talikng to me but no sound came from their mouths. Then when we got to the execution point nothing happened. It just stopped and they were just staring doing nothing. Waited 15 minutes and nothing happened (Noticed that the horses were still moving even though into a wall and the driver was still wipping the horses?) So I installed earlier version of Direct X. Same problem. :( :(
maidenb1;-;Modders should make a lot more than 25% for their own creation. But the fact steam is forcing people to pay money to use their system when you can find the same mods free elsewhere
Martinsmekk [NOR];-;PAID MODS??? NO, JUST NO!! I am deeply disappointed in Bethesda about this. Skyrim and the fallout series is one of my favorite games and when i saw they introduce this. Just no! I think there should only be one option and that is: pay what you want AKA a donation.
[EcG] Rikka;-;this was an average game that was made better by the mods. Paying for somene else to fix your game is beyond stupid.
Mr.Derpy999;-;This game is an epic adventurer game and it is perfect for people who love adventure! This game is a 10/10 game and is totally AWESOME!!!
Aenar Targaryen [Scat4candy];-;So i shouted at a chicken and a dragon came to attack the town, the town people were attacking me and the dragon so i shouted at the dragon and wrode on him, burnt all the people in the villege, killed the dragon, took his bones and scales and shouted my way to my house 100/10 would waste my life again
BOT FRIES N' BURGER;-;This is one of the top 5 games of the past 10 years in my opinion. 9.5/10: WOULD BANG.
MONDAYS v.1.51.7.104;-;11/10 Like Far Cry 3 with dragon.
I speak;-;first i got the nodachi then i chopped my wife and got more souls for my soulgem and then i built a hide helmet for my good pal alvor. alvor's a pretty good guy, and if u havent tlkd to him u probly shud, cuz hell giv u a iron dagon. you can use the dagr to sneak attack the greybeerds, and if u keep doin dat u will farm the sneek skill. eventully they won liek u and they will fus ro da u and sometimes theyll zun haal viik u if they get really mad. but still its a very fun game and i have 20 characters, and after a while you will see that dovahkiin is the true master race.
I'm Sorry;-;Unless a very large U-Turn is done, which at this point I sadly find very unlikely, I shall not be recommending and supporting a developer exploiting a system for their own greed
Jordan Schlansky;-;Get rid of paid mods Valve.
jewoneimon;-;Read all previous posts about pay walls. Good game until it happened
Tokfursten;-;The vanilla story of Skyrim is basic at best, the openworld was good for it's time but hasn't aged well. It's a fun game to play once, that is if you don't mod the game. Mods are an essential part of what makes the Elder Scroll series good, now that Valve and Bethesda have effectively killed the modding community I would not recommend this game. Maybe pirate it.
Grimethel;-;First I'd like to point out that the game itself is fantastic, and it is through the multitude of mods that make it so damn amazing. Now that Steam is supporting paid mods, more and more content is and will be put behind pay walls. Welcome to the new era of DLC, DLC that the company itself doesn't have to make. I do not support Steams idea of paid mods. The workshops will be flooded with absolute crap mods that took little time to make in an effort to make a quick buck. I highly doubt anyone who plays this game doesn't have a long list of mods they run, many running over fifty mods. Now imagine having to pay for all the mods you use, basically doubling the cost of the game, or more. Hopefully the majority of mod makers do not jump on this bandwagon and can see that steam is just trying to use them to make more money. Because of this decision I have changed my review to negative, and I hope both Steam and Bethesda sees the folly of their decision. **EDIT** Apparently the split is only 25% for the actual modders, so they do the work and only get 1/4th of the earnings. Shows exactly what Valve's intentions are: Money.
Kai Phoenix;-;Beautiful/Enjoyable/Soul sucking addictive!
Herp;-;The Skyrim Workshop HAD always been a great place for discovering community-made mods. Starting now, the Workshop is also a great place for community content creators to GET BENT OVER AND SODOMIZED by selling their greatest works. AND ONLY GETTING 25% Check out the latest creations HERE.
Flux Chord;-;>Be a vampire running in the sunlight at low health >Witness a mammoth falling out of the sky >Try to investigate the scene >Suddenly giants hauling  to pound mine into Oblivion >Get killed by a wolf while running, 3 giants trailing behind me 9.9 papayas out of 10.
RastahMan;-;Pros Hours of gameplay, a lot quest Great main story A lot of mods Ebin graphic Cons Well making game work with mods require really a lot of patience Save games likes to get corrupted
R.I.P. P.T.;-;microtransactions dlc pay4mods no thanks!
GeT_DoGeD #Samo_Necural #Whey;-;Otherwise average RPG, made good my countless FREE mods is now probably the most hated game on the internet right now. Bethesda, good job stomping your entire company into oblivion with PAID mods that have no control check. Great f***ing job.
Alex;-;Without mods this game is OK, with mods it's brilliant. Putting the mods behind a pay-wall makes me not want to recommend anyone buy it any more. Making people pay for mods means they are not mods anymore, they are DLC. And I can't recommend a game that is only fun with a load of extra DLC. Big thumbs down.
RetroSimon;-;Mods made the game better and now they want $$ for other peoples work ? HELL NO !
Event Horizon;-;Bethesda games. Notoriously buggy at launch with poor AI and UI are often only fixed through mods, well, say goodbye to that happening from now on with paid mods. Based off how this game originally released and what the future holds, I cannot recommend
Lyle;-;Ya blew it.
Bror;-;DO NOT BUY THIS GAME, YOU WILL SUPPORT VALVE'S AND BETHESDA'S TERRIBLE NEW MOD POLICIES In case you have been living under a rock, Bethesda and VALVe have introduced paid mods for Skyrim. This is not only problematic because this was a service previously free, but because it is a system that can be easily exploited (which is what is happening). On top of that, the modder himself only gets a small cut of the profits if a mod gets sold. VALVe/Bethesda get around 75% of the revenue made off of said mod, which is absolutely inexcusable. DO NOT SUPPORT THIS  BUSINESS
VSS-Elite Jocky the High-Hitter;-;I died by taking a spear to the throat 10/10 would pillage and plunder again.
Mr Fox;-;Paying for mods will kill this game
Arren;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is the new blockbuster RPG from Bethesda. Is it the "ultimate RPG" all the hype surrounded it portrayed it as? No, it is not. But that's because no single RPG is for everyone. If you're looking for Dragon Age or The Witcher in Skyrim, you won't find it, as they're different kinds of RPG. If you're a fan though, and you're mainly looking for more Elder Scrolls, you can't go wrong with this. Much like the previous game in the series, Oblivion, it offers a mindbogglingly huge amount of content from the get go. Content that will take hundreds of hours to completely go through. And by then, you will have forgotten such a big part of it that a second playthrough doesn't seem like such a bad idea. Unfortunately, just like Oblivion, at the end of the day there isn't a huge variety of dungeons and once you've seen one of a said type, you've pretty much seen them all. Skyrim has tried to correct this somewhat, adding flavor to most of the dungeons in order to make them unique, but it can get tiring once you've faced the same enemy 70 times. Combat in this game is the best in the series. Third camera mode is actually viable, and while you cannot pick classes in the previous games like you used to, you can now level up freely by gathering enough skill levels, with enough skills for you to be able to create a specific, personalized character. While this deep personalization remains in Skyrim, some aspects such as spellmaking and custom enchantment creations are completely gone. While some may say this is to avoid your character being a fearsome god of destruction, Skyrim almost makes it too easy for you to do this anyway, allowing even the strongest opponents to fall easily. This includes dragons. Before Skyrim released, Bethesda made it seem dragons were the most fearsome thing on Nirn. And while the first few times you do get to fight them they will put a decent challenge, Bethesda's scaling works poorly to keep it that way as you level and gain vastly better gear. Add that to these encounters being quite common at times, they completely lose that "epic feel" of the fight and just become an annoyance, pure and simple. This wouldn't nearly annoy me as much as it does if it wasn't for the fact that other, clearly looking weaker wildlife found actually put up a better fight than the dragons do. A Shadow of the Colossus or Dragon's Dogma approach to these encounters would do the trick, as those by comparison make the dragon fights in Skyrim disappointingly shallow. While the main quest for this game is mostly horrid, it is the sidequests that offer the most enjoyment. The Daedra quests are especially great. As with the previous games, factions such as the Dark Brotherhood can be joined, and through their storyline, you will eventually rise through their ranks. A minor detail that's bugged me since Oblivion is that these factions never take into account your actual skill levels. Suppose you'd join the Mages College in Winterhold, and the teachers may comment on your great talent, but really, they're just commenting on your lack thereof. You can fully complete its storyline, clearly aimed for mages, having no magic skills at all. I know Daggerfall's old by now, but even there they would check your skills to see if you were a suitable character to join their organization. Why did they not keep this in subsequent games? While these games can be extremely immersive, sometimes that immersion can be broken at times, either by bugs, which will always be present in such a gargantuan beast of a game, or by AI repeating the same lines over and over, notably the guards' comments when you approach them. It could be worse though, no longer will you find the world of Tamriel only having 5 voice actors working on it so there are still improvements. The graphics as well. Skyrim is simply a beauty to behold. Last, and by no means least, the modding community. They have always been a staple in the series since Morrowind, adding hours of playtime to these games. Skyrim has not changed in regards to this, and it fact made mod installation easier thanks to its addition to the Steam Workshop. Find a mod you like? Just hit that subscribe button and open the launcher to see the game download it automatically. It's ridiculously simple, and you'd be silly not to give some of the fantastic mods already released a go. It's almost a sin to want to buy the console versions, due to what they miss on. These are the kinds of games that, 10 years down the road, with their DLCs fully released, will still have people modding them, and that is quite special. All in all, I say Skyrim is a must-have for anyone with a remotely passing interest in the series. It's just that good. Complete with a deep customization, great setting, believable world and endless potential. Make sure you have a lot of spare time, this game will soul trap you for a long time, and you will more than likely thoroughly enjoy it, as I have.
Yogurtjack;-;Just joining the hate waggon
fastjetjockey;-;Bethesda and Valve are steering PC gaming down the wrong path by implementing monetized modding and they're using Skyrim as a spearhead. As such, I cannot recommend this game to newcomers, despite my love for it. At this stage of Skyrim's life, modding is what's keeping it alive for the vast majority that play it including myself. To put mods behind a paywall is opening up a huge can of worms that can only be detrimental to the future of the platform and must be stopped before it advances too far. For further reading refer the Forbes article on the most important points - http://www.forbes.com/sites/insertcoin/2015/04/24/valves-paid-skyrim-mods-are-a-legal-ethical-and-creative-disaster/
Domsterer;-;First off let me start by saying this is a fantastic game and has been potentially ruined by recent events. Now I do think that Mod developers should be able to receive money for their work I don think it should have been handled in the way it has. Why not simply add a donate button and valve take a 10-15% cut for doing all the hosting etc and then give the original Dev around 10% which would leave the mod creator around 75% of the money for 100% of the work. 2 weeks ago this review would have been positive but now, well see for yourself...
Deadshot;-;A one-time payment of $2.99 is required to access this review piece.
[BS] Misanq;-;The quality of the TES franchise has always been iffy, whether it be the poor combat of morrowind, dodgey iron sights in NV or the shockingly bad UI in skyrim, but at the same time free mods have always been around to fix up Bethesda's bad ideas and shameful lack of quality control. HOWEVER, now that valve and Bethesda are pushing to monetise the modding community with paid mods, it becomes difficult to recommend Skryim to anyone, knowing that at some point in the future the ability to fix Bethesda's numerous gameplay misteps and bugs might become what is effectively quite expensive third-party DLC. Moreover, paid modding is genuinely offensive in many ways, given that Bethesda (and valve) are taking 75% of mod revenue for essentially not only failing to make a good game, but taking away one of the key selling points of the PC version of this game after the fact. I would in no way recommend this game, nor future games in the TES franchise.
st0p3rr0r;-;This game supports paid mods; I do not. Vanillas Skyrim is a snoozefest.
wildfield;-;Paid mods. This is ridiculous.
[FL:RP] Barnack;-;Was good until they started charging for mods.
Jaixa;-;Protesting the clunky and greedy manner in which paid mods are introduced. Bethesda will go to no end to monetize Skyrim, including ripping the heart out of a community of fans who spent a truly staggering amount of hours improving the game. Be aware that your experience may change in an instant if Bethesda deems it profitable.
dankuso50 {blue};-;over rated and overall MEH.
Kyrios9;-;Paid mods are an outrage.
Dizzlectic;-;Paid mods WHAT THE F*CK??????
SchultzyX89;-;Bethesda have lost my respect. Valve have lost my love. While Skyrim is a great game (only thanks to help of mods) I cannot recommend a game whose developers are not just downright greedy but cause a community of unpaid people who saved their buggy mess of a game to be thrown out into the rain for their own profit, for shame. And to vlave who let this happen, they are even worse.
Mansworth;-;Skyrim- Paving the road fora future of paid mods. Shame on you.
Brownie;-;I sadly cannot give this game a good review... I will not pay for mods. I had hundreds of hours of enjoyment with mods that will likely soon have a pricetag, and for what!? It hurts to know something you enjoyeed so much now has a price. What's next? Adding content every few months to make more money??? Oh wait...
DA BIG CHEEZ;-;Wow. I don't believe it. Not only has Zenimax figured out a way to be even MORE lazy and ignorant in making a videogame, but also wants to ruin everyone else's fun by selling something that has always been considered free and from the heart. I understand that the videogame press has decided to defend this choice, simply put a 'paywall for mods', but when have they ever been right? I mean lets apply this to reality. We know that modders can code better than any Bethesda employee, see bug fixes and Skyrim Script Extender, but what if Bethesda was an automobile dealer? Ask yourself this question before you even consider purchasing this game, or any mods: should you ever have to pay to have a factory defect fixed on a car? If you answered yes, please consider celibacy and renounce civilization. You're better off swinging from the trees.
Chipotle;-;Down with this sort of thing!
Chipotle;-;Down with this sort of thing!
Tammas;-;Review turned negative after the introduction of paid mods.
MaximusPrime3;-;with the new paid mods everything will go to
Fizzee;-;Whilst the game gives a solid platform and the core story is reasonably good, the real meat of the game comes from the extensive modding community. Whilst this has always been a huge selling point for PC gaming, Valve and Bethesda are currently attempting to turn this wonderful aspect of PC gaming into something they can exploit the community with for $$$ The idea of paying mod makers isn't a problem and should be encouraged, the fact is that the following: a) There is NO quality assurance. the mod can be utter rubbish yet until you fork out $$$ you can't know. b) The mod makers only get 25% of the profit... Yup The person who did 100% of the work gets a tiny fraction of the money c) If a mod stops working, tough luck. d) The mod must earn $400 before the creator sees a penny! if it only earns $399 then Valve & Bethesda get the lot!! e) This encourages both big and impressibe mods, but also cash grab nonsense. All in all, DO NOT SUPPORT THIS COMPANY!
piercen90;-;I'm not going to support paid mods, and as long as there's paid mods I do not recommend this game
(HpN)Zadeis;-;The changes in the modding community have ruined this game along with me finding the changes unacceptable and a bad precedent.
TrUeJiM;-;Pretty bummed i supported this game right before the whole mod debackle.
(LSG) Vynix;-;I now have to pay mods I've been using for years and have dontated for in the past. Blatant cash grab. Thanks for destroying the most civil and supportive community in pcgaming bethesda and valve.
Thrillah;-;Just say NO to paid mods.
MedicBlue;-;A foolish choice to have pay for mods to be added, Potenialy free mods getting ripped off and then sold again has made it so mod makers have taken all their good mods in fear of it being sold by someone else for a profit. Terrible.
BLSmith2112;-;Due to this companies anti-consumer practices I regret making this decision.
SupremelyMoistTiharo;-;This game is amazing, but now that paid mods are being forced upon us by Valve, I can no longer support this.
Appeltaart;-;Putting mods behind a paywall Heck no Sign this petition! https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop
Twincest;-;Bethesda is going down hill with mods.
Fwolly;-;Absolute  game, would not recommend.
Wolf;-;Greed is about to ruin one of the best games. GJ
Prinny;-;Terrible way to add paid mods
Juan Solo;-;A complete shame that modders are given only a quarter of the fruits of their labour which have seen this several year old game still have an active community.
A_FAT_MAN;-;Hiding mods behind a paywall is just disgusting!
joeytman;-;Mods shouldn't require payment, and refunding your payment shouldn't get you banned from the steam community market for a week.
CB;-;Only 25% to modders is too low, also alot of mod-stealing and putting up for mnoney and what not, and the steam support will not be able to stop all mod-stealing.
schmidtzypedia;-;This is a good game on face value and the modding community is amazing but with paid mods a feature of this game and cannot now nor will I ever recommend this game to anyone. You should not buy this game as long as it has paid mods.
jjuswell;-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating: first it's good, but later you regret it. Then you do it again.
NtheQ[FWAG];-;Paid mods are a terrible idea and reduce the value of the game
Bill;-;Great game and a great modding community. It's a shame Valve had to impliment paid mods that add nothing.
Captain Balkan;-;Is a mediocre game at best without mods. Boring, short, glitch filled. Money hungry bethesda and valve taking money out of the one good part of pc gaming is all this game is now. If you want to support valve and bethesda poisoning the pc gaming community then go ahead and buy this game.
Several Zombies;-;Paid Mods are definitely a downside.
Several Zombies;-;Paid Mods are definitely a downside.
KS;-;So it begins, the death of PC gaming. I've been an avid PC gamer for several years, and an advocate for it the entire time, but with the introduction of paid workshop mods I fear for its future. Modding used to be a labor of love, but with the paid workshop it is being turned into a practice in greed. I cannot possibly give a positive review to the game that brought this horrible controversy to surface.
CuredPhoenix;-;I recommended it until Bethesda got greedy. No longer.
Kerem;-;Don't you see the hate you get for this, Valve? Why don't you stand up and say something?
ayyeeeeeee;-;Paywall? How do you not know that everyone already hates this valve?
EnterDerp;-;Everything changed when the paid mods attacked...
BlueSwitch;-;The game is great - Shame the Paid mods ruin such - Valve will be taking 75% while the creater of the mod will take only 25% They made this game into the new Greenlight.
Sergio Wan-Kenobi;-;Was a solid 5 before the paid mods, but now Valve's greed has hidden a lot of quality content for this mediocre game behind a paywall. I cannot recommend this game because without mods, it's a mediocre borefest. Don't buy it.
aaginskiy;-;Skyrim is a pretty good game concept, but requires a lot of mods to both fix issues and improve game play. Now that Steam is actively putting mods behind paywall, I really cannot recommend this game anymore.
KissyKissyBangBang;-;mods that aren't free
Mykiio;-;Was a great game, singlehandedly ruined with the introduction of legally questionable paywalls for fan-made mods. Many modders have pulled their works from public as others began to steal them to turn a profit on steam, and most of the money made from it goes to Bethesda/Steam rather than the creator themselves. A shameless and blatant display of greed that is beginning to tear apart the modding community and pushing away people who genuinely liked and wanted to make this game more fun.
SpyroCoolLP;-;Simply put: http://web.archive.org/web/20150426143713/http://www.reddit.com/r/skyrimmods/comments/33qcaj/the_experiment_has_failed_my_exit_from_the/
BlackHawkXS;-;Paid mods and stuff?
ZAPcon;-;I'm just here for the mob mentality.
Deadfoot320;-;Payed mods? Not a good idea, maybe after it's removed or changed to a donate I'll change this.
Dracarna;-;I only got it for the mods about a month ago and then they implamented paid mods, Just what we all need more mircotransactions
NooDle Pot @NoLife;-;All for mod developers getting something for their hard work - through a donation. Giving people no choice but to buy mods before they try them & only giving modders 25% is atrocious. Just squeezing every penny out of the people who genuinely enjoy this title - such as me. Bad move Bethesda. Bad move Valve for allowing this to happen.
DistortedPixel;-;You have ruined the system and shoved modders into a world that does not and should not support them in the manner you have presented.
Raleiyn;-;First I want to say; I own skyrim for the xbox with over 180 hours played and think it's a fantastic game, even as a standalone. I've always wanted to have the pc version of Skyrim to play some of the mods I've seen for it. Well thanks to Valve and Bethesda I can't enjoy the modded skyrim experience without being sure to give them even more money! I think it's absolutely crazy that Bethesda has made over a BILLION dollars on skyrim yet they want to take 75% of every 'paid mod' offered in the Steam workshop. Same goes for you, Valve. I'm sure you've made a LOT of money off Skyrim and it's disgusting how greedy the both of you are being. You both are multi billion dollar companies but let's take some more of our communities money by doing 0 work and making 75% of the profits! You remind me of Congress. Soon as the question of pay raises for themselves is brought to the table, it's the fastest thing Congress passes next to Mexican food. I will buy this game (I played the trial) as soon as modding returns to what it was instead of another funnel directly into Valve/Bethesda's greedy overflowing pockets.
Chalas;-;The game itself was great. With mods was AWESOME! But now that Valve and Bathesda decided to turn mods into paid DLC is damaging not only the community, but also the re playability of newer games and the possible abuse from modders for a quick cash grab. Mods have gave birth to countless classics and it is my opinion thanks to a loyal and passionate community. Creating paywalls will hinder that innovations and divide the community. Why not add a donation button instead?
Practicing for LCS;-;Paid mods that don't even support the mod makers because they only get 25% of all sales is a deal breaker for me
Koopagamelouda;-;Do not buy this game on Steam as long as they are making people pay for mods. Mods are not commercial products. If they want people to give money, they should have implemented a 'Donate' button.
thebobafettest;-;Only 25% of the game was good.
NotAChiken;-;Love this game to death, but what Valve and Bethesda are doing to it is just wrong. Mods should not become DLC and that is exactly what is happening here. The community needs to put its foot down and show them that we do not support the direction they are taking our games.
Sistine Chapel;-;Really Betsheda.
Moe Szyslak;-;This game was alright without mods, but mods where the reason most people own this game. Do i really need to carry on?
KILLA;-;Hiding mods behind a paywall is just disgusting! Why not a optional donation button, Valve?
Install Gentoo;-;The game is big only because of the modding community and instead of hiring the best people in the community to make their next game actually worthwhile even without mods, they are treating them like dirty replaceable trash giving the unstable job of making fanfic DLC and getting pennies in return, while completely destroying the whole modding community itself.
ZiggityZeke;-;Valve, the faster you remove the paywall for mods, the quicker we can get rid of Bob and his ing tanks.
John Lykins;-;This game is freakin' sex.
oklaf;-;Enabling "pay-for-mods" is just a horrible system!
SewerPrincess;-;Being chronically ill, this game helps me get away from everything.
NOT Nightmare (He will be back);-;Best game I have played in a long time.
Shukaro;-;Have you played previous elder scrolls games? This is just them except with nicer graphics and some systems which are either a little better or a lot worse. Only worth it with mods (which are a huge ordeal to install), and even then the combat is not good.
Cadfael_Jernigan;-;+ The exploration was good + Some good mods but cannot really rate a game on what other people make for it but hey got to have more than one positive up here - Rather uninteresting story and rather dull combat. - Almost all the side quests were bad Now that they are starting to be paywalled it is hard to justify getting this game. The extra conent which was paid to begin with was not worth the hassel. Hearthfire does add in something interesting which I have not seen in RPG other than RS and without having to spend weeks building a decent house was something to be happy with. While this 'pay for extra things in our lackluster game because we spent too much time drawing and not enough time writing' game was good with mods it does not justify spending extra just to have it tweaked to your preference Reccommendation: For a game which is very good with mods - Mount and Blade: Warband RPG with good medival period fantasy combat - Dark Souls 1/2 RPG with good story - Oblivion had some very good moments, Mass Effect trilogy (bit wonky at times due to a writer leading at some point)
tiddles j zombol;-;you have to pay for mods
sthii;-;I am not a supporter of paid mods This game is great, however I can not support the mod monitization
Forsaken;-;You know why.... (paid mods)
Chi Long Qua;-;Stay the  away from this game now that Valve and Bethesda has introduced paid modding.
ruairi;-;love this game don't love paid mods
SkateboardCat;-;Valve introduced paid mods for this game which is unacceptable.
Rand_Al'Thor;-;Don't support paid mods
HARDOLF;-;Nice game! Five stars.
Pulsing_Pressure;-;These new ways to support workshop creators are a joke, especially with the measly 25% cut. With no quality control, the desire to make $$$ will be what drives modders to flood the workshop with low-effort paid mods, and they can already be found in the workshop. Mods have always been something PC gamers have been able to brag about, they've always been freely available to us and they're very useful when it comes to fixing broken games. Heck, there are Skyrim mods that fix bugs and issues that only make the game much better. There's an old way that actually supports content creators that isn't anything "new" and really does support the creator: DONATIONS . You could just implement that. But of course, Steam knows that. They defend their cut by saying that modders have a pay what you want option. That does absolutely nothing to alleviate the meager cut modders get. And seriously, no announcements for feedback on this new feature? As unexpected as it was, we know why it happened. And Steam/Valve know why they couldn't let anyone know. I hope the backlash shows Steam/Valve that, while PC Gamers have always put them on a pedestal, for good reason, the pedestal can always be kicked out under them.
Arischer Kebab Entferner;-;Would pay for mods again 10/10 On a serious note though, this game is ok buy on sale otherwise don't. Oh, and don't buy any workshop mods. Even if you want to support the modders, they only get 25% of your payment. And they don't get paid any cent if they don't make 400 USD at the end of the month. Which excludes the huge cut Valve, Bethesda and some other people including the Nexus get (75% overall). Now lets think about that a little: Imagine if I made a little mod, and would sell it for 1$. I only get 25 cents of every sale. Now for those 25 cents to add up to 400$, 1600 people would have to buy my mod. Even if you wish to support modders, directly donating to them via Paypal/Patreon/whateverthepeopleusetogetdonations will help them a lot more. Consider doing that if you insist on giving modders a little tip. In my opinion, mods should not be locked behind a paywall. If you support this standpoint too, write a negative review in the same vein as mine and vote with your wallet. After all, Valve are a company that knows how to handle money. And if nobody buys these mods being locked behind a paywall and if enough people speak up against it, we might be able to have them stop this new practice. If people will support this on the other hand, mods will become glorified DLC and a lot of modders will be opportunists, jumping on the train for a quick buck.
[TBS]Sierra159;-;You know, I've played this game quite a bit, the only reason I have the low play data is due to a steam reset. I believe skyrim is an amazing game with limitless potential due to the power of modding. But now, valve and bethesda have moved to try and put those mods behind a paywall. I can't reccomend a game that does that.
Terant;-;Skyrim without mods is a bland, boring game. Skyrim on PC without a $5 UI mod is considered 'unplayable' by many people, so the price of this game is always at least $5 more than they say. Don't pay for mods. Don't let Bethesda sell you DLC they didn't create.
Bullseye55;-;As an almost four-year Terraria modder, I just cannot support this practice to spread. Paid mods are one of the steps that will degrade the quality of games to a large degree, and any game that has done this in the past is now dead or nearly dead. Combined with the DLC practices practiced by many companies, this just isn't good news, and hereby I do not support this practice. A donate button would be fine, but not locking mods behind greed what Valve makes a huge profit off of. Just screams money and greed to me, and it should to everyone who sees this practice.
Night of the Living Rednecks;-;Now that Steam and GabeN have sold out and opened a Pandora's box shaped like a terrible idea, I can no longer recommend Skyrim. Prior to this I've logged 70h on my Steam copy of Skyrim, ~150h on Xbox 360, and ~40h on a non-Steam copy. I never downloaded mods from the Workshop to begin with because it was already inferior to other options. Now those other options have the added benefit of not being pay-gated, but this stupidity has already made people start pulling their mods from free sites for fear of having them stolen, uploaded to the Workshop, and their own work DMCA'd. The game itself is solid, and the modding community made it excellent, but I fear that that may be over now. I have never been more ashamed of Valve and Bethesda than I am now. https://www.change.org/p/valve-remove-the-paid-content-of-the-steam-workshop -- 56k signatures and counting. e: AS OF 4/27/15, Valve and Bethesda relented and took down paid mods for Skyrim. HOWEVER! "But we underestimated the differences between our previously successful revenue sharing models, and the addition of paid mods to Skyrim's workshop. We understand our own game's communities pretty well, but stepping into an established, years old modding community in Skyrim was probably not the right place to start iterating. We think this made us miss the mark pretty badly, even though we believe there's a useful feature somewhere here." This review will remain negative until three years have passed with no attempt to institute the same system for other, newer games without a community ready to defend them.
MitchBuchannon;-;Dont buy this you automaticly loose your social life xD
n (Matrix);-;You should know how good this game is by now, Bethesda; Rpg; Mods; Modding in : BUY IT!!!
BubbIes;-;Very dissapointed in Bethesda and Steam allowing for paid mods. The Skyrim modding community has been fine and continued to steer in the right direction for well over 9 years including TES:Oblivion the last thing we need is for Steam and Bethesda to make a quick buck. Also according to Gabe Newell on the Reddit AMA, the percentage split for paid mods is dictated by the developer. If Bethesda really believed in supporting mod creators, the cut % would not be just 25%. Overall, developers are looking to make a quick buck and not here to support the modding community. I am very dissapointed.
High Impact Sexual Violence;-;I can't in good faith recommend this anymore. Bethesda and Valve trying to monetize a hallmark of PC Gaming. Mods have a long successful history and it's never been about getting rich. Mods are made, users enjoy, donations are made and often times mods get picked up by game companies now and again and are made into amazing games of their own. Nothing about this new system incites creativity and quality. I know they won't listen to a simple review, but I hope our chance to vote with our dollars doesn't come before this spreads.
dante;-;is good with mod mainly but vaniller game is alroght also
SaneZero;-;This game taught me how  my life is....... buy it, or get an arrow to the knee.
Fuck bitches, get APEX;-;I bought a sword, no, like, i BOUGHT a sword, with real money. Paid/10
Thebalrog6;-;Back to crashing my computer without having to pay a damn thing with using mods. 10/10, would crash again. P.s Bethesda/Valve, don't EVER do the paid mods again.
Outcast;-;Mods are slowly switching to a paid version, one of my favorites, Wet and Cold, became paid and was removed from nexus. GG Bethesda, this game was a masterpiece for the PC Modding community until you ed it up. Let us hope ENB never follows this path.
Click;-;One of the few games that have lived far past their expected life time, and I can guarantee that Skyrim and it's community will never die. As long as mods don't become paid again. @ ~ @
Nope;-;Paid mods were removed 1000/10 Skyrim is good without paid mods.
Drazznoro;-;Mods are free now, game is good.
EIGHTLEAFCLOVER;-;WIthout a doubt the best game I have ever played. Still play it almost every day somehow. Incredible.
Bubbaseaton;-;So, I need help, I can't figure out if I have the game or not, because when I try to press play, it takes me to this wierd screen but doesn't load, and at some times it says I have to purchase the game and even when I press that, it takes me to this wierd screen. Idk what to do, but I need help figuring this out. :/
Mountebank;-;An excellent game, although a bit buggy, but easily worth it through myriad mods available through Steam Workshop.
TanduryFury;-;Aside from all this paid mod buisness going on, Skyrim itself is a fantastic game, and remains to be one of the greatest RPGs ever since it came out back in 2011.
DeadSanto123;-;No paid mods 10/10 best game
RAMSOLL;-;HELL YEAH MODS!!
ShMo;-;Well, that was a rough patch for us all. Valve's rescinded their paid-mods feature, and have expressed that they'll try other directions regarding financially compensating the right mod authors for the work they've put forth. Hopefully Valve has taken what feedback (in between the hate and the rage) they've collected and will produce what the people at large will support and agree with. I for one am all for donation options to mod authors, and would even suggest being able to initiate project kickstarters for those who have established a solid reputation for consistently producing high-quality mods. I'm still a tad leery (I mean, it just came and gone), but as time passes I am hopeful that things will get back to normal, that people will calm down, and that Valve will hit a solid compromise that nobody can find reason to argue with. All that drama aside, I can still recommend Skyrim to prospective customers. What Skyrim can do that most games cannot is virtually guarantee that you - yes, you, mister Anderson - will find exactly the kind of game you're looking for if you're willing to put time and effort into installing mods. You might go 30 hours before needing mods that get you a thousand hours; you might be like me and enjoy the base game for 1100 hours before playing mods. Either way, if everything continues smoothly from here on out you'll get the game you want out of Skyrim for sure.
Cake | CakeIsGaming;-;I will refuse to recommend this game until paid for mods are no longer existant. EDIT: While the mods may be free again, I will be keeping this review negative because it happened in the first place. I may eventually change it back to positive, who knows.
left click only & never 1v1;-;If there is any game that proves studios do not need to release a relatively bug free, massive content filled game while still being overwhelmingly successful, TESV: Skyrim is it. However, Bethesda owes their success and high ratings to the kind and good willed people who "fixed" / modified Skyrim for nothing in return. And what does Bethesda do to reward these people? They endorse a laughable cash farm/paid mods system where they are doing nothing and taking the biggest cut. The only reason why this 4 year old game is still relevant and talked about today is because of the content modders created and fixed. Yes, paid mod system on Steam Workshop has been removed but Bethesda has left a burning scar on the attractive modding community with their actions. I have no doubt they would try and take advantage of their greatest undeserved asset again which is why I can't thumbs up this product. What I think of the game itself (without mods): GOOD - graphics/visuals are good (for its time), I like the combat, talent tree is nice, sprint bar! BAD - short quest lines (especially for guilds), dialogue/story writing doesn't live up to previous Elder Scrolls, dragon combat seems corny to me, not as many caves/dungeons as TESIV About the whole paid mods situation: -I'm not against someone making money for the things they create (^I've bought several early access games, this isn't even necessary to say^) -I'm not against giving my money to someone for the things they create -I have DONATED money to modder/server owners in the past -I am against Steam Workshop turning into a micro transaction nightmare -I am against STUDIOS making money on mods that "fix" a game -I am against STUDIOS having even less incentive than they do now to make an outstanding game because they would be able to sit on a cash farm known as paid mods
Opeth;-;Just helping others protest. Nothing to see here.
giantmagma;-;Simple the best game i've ever played.
dark magnetism;-;Thank you for hearing us out.
asmcint;-;I've had this game for less than a week and already have 63.4 hours on record. If that isn't a sign I love it, I don't know what is. Between the amazing combat, beautiful scenery, engaging storyline, and general feeling of badassery this game gives you, there's nothing not to love. That said, if you have a girlfriend, wife, or other person you live with and care deeply for, weigh your options carefully, as this game will suck away an unhealthy chunk of your life.
404Data;-;Mods are free again, all good for now ^_^.
Nightwing;-;Reverse your negative reviews! Paid Steam Workshop mods are being removed and this great game deserves an "Overwhelmingly Positive" rating once more! :)
VenoM;-;It's potentially one of the best games ever made, but you already know that and are probably just on this page for amusing jokes. 10/10 needs more dragons
The Shameless One;-;Paid mods and predatory practices - http://i.imgur.com/iEFMiGo.png
Lummus Maximus(Blood Demon);-;I was only lv 4. Bow in hand, I was sneaking up on Valtheim Towers. The one bandit guard lazily gazed at a cliff face. I snuck closer. Suddenly, the bandit yells out; "I'm going to enjoy looting your corpse!" My heart stops. Have I been seen? Will she cut me up? She runs away from me. Before I can react, the locked doors burst open. An orc sprints out, sword in hand, and he yells; "I'm going to enjoy counting your coin!" He sprints off in the same direction as the bandit guard. I sneak up on the tower- the doors spread wide open- and peek around the corner out of curiosity. The two bandits are on one side of the river, shouting threats; on the other side, a lone rabbit, busy not caring in the slightest about what's happening. There's a third bandit, an archer, on the ridge above the rabbit. He fires arrow after arrow, missing every time. I slowly sneak into the tower, dismantling every trap and carefully checking for loot. I finally arrive on the bridge. From below, I hear a shouted threat; the rabbit is still alive- but not for long. After a solid ten minutes of being all talk, one of the bandits is finally swimming across the river to finish off the rabbit and take its phat loot. She corners the rabbit, and with a quick slice, it's over. She begins swimming back to her post. I pull out my bow. With the bandit in my sights, I release an arrow. "This is for the bunny..." I whisper. In slow motion, the arrow arcs majestically through the air towards the bandit. Boom, right in the heart. In the middle of the river. Her body floats over a waterfall. 10/10 GOTY
geniusalias;-;The game itself is just amazing, but the introduction of paid mods made it the first platform to introduce the plan that will most likely ruin mods if not repealed.
Stealth;-;Paid Mods. Pop ups in game asking you to buy mods. I don't want to buy your  sword for $5 that you made with pirated software. 11/10 .
SkeletonBow;-;Skyrim is quite simply put, one of the best RPGs ever made. The game is absolutely massive, I've put in just over 100 hours so far in the last week or so and I'm probably only about 20-25% through the game. There aren't many games that give you 300 or more hours of single player gameplay in a single game and this game has to top the list. The graphics are amazing and very beautiful, the open outdoor world is massive and allows you to freely roam wherever you like with no artificial restrictions (except perhaps the boundaries of the map which I've never reached in over 100 hours of gameplay). Unlike most other Dungeons & Dragons style RPGs that follow a more pen and paper based approach to painstakingly creating a character and assigning dozens of numerical character attributes and managing them over time, Skyrim is incredibly immersive by taking a different approach to character building and evolution. In Skyrim you choose your character's race from about 10 or so different races, but you do not choose a character class or assign attribute points etc. Instead, you start out as a newbie character with no real skills other than a few benefits attributed to the race you've chosen such as being naturally resistant to fire or whatever. From that point on your character evolves based on how you choose to play the character via in-game decisions you take. Whatever weapons or skills you choose to start using to solve problems with, you will evolve those skills and become better at using them. For example, if you use a bow and arrow a lot, your archery skill will improve and you will essentially become an archer by way of doing it rather than via artificial pre-selection. If you choose to cast spells and do other forms of magic such as staves etc. then you will start to become a mage. But nothing holds you back from specializing in as many things as you want. This really makes the game incredibly flexible and tears down artificial "class" boundaries of the traditional RPG. My character is a female High Elf which has evolved via gameplay to become a Thief/Archer/Mage for example but the possibilities are endless and it allows for characters that are much more unique just as in the real world and not boxed into one well defined role. The game is infinitely moddable also and has an incredibly rich modding community, with mods that add new content and quests, new items, objects, decorations, new armour and weapons, adult content and eye-candy, humour and a multitude of other enhancements/addons. Quite simply put, this is one of the largest and incredibly fun to play RPGs ever made and any fan of RPGs who has not yet played Skyrim should definitely get this game and prepare to set aside hundreds of hours for entertainment.
martin;-;The only thing that made Skyrim great, was all the mods. Now that Valve and Bethesda has decided to  modders over, and mods are no longer free, I can't recommend you buy this game.
gamefreak;-;I completely recommend Skyrim. I've played skyrim for years, and with free mods (let's not revisit a certain mistake) the game is never ending. I love skyrim and The Elder Scrolls series as it's been apert of my life for over 10 years now. Even if you don't like rpgs you'll more than likely like this one.
Medic;-;I'm in two minds whether to change this review back to positive or not, because I'm still neutral here. Thing is, Skyrim is only an amazing game because of the many thousands of mods that prop it up. Take the mods away and you're left with a simple FPS RPG game with an even simpler plot. It looks wonderful, it plays rather smoothly, the combat is nice, there are other things you can praise Skyrim for, but the sheer power and tenacity of modders is what makes Skyrim so strong. Thankfully, the Skyrim Paid Mod Workshop fiasco has come to an end, but my trust has been shaken. For now, I will leave my review as negative, a fitting scar for the scism that now runs down the community. On an unrelated note, don't buy the DLCs on their own. It's often cheaper to just get the Ultimate Edition whenever it's on sale for 10 or so - You save yourself a good bit of money.
Son of Mohan Ghale;-;Honestly I just want you all to know that the mods for this game make this without a doubt the Greatest modern RPG and allows it to stand up to the test of time almost 4 years after its release. Not to mention that it is already a high quality game prior to mods all in all i can't advise it more!
Jester von Dumb;-;The best open-world game ever.
Causality;-;The Game itself, needless to say 9/10 in its basic Rollout. 11/10 with the right Mods. As for payed Mods: It is a shining example on how a good thing in principle, with real potential to improve things, get useless and even cheeky due to a not-even-half-thought-trough concept. So far +1 for the cencelation of payed mods, like it was implemented. but -2 for the fact that not even the first rollout did get the necessary thoughts, but also for the fact that it will be a major setback for a further good-thought-through-concept. rgds
hwd;-;Change your reviews to Recommended, people.
Nargo;-;Mods were what made this game worthwhile. And now I have to pay for them as well. What a shameless cash grab.
Rossmallo;-;Still as excellent as game as it always has been. This whole blip with the paid mods is but a small dark moment in the game's history, and with a bit of luck it will vanish into obscurity, and the game will once again shine like the star it is. ...Just my positive review I've neglected to do, to try and negate some of the negative, two word ones that have been vomited at this due to a single bad decision.
[TF] Fallen;-;Paid mods? No thanks. Wont be supporting a developer that wants to cash in on them either.
8th Lt. Col Matt Novosad;-;Now that paid mods are no longer a thing, I can recomend this game. It has a vibrant, free, modding community which really makes the game. It's open and you can basically do whatever you want. You're the Dragonborn and you have shouts and swords and it's pretty cool overall. Also there is loverslab for your depraved video game sex needs.
Dirrrty Dan;-;TESV: Skyrim is the 5th installation in the Elder Scrolls series of games. Pros: -Replayability: The amount of factions you can join or oppose, questlines and the like are so vast. Different playstyles grant both advantages and disadvantages, and the random encounters in the world cause nothing to be boring or dull. -Mod compatibility: The mod community for Skyrim is a myriad of different topics, from fixing small bugs, adding followers or even remodelling the game, like Skyrim Redone by T3nd0. -Open-world adventure: With many places to go and dungeons to explore, there will always be something to do in Skyrim. Cons: -Some areas feel like they're unfinished, like Windhelm. The arena would have polished the grim city off rather well, but Bethesda didn't implement it, unfortunately, although this leaves resources for mod authors to create their own renditions of the content. -Most characters have little or no unique dialogue, leading to randoms with no real purpose. -Capital cities are very empty, and have 20-35 citizens, rather oddly. Again, there are mods to fix this. -A lot of annoying bugs, some of which CAN be fixed in the console, opened with the tilde (`) key, above the tab button. Unofficial Skyrim patch helps out with these. Overall, a beautiful game, with a lot of feeling, although can feel desolate at times. Moddability is a massive plus with me, allowing for a more customised game experience. Rating: 7.3/10
Scaredy-cat;-;About Skyrim. Skyrim is the game that has produced quality memes such as "arrow to the knee" and "no lollygagging". The game has a nice modding community and a large variety of mods from custom gear to replacing dragons with Thomas the Tank Engine. The vanilla Skyrim without mods and such is great too, it is relatively simple for people to play and doesn't require the skill level of Dark Souls for example. (In Dark Souls I find it hard not to die every 10 seconds.) Thankfully Valve listened to their customers and didn't make a thing out of Paid Mods. Also Skyrim seems to even run on a potato rather well so you don't need a hardcore gaming PC for this game.
Phantom Symphony;-;The damage is done..
B E V V Y B O Y S;-;Let me break this down to you. When Skyrim came out almost four years ago, it was a buggy, awful mess. Stuttering everywhere, NPCs breaking down, and if you went in the wrong place at the wrong time, it crashed. Today, it is still a buggy, awful mess. Stuttering everywhere, NPCs breaking down, and if you go through the wrong door at the wrong time, it WILL crash. But luckily, there were mods to fix that. Stuttering removal, scriptfixes for the NPCs, and magic ritual powered by the blood of children to stop this thing from crashing every time you go in a building. Now mods are behind a paywall. Now you have to pay for the very things that made this game playable in the first place, on top of the game's actual price. It's a scam. There's literally no other word for it, except for synonyms for "scam." You are now being treated exactly like the little consumer plaything Bethesda and Valve see you as, and not a lot of people like it. I definitely don't, so I cannot in good consciousness recommend you a buggy, awful mess where you have to pay extra for community-made addons for the same reason I cannot recommend you a crappy Free To Play MMO where you have to pay for an edge over every other player. Don't buy this game.
Trace Legacy The Grand Templar;-;The war is over my friends! The paid mods are dead and freed from gaben's hands. Sheath your swords and lets travel back home :).
Kozzy420;-;Thank you Valve for pulling the Pay for Mods!
Wisemaster;-;Longest lasting game you will ever play due to modding community. However with the recent money shaped knife violently jabbed into the back of the workshop, the future of this game is doubtful. Still an absolute necessity for all Steam owners
WhitePrism;-;Ok so id like to point out that this game is amazing, the storyline, the quests (and sidequests), the land available even without any dlc will have you hooked for hours. Then the dlc come which are exceedingly good and worth every penny.... Then it comes to the bad... Mods (Well paid mods) the mods themselves are amazing, getting chased by the trololol troll while riding flutter from my little pony is something that never gets old. However paying 5 for a mod on a 7 game is an absolute joke, there are many other ways around this which im not allowed to Nexus *ahem* talk about. If you dont own this, get it, but do not for the love of god pay for any mods, the devs have always done ths out of the kindness of their heart and have always said you can donate to them. Great game 10/10 would take an arrow to the kneww for. whereas screw paid mods.
Guinness;-;Remove paid mods and the game is perfect, until then I cannot support this game.
Qu1n;-;Hitting the dislike for Bethesda's attitude toward the Modding community. They have been perfectly comfortable letting modders fix hundreds of still present bugs, Improve their graphics and textures and let them develop new content. That was fine, but now they are planning to steal this to improve their own bottom line. Its Immoral.
Vinchenzo;-;Forcing payment for mods.
d.thompson12315;-;if only mods were free :(
Harpuajim;-;Same as everyone else. Make it a donate option and call it a day.
Polishmafia;-;*Insert mad about selling mods rant*
Pieh;-;Skyrim is an excellent RPG capable of suck many hours from your life. It tells numerous engaging stories and delivers an immersive experience in the frozen nothern lands of Skyrim. If you've played other Elder Scrolls titles you have a decent idea of what to expect, if not you're likely going to be pleasantly suprised. The Steam Workshop mod support for this game open up a contanstly growing database of new, east to install content. Well worth the money.
Metal Gera;-;Negative review in support of the removal of the paid mods system.
{SuN} BitBananna;-;One of the deepest RPG experiences ever and does the Elder Scrolls franchise justice, The story is creative and unique and excellent. combat isn't as deep as games like Witcher 2 however its easy combat system allows for the game to be accessible to all. The modding community & scene within the game is amazing, if you are looking for a way to change the dynamic of the game or just a aesthetic change there will most likely be a mod for it, weapons, armor, quests its all there. the Graphics are still quite good especially with the HD texture pack and combined with a ENB the game looks glorious. its a MUST BUY.
MRGHRGLGLGL;-;It's very nice. Buy it.
AARDonyx;-;Valve and Bethesda decided to profit off of the modding community, destroying it in the process.
PFC Gomer Pyle;-;Now I have Monophobia.
SquirtyQwerty;-;HOLY CRAP THIS GAME IS A-MAZING. skyrim has to be my favorite game of all time. i have beaten the game with every race and there is abolutely no end to the things you can do in skyrim. Bethesda created a masterpiece that should belong next to the mona lisa. PURE BAD ASSERY
cheapbuster;-;Great game! Hopefully the start of a whole new fantasy series! I can't wait for Skyrim 2!
=(eGO)= TheJollyRoger;-;Not supporting Steam or Bethesda until they completely change their business models. I can certainly survive without Slyrim, as Oblivion, Morrowind, and New Vegas are better games with FREE mods any way. I recommend that you who are reading this review do the same and shop only at GoG, Humble Bundle, and (dare I say it) EA's Origin. Valve needs more competition now. Edit: 4/27/2015 10:03 PM Welp, they finally did a 180 degree reversal with the policy for Skyrim. But in the official press release for this policy change, the official Valve employe who annouced this change implied that they would try again, just not for Skyrim. So no, I'm still not supporting Valve anymore. They are still a monopoly. They are still hypocrites. But what now for Skyrim and Bethesda? Should I now give Skyrim a positive review? No! It's my opinion that Zenimax and Bethesda Softworks (not Beth. Game Studio) still want some form of paid modding and were the main pushers for paid modding in the first place. Remember Horse Armor? Also, I have my beefs with Skyrim itself as a game. People really should play Morrowind, Oblivion, and New Vegas before spending hundred's of hours into this shallow game. I can't go into specifics at the moment, but there are plenty of reviews and videos online addressing concerns that I agree with. View Valve's statement here: https://www.reddit.com/r/pcmasterrace/comments/3434it/paid_mods_in_the_steam_workshop/ 4/28/2015 Bethesda gave their own PR twitst. http://www.bethblog.com/2015/04/27/why-were-trying-paid-skyrim-mods-on-steam/ Look at this particular statement: "Horse Armor gave us a start into something new, and it led to us giving better and better value to our players with DLC like Shivering Isles, Point Lookout, Dragonborn and more." They seriously believe that horse armor has helped not just Oblivion, Elder Scrolls, and Fallout but also the gaming industry as a whole? Horse armor did not "encourage" them to make epansion packs and dlc that were planned and were in development already. If they could without backlash, they would follow the scam-like behaviors of other developers like EA or Paradox when it comes to the most inane DLC's. They said to the effect: "Well mod sales were insignificant anyway. And people who use mods and make mods are very insignificant when comparing to all Skyrim players." Well, if it wasn't that significant, why risk your business and lose potential customers for future games you idiots? They also said that they began discussions and planning for paid mods back in 2012. They will not simply waste 3 years of planning because of this backlash. NO business plans something for such a long time just to do a complete 180 and waste all the wages to people who worked on introducing a new product or service and all the data and knowledge from analyzing the market. This will come back, one way or another. My positive review for Skyrim will not.
Appleorgasm;-;Kill a chicken get chased by the entire village like you're a serial killer. 10/10.
The Skeed;-;First there had been the expansion packs... And there were DLCs... And now there are MODs for sale!  you valve. Make HL3 already.
Jack;-;10/10 - highly recommend post Pay2PlayMod 0/10 - Not recommended with Pay2PlayMod "feature" 11/10 - Pay2PlayMod removed, donation button added(?)
Companion Cube;-;What can I say? Half-finished game that only survived because of modability, which will now be placed behind payment walls. While the decision is a good one for modding in the long term, the consumer is again shafted. I wouldn't recommend the base game Skyrim as anything close to being worth playing, however if you don't mind to keep forking out money for characters, weapons, minor patches, etc then this game might be for you. Was nice while it lasted, though! EDIT: Well, now that the paid mods have been >>temporarily<< put on hold, until they can put more legal bindings on them, I will refrain from changing the review, since it's only a matter of time before it's back. Also the damage has been done: the community is in shambles, modders are leaving and players are still spamming about it. I feel like the modders pulling their free mods is mostly because of the players who attacked the modders, more than the allure of potential profits. The playerbase attacked the wrong targets here, but everything's been done, now we just wait and see where this develops. Third-Party DLC, that the company is actually getting money for and then money from publishing it, is here to stay. There is nothing we can do. I'll miss gaming.
DSCO;-;paid mods, don't buy this game.
Tenshinen;-;EDIT: Even though Valve & Bethesda withdrew paid mods from Skyrim, I am still not changing my review. Them pulling it back doesn't change that they tried to push the idea in the first place. The game itself is great. Many hours of fun in just the base game. Add mods and it becomes a whole new experience. Why the negative review you may ask? Mods are the lifeblood of this game, and Valve & Bethesda see fit to lock them behind paywalls just to make a quick buck. This is not acceptable.
I need feminism;-;paid/mods you wouldn't steal a car, but you would pirate a mod
AOLetsGo;-;(would it break Valve's servers to allow unlimited space for text reviews?) 7/10 I have to be really, really hard on this game - not out of hate, but out of love - because while it is a masterpiece of decorative design, it is also a deeply, deeply flawed game. To summarize my ambivalence to the world of Skyrim, I need only point out that I just called it "the world" of Skyrim. Not "the game" of Skyrim. Because what we have here are game mechanics built around a beautiful environment - not a beautiful environment developed to support a great game. That's my thesis, and I'm sticking to it - this is a world first and a game second. A for that world. Oh, that beautiful, beautiful world. How did they even do it? It is a 15 square mile sandbox, of which every single inch is carefully, painstakingly hand-crafted . It flows naturally from place to place. It's packed so dense with discoverabe locations, each its own kind of little neighborhood, and it feels unbelievably vast. Throw in some tricks of perspective and it looks even more enormous than it really is. The world is magnificent. Aside: some people don't like the "sameness" of the differing environments. To me, it's called "Skyrim." So hey, there aren't any deserts or jungles or tropical beaches. They say that eskimos have 100 words for snow, and I bet the art director knew about half of them. I also bet they spent a goodly amount of time really investigating the many microclimates of the northern environment - because they faithfully replicated most of them in the game. Choosing a geographical limitation like "Norway-ish" and then doing everything you can to work within that context is not boring - it's a bold move and I applaud it. So you have a vast and pleasing world. Is that enough? Well, no. The world has to be populated by interesting places, and interesting people. So places first. Let's start with the cities. Or "cities." In one sense, the cities are the core and the best of the world - capitals to their surrounding environment, microcosms of their surrounding holds. You look around and you generally aren't wondering whether you are in Markarth or Riften, because each place has its own vibe that makes it unique. This is a great thing - it is immersive and beautiful... But. Oh, but. Walking through the city gates is where you start to be reminded that this is a fake place. No tricks of perspective can make up for the fact that at most there are 20 buildings and 50 people - and often substantially fewer. In this cradle of Tamrielic civilization there are maybe 2000 people. As a question of immersion it just takes away from the game to march across the glorious tundra and up a dang mountain and across a magical wonderbridge only to arrive at a "College" with four students and four teachers, surrounded by six shacks and 10 more people. A "game" of Skyrim would include cities that took days to fully investigate, that are so chock full of intrigue and secrets that you couldn't possibly find them all without a lot of hard work. Plop ten of those kinds of places into the word of Skyrim and you might really have something. As it is, you don't. It takes about a half hour to find every place of interest and to find and talk to every person worth talking to. Which brings us to people. Point the First, in the broad strokes, there are a wonderful variety of realized characters, each with their own backstory and clearly lived life. Point the Second: it's not enough. Consider Sapphire in Riften. She leans against a wall and when you first meet her she tells you to screw off because you have no business with her. Awesome! This is how many real people might react. But then the immersion-breaking starts. If you murder the barkeep in cold blood right in front of her, she will say the same thing. If you save a puppy, she doesn't give a rip. And again and again. Defeat the empire for the rebellion? The Stormcloak guards don't even know who you are. Become the apostle of a daedric prince that promotes cannibalism? Meh, canni-what? Yawn. Rise to the leadership of a group of known werewolves? Come on over and buy some tomatoes! Have you met my daughter? This in a nutshell gets at what is wrong with Skyrim's population. In a game where the whole point is to become a known quantity, this is unforgivable. What am I out there assassinating people for if I don't get no hate from the lawful goods and no love from the chaotic evils? Oh wait, there are no moral factions. The people are fake. And the people are also pretty boring. Do I want to know what the Jarl of Winterhold thinks of the Thieves Guild? Tough sand! And never mind the poor lumberworker down the road - he won't even tell me what he thinks of the Jarl. A woman who is supposed to spend her entire life selling food right in front of Jorvasskr has no opinion on the Companions. Two to four dialogue options apiece do not an immerive storyland make. This is because the game was secondary. But, but, people give you quests. True! And those quests are also boring. Go get some loot - go kill this guy. Come back. Repeat. Repeat. Repeat. Repeat. God help you if you are much curious as to motive, because mostly the quest info gives you the bare minimum to get you chasing the omni-present quest marker (which is impossible to turn off because quest journaling is incoherent). Eventually you may see some pretty lights or a semi-interesting character may die, but in the meantime you will have spent your time crawling through five dungeon types which, while admirably varied, just aren't interesting enough after the tenth one. But it's always a very, very pretty walk to the dungeons. What game? During your crawls, you will hit things with a very limited selection of melee attacks, because magic is completely nerfed after about level 15 (it stil takes my Level 58 character a long while to fry a mudcrab - with magical fire ) given the game's poor balancing and much simplified magic options. You might mix things up by sneaking up on a few at least. As for the questlines, I will be positive here. I enjoyed the stories in all of them. The problem is, quite simply, that I enjoyed the stories in all of them during the same playthrough . Do the requisite dungeon crawling and you cannot fail to become the high king poobah of each and every group in the land. Which is great for casual players, but disappointing if you care about, you know, role playing. Speaking of which, calling this an RPG is an insult to all other RPGs. If Skyrim is an RPG then so is Gears of War - you are given a role to play. Class buffs and a few special powers does not an RPG make. There are no consequences to your "choices," no world reaction to your actions, few alternative means to any particular end. If you disagree try to play through the game without picking up a weapon. Try to murder all of the Imperial Jarls and report the good news to Ulfric. Try to murder Ulfric and report the good news to Tullius. Good luck! This is not an RPG. Also, bugs. Seriously. So why do I still recommend this game, and very, very highly at that? One word: mods. Not all of the above can be addressed, but a lot has been, and the game still offers a nearly endless amount of content and playable enjoyment. I love the game like I love my family: with a large amount of frustration.
Mustang46Turbo;-;91 hours in I finished the main quest line. I am absolutely astounded by how amazing games are getting. This one came out Nov. 2011 even. I kind of bounced around between doing quests and running around like a crazy man. I ended up being a stealthy archer that could burst into flames at a moment's notice. I could one hit guys from a mile away and they never even saw what hit them. Even though I finished the main quest line, I feel like I've barely started playing. I can't imagine the amount of man hours required to polish this game. I was using a few mods. SkyUI being the most important. I can't recommend this game enough. I hope some day I can find time to play the expansions. I only wish a 2nd player could have controlled my follower. haha Maybe I would have set her on fire less often.
AgentScruffles;-;SKYRIM. The best game man has ever created, no questions asked. Period. Buy it or die
Lexus0202;-;There's always something to do in this epic game, just riding your horse and look around is amazing. The main quest is really cool, yet it's just a tiny piece of the game. One does not simply finish Skyrim! I can't write everything, it's seriously so much to know. To make it as short as possible; if you like to slay dragons and other evil creatures, look like a badass, help people with all sorts of tasks and travel through beautiful landscapes and scary dungeons, you HAVE to play this game.
Artful Dodger;-;This is by far one of the best rpgs created with 273 quests this game is a must buy.
Natural Herb;-;Shouted a bunny off the top of a mountain. 10/10
isleggo;-;Great storyline, fantastic quests, some hilarious dialogue, fine mechanics, charming npcs, brilliant companions and to top it off, there's mods.
xXxM1N3CR4F7F4N420xXx;-;Probably the only game that has more mods installed then my Garry's Mod. Prepare to have your hard drives utterly molested by Skyrim mods. From graphics, tweaks, additional content, patches, textures, sweet rolls, and exploding chickens, Skyrim has it all. And you can make women incredibly busty aswell.
The Butter Walrus;-;A game where you can kill a Dragon by Shouting at it. A game where you can become hidden and steal stuff by placeing a bucket on the store keepers head. A game where you can marry cats, lizards, elves and orcs. A game where you can kill a demi god nickednamed the "World Eater" easily, yet children are immortal. A game where you can go to the moon by taunting a Giant. A game where the guards of citys always seem to know everything, even more than you. A game where you can bring two bandits back from the dead as zombies, walk around a city with them, and no one seems to give a . A game where chickens count as eye witeness's to your crimes. -11/10 Would steal a sweetroll again. (On a more serious note, the game's very big, its fun, but the combat is a bit dull and lacks any weight to it.)
tanasinn;-;A wealth of exploration, combat and interaction. There's always something to do. Plus, the (brilliant) modding community expands the potential of this game infinitely. A must-buy.
Sam;-;Amazing game! Plenty of hours to be had
[Meeow~ :c] ~Twily~;-;LOVE IT.. Play it more on other accounts bloody brillent game! :D defo recommend <3
Blu3Y (Illuminati?);-;Mods. Mods everywhere. Can't stop installing mods. BUY THE GAME NOW!!!
Momo Velia Deviluke;-;I am a big fan of the elder scrolls series since morrowind and enjoy the story mode a lot and i like doing mods and messing around with them.
Buffalo;-;I guess I like playing this game, I enjoy how the cows look real woolen, almost like a wooly cow, or a wooly rhino. Plus there are lots of goats in this game, but I dont think there are any sheep, which doesnt make sense... where would the cows get the wool from in the first place? It's the small questions like that one which make the game for me. I mean what other game out there right now has woolen cows in it? I cant think of a single one, not even farming simulator 2012 has cows made of wool in it so why does that game even get so much credit in the first place? I dont get it. If a game doesn't have woolen sheep and does have woolen cows, then tell me where the cows get the in wool from, all these unanswered questions are what make this game so great, and better than its competitors such as checkers or Big 2.
Usagi Tsukino;-;"Like Fallout 3 with magic and dragons."-IGN
Lionblaze (Simba Mufasa);-;great game
LovinMcBitz;-;Great Game. Nothing more to say.
Airforce Grandpa;-;Made the way how I look at sandbox games forever. It's that good. If you hear anyone give this game below a 7/10 at most, they have brain problems.
KYR Syndicate;-;Simply one of the best open world RPG game. Played more than 50 hours and can't stop playing it. Huge map with a lot of quest. Stunning story and good graphics. Also it's moddable and there's a lot of things to do. Another great work from Bethesda!
DetectiveFox;-;This is a great game there are so many quest lines, people, places and great graphics. this game is just so addicting.
BillTheBody;-;Great game! One of the first male NPC's in the game was drunk and challenged my female character to a fistfight for $100. Also I screamed a goat off of a mountain, which was good.
Cyco;-;A brilliant RPG set in a beautifully created world. Dragons, ogres and bandits run amok and you can easily lose yourself in the game doing the near infinite amount of quests. Be a stealthy assassin or powerful mage and discover the power of the Dragonborn while fight for the Imperial Empire or Stormcloak Rebellion... if you want to. There is so much to this game that you can spend over 100 hours in it and never touch the main quests and when you're done, it has an extensive modding community to offer new creatures, weapons and entire quests to keep your adventure going.
[U.S.] [S.G.] Reign;-;Get this. If you are reading the reviews stop. right there, Scroll back up and buy this game. Right now. DON'T LOOK AT THE NEXT REVIEW, GET THE GAME. NOW.
Richard;-;200 mods later i'm firing lightning out of bombshell bewbs at thomas the train 10/10 realism - IGN
Arwenos;-;I only play this for the jiggly boob mods.
[Charged Myth] Twilight Sparkle;-;One of the greatest games of all time. It sure earned those 200 GOTY awards. (game of the year)
Jon Snow Ded Faec;-;Skyrim, oh where to start. I got the game for the Xbox 360 christmas 2011 (yes I was a console peasent back then) and was instantly dragged into a fanboy state. I remember the opening cutscene playing and I just sat there squeling like a little girl. After powering through the tutorial I was faced with the massive worldspace and the hours of exploring, questing and fighting that lied ahead. As I slowly walked towards the town of riverwood, I saw the amazing variety of landscapes that sprawled out across the world and stood in awe wondering where to begin. On the subject of gameplay, despite a few minor bugs (which have mostly been patched by mods like the unofficial skyrim patch and Bethesda's own patches) it's extremely fun and engaging. The way the combat feels is amazing (expecially the archery) and the more tedious tasks (crafting, enchanting and alchemy for example) are fun and rewarding in their own way. The story was exciting (if a little bit predictable) and the characters were interesting. However there are (as with all games) some downsides. You can find yourself forced down a few paths and sometimes you'll experience game breaking issues (like one of the master spell quests was bugged for me) but it doesn't take away from what a truely great experience Skyrim is.
Skoto;-;-Epic Music -Cruel finishing Moves -Complex story with some twitches -Great and nearly endless map -A challenge when played on highest difficulty -Awesome add-ons and workshop-items I really recommend this item especially if it's nearly free in sale (17 bucks for Legendary ?! DAMN BOY JUST BUY IT).
Curator of Cubes;-;Shouting at bears has never been so fun.
MyroP [Fr];-;Don't buy this game before exams.
Leprechaun;-;I broke my game after less then an hour of playing it. Ten stars.
TradeOfAllJacks;-;Skyrim... I don't really think there's much that I can say about this game that hasn't already been said! I've played hundreds of hours on this game (I initially played on console) and I've loved every minute! Skyrim is one of those games that just never gets old, you can always come back to it and there'll be new stuff to find. And that's just Vanilla without mods; the modding community for this game is fantastic, and if you can't find what you want on the Steam Workshop there are thousands of mods on the Skyrim Nexus. From things as simple as retextures to make your game beautiful, all the way up to entirely new worlds, there are mods out there that will completely change your experience. And that's what I lovwe about this game, it never plays the same twice! I highly recommend this game to anyone, even if you're not a big RPG fan, this game is still a masterpiece! At such a low price now, this game is an absolute steal!
ajh101980;-;A little more action heavy than previous Elder Scrolls games. Rpg elements are a bit lighter, with fallout style perks to help diversify character builds. The world is huge. Easily hundreds of hours of game-play. After 2 years, I still come back to play a night every few weeks. One of my all time favorite games.
Czerwony;-;One of the best cRPG ever created. The mods allow to extent the gameplay significantly and although I have played it quite a lot, I still find new quests and uncompleted tasks.
Maple.Rinne;-;Had this on the Ps3 when it came out and bought it during the Thanksgiving sale. Totally worth it. It is so much better on PC then it is on Console
Kyle Begin;-;great game. 200 hours in and I have finished the theives guild questline, dark brotherhood questline, and the college of winterhold questline, and have close to 50,000 gold. along with the quests, the DLCs are also worth the money. words of wisdom: Dragonborn DLC is not a good idea to purchase before level 40-50. I tried at level 5, kept on dying, tried again at 20, also kept on dying, and once again at level 45 and let me tell you, even then it is still pretty hard. The hearthfire DLC is pretty cool, you get to build a house, adopt kids, move in with your wife etc. The only problem is; be prepared to spend a lot of gold and collect a lot of recources, because you have to build EVERYTHING in your house. I mean EVERYTHING. Unless you want to spend 10,000 gold to have your housecarl (you can move people like lydia into your house) and have them decorate for you. overall, the game is very time consuming, fun, and well put together. 10/10
Cimbo;-;I saw a mammoth fall from the sky. 104.09/104.09
I EAT CONDOMS;-;Placed my hand next to the PC fan Suffered from 3rd degree burns 10/10 would place my hand again.
Kayvee;-;Iv'e re-played the story over 3 times, and had a completely different experience each go. 10/10.
Sucker_punch3;-;In my time Skyrim has been one of the best games I've ever played.It has all you need for an indulging play. If you like medievil, dragon age, steel clashing things then I suggest Skyrim. I like skyrim for the freedom and the fact you dont need to choose a class you can make one be it, ranger, mage, battle-mage, warrior, swordsman, theif, assasin etc. its your choice. DLCs are a good addon but they are quiet pricey so the cheapest and the best(in my view) is Hearthfire, the others yea, killing fighting but hearthfire is one of my favourite. You can build your own house which I think is pretty cool and raise a familiy. So yes I suggest Skyrim I think its a great game and you should play it.
The UMP-45;-;Quite possibly the greatest game to end the Xbox 360/Playstation 3 era. There is so much to do in this game - if you had 20 dollars to spare and you could only purchase one game in the next 4 years, this would be the game to buy. I have about 1000 hours collectively put into this game from 2011. I bought this game when it first came out (a few months after my high school graduation). I used to pirate games but thanks to this game, I now purchase games legitimately. Why? Because I realized that developers like this need that financial support. The amount of love that the development team put into this game is legendary. You can tell that they truly cared about creating a place that would forever last in your memories. I've beaten the game's main stories only twice, but there is still a crap-ton of stuff you can do afterwards. The game simply never ends. I often crave for the game's viking theme and it truly feels like a new game each time. Anyways, if you haven't purchased the game already, you truly NEED this game in your library. You cannot call yourself a gamer and NOT have played this game. Greatest game of all time (so far) 10/10.
[Kruziikrel] {Sage Of Windhelm};-;This Game Has A Great Story, A Great Ending, And Great Boss Battles! Play It! This Means You Nicky!
Kelso;-;I absolutely love this game. I haven't had this much fun since... well, Oblivion, which might not come as such a big surprise. Bethesda might have frightening lawyers, but they sure as hell know how to make an amazing game! It is most certainly a must play for anyone who likes RPG's or open-world games.
Wolf;-;thiis one of the best games i have ever played in my life it has a thrilling sotry and many other great features, definatly a 10/10 anyone who loves role play games and aventure, this is the game for you
Slaughter_round;-;Get this game!
TheCherryRedTyrant;-;its a good game, my only complaint SO FAR was when i bought it on christmas morning, 50% off, around noon, it became 75% off...WTF STEAM!
Grimethel;-;First I'd like to point out that the game itself is fantastic, and it is through the multitude of mods that make it so damn amazing. Now that Steam is supporting paid mods, more and more content is and will be put behind pay walls. Welcome to the new era of DLC, DLC that the company itself doesn't have to make. I do not support Steams idea of paid mods. The workshops will be flooded with absolute crap mods that took little time to make in an effort to make a quick buck. I highly doubt anyone who plays this game doesn't have a long list of mods they run, many running over fifty mods. Now imagine having to pay for all the mods you use, basically doubling the cost of the game, or more. Hopefully the majority of mod makers do not jump on this bandwagon and can see that steam is just trying to use them to make more money. Because of this decision I have changed my review to negative, and I hope both Steam and Bethesda sees the folly of their decision. **EDIT** Apparently the split is only 25% for the actual modders, so they do the work and only get 1/4th of the earnings. Shows exactly what Valve's intentions are: Money.
Kai Phoenix;-;Beautiful/Enjoyable/Soul sucking addictive!
Herp;-;The Skyrim Workshop HAD always been a great place for discovering community-made mods. Starting now, the Workshop is also a great place for community content creators to GET BENT OVER AND SODOMIZED by selling their greatest works. AND ONLY GETTING 25% Check out the latest creations HERE.
Flux Chord;-;>Be a vampire running in the sunlight at low health >Witness a mammoth falling out of the sky >Try to investigate the scene >Suddenly giants hauling  to pound mine into Oblivion >Get killed by a wolf while running, 3 giants trailing behind me 9.9 papayas out of 10.
RastahMan;-;Pros Hours of gameplay, a lot quest Great main story A lot of mods Ebin graphic Cons Well making game work with mods require really a lot of patience Save games likes to get corrupted
R.I.P. P.T.;-;microtransactions dlc pay4mods no thanks!
Cimbo;-;I saw a mammoth fall from the sky. 104.09/104.09
I EAT CONDOMS;-;Placed my hand next to the PC fan Suffered from 3rd degree burns 10/10 would place my hand again.
Kayvee;-;Iv'e re-played the story over 3 times, and had a completely different experience each go. 10/10.
Orthrin;-;its an art . its hard to describe but Skyrim brings you to another dimension. excellent music, atmosphere and lore you may forget your real life
NoBo;-;Attempted to kill a child with dubstep cannons, it ran and batman suplexed it to death. Kamahameha'd a chicken, it exploded and I died. 10/10
SpaceRiceBowl;-;Paid 10 gold to see a soupspoon. Thanks Bethesda 10/10
Crypto + Soul Saver;-;Really well done game i enjoyed a lot. if you get this game you can get mods from the steam workshop to make it better.
Renegade;-;I feel like I've got enough hours under my belt to put together a fair review of this game, so let's hope it'll be a useful one. At the time of leaving this review, I've clocked 199 hours, but I've played this game for a fair amount of time in offline mode on top of that, probably about 20 hours or so. So what was I doing on this game for all that time? The first 30 or so were pretty much a waste, though this isn't really the fault of the game. I went into this game not really knowing what to expect, as I knew little to nothing about the world of Elder Scrolls. I was more eager to just play than I was to pay attention to the characteristics and powers of each race, so I ended up choosing a Nord and progressing down an all-rounder character route, investing skill points in a bunch of random skill trees. While the idea of being an all-rounder and being able to approach combat however you choose might sound appealing, in this game it felt really boring, but that's not necessarily a bad thing. It encouraged me to start fresh, and being partial to the magic and spells in this game, I decided to play through as a high elf mage and found this route to be right for me and overall pretty enjoyable. However, sometimes the game crashes without warning and may crash again at the exact same point the next time you attempt it, which can be extremely irritating and make gameplay feel beyond tedious. Also, if I'd played this game on a console instead of PC, I'm not really sure how I'd feel about it, for two reasons. The first is console commands, which (among other things) allow you to perform actions which should have been features implemented in the base game available from a low level, such as allowing you to remove perks you've chosen and select different ones in their place. The second is mods, the modding community has produced a whole variety of very useful mods which fix bugs, balance combat and leveling, and add in new features (some of which should have been there in the first place) - overall making the game a MUCH more enjoyable experience. All in all, I do like this game, but if I didn't have access to console commands and mods, I probably wouldn't like it all that much.
Epitri;-;What a fantastic game! It's even better that I purchased it from Amazon.com! Where it was delivered much quicker than I initially expected! It came with no damage to the exterior of the game's case and the packaging was incredibly secure! Great job Amazon!
Na Na;-;One of my favorite RPG games of all times and mods make this game just so.....Sexy
Chef Excellence;-;It's like Skyrim with guns!
Fortafy;-;Don't have a social life anymore, thanks.
Hidan;-;I shot a chicken with an arrow and it blew up. 15/10
Lar$h the AFK for 3 weeks.;-;I played this game for 3 Years. The first 2 where on my xbox, but the I realised you can mod the game, so i left my level 60 Orc with daedric armour and gone straight to my old shanky PC. and because of skyrim I've became a PC gamer. Thanks Skyrim, thank you!!! 100000/10
Weefle;-;Basically the story about Tom Sawyer and how his mind is not for rent.
Guts;-;This game makes you want to play it and then gives you the possibility to mod your game and then you simply can't stop adding until you see that isn't running perfectly and delete all your mods to install them again and you  up on something and you go cry in the corner, I had probably twice the hours I had playing in this game just from modding today is a sad day. I give up from installing mods in this I can't even load my game and I honestly lost all my effort on trying to understand why it happened. Farewell skyrim, I will cry to my bed now and maybe play you someday vanilla, I just hope witcher 3 has hundreds of hours like this game although I doubt it. TL;DR: This game will make you feel miserable if you mess with make a mistake with mods but it was worth it when it worked. Edit: Made this review when I had 70 hours or something now 170 and currently growing, best game ever if you get your mods working together
MustangWarrior;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is personally, my favorite story-based game. The many classes you can be enriches the game, and you can defeat the ultimate dragon in numerous ways according to your chosen warrior. Not only do you play the storyline, but you can choose to freely roam Skyrim at any point in the game, and obtain the best gear in the game. The huge variety of enemies and monsters to defeat in the game creates an endless fun experience. Getting the DLC for the game enhances the game in many ways. 11/10
Benjamin Half-Cocked Harrison;-;Probably one of the best buys I've ever made in my short gaming career. A solid playthrough altogether, the possibilities with mods are literally endless, and you will find yourself sinking hundreds of hours into what I beleive to be a fantastic buy.
Jet Fuel;-;Bought the whole game and all its dlcs twice, Xbox and PC. Combined 46 days of playtime. 11/10 -It was ok- -Far Cry with swords-
Pyroglyph;-;Don't even read the rest of the reviews. Just buy the game. You may lose half your lifetime playing it but it will be worth it. Trust me.
Randomperson;-;Play it. Please. And have 800 hours of gaming on it, like me.
VAC Banned;-;I used to hate skyrim, but then i took 4 arrows to the knee... Now i love it 10/10, would skyrim again. If skyrim was bread, it would be good bread Buy the damn thing if you havent
[AwW]Kanker Aap;-;Great game bethesda about a year ago i bought it for the pc but before that just played on the ps3.
JOKER;-;Wow, this game took me hours just to finally take seriously. I spent days messing around in the villages of skyrim, killing and stealing. This game makes me feel like I have unlimited options, i'd definetely recommend it! It starts with you as a prisoner but are saved by a dragon attack!!? You can later choose to be the rebels, Stormcloaks, or the Empire. Of course you can also stop the dragons, though. But as sad as it is, it took me hours to start the storyline!
[MS]Merlinsclaw;-;Every time I watch The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim Full Trailer a tear runs down my face 10/10
EisaiPalikari;-;You will not understand why everybody says how good this game is, until you will play it. You can put mods that make the gameplay even more fantastic than that already is. Amazing Game 10/10! P.S. I'm writing this review after spending 1000+ hours
Dark Ranger;-;Buy it and mod it now you s.
Randomperson;-;Play it. Please. And have 800 hours of gaming on it, like me.
VAC Banned;-;I used to hate skyrim, but then i took 4 arrows to the knee... Now i love it 10/10, would skyrim again. If skyrim was bread, it would be good bread Buy the damn thing if you havent
[AwW]Kanker Aap;-;Great game bethesda about a year ago i bought it for the pc but before that just played on the ps3.
JOKER;-;Wow, this game took me hours just to finally take seriously. I spent days messing around in the villages of skyrim, killing and stealing. This game makes me feel like I have unlimited options, i'd definetely recommend it! It starts with you as a prisoner but are saved by a dragon attack!!? You can later choose to be the rebels, Stormcloaks, or the Empire. Of course you can also stop the dragons, though. But as sad as it is, it took me hours to start the storyline!
ArcadiusMaddock;-;I really liked this game, it has hours of play and so many diffrient things to do. From vampires, to dragons, to werewolfs, to wizards, there are so many major quest lines to do. Another thing about the game is that it is skill based compared to mainly level based. There is still a leveling system, but it relies hevily on skills. That was my favorite part.
EatGamer;-;If you haven't played Skyrim yet, you're an idiot.
elvishknight;-;I finished the Main Quest for Skyrim a couple of days ago and I have to say I'm just a little dissapointed at the ending. The first encounter with Alduin was more epic then the second. I may make a mod just to right that tragedy (I also might make another one but as I do not trust the internet and awesome Idea's I shall not speak of it). Other than that I am way more than satisfied with the game. It has great graphics, awesome gameplay I feel like a warrior blowing away my enemies, and what is more fun than slaying dragons and even riding them?
PurpleRekts;-;The Best RPG Game in history.
arakis99;-;Beyond awesome. PRO: Open world rpg with emergent behaviors and a compelling story line. +loads of content CON(s): You will often stop playing other games when you realize "hey, I could be playing Skryim instead". +game doesn't mow your lawn
Sir_Nightengale;-;Only one word can describe this game. EPIC. This is by far one of the greatest open word fantasy RPG's of all time. If you don't have this game, you're doing it wrong!
Bleach1370;-;Good game would play again/10
Freud Mich;-;Found two bandits fighting a fish in water. They almost died.
CMoose;-;Like Far Cry 3 with swords! 10/10- IGN
FBER;-;The game is great much like the other Bethesda game has full freedome to lurk around where ever you want without worry of your quests and as any of the other titles full mod support makes the game have limitless hours of gameplay by far the game has much to offer evryone who has a chance to try and play it should.
Lagertha;-;its really a fun game i never get bored of it
z (No CS/Dota);-;I can describe this game in one single word: Amazing. I don't like the roleplay genre, but I like this game. I can't write more, I need to play Skyrim! I'm addicted! Damn!
ArcadiusMaddock;-;I really liked this game, it has hours of play and so many diffrient things to do. From vampires, to dragons, to werewolfs, to wizards, there are so many major quest lines to do. Another thing about the game is that it is skill based compared to mainly level based. There is still a leveling system, but it relies hevily on skills. That was my favorite part.
EatGamer;-;If you haven't played Skyrim yet, you're an idiot.
elvishknight;-;I finished the Main Quest for Skyrim a couple of days ago and I have to say I'm just a little dissapointed at the ending. The first encounter with Alduin was more epic then the second. I may make a mod just to right that tragedy (I also might make another one but as I do not trust the internet and awesome Idea's I shall not speak of it). Other than that I am way more than satisfied with the game. It has great graphics, awesome gameplay I feel like a warrior blowing away my enemies, and what is more fun than slaying dragons and even riding them?
PurpleRekts;-;The Best RPG Game in history.
Grandpa Murica;-;FUS ROH DAH YOUR , DRAGON! Who wouldn't want this game?
Alpha Moose;-;Wow this was a great game, i played it for days!! Skipped school and dropped out just to place this game. My children died. #Masterpiece #100endings #Oblivionsucks
NihlusGreen;-;Incredible FPS RPG, one of the best current RPG's to buy. 1000's of mods of are available, I recommend, in addition to Steam workshop, Nexus mod manager http://www.nexusmods.com/games/mods/modmanager/? to handle the many great mods from Nexus http://www.nexusmods.com/games/? Thanks Boltte
Arock;-;This game is definitely a game.
Aether_Ocean;-;Play this game. No, seriously. Play it.
Goose;-;The best RPG game
[TBR] lino;-;like morrowind and oblivion, but not irritating to the point of tedium. It is, without exaggerating, an old RPG gamers' best friend. No pointless pursuit of stats. gratifying to explore and beautiful to behold.
The Splendid;-;Love it 10/10 !
NeonNoodls;-;This game is awesome!
Dwayne Johnson;-;wow what a amazing game i mean it's like so cool and flashy like a man waveing a gun in ur face and like if u move i will blow ur brains out so yer as i was saying its so cool because it's so reolistic because u shout a people and they go oh no! then a thing comes out of ur mouth and it makes them go flying i mean i can do that also i can fly any geting back to the point AAAA! OMG there's a talking crow in my room AAAAA! run, run for the hills. Hey wait ru still reading? most people get bord by now and then play skyrim and go oh look at me i have dadric armor lalala! oh yer reading all this is a mistake because i have no opinion so lol u just wasted a min of ur life reading this crap!
Durzan;-;Truly an amazing game. If you a fan of fantasy this is a must play. ALso with the amount of mods available you make this our own.
LeeroyTheGeek;-;One of the few games you spend 200 hours on to complete only then to decide to start again whilst looking forward to it. Ive now completed (and brought it with all the DLC) on PS3 (Twice), Xbox360 and most recently PC (Total usage on all platforms over 1000 hours) and still believe its money well spent. Cant wait for the next installment
TiggaBiscuit;-;Awesome game! Loved every second of the gameplay can't wait to play more. Definately worth the buy!
Winning is a social construct;-;not enough dragons
Ewok Lord;-;Very good game, es muy bueno.
Mm;-;Paid mods? "The future is so bright i don't need my eyes too see it"
blvke;-;-tier game until my folder becomes 500+gbs then it's worth it, 5/10
AnklesTheSpeedrunner;-;i watch furry stuff on website i get virus i download mod with bestiality i no get virus 10/10 use protection
Robin [Hertig];-;FIrst game to introduce DLC contents and steal from content creators. I would not recommenc this game.
Balrog9;-;Due to steams practices of selling mods other than creating a button for donating i must give this a negative review in protest.
XIX The Sun;-;Paid mods. Wow. Just wow. Who in the world thought that was a good idea. Add a donate option as apposed to selling the mod and taking all the profit. The only reason I bought this game on the computer is so that I could mod the living crap out of it. Shame on you Valve and Bethesda.
Specter214;-;Avoid like the plague, this is now a DLC simulator hiding behind the mask of a way to help content creators when they barely get any of the profit.
ToxicHyperspace;-;Less content than either Morrowind or Oblivion. You used to be able to increase content with mods, but now they've nickled and dimed that away.
.inf;-;Miss hit the guard when trying to kill a dragon ... get a bounty points 13/10
DEMH Futsutsuka;-;TLDR: this game is tops. If for some reason you haven't tried Skyrim at this point, the gamer inside me wants to express its greatness to you. Haters gonna hate though, if you're among them, move along. A beautifully designed fully immersive world. I'm sad to admit I'm in the population of Elder Scrolls players who started with Skyrim, but what an absolutely amazing game. I've played roughly 10x more than my clocked hours on this account, from previous accounts, other consoles, and watching friends play. I am currently on my 10th playthrough, which was mostly played on 6/6 difficulty - Legendary, other plays outside the first on 5/6 - Master. Every playthrough was an adventure. Purchasing the Legendary Edition was a great buy, and well worth the investment. 6/6 diff has proven itself to be a hefty challenge, and it requires you to use every beneficial aspect of the game possible in order to step out the front door (or prison gates). With a civil war going on, ancient Dragonpriests maintaining themselves and their undead armies centuries after their deaths, relentless elves from the Aldmeri Dominion, troubling social class strata, pesky and meddling Daedra, and people with problems around every corner, the options of things to do are virtually endless. Will you choose to help and save the world, or become the most powerful super villian Skyrim has ever seen? Oh yea did I forget to mention dragons? Cuz we got those too. An wonderful aspect of this game is the amount of workshop material developed by the community, and many mods alter the gameplay from texture updates, ui features, building your own civilization, allowing followers to mount horses, having a handful of followers to be your personal army, and more unstable ones that even let you turn into a dragon yourself. After strolling the steam workshop along with nexus mods, I've found dozens of addons that I've stuck with through multiple playthroughs. 3 DLC: Dawnguard, Hearthfire, Dragonborn In a nutshell- Dawnguard further develops the plight of the vampires in Skyrim, and allows you to either join a faction that seeks and destroys vampires, or become one yourself. Hearthfire adds 3 plots of land (in addition to the 5 buyable houses) available for purchase, where you can build your own home with a creative house building interface that lets you build your house piece by piece and eventually build a large manor with 3 wings and a basement. Don't forget your spouse and (up to) 2 adoptable children can move and live there as well. Sadly Winterhold is the only hold where a house or plot of land is unavailable to purchase. Dragonborn offers the new playable area of Solstheim, and a main quest line to go along with it, involving a previous Dragonborn who abused the powers of one of the Daedra, Hermaeus Mora, and gained immense power. The spells, abilities, and Thu'um (or shouts) you discover in this expansion are extremely powerful, including unique buffs you yourself can siphon from the knowledge contained by Herma-Mora. All in all, 11/10. If you're on console, good luck fully completing a playthrough, you will hit a game breaking glitch. PC users luckily can use console commands to fix virtually any problem, glitch, or mishap you may encounter. Familiarizing yourself with useful commands is recommended. As with a game this big, you have to expect hiccups, but on PC there hasn't been a problem I couldn't fix. Recommended over and over, replayability is huge, if you get bored, mod it up, there's lots out there.
Transience;-;My review for this game is located at: http://steamcommunity.com/app/72850/discussions/0/41973820730406687/ The reason that it is there and not here is due to it not fitting in this space. If you are here simply to know whether or not I would recommend this game, then it is with a hearty yes. Skyrim is a fantastic open-world fantasy Western RPG that has held up extremely well since its release, largely due to its vibrant modding community.
php php;-;Having played The Elder Scrolls games throughout my childhood, I can honestly say this is a masterpiece. Oblivion was great but all of the gripes I had with Obvilion have been fixed and things I didn't even think of were added. If Bethesda was any other software company, they would've overdone themselves, but this is Bethesda we're talking about: They performed at the highest level, as usual.
R.R.;-;The reason why I have steam.
Knaurken;-;BEST PURCHASE IVE EVER DONE. Skyrim. -----> Epic. (I bought the Legendary Edition, so i got Hearthfire+Dawguard+Dragonborn aswell in this package) Great story behind this game, epic graphics. (Could've shown a bit more boobs...but thats just me :)) Say it again: Best 'Money-Waste' ive ever done. I think you should throw away some cash to get this! Strongly Recommend!! /!\
[MCCT] Small dick Big dreams;-;Okay. This is the greatest game I've ever played. Just getting that out. In the uninspired craphole of Call of Duty and Battlefield, this game is a massive breathe of fresh air. Everthing is virtually PERFECT The Visuals The Music The Combat The Item System EVERYTHING IS IMMACULATE This is the first fantasy game in YEARS to feel like a fantasy game. Everything feels so unique and well done. The NPC's feel real, the visuals immerse you so quickly you'll be completely unaware of anything going on around you. At first the story seems very cliche but it works incredibley. The story mode is the perfect length. It's not as depressingly short as Batman: Arkham City yet not as annoying long as Portal 2. Even if the story doesn't quite quench your thirst for adventure, there are hundreds of side quests and side quest lines to keep you occupied The levelling system is smooth, and you actually have to practice to level up in any given skill tree. Want to level One-Handed combat? Grab a One-Handed Sword, head into the wilds and start slaughtering. Want to level illusion spells? Equip some, find some test subjects and see what your spells can do. I have this game on Xbox 360 and PC, and I honestly prefer the Xbox version BUT, there is one thing the PC can do that consoles can't. MODS There are thousands of mods that can do anything from adding a huge arena to the vast game world, to making NPC's run indoors when a dragon attacks a village. Mods can help you iron out the few imperfections this game has. The game world is vast, sprawling and beautiful. Anything from a shack inhabited by a little old lady who turns out be an evil and powerful witch, to huge and active cities full of lootable shops, houses that can all be broken into and individual and interesting NPC's that interact with you in different ways depending on how you act. With unique and hand-crafted temples and dungeons, villages deep in the mountains, lairs inhabited by sleeping dragons and secret crypts that all somehow link to a quest. Saying this game has "good graphics" is a massive understatement. The textures look a little low-res when you get up close but the world never fails to immerse you with it's beauty and realism There are 3 basic ways to go in this game: The Warrior, The Thief and The Mage. If you choose the path of the warrior you will be responible for levelling thing like One-Handed, Two-Handed, Blocking and Heavy Armour, which eventually allows you to pulverize any enemy who dare stand in your way. If you choose the Path of the Thief (like I did) You will have to level skill like Lockpicking, Pickpocketing (my personal favourite) and Sneak, which allows you to slither through any nook and cranny silently and maybe doing some looting If you choose the Path of the Mage, you will have to level skills such as Illusion, Destruction, Conjuration and Restoration, which allow you to apply paralysis, poisoning and enslavement on any and all NPC's. Restoration, however, allows you to heal the wounds of you and your allies. The DLC packs for this game include in order: Dawnguard, Hearthfire and Dragonborn. Dawnguard is my favourite of the 3. In it, you are told of a vampire hunting group called the Dawnguard. If you visit Fort Dawnguard, you will be sent to Castle Volkhier, were you will meet, you guessed it, VAMPIRES!!! At this point you're given the choice to join the Vampires and reek havok OR Get the hell out of there and return to Fort Dawnguard and become a vampire hunter. I won't spoil anything but it's definately worth what it costs. Hearthfire is rather simple. This expansion pack allows you to purchase land, build a home and start a family. It's nice but building a house is hard work, which I enjoy, but you need a lot of patience. Finally, Dragonborn. I didn't like Dragonborn that much, but it was a fun expansion and definately worth it. Tip: If you stand atop the highest southern mountain on a clear day, you can see Whitegold Tower in Cyrodil, from Oblivion! How cool is that!?!? Bethesda has created the perfect western RPG and one I will compare future WRPG's to in the future. It may sound like I'm kissing Bethesda's  here, but they deserve nothing less after this masterpiece. If you were a fan of any Elder Scrolls game before this, you WILL enjoy the hell out of Skyrim. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim easily earns the score of 10/10. PERFECT If you've bothered to read this far without running off and buying the game, do it. NOW. You can't realize what a good game is until you play this game.
King Noodler;-;This is probably my favorite game. What is lacking in content, you can just get in mods!
TurbaN;-;10/10 Gives moist nipples. Very Gooch.
JTFN3L;-;A must have for everybody's collection!! It provides hours and hours of gameplay...
BearFucker;-;THIS GAME IS THE MOST AMAZING THING IN THE WORLD! I've owned it one PS3 and Xbox 360 and now I own it for PC. I've logged hundreds of hours between the two consoles and I can't reccomen this game highly enough.
Qarren;-;People tell me to enjoy life you have to stop and smell the flowers. Well, people, its kind of hard to do that when even the flowers are spurting consumerism all over your face in a strangely suggestive manner. The hype surrounding the release of Skyrim was the truest example of this and I dont think Ive ever seen so many nerds swoon at one time. The game will see you as a prisoner again (these guards really have to stop arresting the worlds greatest heroes) when youre freed by a reptilian anger management escapee; a story for the ages for sure. Finally, after choosing to follow your death penalty chum or the man that nearly turned you into the next Eugene Armstrong, you are let loose upon the unsuspecting land of Skyrim. At this point youre left to your own devices and by all means you can follow the ever present arrow to the following plot point or you can jog off, find a shop, put a cooking pot on the shopkeepers head and steal all his goods assuming you play the PC version, if not you can suck on my dragon bone. However, there are situations the game randomly drops you in. I fondly look upon the time I killed a blacksmith and received money from her will even though that was the first time I met her. Of course then her boyfriend caught on and hired mercenaries to kill me, but ended up killing an innocent bystander, who I then also received money from, suckers! I bet youre expecting an ending statement here, but Im afraid the reptile had an aneurism and burned it up. By the way, I know you'll get the nude and killable children mods.
Neus IHOP;-;The replayability of this game is endless on PC with mods and with such graphics anyone in the family would enjoy this rpg.
Spartanman72;-;In all the hours I've played Skyrim, I'm still not tired of it. I had for the 360 for a while, and I put a ton of hours into it. Now that I have it on the computer, I would definitley reccomend it to anyone. The mods you can get for the game is ridiculous, and it can add so much to your game. Overall, even though it is an older game, it is still one of my personal favorites.
Celphix;-;Found a dead guy on the side of the road. He had 100 gold. Would do again.
!!!TheToTGod!!!;-;A very pretty open-world game and amzing combat and story!!! :D
Northveygr;-;Best game in the world.
King Kunta;-;Probably my least favorite TES that I have played, though that doesn't mean its horrible, it has a lot of copy and pasted content (Castles, Crypts, Caves). For a 3D game it still focuses more on stats then skill which is a bit of a problem but mods like Duel or Ace can fix combat and the AI performance to make it a little more fun and bearable. There is a lot to do in this game though its a lot of the same thing over and over again, it has a few stand out quests/dungeons and has a fun and intriguing main storyline though the civil war campaign is garbage and most of the things in the game get very repetative. The puzzles in this game are incredibly easy (and the same over and over again much like the combat and stealth). - AI - The AI in the game aren't very good when it comes to combat (or common sense for that matter). A lot of the AI have cool personalities and some of them even have very unique backgrounds. As I said earlier mods like Duel, Ace can improve AI combat performance. - Stealth - The stealth system is almost completely stat based, it requires at low levels you will be detected fairly easily but after leveling up your stealth (perks or not) you become almost impossible to detect. - Combat - As I implied earlier the combat in this game is very generic and easy. Fighting as a warrior all you have to do is kite, attacking then running back over and over. Fighting as an archer (stealth or not) is just about draining as many arrows as you can in them before they get close to you. It is hard to miss as an archer because of the crosshair (which you can disable) (<-- I did) but at very distant ranges it can become a bit challenging. Mages in this game are bad and boring to put it simply, they don't do much damage until they are very high levels and even then you feel more like a glass rifle then a glass cannon. - Wrap-up - This game feels like it is just trying to make dumb people feel like badasses rather then challenging the players in any way (I feel Morrowind made players think and put effort forth to figure things out a majority of the time). The game is good for one vanilla playthrough since the stupid level up system they put in this game enables you to not have to choose a playstyle and stick with it (the game does that a lot in different ways giving you many chances to back out of a choice after you learned the consequences). The level up system makes replaying the game practically pointless (if you are looking to have different playthrough experiences) since there are almost no choices in the game that have any real impact on anything. 6/10 as a standalone game. 5/10 as a TES game. 1/10 required intelligence level (MOST OF THE THINGS I SAID THAT WERE WRONG WITH THIS GAME CAN BE IMPROVED WITH MODS THOUGH THAT SHOULD NOT BE AN EXCUSE TO SAY THE GAME IS GOOD. MY RATING IS BASED OFF OF THE VANILLA GAME EXPERIENCE.)
Hrunthir;-;I was hooked from the moment I woke up on the cart and am still hooked. I have been the quintessential wizard, dashing rogue as well as the antitypical orc diplomat. With so many different ways to play the vanilla game how can you not become enmeshed in the grandeur and spectacle that is Tamriel? And just when you think you are done someone makes a mod that you have to try and then the cycle begins anew. It's not real but the feelings are.
Lando;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a game where you play as a soulless serial  who tries to suck the souls out of innocent dragons. This game is absolutely stunning on low graphics, and you have to play it on low graphics or your game will crash from entering a building. The combat system has REDEFINED the Elder Scrolls series, as it is changed to a right-click to block, and a left-click to hit. The entire modding community of The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is made up of 40-year-old perverts who sit in there mother's basements and try to make graphically enhancing mods for nude characters that have visible neck seams. I would rate The Elder Scrolls V: Skyman a 12/10.
HelionMusic;-;Started out as a Nordic woman, ended up marrying Lydia. 10/10 would marry her again right after I go and shove a few more swords into another dragon.
FluffehTaco;-;Amazing open world map with great varity of things to do
Gay Bastard;-;So like I was playing this game and my mom comes in (keep in mind, she's a total looney), and she's like, hey Jimjam (short for Jimmy Jamper) your sandwich is ready. I go downstairs. No sandwich.
Squinty;-;Playing it through the 1st run through is great as it takes a while to finish off the campaign. The missions are diverse and intense, yet some show surreal serenity. The one problem which I have come across is repetitiveness, as when you make a new character you will find that you will drop off slowly. - Squinty
Scenatio;-;Very expansive game with unending mods really keeps you playing it.
+The Hawk+;-;probably my favourite game of all time! this has the best modding community ever. 10 years into the future and i bet people are still playing skyrim.
snap;-;Truthfully the best game RPG game I have ever played. Totally worth every cent.
Juansheet;-;Total play time upon writing this review: PC: 210 hours Xbox 360: about a billion years Endlessly replayable game, with hundreds of side quests to waste your life on. Plus, the fantastic modding community that this game has means you will NEVER run out of things to do. And there's a mod which makes chickens explosive. Enough said. 10/10 would destroy my social life all over again.
Dave;-;What outside world? 11/10
Gur;-;I saw a dragon this one time. It was a goat
Foxchase;-;Played this game for 1001 hours now Maxed out mods Still not crashing Skyrim is love Skyrim is life Everyday Skyrim
Dinghole;-;the amount of entertainment I get from putting dead bodies into sexual positions is concerning
Demonic Avenger Fate;-;A open world game with a world that seems never ending. You will face strong Warriors, Mages, Armys, And of course the most deadly the dragon. with many dungeons to explore vanilla skyrim alone sets itself high above what I initially expected. Placed in a world where two factions clash against one another in wars. (If you choose to do them this game gives you immensive control over decisions) Want to be a mage? Ok. Want to be a Warrior in your armor with a giant sword? Ok. Lets delve farther into this idea of freedom though. Something new and exciting. Want to be a mage wearing heavy armor wielding a sword? Ok. But theres just so much customization you can make your own unique character and it doesn't stop there. If you choose so the skyrim nexus or steam workshop has a extensive library of mods to help you make that special person in your mind. Want a specific looking armor? Want something outragous like exploding arrows? Want a car? For whatever reason you would want one in this game... You can get it with mods! Ending this games rating I would highly recommend. Ive spent countless hours playing it since it first came out and it still brings me much enjoyment. Its honestly worth more then any game ive ever bought so much so that I had to buy the steam version so I could use mods and experiment more with it then the consoles allow. My rating for this game is 10/10 and I would definitely buy again if I had too.
steph;-;used to play weeks worth of this masterpiece in my old PS3 and i got the PC one because mods :3 and it's arguably one of the best RPG games ever made. every penny worth.
Abshiroo;-;When some donkey  smelling prick comes up to me in skyrim and tells me i'm a  I kill his whole family and the entire population of that town along with that, also I download the nude mod so I can fap to some huge dead  ,that's how I live my life in skyrim. #DragonBornThugLife I rate this game 69/420
Green Power Ranger;-;great game and amazing steam work shop must have!!!!!
DiddlyLift;-;AWESOME! This game is super addictive!
Her0 #Prai 4 eddy;-;Best ing game ever! Have it on xbox but had to buy it to pc becaus it's so awesome:) CS:GO Is the best game ever but this is even better somehow:)
GilliesTheGhillie;-;Im writing this reveiw to tell everyone to buy this game. This is one of the best games I have ever played. I have played it on xbox for over 500 hours and on pc. If you do not have this game then I would highly recomend buying this game. In this game you can be a warrior, mage, theif, vampire, warewolf and much more. The quest line is an amazing experience if you like action adventure games then you must buy it. After finishing the main missions there are a wide range of things to do and I dought you could get bored playing this game. Modding in this game is easy and makes the game even more fun to play. The only down side to this game is that it is not multiplayer. If they did bring out multiplayer for this game it would be the best game ever made. *Dont listen to the people that do not recommend the game, they know nothing of what they can do in this game. This game can go above the line with mods and is just amazing. The graphics are pretty good. Its can run on almost any pc but to play this game and you have a 75hz, 100hz, 120hz, 144hz monitor then you need to go into your settings and change it to 60hz. This game can only run at 60hz which does not change the graphics. WARNING IF YOU DO PLAY AT 60HZ+ THEN YOUR PROPS IN THE GAME ARE GOING TO GO CRAZY, SUCH AS CARRAGES ARE GOING TO FLY. You have been warned.* Thank you for reading my opinion on Skyrim. Hope you buy it and enjoy the endless fun.
FriendlyNeighbourhoodPaki;-;I fought a dragon with my bare hands while listening to Guile's theme song than I ate his soul. 10/10 Chuck Norris would approve.
UnKnown;-;this is the best open world rp game i've ever played :)
Fa Kju Tooh;-;Having already 533 hours now, I thought it was time to write a review. First of all, I'm a huge fan of the Elder Scrolls series. I played every one of them, and loved them all. Some more than others. However, I'll start by saying TES V is not my favorite in terms of story or characters. Almost none of the characters are really interesting, and the story was pretty bald. In RPG the story matters to me the most, but Skyrim had such beautiful locations and great gameplay, that I couldn't possibly dislike it. The graphics in Skyrim are beautiful, even without mods. And the locations are a huge improvement. Morrowind and the other games are pretty outdated, but they had different locations. Most locations in Oblivion were copy-pasted. However, Skyrim takes the best of both worlds. A lot of different, beautiful and interesting locations. Skyrim really encourages exploring because you might find loot or a very nice view. The soundtrack is as in every TES game, amazing. The voice actors did a great job, even though some actors seem to be re-used a lot. The gameplay was also a huge improvement. However, unlike previous games, magic seems pretty useless. The combat is fun, but might get boring after a while. It's not as hard as it was in Morrowind, but it depends if you find this good or not. Even after completing this game, the fun never stops. Skyrim has a very active modding community, with lots of different mods that make this game even nicer, and add tons of extra hours to the gameplay. If you're still not sure if you want this buy this game, you really should. It is really worth the price.
Lendovaxion;-;This review was made with 244 hours playtime on Steam, and much more off Steam. I would like to begin by giving a quick overview of the game. In 'The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim', you presume the role of the Dragonborn, destined to do all sorts of things, from exploring dungeons, to sleeping in inns, to eating sweet-rolls. What's wrong, someone stole your sweetroll? Never mind! Because this is the fifth game in the series, that is, the five 'main' games in the series: Arena, Daggerfall, Morrowind, Oblivion, and of course Skyrim. Skyrim itself, takes place in the Northern-Tundras of Tamriel; A war-torn land, split by a civil war, and infested with bandits. Right, now that's all finished! This time, I'll try something different with the reviewing system. I'll split everything up. Gameplay 7/10. A good gameplay system, depending on who you are. A massive change from Morrowind, and a partial continuation of the general feel of Oblivion, Skyrim has some new gameplay mechanics. That is, the perk trees of each individual skill, the way those skills work and interact with the game on a mechanical, and general level, and the general 'leveling' of each stat/skill. The reason this hasn't gotten a 10/10, for all the new gameplay mechanics, is mostly due to the fact that Skyrim was, to put it bluntly (But truthfully), 'Dumbed Down'. By which I mean: Made easier, Made simpler, Made more 'Mash this and repeat that'. The 'Late Game' class-archetypes end up being, literally, that . As a mage, stunlocking is all you do. As a 'Rogue', stealth kills with insane damage levels is all you do. As a 'warrior', potions, potions, potions, potions, potions, potions, oh and more potions - Is all you do. This can all be fixed by the community. In fact, it has been fixed by the community, as you'll find out soon enough. Story 5/10. Ah, quite the let-down. To be honest, whether or not you find the storyline of the game interesting, or not, is truly dependant on your preference. Without spoiling anything, the most I can say is: The storyline of Skyrim was a huge downgrade from that of... Say, Morrowind? Oblivion even (Not that I much enjoyed that either.) There are a few plotholes here and there, and, in general, the whole storyline(s) is pretty repetative, and unengaging. It should also be noted that (Again, cured by the Community), there is very little 'choice' within the storyline(s), which could cause them to become boring after a short while. Yes, I understand this isnt just a problem with Skyrim, but I'm reviewing Skyrim. Combat 4/10. As earlier mentioned, the combat mechanics of the game are rather basic, and simplistic. This may not affect you; But, after a while, when you're stuck doing the exact same thing, or mashing the exact same buttons, with weapons and tactics that can beat the highest game difficulties (Master/Legendary) as if they were on the lowest, things do tend to get boring, and tedious. The late-game of this is horrible - But then again, starting the game over a couple of hundred (thousand. Million. Billion. Trillion.) times never hurt anyone! Trust me, I've been there, and I've done that. No. Really. ... Really. But, to be serious. The Combat system in the vanilla game is very repetative, and thus very tedious (and/or boring). But. Some people enjoy that kind of thing, the simplistic side to combat, where you dont have to care about much else other than doing the same thing(s) over and over, to max out your characters. So good for you, my completionist-chums. That is, unless you're a completionist who doesn't like having to do that kind of thing. Graphics Look, I'm a person who plays a game for the game - Not the graphics. Otherwise, for all those pixel-terrorists (Heh. No? Ok, sorry.) out there: There are PLENTY of graphics mods all over, and even Bethesda's own 'High Resolution Texture Pack'. The World 7/10. Skyrim's 'World', rather coincidentally (Not really) named 'Skyrim', is a tundra landscape, with many mountains, and valleys, rivers, and lakes, frozen seas, and the like. A vast land, with ALOT to discover, explore, and contemplate. From beautiful scenes, to rough areas, to scary crypts and tombs - Skyrim has it all. Pretty much (Barring a few exceptions), if you can see it: You can visit it. The Memes 8/10. No. 9/10. No. 10/-- Wait! Decide for yourself: I used to be a normal human like you, till I took a Skyrim to the Knee. The Gods gave you two hands, and you use them both for your [CENSORED!!!]. I can respect that. No lolly-gagging. (Please. Just... WHY!?) Call yourself a Nord!? (No. I'm an Orc. A FRICKEN ORC!) Filthy Milk-Drinker. (Wow, you've just insulted 86.9% of the world's population that actually drink milk. Daily.) The Community 41897489416/10. Skyrim has one of the, if not THE, greatest communities there is. Even now, 4 years after it's launch - There are people working hard, on modding the game, helping those with technical difficulties, and the like. 'Let's Plays' are still going on, and the fact that I'm here, typing this review ALOT later than the game's actual release date, should be proof enough, that Skyrim's Community has lived on, for a long, long time. My last thoughts "To buy, or not to buy? That is the question." - William Scrollspeare Yes, although I would recommend testing out the occassional mod, or even deciding to play your game fully-modded, unless you want to stick with the 'Native' Skyrim game. I bid you adieu,
kyubey did nothing wrong;-;this game be cool base game only for 3 playthroughs (one for every playing style like ya know mage, warrior, thief) then you have to add variety yourself by restricting what you can and cant do and the use of mods but i got like 100 hours without mods and it was worth it
Zerenei;-;i like the game. tis gud. i hate dying. tis bad.
Arnaldo Beowulf;-;The storyline, the sidequests, the mods, the freedom, AH THE FREEDOM, everything is perfect on this game, I love it so much, no words can express that.
The Pussy Wizard;-;Skyrim is a masterpiece. Enough said and no elaboration needed. Stop reading this review and buy the game. In summary, I recommend this game 100% to anyone who doesn't mind staring at a screen for hours, days & weeks! :D
Solid Snake;-;There's a staff that turns people into a Sweet Roll 10/10
Gilly;-;Addicting, Addicting and Addicting
Gwynbleidd;-;The Elder Scrolls is my favourite part of the Skyrim series <3 http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=180265299
godlygunslinger;-;As always bethesda makes an amazing game with a ton of replay value!
Gangsta Kitten;-;Hi everyone! Please check out my profile for more reviews! This was clearly a massive breakthrough for Bethesda and the begginings for the Elder Scrolls series. This is the RPG that finally took open world fun over the top. Clearly, I am very happy with this game, which is quite rare for me. The first person gameplay again freakin' dragons really make the gameplay intense. The graphics are fantastic. Also, there is a free DLC available for better graphics and textures. It truly sets a great speed for the memory it takes up. Really, that is one of the only things I have to say about this game that I dislike. The memory space for it, especially if you download the DLC's, is kind of nasty. But if you have a computer that's built for gaming (like mine) then I'm sure we can handle a couple seconds of bad RAM. Refering to the earlier comments on the DLC, they have four of them (including the free bit). The majority of the DLC's only affect the gameplay, enemies, and spells that you can use. It's very suprising that this game is twenty bucks. I received it on a sale for five dollars! My brother had been showing me the gameplay on his Xbox (the first Xbox game I played) and got me hooked onto the serious in which I played the second and fourth (and obviously fifth) games of the Elder Scrolls series. I was super excited when I played it for the first time. Note, please, that I was young at the time, and never really had any magnificent experiences on video games. At the time, the only really big systems were the Gamecube, Wii, and DS (Was I a big fan of Nintendo? Yes). So you couldn't imagine my excitement when I purchased it for such a low price. Be thankful that this game is sometimes lower than five bucks, and they have sales for it quite often. The Workshop is quite fun. You have alot of crap you can do and some overpowered deeds you can commit to. Of course, as we all know, when you play a game, the last thing you want to do is die quickly. In this case, at the beggining, you have collected some stuff that you can use to your advantage from the original Elder Scrolls, like the destruction, healing, and other useful things. The spawns amoung the forests and mountains are very well done.
marK.B.;-;If you like open-world RPGs you gonna like Skyrim. With all those amazing mods produced by the community you just can't get enough of this game.
Wim~;-;Best game since Morrowind!
Djs;-;Probably one of the best games I've ever played,
HIPfreez;-;Skyrim just made Elder Scrolls gold. The game is unbelieveably amazing in every aspect especially when Bethesda made it. The Fallout Series (3, New Vegas) were the games that made the type of gameplay that they put off, hands-down my favorite. Combat in my eyes is very stratigized, Not having to rush to kill the enemy BEFORE your companion does, and not having Vats is great. Example: I had to run and jump off of things so that the enemy, which was way stronger than me, would fall back father behind me so that I can heal and gain some more magika. Also on PC, It blows the Skyrim expericence up to the roof, Its beautiful. Skyrim is where Its at if you want a new, open-world game. 110/100
Six6Star_Studios;-;A friend of mine got me into this game a while ago and it's free roaming gameplay, and general ability to craft almost anything reeled me in. Then the ability to mod the game came in and I was hooked even more. With every DLC the game kept growing. Even after being out for years now this game just keeps going. People love it and I know why they do. With all that people contribute to making the game more than it was released as, it has become a people's game made by Bethesda but shaped by the players into whatever vision each of us may have. It has become a huge way for so many to express ideas and share them with countless others. As a modder for this game the happiness my work and the work of so many others brings to people is priceless...and better than any amount of $.
Lupus_Dominus;-;Very good game. While the story may not be as good as in previous Elder Scrolls games, it's still a epic game. The fact that you play as a Dragonborn is a nice change, which brings me to the Shouts. They were a very good addition to the game, and they can be pretty fun, for example Unrelenting Force (A.K.A. the popular FUS RO DAH). Graphics wise, it's not the best there is in terms of textures (theres also shadow striping in some spots), but graphics aren't always the main priority of a game. There are bugs, and stuff that should have been in the game, but the DLC's add extra questlines and content which are really great (my favorite is Dragonborn, but you may have different opinions). Dragonborn and Dawnguard add extra questlines and places, and Hearthfire gives you the ability to build your own home in 3 places. Even so, if you want the game to be PERFECT, then get the mods you want and your experience will be very great. Score: 9/10 (by itself) 9.4/10 (with DLC) 10/10 (with DLC and mods)
isiac7;-;Just bought this game on sale for $4.99 gotta say it pays to have steam!
IAmTehKodo;-;Anyone who likes RPG's should have Skyrim. A lot of people will say Oblivion was better, and in a lot of ways it was, but with the Steam Workshop and the Nexus at your fingertips, Skyrim easily becomes one of the funnest and most immersive RPG's out there. Vanilla Skyrim is fine, but the mods make it what it is. Definitely recommend it.
Calibrono;-;Such cold, very big, much freedom, amaze.
Core2Duo;-;Skyrim is a must-have! If you're a huge fan of TES series and RPG games like I am, then don't hesitate to buy it.
Officer Jaco;-;This is actually good, The graphics are very nice and the HUD is very easy to understand as of the colours for Health, Stamina and Magicka. This game got me so hooked I have planned a youtube series of it and will be excited if/when I get a better computer so I can play this game on ultra and enjoy every damn moment of it. 10/10 owns all DLC
cri74;-;Safe to say this is one of the best games out there if you like adventure and magical storytelling. I loaded this with mods like Climates of Tamriel, Vanilla Nights, Real Rain, HD textures and Purewater. Its stunning on ultra!! Allthough im not a fan of medieval kind of games, Skyrim really sucked me in and i love to explore this game. It only gets better and better :) You should play this!
oi;-;I would not have recommended this game three years ago. However the mod community, lowered price and *excellent* expansion pack content make Skyrim a must-own, and not for the vanilla experience. I will stand by my opinion that Oblivion was better, especilly in the uniqueness of the quests it offered as opposed to "find x in cave full of draugr", and don't get me started on the BS "but the combat is better in Skyrim" argument since the same bad combat system is just hid behind fancy execution moves. But the expansion pack content is genuinely interesting and through modding I've made my game a hardcore and fast-paced experience that feels not unlike Diablo, (to clarify that's in pure intensity and not literally like a dungeon-crawler). It's disappointing to have to merely say "the mods make this game" but that's the harsh reality in this case. The expansion content however, as I've stated twice already, is high-quality and only emphasises how mediocre the vanilla game is. Edit: Also I would highly recommend playing this game with a controller. The character feels more weighty to me that way, although that could be personal preference - you WILL have trouble playing an archer that way.
55socram55;-;One of the best games I've ever played
Brock-Boi;-;best thing since fried chicken
Fevershaking;-;Well where do I begin. The Elder Scroll Skyrim is easy the best game I've ever played, Although I'm not the most hardcore reviewer in the world, It's an excellent game, and you should buy it if you don't have it already. You get an excellent RPG experience with an Open world environment and Hours apon Hours of content, and that's without the DLC or any Mods. Mods is what really makes this game shine. The Modding community on both Nexus and Steam Workshop are both excellent, and Bursting with content for you to enjoy. Like I said before, If you haven't already, Buy this game.
ChocolateBiff;-;i am da dragunborn HUAAARGHAMAHAAA! u should play dis game NAOW!
Berto;-;Freedom is meaningless if its full of boredom. The first few hours were cool, however as the time went by, all became so stale, generic and boring that I had a lot of trouble to find the motivation to continue. The Witcher and Game of Thrones really spoiled me in terms of fantasy. Still, it can be fun sometimes. 3/5
All Day Nigga;-;Great game, Amazing Story and alot of intresting side quests. Good gameplay and the engine is easy to understand. And for the final thing, MODS ARE AWESOME!!
Yal Yager;-;This game redefines masterpiece. I keep typing and backspacing because I am at a loss for words, because trying to describe this game makes me think about how amazing this game is, and I can't think of what to say. Yep. It's the game of my dreams. The ultimate roleplay experience. Pretty much everything I could wish for in a game. Never a roleplaying game so very long-lasting. Whether you play as a badass, or a simple person existing in the world... you'll still feel awesome. Replayability value is extreeeeeeeemely high. Never a game so beautiful and IMMERSIVE in every way possible too. I always turn the volume way up. I cried even on the main menu because it was so amazing and the music and the awesome. There is not a more amazing game series than the Elder Scrolls. I have played the first four TES games, and this game just sent my fanboy heart and turned it into a Viking.
Jake;-;Most Epic game of all time ! Use the mods :D
anus friends;-;Skyrim is an amazing game where you can be the dragonborn, cast shouts, do magic, and defeat the neverending waves of evil in the land of Skyrim. You can do outstanding things like dying repeatedly, sitting in your desk chair for hours trying to farm your smithing skill, killing innocent people, and if you have mods, killing children, and fapping to naked women! What else could you want from an amazing RPG game where you're the ultimate badass *to an extent*? 10/10 It was ok
Munzch;-;I don't know why I'd bother even making a review for Skyrim at this point, since everyone has blown a collective load over it. This game is fantastic, beautiful, endearing, and I can say that any bug or problem that Skyrim has makes it all the more memorable and lovable. Mods are a great way to enhance what's already there, with ones such as Falskaar that can add hours of new, lore-friendly content to an already time-consuming and amazing game. The community is welcoming and rich with art, mods, and jokes. I love this game. Regardless of the paid mods blunder, this game is one of my top five favorite games, without a friggin' doubt. Do I even have to whine at you to buy it? 9/10 would fly into stratosphere by the hand of a giant again
zeroxmadness;-;its sik but dont get if you only got 2gb RAM. it will be too slow and crash every second
Jigga Mane Aint Playin;-;If you play anything other than a Khajiit, you aren't playing it right, man.
Shrike;-;I highly reccommend this game. Altough I can honestly say that I spend twice the time modding the game than I do playing it.
Damocles;-;I'd definately recommend this game. This game is a few years old now (2011) but it is still an amazing game to play. With all the great mods out there it is even possible to add more fun to the game or more awe with the many graphic mods that are out there.
That Deceiver Kid;-;* This review is lengthy. If you just want the summary, scroll to the bottom, if you want a breakdown of the items listed, feel free to read all of it. Either way, you'll get an accurate, honest review of the game* IF YOU WANT A SIMPLE REVIEW, SCROLL DOWN TO THE BOTTOM. After owning the game on both PC and Console, and after creating a myriad of characters ranging from the buffest, most brutal warriors to the most timid and sly pickpocketers, I can say that this game is hands down amazing. It's been three years since the release of The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim (11/11/11) and It has captured my attention ever since. Most of my hours were logged on console before I came to my better senses, got a PC, and grabbed the Legendary Edition on sale for 20 bucks. This review will detail the following. - Base Game - Combat - Types of Characters and Races - Variety of Mods - Recommendations and Conclusions About the Game *NOTE* No storyline other than non-spoiler mentions will be made in this review, so don't worry about that. The base game itself is very satisfying. The staggering amount of side quests, individuals, random events, and items gives the game an almost endless replayability. The skill trees are straightforward, and easily read and used. The inventory is VERY simple yet, as many people can understand, the inventory has no search bar, making searching for a quest item a little more challenging in a cluttered inventory. The inventory is sorted alphabetically, so the worst you have to do is scroll down a list of infinite keys, letters from friends, death threats, and other sorts of nonsuch, which isn't really bad. Side quests are very rewarding and fun. You never know if the stranger who is stranded on the side of the road needing help with his wagon is a simple person in need of help or a runaway murderer. The leveling of the skill tree can go on forever, and so can the main level, which used to be 81, but patch 1.9 allowed you to make any skill that is level 100 into a "Legendary" perk, resetting it's skill to 15 and letting you earn an infinite amount of XP from your skill trees. The main level can even go above level 252, so no need to worry about capping out on a level because your skill trees that made your character a thief, archer, warrior, etc were already. In other words, UNLIMITED LEVELING! Combat is VERY rewarding and fun. It can be challenging at times, but thank Talos you have a million and one potions of archery, alchemy, health, stamina, magika, and lockpicking to see you through it. Fighting one on one is simple enough, but one against several is challenging, and can try the patience and skill of even the most battlehardened warriors. Each type of character has a variety of ways of handling multiple opponents, although some vary in efficiency. AOE (Area of Effect) spells work, or a sweeping blow from your battleaxe, or just quick jabs from a knife to each opponent. The choice is yours. From my personal experience *Keep in mind, this is what I like and not what is best statistically* I have found that archery or a sword and shield is preferable to magic or two-handed weapons. Archery lets you pick off target from a distance, giving them a lot of damage. Shields block a lot of damage, and after attacks, you can let out a killing blow of your own. Magic can summon minions of the dead, ice, fire, etc as your own personal posse. Two handed weapons deal massive amounts of damage, which makes up for their bulkiness. Armor usually is a preference of the player, not bound to one fighting style or the other. Also, FUS ROH DAH! As for races, each race is specialized towards a certain type of fighter. For example, you typically wouldn't take a High Elf as a warrior or a Redguard as a magician, but both are available to you if you so desire. The races are listed below: - Nord (Primarily Two - Handed Warriors) - Imperial (Primarily Shield Users) - Breton (Usually Mages) - Argonian (Primarily Thieves/Restoration or Alteration Mages) - Wood Elf (Primarily Thieves/Archers) - High Elf (Primarily Mages) - Dark Elf (Primarily Mages) - Khajiit (Primarily Thieves) - Orc (Primarily Warriors) - Redguard (Primarily Warriors) Classes: Warrior- Very strong, very tough to kill. They are usually slow, but devastating to enemies. Use heavy armor. Mages- Cunning and powerful. They can't take many hits, but can conjure things up to take hits for them, and can have a very diverse selection of spells to use at any time. Use light armor with spell enchants. Thieves- Sly and deadly. Use one handed weapons, which are usually daggers. They prefer to stay hidden and make their money off of stealing items from people's homes, or pockets. Wear light armor that is usually of a material like leather. Archers- Precise and Meticulous. Stay back and engage fights first with well placed shots. Use one handed weapons and light armor for when they can't pick people off fast enough. The moment you've all been waiting for.... MODS! The amount of mods that have been created for Skyrim are astounding. Graphics can be improved, glitches can be fixed, items added, people added, places added, actions added and much more! The Steam Workshop has a great deal of mods that work on their own, and some that just don't work at all. These mods can be managed easily on the launch menu of the game. Some of these mods require other mods that help run them. These helping mods can come from The Workshop, or the SkyrimNexus, which is a HUGE modding community posting mods for skyrim users to enjoy. Hello to everyone who just wants to know about the damn game, and not all this information. Also hello to the people who ACTUALLY read my entire review. In which case, thanks! Anyway, here goes. The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is a fantastic game! The diversity of all aspects of this game is unique and hard to find in other titles. Should you get it? YES. Should you get the Legendary edition? HELL YES, but get it on sale because Skyrim goes on sale frequently. Overall great game, must get. Any questions about the diversity of the game, please consult the novel above this paragraph. P.S. ALL HAIL TODD HOWARD AND JEREMY SOULE
Domo Kun v1.0 beta (Report bugs);-;i am surprised that it actually took me a while to create a character.
Helixia;-;+ vast world + nice story + weapons/crafting + modding + DRAGONS! + much to do One sidenote when you mod the game then the game can be unstable from time to time. But for me is the game a 5/5.
NaBeHobby;-;To be honest, I actually pirated this game years ago. I just bought it recently and I'm already 60 hours in. The main plot can be finished within two days, which is a little frustrating. How could a game this big be finished within hours? The main reason this game stands so brightly is its side missions. There are literally hundreds of them. There are so many I can't stop finding them. And they're not cheap fast side quests. It take at least two hours just to complete one of them. It's awesome to find so many quests, but it can be annoying when they're popping up everywhere. There are times when you vist a city to finish a quest, then be introducted to another quest. Your quest window will start building, holding them all. I kind of wish they would hold back and have certain quests be available when you've progressed in-game a certain amount. I also wish NPCs would be more alive. After stealing something, the owners will somehow know you've stolen it and set a bounty, and merchants will not buy stolen items because they somehow know it's stolen. Merchants do not lower prices if you come to their shops as a regular customer. Adopted children will not stop bothering you. Guards do not persue you when they obviously know you're a member of a bad guild. I just wish the people would actually be living people. Perhaps the next Elder Scrolls? And there are useless skills. Skills like smithing and (for people like me) the entire magicka section are never used. Maybe I'll use a healing spell once or twice, but that's it. I can easily just use up my potions I collect (which are everywhere) instead of taking the time and wait for the restoration spell to work. Maybe I'll start exploring alchemy once I exhaust the remaining slots on my main skills, but until then, they're just an eye sore and a waste of time swifting by them. And last complaint is that the world map does not correctly show how far things are. Once you set a destination that seems to be a very far distant, it actually takes only a minute to run there. Overall: 8/10 There are some annoying things such as useless skills, robot npcs, and silent arrows that alert nearby enemies, but the quests really do balance my judgement scale. You can tell the devs took their time to think about the game. There are even books in this game. Books that you can sit and read. If you're one of those people that only focus on the main story, you're only going to have a very limited amount of fun. But if you do like to explore, then bottoms up the Nord Mead, my favorite drinking buddy! :)
Dovahkiin;-;When i bought The Elder Scrolls Skyrim Legendary on my 360 console and switched from console gaming to PC and i just had to play Skyrim again. The game never gets boring and once you try the game with mods it's even more better than the vanilla game. I thank the mod community for all the great mods. Skyrim is such a great game that you'll never find yourself bored and there is always something to do. Skyrim is basically a 10/10
Don't Fondle My Cookie Dough;-;This game is so good!!! There is so much stuff you can do in this game!! It has good combat, good quests, good story, good inventory and alot of levels and skill trees to go into!! Its a little glicthy sometimes and the graphics aren't the best, but mods can fix that quite easily. I give it 8.5/10
The Crocket Master;-;11/10 its like skyrim but without skyrim
discotent;-;Fought my way through an epic cave, battling an endless barrage of ruthless thieves, giant spiders, and reanimated skeleton soldiers. Got killed by a swinging door.
Nexendia;-;%20 of the time: Play the game %80 of the time: Look for new mods
ShadowLady;-;OMG kicking dragon butt's , crafting , getting home and etc. COOLEST GAME EVAH
Cavalry Knight;-;Ive always loved role playing games and this is the best one by far end less mods to improve the games graphics
CoderMP;-;Play this game. I mean it. It's massive compendium of lore in this game (let alone that of the other Elder Scrolls games) is large enough to keep you intrigued with the over-arcing story, alongside the side quests. And don't even get me started on how huge the modding potential for this game is (with which I would recommend a vanilla run completely first, then a modded run) and the massive and helpful modding community that comes with it. tldr: 10/10 will play again...and again...etc
Sir Tophat V;-;Great game without mods, Amazing game with mods. The mods are back to free so all is good!
Blue22111 [Payday22111];-;Never forget the paid mods. Never allow it to happen again. It's a 10/10 game. Full review coming soon.
Wasted;-;Used to be good until are you forced to pay for other peoples mods they even started banning people on the forums and started forcing mod sites to pull the mods so steam can make a profit
Randy Butternubs;-;I am never giving a single penny to Valve or Bethesda again. Congrats on ruining modding for everyone
superc0urt;-;This is one of the best games I have ever played... And the mods you can get for it... It's worth the money.
Genebris;-;We have cleared Skyrim from paid mods infection! Now it can rest and recover it's power (positive reviews) back up to 100% and more. Our awesome community showed that we can't be handled like EA handles it's customers. This day will be remembered for centuries, bards will be composing songs about this heroic feat. Let's drink a mug of mead in honor of Valve And Bethesda! For the eight! For free modding!
zTraction;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is by far one of my most treasured and favourite games released out there! Its vast/open world gives you an over-abundance of freedom to do what you please! Skyrim provides a great element of choice as you have the freedom to be who YOU want to be, and some of your choices may influence alternate paths to a story once foretold. You can choose to be the hero, or the villain. You have been bestoed a gift from the gods, in the dragons tounge "Dovakhiin" you have the power of your voice, and by destiny the 'Dragonborn' is the only mortal who can slay and rid the world from the awakining of the dragons. As Quoted - "The Empire of Tamriel is on the edge. The High King of Skyrim has been murdered. Alliances form as claims to the throne are made. In the midst of this conflict, a far more dangerous, ancient evil is awakened. Dragons, long lost to the passages of the Elder Scrolls, have returned to Tamriel. The future of Skyrim, even the Empire itself, hangs in the balance as they wait for the prophesized Dragonborn to come; a hero born with the power of The Voice, and the only one who can stand amongst the dragons" - Written by Bethesda Game Studios On-top of all this awesome game-play, the game offers even more paths with the DragonBorn, HearthFire and DawnGuard special quests. However, to further the games content, the Skyrim Workshop offers thousands different unique quests, alterations and UI script extenders and not to forget, a lot of credit goes to the NPC's and Extensive textures - Graphics overhauls (ENB's). Much Immersive, much wow. Personal Meta Score - 95/100
Zbrojny120;-;Paid mods have been removed, hail TES.
Blue Pebble;-;Skyrim... Need I say more? Well yes, kinda. It is the best RPG made in my opinion and set the standards for all other RPGs. Should you buy this game? Yes. Should you buy the DLCs? Not for $19.99. Wait until they're on sale and then buy them. In the meantime download Falskaar/Wyrmstooth if you get bored.
Helixia;-;+ vast world + nice story + weapons/crafting + modding + DRAGONS! + much to do One sidenote when you mod the game then the game can be unstable from time to time. But for me is the game a 5/5.
plazmafreak495;-;Amazing game,a must buy for all steam users.
cri74;-;Safe to say this is one of the best games out there if you like adventure and magical storytelling. I loaded this with mods like Climates of Tamriel, Vanilla Nights, Real Rain, HD textures and Purewater. Its stunning on ultra!! Allthough im not a fan of medieval kind of games, Skyrim really sucked me in and i love to explore this game. It only gets better and better :) You should play this!
oi;-;I would not have recommended this game three years ago. However the mod community, lowered price and *excellent* expansion pack content make Skyrim a must-own, and not for the vanilla experience. I will stand by my opinion that Oblivion was better, especilly in the uniqueness of the quests it offered as opposed to "find x in cave full of draugr", and don't get me started on the BS "but the combat is better in Skyrim" argument since the same bad combat system is just hid behind fancy execution moves. But the expansion pack content is genuinely interesting and through modding I've made my game a hardcore and fast-paced experience that feels not unlike Diablo, (to clarify that's in pure intensity and not literally like a dungeon-crawler). It's disappointing to have to merely say "the mods make this game" but that's the harsh reality in this case. The expansion content however, as I've stated twice already, is high-quality and only emphasises how mediocre the vanilla game is. Edit: Also I would highly recommend playing this game with a controller. The character feels more weighty to me that way, although that could be personal preference - you WILL have trouble playing an archer that way.
55socram55;-;One of the best games I've ever played
FreshFunkyFunions;-;So many mods my PC crashed. 420/10 would crash again.
Fetty AWP;-;I am in love with this game. Its intense and beautiful.
infamousLabRat;-;I've always been a fan of the Elder Scroll series and have to say Skyrim holds its end fairly well. With the nearly never ending quests and many hours of gameplay just in the "plain" game. Skyrim is possibly the greatest rpg of the 21st century. The countless mods from the community riches the game even more with new armors, characters, quests, and so on. I was not a fan of the paid mods but with valve getting rid of them this game is back on track to being the best modded game on steam. From playing Morrowind back in the early 2000's on pc and oblivion in 2008 on the Xbox 360. i only hope for the best for the rich story of Tamriel and the Elder Scrolls series to live on for years to come.
Queen Reggin;-;Beautiful game, incredibly playable. Something for everyone in Skyrim :)
DDM.shutsilver5;-;My somewhat short skyrim review. Right, After the the paid mods ''scandal'', Skyrim is back as it was before. Now trust me when i say that i have been playing and modding the  out of skyrim. Hell, i have even been needed to re-instal the game 3 times now because of game file corruption, only becasue of the awsome moddding community! ''Oh valve and bethesda are stuiped now that they added paid mods, report!!!1'' Stop it. Valve and Bethesda game studios were just trying something out. They saw that that the community had potential to earn money for their creations. However we all know what happend, and Valve & Bethesda apologized. End of discussion. Not talking about the community, The Elder Scrolls: Skyrim is an Awsome RPG game with 3 awsomes DLC's and with a ton of user created content. Now skyrim is not perfect, no game is. However if i were to rate it, I would give- Non- Modded skyrim: 7/10- An awsome game. Modded skyrim: 9/10- Almost a must buy. (And as AngryJoe says, it comes with a badass seal of approval! ) Thanks for Reading this review, Good Luck and have fun! Ps. Sorry if the english in the review is bad, english is not my first language^^
Uncreative;-;Was walking to a dungeon Saw a tree stump ants were on said tree stump 10/10 would stare at ants for 20 hours again
EriyaSan;-;You can get a graveyard mod and bury everyone you dont like.
QRBY CSGOhot.com;-;This is an AMAZING game!
Aronie;-;Well, to be quite frank i only have one sentence to describe this game. 10/10 would bang.
The Flash;-;I killed a chicken and got stabbed to death by an angry villager. 11/10 GOTY
maddy;-;Killing a chicken will cause everyone to try and kill you. Do not hurt chickens, but if you must, do it stealthily.
Mafu;-;This is the best game I've ever played. If you don't know about a game to buy, this is the perfect choice and the right destination of your money. And, thanks to the mods, you can play it forever. You don't even have to worry about the story (If you only center your attention in it, your game will be a little short, I guess) . The beauty of this game is to explore the amazing lands of Skyrim and the beautiful lore that has to offer. The freedom that this game gives you, it's impossible to compare with any other. It's just unique. I love it. PS: If you value your social life, just don't buy it. This game is a real life-drainer.
-7-;-;I love this game. I wish it was a bit more like Morrowind but it is still the best game Ive played.
Sleepi;-;When you're bored, Skyrim is there for you. Always.
Alex;-;its a good RPG game,the dlc are good,like the steam workshop mods, i would give this 10/10
zachmedia;-;TESV: The Elder Scrolls is a great, amazing game with incredible depth. I fully recommend it. 10/10
Commanduf;-;A Great game made greater by its FREE mods!
Nichollo Machiavelli;-;Hey Valve,im ex EA employe and i have good business model for you: As well as letting your costumers pay 4.99$ for a sword texture,you might be interesting to let them pay 1.99$(sale from 3.99$) for casting a fireball in-game,or getting horse in-game for 7.99$(that was in another TES MMO title,sorry im from EA,we dont really original here).Im giving you that ideas,but if u gonna actually use it in future,id like to charge 75% from your potential profits. Seriously  paid mods. 0/10.
Brimcation (See Bio);-;I bought this game a week before finals and I have lost all control of my life.
Autoflame;-;Thank you Valve for retracting Paid Mods
Delta Heavy {Heimskr};-;Mods aren't paid for anymore. 10/10 would recommend.
Drench Fairy Hipshit;-;Crash, Crashes, Crash Bandicoot, Crashes more times than Lewis Hamilton... but I love the game.
insane;-;Like Skyrim with guns without guns. 11/10
Steelius;-;Do you want to play a game where you have the freedom to explore any place without level restriction, to build a character however you want, or to progress a quest whenever you like. Then Skyrim is for you. The open world of Skyrim is massive. The content that the game offers can easily be worth hundred hours, even more if you get into the modding scene. Things like building your own home, starting a family, or reviving a fallen guild can make the world feel immersive. The game does have some issues. The combat can get dull after awhile. If you play mage, I suggest getting some spell mods. The main questlines can be repetitive. I've done one and kind of guess how the others turn out. Being a Bethesda game, Skyrim has a lot of bugs and glitches. However, there are unofficial patches that you can download to fix them. Despite some issues, Skyrim is still a good game. It's worth buying at full price for the amount of content that it offers.
The Valeyard;-;funn while it lasted :\
() WhiteSoul;-;Best game For Modding started modding when it was free for a day then bought it its an amzing game yoou can play for hours and the moddings great highly recommend if you do not have this game you are dead in side ITS THE BEST GAME EVER
DragonBlade151;-;Oh, Skyrim. Skyrim. How can i go 1 day without playing please tell me. this game is the best game I have seen so far. Epic dragons, loot, quests and much more. This game is literally perfect. The game is easy to run, although it looks amazing while you're playing. The mods are incredible aswell. The DLCs are amazing. I love how you can actually choose what you want to do but still have like a back story to what you're doing. Vampires and Werewolves, Dragons and Spiders. This is absolutely my dream game. You can even choose which stats you want to upgrade and so choose your path: Warrior, Archer or Mage. This game is amazing in any way you can almost think of. I totally recommend buying this game, Worth every dollar and i would even pay more to get it.
flim flam;-;No more paid mods thankfully Anyway, this game is fantastic, I have put hundreds of hours into this game on the console version and when I finally got a good enough PC to run this it was one of the first games I bought. Modded it to hell and eventually broke it and had to do it all over again. Thank god I didn't have to pay for those mods.
TweeZ #SSRival;-;Paid mods? Gaben has betrayed us.
TheSoulOfLincoln;-;This game is amazing. I love the story alot.
Swagrid;-;Cheese wheels crashed my game 10/10
Spyhunter223;-;Its ok
MrShadowCamz;-;10/10 Used to play on the Xbox all the time until I learned of the PC Master Race. Can't wait to mod the hell out of this!
Ordovician;-;Negative reviews based on the paid mods fiasco do nothing but make the game look worse now that it's over. Well done for not taking them down everybody, I'm going to have to try and make up for it. Add a donate button. That is all. This is one of the best games of the last generation. I have over 600 hours on the on-release xbox copy I own and now that I have it for the PC the lifespan is infinite; mods are Skyrim's true potential realised. I once ran over 200 mods at once on this, now I have about 90. You have not experienced Skyrim without making it a frankenstein's perpetually crashing-to-desktop monster of modded clusters with trains raining from the sky, Macho Man Randy Savage dragons and Shia Surprise sneak attacks.
Spooky Ghost;-;If Skyrim was a sandwich, Modded skyrim would have the lettuce and the mayo and all the other condiments, Unmodded is a sandwich with nothing but meat chees and bread.
xXREtaLiator98Xx;-;Yes! the paid mods are no more we have freed skyrim from evil corparation take over. The community should make a special day for the retaliation of the paid mods of skyrim being removed. Still the best game ever
Senpai;-;Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim brilliantly realized the motto of the series: " Be anyone, do anything ." Skyrim - is a huge world in which thousands of sessions and tracks, among which there is no excess , boring or unnecessary .
Franklin Archibald III;-;It's like Skyrim with Skyrim 11/10 -IGN
Nerdbeard;-;Mods are free and great! Back to fighting My Little Pony Dragons with 2-handed marital aids.
Yo5hifan;-;It's amazing game! Storyline is great, graphics are awesome and gameplay is good! I recommend it! 9/10
Noah;-;I don't have many hours on this game and I am already in love with it. The game itself is so incredible it is worthy of a single tear. When you dive into the wonderful world of mods it becomes worthy of 10 single tears. This game is so amazing I am literally struggling to type this review. Basically it is the best game of its kind. This is one of the only games that I know where the graphics are fantastic and the actual gameplay is overwhelming with an entire spectrum of quests and missions to do. This game is an absolute must have!
GhostKi11er;-;very nice game. start on lower diffuculty though unless you like being sent to a loading screen every 15 min.
Spooky;-;3rd day 40 hours 100+on ps3  my life! dragon/10
plazmafreak495;-;Amazing game,a must buy for all steam users.
Piwah;-;Killed chicken in first village. Got arrested for assault. 10/10 would commit murder again.
Capitali$tDoag;-;This is a action/adventure game , an RPG, AND SO MUCH MORRRE It's set in a high fantasy world filled with quests, magic, lore, and much more There's so much to do in this game even without MODS and the MODS add lots more depth, quests, armor, story, boob, and you name it, into the game This game will give you an easy 1000 or more Hours of FUN ( even more with mods ) I recommend this game
Karliah the Nightingale;-;Skyrim is a brilliantly crafted RPG, I've logged at leats 5000 hours over various saves and platforms and have completed nearly every quest (if not every quest.) The aception of course being the quests that don't stop renewing themselves and I can honestly say that Skyrim is my favourite out of TES 3,4 & 5. On the consoles it did become boring after completeing the quests and being left with the automatic renewing quests but thats why I now play on PC, because you can add mods that can include anything from a differently coloured item all the way to imersive new lands via envyronment and character texture overhaulls. The only disapointing thing for me (Stock/Non Modded Game) was the visual effects, I expected more after TES 4 - Oblivion with its almost overly bright and contrasted scenery. However, in my opinion if you were to take the Oblivion and Skyrim visuals and merge them it would create near perfect rendering but only time will tell so Bring on TES 6. Thanks for THOUSANDS of hours enjoyment in Tamriel.
Kadeno;-;Mod are now free again, you can now appreciate skyrim even more. It's a little part of history in a war against DLC and this game his a victory. sing the dragonborn song~
Caminator;-;One of the funnest games ive ever played, after a while it can get old, but the modding system is great, when you play skyrim, you play it like an adict for a week, then you break for a month, but it always come itching back to you
Field Tested Foreskin;-;overly addiction for in retrospect, a pretty stupid game, i would recommend this game, but at least half of the gametime is pointless grinding, and the rest is modding. i went over to a giants camp, and i requested to be an astronought, i applied and before i could read terms & conditions i was in space, good veiw. 11/10 would not read terms again
Rune Jai;-;One of the best games I own on PC. Hands down my favourite open world RPG, this was also my first RPG when I built my first PC. Storyline - The storyline keeps you interested and does get better, I never got bored of this game once and I'm sure you won't either. Side Quests - Decent side quests to keep you entertained if you want to stray from the main story. Sound - No problems at all but the characters dialogue can SOMETIMES overlap any important dialogue, not a big problem, there are mods to relieve this issue but I've never looked into it. I always keep my subtitles on. Graphics - I can run this game no problem (see specs on my page). I could also run this easily with my previous GTX 670 setup. I suggest pouring in some ENBs if your system has the horsepower, it'll look amazing. Gameplay - I love the levelling up system along with the crafting. I go hunting for materials all the time to craft weapons and armour with. Good combat and fast switching between weapons/spells although I use a controller; I cannot give my review with a keyboard because I don't use it. Steal, buy or hunt for items, sell them for dough or marry a character and get their dough lmao. Modding - Best part of the game is the modding and its community! There are thousands upon thousands of mods to choose from. Add new weapons, materials, armour, jiggle physics, 4k textures, skin textures, hair mods, voice mods, more races, have your very own pet dragon, more monsters, building mods, loverslab *cough* etc. If you're not modding in this game, you're doing it wrong. It's very easy to mod, simply go to the nexus modding site, download the nexus mod manager and a few other things like Skyrim Script Extender. You'll know what I'm talking about if you decide to go on the modding route. Cons - I haven't played the previous Elder Scrolls games so comparisons are moot. I wish there was more world to explore but that's where mods can save the day. That's all I can think of for now but if it can get a former RPG hater like me to love RPGs and PC gaming in general then maybe it's worth your dough.
BruhFallo-Senpai V.7.00;-;Step 1:Play It. Step 2:Get Bored. Step 3:Mod It. Step 4:Repeat Previous Steps Pretty much nothing more to say here.
Naveedster;-;My hands-down favorite game of all time. A must play for everyone. 12/10
DEVASTATOR;-;In my opinion, one of the best survival games there is.
HERO of HAC;-;Only one thing I can say about this game........ MOD IT TILL IT BREAKS
meathorse;-;Sir Frankenberry, Esquire visits the city of Solitude for the first time. It's a business trip, but there's much to see in this relative metropolis. The matter of business is attending a wedding reception, but that will go on all night. Let her live a bit longer. Sir Frankenberry, Esquire has time to be distracted. He comes across a clothing store, something else the warrior has never encountered. Non-protective outer chest coverings? How unusual. How... impractical. The shop's owner, Taarie, is as intrigued by the sight of an orcish customer as Sir Frankenberry, Esquire is by the mere existence of the shop. The owner's curiosity bubbles over. She energetically requests that Sir Frankenberry, Esquire model one of her signature garments for Solitude's mayor. The unspoken but understood reason being that if her clothes can make this monster look appealing... Sir Frankenberry, Esquire sees several steps beyond this thinly veiled insult and into the payoff. He would be honored. Taarie passes a formal hip-length tunic to Sir Frankenberry, Esquire and wishes him a good evening. Once out of sight of the shop, Sir Frankenberry, Esquire forces the shirt on over the top of his full plate armor. It stretches, but in credit to its craftsmanship, does not burst. Refusing to smile, Sir Frankenberry, Esquire heads off towards the reception. Solitude's mayor has already arrived, of course. She has predictably positioned herself adjacent to the bride, where the evening's attention will be perpetually centered. A fully armed and armored 7 foot high orc approaches. His face is hidden by an enclosed helmet. The warhammer strapped to his back runs nearly the full length of his massive frame. A strained and battered wrap of cotton fabric clings about his chest. The mayor maintains composure. "DO YOU LIKE MY SHIRT?" "I'm sorry. Hello... your shirt?" "YES. DO YOU LIKE IT?" "Oh. My. It's positively astounding. I do." "TAARIE MADE IT FOR ME. SHE OWNS A CLOTHING STORE IN TOWN." "Taarie did? That's... great. I should visit her later on..." "SHE MADE IT FOR ME TO WEAR FOR YOU TONIGHT." The mayor was on the brink of betraying an emotion of discomfort. But before an eyebrow could be raised, Sir Frankenberry, Esquire's warhammer was lifted overhead, then brought down through the body of the nearby bride. The weapon's weight was more than that of the target. The swiftness of the action combined with the unrecognizable result meant that several seconds passed before anyone knew exactly what had occurred. Anyone except the orc, of course, who was already sprinting towards the city gates. "TAARIE MADE IT FOR ME! SHE MADE IT FOR ME TO WEAR FOR YOU TONIGHT!" Sir Frankenberry, Esquire permitted himself a smile.
Not Enough Pancakes;-;Edit: Bethesda decided to remove payed mods so I'd actually recommend it now. Keeping the old review down there however just so you know their shady past. ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- This game was great until Valve and Bethesda decided to introduce paid mods. The whole reason Skyrim is so popular on PC is because of the easy access to mods and them being free which is what made the game so great. Unfortunately Bethesda has decided to remove the free and accessible features of modding and replace it with paid mods just so they can make a couple pennies. What's even more disgusting is that they think they can take A WHOLE 75% OF ALL SALES AS THERE OWN! That's right! Modders only get 25% of the profit that is made from their work! Overall, this game is fine if you want to play Vanilla but if you want to mod your game and delve into the world of Skyrim modding you're unfortunately a bit late. I won't be buying products from Bethesda until they decide to fix all of this and I hope you do the same!
PotatoOverlord;-;This game is truly remarkable. There is so much to do and see and fight and eat and ride and learn and wear and read and discover. There is so much to do for everyone.
Wilfred Owen;-;A phenomenal game. So deep and rich, meaning an immersive and long-lived experience. A game I will keep coming back to.
Kim Jong il;-;This game is better than North Korea.
King Crocodile;-;There are very few bad things to say about this game, I can't even think of any right now. One of the best games I have ever played. Don't be fooled by my hours in the game, I have just recently bought the game ;) Absolute recommendation for everyone. Even if it's not on sale, worth every penny.
Page > Hendrix;-;this paid mods
Kresh;-;Even if you don't play RPGs, this game will be worth it to at least try out. It has a lot of content, is very addicting and will also be worth the price. You don't even need to play the quests, only exploring the world is still something you can have fun with. The main quest can easily be completed in about 20 hours, but I have over 100, because there are numerous other side and miscellaneous ones. And if all the dragon slaying, shouting, pickpocketing, sneaking, time travelling, bandit killing, gold hoarding and number of deer you can shoot in the butt wasn't enough, you can still install mods. Hundreds. Of course, you should be aware that this may cause unwanted crashing, so make sure you can handle them all. From graphic mods to DLC sized quests, there's sure something you will pick. My only problem with the game is the ing mountains. 9/10
baghera;-;One of the best singleplayer open world RPGs I ve ever played.
Oberain;-;To be honest if you're reading Skyrim reviews it's not because you're on the fence about actually buying the game so I don't feel the need to write some form of lengthy review of the most well known RPG of the past decade. **EDIT: Apparently Valve removed monetization of mods...for now. I am keeping my editorial rant up but changing my recommendation because, frankly, Skyrim really is just a damn fine game. The language of the PR release, however, suggests that they are going to come out something else, so becoming complacent in victory would be an extremely bad idea. For a sense of context I want to point out I am all for mod makers being compensated for their work through donations. I have no problem donating money to mod makers if they provide me with a worthwhile addition to my game and give this addition free of upfront charge. I understand the amount of work some of these people put into their mods and I wholeheartedly think they deserve SOMETHING for their passion and work. Turning mods into DLC is, however, insulting to not only me as a gamer, but the mod maker as they become an exploited worker. This doesn't have to be the case. They can all make money and make people happy at the same time if they weren't so f*cking greedy to start with. If Steam RADICALLY changes the system to be ONLY DONATIONS; ONLY DONATIONS taking less then 20% for themselves and Bethesda, then all involved would make far more money total and come out of this looking flawless from a PR point of view. As an example I have bought premium currency or what have you from GOOD free to play games I have enjoyed. As you can see in my profile, I have played a LOT of Warframe and have donated a LOT of money to the company (by now it's probably a few hundred of dollars over the years which, yes, is a lot of money to most people) because they are offering me an ever improving game completely free and I think they deserve something. If Warframe had demanded a subscription or money up front, they would of made nothing off me as I never would of played it to begin with. There are a lot of gamers like me; Gamers that have funded plenty of free to play games like Dwarf Fortress, have given money to the humble bundles FAR exceeding the "minimal" amount and funded plenty of games on Kickstarter due to nothing more then altruism and a belief in a fellow gamer's passion to improve the industry. A modding paywall, however, feels as though Valve, Bethesda and even a few modders themselves are  on the very notion of what makes PC gaming great. It is insulting to me as a gamer. It is insulting to us all as a culture and it is something that should not be tolerated. With the way the system exists now (Or rather how it existed before the rollback), I will not be buying games through Steam unless I have no choice and I will NEVER pay for a mod. Ever. I am more then happy to send a donation to a few modders who do exceptional work (Interesting NPCs comes to mind) but any modder who hides their content behind a paywall will lose my respect and any chance of EVER getting money off me. I'd also like to point out that monetizing and releasing total conversions which create an entirely new game using an existing engine such as Gary's Mod and DayZ are NOT the same thing as paying for Skyrim mods. I can't fathom why certain people involved in THIS side of modding the need to voice their opinion when they clearly have no idea what they're talking about.
Jr;-;Hahaha, oh boy. Valve, Bethesda... you guys ed up bad with this one. Game's great, (free) mods are fun, but the pay-for-mods thing is super gay.  that , man. Helps nobody but Bethesda suck up more money for doing jack .
Hellishtomb;-;It was pretty good ngl
raqun AFK FOR 2 MONTH;-;This is the really legendary game, you must play it!
Rishal;-;This is by all accounts, an AMAZING game. Even though it's story does not match up to what it's predecessor, Oblivion had, it is still very good. The limit on what you can do in the game is virtually non-existent! Also, there are hundreds of side quests you can do, some of them you can repeat. The 3 DLC's that have been released for the game, Hearthfire, Dawnguard and Dragonborn also add a lot more. In Hearthfire, you can build your own home from scratch, in Dawnguard, you choose a side, and it has a lot of cool stuff. In Dragonborn, it adds a whole new world! Even if you don't want to do something in the game, you are not forced to (unless you count the opening quest)! This game is worth the price.
Spaxey The Sultan of Swing;-;If you like a long main quest of killing, magic voices, dragons, slashing, killing, and even MORE KILLING!? GET THIS GAME!! If you want this, get it during a sale... it's really expensive. But... GET. THIS. GAME.
Gandalf the Razzmatazz;-;Like Fallout w/ guns without guns.
BobsBigBeconbutt graese;-;this games like midevil gta.......but you cant lose to cops(gurads) you have to kill and slauter every one
Bluesparks;-;Skyrim is a good RPG, but not a great one. I have been an avid fan of the Elder Scrolls series since Morrowind back when I was a wee lad playing that lovely dirt-colored game on my brother's original Xbox back in 2003-2005. Anyways, I was expecting this game to be a more refined version of Oblivion, which has a special place in this Cuban's heart, but Skyrim was different. It felt targeted for a broader audience, not one the typical Bethsesda RPG fan like me and many others. Forgive the word, but Skyrim is the epitome of a casual RPG. If my brother, the same brother who bought Morrowind for me and my other brother back in 2003 but hated it, can sink hours into this game like it was Call of Duty, then it definitely is a casual RPG. Does that make it bad? God no! Skyrim is an extremely pretty game that I would love to indulge myself in if I had more time to. I just feel like if anyone can pick, swing a sword, and kill  in an RPG, it is casual. Try doing that in Oblivion against some tougher creatures and your  will become mudcrab food along the shores of that bloom covered and colorful land.
Shit-Biscuit;-;There are games like Dragon age which do a great job of making you feel as if you are in the world but they fall short of totally getting you in the world. But skyrim is something else , you can cook , hunt , explore or just kill bandits all day. You have the totall freedom to do what ever you want really. If you want to be a sneaky assassin who can summon daedric gods to fight along side you thats all cool with skyrim. Its this total freedom that sucks me in comeplety and why it is one of the best games to come out. And this is coming from a person who was not a fan of Oblivion. If you are looking for game that take hours of your life away than this is the game for you my friend. There are of cousre some bad things about the game but they are far overlooked by the fantasticly great things about. I give this game a 9.5/10 on PC. ( and on Xbox an 8/10) HAVE FUN!!!!!!!!
Jorji the Tuxedo-Gator;-;Skyrim was the first Elder Scrolls game that I bought, and I must say that it did not disappoint. The amount of depth to the quests and the world in general is unreal. Even after playing through the storyline once or twenty times, it feels like a new experience when you start a new game. I highly recommend it to just about everyone. My only complaint is that the dungeons sometimes start to feel repititive, but it still makes up for it by adding unique storylines to each. In summary, this game gets a 11/10.
EdgeUHF;-;Almost as good as Oblivion. Can be hard later on, but there are tons of things to do and discover ;) if it's on a sale get it ASAP.
Camza;-;One of the most immersive games i have evrt played, if you want to have fun with mods without any problems get this game becasue they are easily compatable with workshop,
Mr. Munchies;-;Of all free world games Skyrim may be one of my favorites. It has outstanding graphics even on low quality i could make every detail out. It also has an extremely big map for exploring and tons of creatures to fight. One of my favorite things about it is the super bad  ninja stealth and stealth kills. I could go on all day about reasons you should buy The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, but im not going to hold the truth every game has downsides to it. Skyrim has A LOT (over a thousand) of bugs and sometimes they can keep you from completing main quests and you rage meter may even fill up and heavy attack you computer, But there are ways to fix the bugs there are plenty of solutions online to help. So if your trying to have some fun slaying Dragons and Giants an getting chased by Thugs because someone put a hit on The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is your game!
Leonard.K;-;This game is awesome, but you will need to mod the hell out of it!
Cloud;-;Things I like about Skyrim: Keep in mind that these are my opinions, your opinions might differ, no torm, pls * Gameplay * The voice acting * The nature and enviroment * Level system and perks * The huge modding community and the huge list of mods * How you can play basically any role, archer, berzerker, all different types of magic roles. * Every character you create can do and learn everything in the game * Many awesome quests * Vampirism and Werewolfism * All guilds and holds * How you can marry people of any gender * Followers * The great ammount of character customization tools and options * All different shouts Things I don't like about Skyrim: * All  glitches (For example the buckets..) * Only you can kill your follower (Which is really easy to do if you miss-click.) * You can only marry once * The hairstyles are horrible * No first-person while riding horses * I used to be an adventurer like you. Then I took an arrow in the knee.. * The combat system 9/10
BouncyBalls;-;This game is nothing but incredible and everyone already knows it. It's just a shame that the official DLC was very, very lazy. Thank god the mods make up for it!
The Fun Guy;-;BEST GAME EVER! I Spent So Much Time On It And IF You Like Skyrim Try Fallout New Vegas
Aligerous;-;Ever wanted to be a mage? Warrior? thief? Or just a mix of them all? Well, with Skyrim you can, Skyrim is a typical Bethesda game, where you get to create your own character using the games many customization features, you'll then be able to play the game however you want in an almost limit less world filled with skeletons, zombies, wizards and other kinds of monsters. Once you've completed the main game you'll be able to add more quests, followers, houses, overhauls, pets, textures, weapons, armor and so much more via some of the many mods that the community creates. Skyrim is an amazing singleplayer RPG, with endless possiblitys because of the amout of mods created by the awesome community.
(   ) QuackBunny;-;It's like Skyrim, but with more Skyrim! Dragon/10 would shout agian
Shreddy_;-;Too little travelling in the game and did not find any rims in the sky. 3.5/10 disappointing.
Linearskillz;-;This is quite possibly my favourite game ever made.
Naeirl;-;Still the best game :) Fus Ro Dah/10
MasterOfDerp;-;This game NEVER ENDS. In most games, that wouldn't be a very complimentary feature, but in this game the gameplay is phenomenal, the graphics are great, the level system is smooth, and you can do almost whatever you want. It has hours upon hours of playability, with the main story line, the DLC story lines, the playermade DLCs on the workshop, and then on top of that, every playthrough can be different because of the vast collection of player made mods. Plus it was only $7.50 during the Christmas sale. I would recommend this game to anyone.
creature99;-;Loved this game back when it first came out played it on a xbox. The game never gets boring for me as you can play with an infinite number of types of class with the make your own class in effect system and you can install mods to make the new experience even better 10/10.
Miss;-;Best Game Ever!!!!! The graphics are not the best but you can tweak it later on with add ons. I adore the story line it is very interesting!!!! I enjoy every second playing this game!!
Hawk;-;Huge sandbox game, with awesome storyline and lots of side quests and small puzzles to do. Epic adventure awaits you in this game.
Angry Dog;-;Saw an offensive pornography modification on the Skyrim Nexus and I had to analyse it on its level of sexiness. I was required to enter the angle of penetration and divide it by the cosine of x. I then weighed the apparatus used appropriately, so that the shlongs used were more than apt for deep penetration. I then 3D printed a model of this modification, and use it to compensate for my extreme height and lack of pornography (which I reject to watch - pigfilth the lot of it). To conclude, do not buy this game. It is a pornographic game with a sick twisted community that will only purchase it for the bouncing breasts and buttocks. Highly recommend. -Henry Mellor 2015
AQU4R1U$.exe;-;Amazing game worth the price and It gets even better withe the dlcs but the main quest is too short but it doesnt matter because u get hours of gameplay with side quests
Davregis;-;Undeniably excellent with mods. Without mods, however, it's a 75.
Kenway;-;The best RPG you could ever have. Hands down.
MajorLeaguePepper;-;awesome game!! spent ~700 hours on it on the playstation. and never getting tired of it :D
DeWynter;-;The best game I've ever played
Mix;-;Can't say anything about this game that hasn't already been said. Simply a classic, I loved it on console, but with the modding community I love it on PC more. Great game.
Ghirachim;-;Quite a good, lengthy game. Mods can give it that little extra, making it one of the greatest games to date.
Xander;-;8/8 gr8 m8 Bandits Captured my wife... i let them keep her she was a hoe anyway all she wanted was my money
ToastedWafflezz;-;I added 50 mods and it broke. 2/10
zw98;-;Great game, Great Fun, Make sure you have this in your library! One of the greatest I have played for this type of Game! EDIT: Now that I have played it more, the DLC adds more fun! Great game overall, cannot wait for Elder Scrolls Online and Elder Scrolls VI. This game delivers lore, fun, and just plain amazingness at the expanse of the world and main quest line. With about 80+ hours on the main quest, I find this amazing. Make sure you get the DLC or you are missing out! Buy it! It is worth every penny!
Electrolux;-;One of the greatest games in the history of mankind. NASA landing a rover on Mars, some 200+ million kilometers away, is an accomplishment that pales in comparison to this game. It is art. It is beyond art. It transcends the human imagination. "It belongs in a museum!" They should have put a copy of Skyrim on Voyager instead of that fruity gold disc Sagan designed. PLAY THIS GAME.
[SCG] Diabeetus;-;If you stab someone the very first thing they say is "Is someone there?"
cr33pyguy;-;This game is an absolute must have. The story is very engaging, and even though I've put over 200 hours in I'm only using the third best armor tier, so there's still lots to do. I tell you, if there's an engaging game, this is it.
Reuz;-;G.O.T.Y. 2011 (Game of the Year)
Donkey;-;Got lost in the Reach and got cut down by a bunch of angry forsworn 10/10 will kill those magic using s next time
dragonmasterlandon;-;Bought it for $20 when it went on sale the next day for $5 and i dont even care because it was worth it
DADKILLER666;-;Played a cat, developed a fursona. 10/10 do NOT buy.
Snoop Dolph;-;MOD SIMULATOR 2015 Don't get me wrong its a good game even if its not modded (Yes I played it in vanilla and finished in 30hrs) but one thing that will keep you playing this game is the variety of mods in Nexus and in the Steam workshop that can range from boobies to weapons that can keep this game so entertaining.and I'm telling you this game is so addicting (Played nearly 300 hours offline)
TC|Sorwynn;-;With mods this game is just perfect! 10/10 with mods 7/10 without
Left Boob 1949;-;i think ball sac
Hand Table;-;Not sure why I'm taking the time to do a review of this game. We all now it's sooper kick-. Should be called "Mod it till it crashes"
Bangafat;-;I used to be an adventurer like yourself Then they started charging for mods say NO to paid mods
SoulScream15;-;One of the best games out there, well worth the price. 10/10
[TG] Trippy Fox;-;It's all fun and games, until you slaughter the entire village of Riverwood to have nothing more than two kids running around screaming at you.
kingchris20;-;If you dont have Skyrim yet,.........why? LoL, it is quite easily one of the best games in a long time! I've almost got 500 hours into it since it came out!
Domsan;-;GG, 10/10 would buy
SunriseOrigins;-;Started up the game, the cart that I was being held up in started to fly around the map. 11/10 would fly again.
Jactus;-;I wasn't going to buy this game at first because I only meet the minimum requirements, but then on the Summer Sale it went down to 3.74 Euros so I figured that I could buy it and play it when I buy my new PC. Nevertheless the game plays quite smoothly on my PC (lowest graphics of course), but I don't mind at all. The gameplay and combat is fantastic and the sheer immersion of the game makes it awesome! I can't speak for the graphics of course, but I would definetly recommend it to everyone and not only RPG fans.
Tiger;-;So good I intend on making 10000 hours. GG MANG
Skyriel16 (Natsu);-;Skyrim. 10/10 - IGN More Survival elements than DayZ.
Wersuz;-;EPIC FANTASY REBORN The next chapter in the highly anticipated Elder Scrolls saga arrives from the makers of the 2006 and 2008 Games of the Year, Bethesda Game Studios. Skyrim reimagines and revolutionizes the open-world fantasy epic, bringing to life a complete virtual world open for you to explore any way you choose. LIVE ANOTHER LIFE, IN ANOTHER WORLD Play any type of character you can imagine, and do whatever you want; the legendary freedom of choice, storytelling, and adventure of The Elder Scrolls is realized like never before. ALL NEW GRAPHICS AND GAMEPLAY ENGINE Skyrims new game engine brings to life a complete virtual world with rolling clouds, rugged mountains, bustling cities, lush fields, and ancient dungeons. YOU ARE WHAT YOU PLAY Choose from hundreds of weapons, spells, and abilities. The new character system allows you to play any way you want and define yourself through your actions. DRAGON RETURN Battle ancient dragons like youve never seen. As Dragonborn, learn their secrets and harness their power for yourself.
FabulousSideofheForce;-;really fun game
Trixie | On Vacation;-;You can launch goats off a mountain, even though the elders tell you to use your powers wisely. 11/10
xXx_TheRareSpyCrab_xXx;-;BEST GAME EVER YOU HAVE TO BUY IT NOW!!!!!!!!!!
Leppie;-;There is no reason for you to not own this game.
Optimo Joe;-;They want you to pay for features made by amateurs that should have been in the game to begin with.
Loli Princess;-;I don't even know why I'm doing this. This game doesn't even need a review. IT'S FREAKING SKYRIM. You know, the one with FUS RO DAH and stuff? Yeah, that one. If that's not enough, then I must remember you the Mods. THOUSANDS OF THEM. Skyrim's community is pretty big you know. Stop reading reviews and play this.
Mixy >:);-;An epic game made all the more epic by the fact that it is so easy to mod!! :3
Victin;-;Best Game Ever ! Completing all the Quests and Achievement gives you many, many hours of gameplay. And if that isn't enough, there's this thing for you: MODS! Seriously, Skyrim mods are the best thing ever.
The Executive Producer;-;Literally lost my will to live
Kakrenad;-;Dragons and arrows
Mrfaron;-;Skyrim is one of the best video games ever made. Mods = infinite replayability.
SKX2480;-;Killed chicken in Riverwood, got noscoped by guard. 420/69 would MLG again - Ign
visvis101;-;It's Skyrim. It doesn't even need guns. Need I even say more? 11/10
Niko;-;IT GAVE ME KNOWLEDGE ON HOW TO SUCK HUGE
Valo;-;Comparing this Skyrim to new, incoming open-world games is like comparing to Far Cry 3 to the fourth one. Far Cry 4 might have better graphics and better controls, Far Cry 3 still makes me feel better.
[Merc] Boylaska;-;Pro: -big open world -great graphics -character customization (creation/leveling) -beautiful questlines -soundtrack = inspirational = earcandy -many mods on Steam Workshop and Nexus -ALOT of console commands PC via the ingame console (PC only!) -endless replayability due to character customization and mods Con: -basic combat animations, especially hitting some(one)(thing) with melee is a bit of a let down -voice acting is weird on moments, for example: you see a 70 y/o woman but hear a 20 y/o lady -glitches (though those are just minor and somethimes funny things) Verdict: One of the best, and probably THE best, RPG I've ever played! The huge game plus its dlc and many mods (though now a bit less accessible with the paid mods system) keeps you going for hundreds of hours, even if you only create 1 character. I give it a 9,5/10 ! What to buy: I recommend buying the Legendary Edition wich includes the game plus all dlc (Dawnguard, Hearthfire, Dragonborn). Though the base game is huge and with all the mods you probably don't see a reason to get the dlc, the quality of the content is really worth it.
AllMATTO;-;I find it hard to imagine it when a person tells me they havent played skyrim. I find it even harder to imagine someone who played skyrim and didnt like it.
kirstin.carnage;-;To me, this game is timeless. There is a reason people play it over and over and over. Between the lore, the immense number of side quests, and the different choices that affect your gameplay, this game is a new life, a new experience every time. Very immersive and always fun.
WolfEx;-;An epic RPG, with a good story. The choice to play as thieves and assassins is always a great character option that keeps that tired hero theme in check. I found the dragons got boring after a while, but the massive world to explore, and good story twists make this a great game.
Salmon;-;What a sequel, ey! Skyrim continues to add to the expanding 'Elder Scrolls' timeline, in a much more stylish way. Skyrim offers much more manageable controls compared to its predecessor, Oblivion. As well as this, it is so much more /pretty/! The story is riveting enough to pull you through the countless fetch quests and other tedious tasks, although the pace can fall at some stages during the story - through these it is simply a fact of powering through these sections until the story picks up again. Personally I wouldn't buy this game unless it was on sale, but if you are a Elder Scrolls fan or an avid RPG player, this game may just be worth the RRP.
Mr Spoon;-;Flat out one of the best games I have ever played. Endless customisation, deep lore, a huge breathing world to explore, stunning visuals, epic storylines and choices galore. This game can be played anyway that you wish. You can blast through every storyline, creating a death dealing beast of a character; be it mage, archer, elf, orc or lizard. Or you can roleplay the day in the life of a poor fisherman or farmer, or a hunter or soldier...the opportunities are endless. You can literally do whatever you want in this world. With a choice of ten playable races (more with mods), and a complex and detailed characeter creation screen, you are free to birth any denizen that you desire. And hello old school rpg-ers: no classes. Thats right, build whatever playstyle you so wish; from a duel weilding ice mage to a pickaxe hefting orcish maid. Choose your own story, and make choices that will be reacted to and remembered (mostly). And MODS! This game has a colossal modding communtiy, from the Steam Workshop to the Skyrim Nexus, you can completley change the way you play the game, or the way the game looks and more. Seriously, this game can look next-next-next gen :) Honestly, I can't recommend this game enough; play this if you are looking for immersion, quality, roleplaying, story, lore...I could go on for days, but I appear to have taken an arrow to the over-used-internet-meme.
The Pork Pie;-;Best game. Ive played it for over 500 hours on xbox but it is so good I got it on PC aswell. The modding community is great.
RoflNoodz;-;I have 700+ hour on this game...Do I really need to say anything else? Honestly you either love TES or you hate it.
Heisenberg;-;Do you not have this game? Stop waiting, Go get it. Stop Asking questions, You will love it. (I had about 6000 Hours on another account that i lost the password to. So i bought Skyrim again. That should be point enough)
aBDULLaHxAG1;-;best game of all time
MikooOoOoo;-;For just a moment, imagine yourself dressed in armor and fur, your muscular frame toughened against the cold blowing wind and snow that swirls about you. Now let the camera in your mind's eye pull back a bit to show the heavy forest you're trodding through with sword and shield in hand, your senses kept ever sharp against stalking predators. Pull back even more and discover that your frozen woodland is on the slope of a mountain, one of many in a range surrounding a sprawling city. Pull back one last time, to a satellite view: The city you see is joined by two, three, then dozens more, spread out over a vast landmass crisscrossed by a seemingly infinite number of rivers, lakes and mountains. You are in Skyrim.
Thismanhaslazers;-;Garunteed Life Waster 1,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000/10 Recomend to your children, let them be consumed by it for eternity. Also one of the greatest mod communities ever.
warlordneo;-;if you didn't play this game just quit gaming
FoltzwithBoltz;-;The thing about Skyrim that always brings me back is because it never fails to surprise me. Whether it be a dungeon I've never explored or a playstyle I've never tried. Skyrim is so addictingly fun and extravagantly beautiful it never ceases to amaze me. The modding community makes it all the better allowing you to expand the game to what it always felt like it wanted to be, but Bethesda couldn't manage to achieve. Skyrim will always be my favorite game of all time.
Ra's al Ghul;-;this game is fun to play as a waiting for something to download and it has a nice storyline and great voice actors so i rate this game 8/10
TheCommanderDoughnut;-;Its Skyrim, nuff said.
Senpai ();-;Sweet Rolls for the Dragon Born and friends, from The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, following as close to the in game recipes as possible. Warning, abuse of moon sugar can cause tooth decay. Use at your own risk! Sweet Rolls 1/2 tsp from Salt Pile 1/4 cup from Jug of Milk 2 cups from Sack of Flour 2 sticks (1 cup) of Butter 5 Chickens Eggs 1 1/2 tsp Extract from Vanilla Plant 1 2/3 cups Moon Sugar (aka granulated sugar) (you can add in 1 tsp of baking powder to assist in rising, but if you whip the butter and eggs enough, you wont need it) For the glaze: 4 TB Butter 2 TB from Jug of Milk 2 cups Powdered Moon Sugar (aka confectioners sugar) 1 tsp Extract from Vanilla Plant Sweet roll pan (mini bundt pan) Step 1: Gather Ingredients 1. Gather your ingredients and allow to reach room temperature. Preheat your hearth to 350 degrees F. 2.Cream the butter and sugar together and beat until fluffy (at least five minutes). 3. Slowly add in each chickens egg and beat well. Add the milk or cream. 4. Add the flour, salt and vanilla extract and stir gently until mixed. 5. Pour into greased swell roll pans and bake until golden, about 20 minutes. Allow to cool. Step 2: Glaze and Consume 1. For the glaze, melt the butter and add in the milk. 2. Slowly mix in the powdered sugar and vanilla. Drizzle over cooled sweet rolls. 3. Do not fight any dragons for 30 minutes after consuming more than 5 sweet rolls.
Hightech Redneck;-;buy, just frickin buy it!
Intergalactic Terrorist;-;This is the best game ever.You just turn your brain off for a couple hundreds of hours and enjoy literally UNLIMITED content (I have played the ps3 version for almost 200 hours and left a lot of quests untouched ).Now that it gets frequently on sale there is no reason not to have this game.If you are still thinking about it just go for it!
iBonk!;-;One of the best games you could ever play in your life. Ever. Like, anytime, ever.
HanKer>GTA=NFS+PAYDAY;-;Spent more time to install mod, will find this game is the best single player game in the world
Dank Sanic;-;killed an old lady in the woods, she sent thugs to assassinate me. 8/8 would murder again
Bogaard/Yoda;-;Realy awesome game :D and at the steam workshop there is a mod installer
/r/atheism;-;Doesn't deserve all of the praise. An overhyped, oversimplified RPG with frustrating combat, overwhelming and unnecessarily complex skill trees and braindead AI. The only justification for buying this game is for modding, which is the only thing that makes this game half bearable, as the vanilla version is completely bland. Use your money somewhere else.
AdkiN;-;Killed the emperor, got fined 9000 gold. Stole a cabbage, got sent to prison, and wanted all over Skyrim. 10/10, would steal a cabbage again.
Free CS:GO Key's;-;one of the best game i had
Melosaur;-;Skyrim cured my diabeetus. I can now live a long healthy life in my studio apartment with my 30 cats eating white chocolate macadamia nut cookies into my golden years. God bless Skyrim.
plaster.;-;I've played this game on all 3 platforms since release, and even after getting all achievements there is a lot more to do in this game. Installing mods just makes the game more stunning than it really is, and in short; it's probably the best game out there in my opinion (Maybe discluding Fallout)
Arcane Overlord;-;One of my favorite games of all time, Skyrim is a wonderfully crafted RPG and edition in Bethesda's Elder Scrolls series. It has a very interesting storyline, and has many different armor sets to defend you, and weapons and spells to slay the vast array of enemies thrown before you. Even though some of the side quests aren't as interesting as the ones in the previous game Oblivion; there is still many fun and entertaining quests to take part in. The world is also very expansive and rewarding to explore. Once you pick it up you won't be putting it down for months. 9/10
Harmax;-;Game of our generation. Thanks to mods. Free. Free mods.
Crowes;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is the only quality variant of a Lord of the Rings video game that it isn't trying to be nor actually is one. Its a bit of a medieval simulator with its own cannon and lore. With several plot lines taking up the majority of your time alongside the numerous expansion content, and side quest lines that allow you to truly become your own character, whether that be a modern Robin Hood or the next incarnation of Merlin. Some of these quest lines arent the longest and some of them are quite repetitive, but many of them allow you to become something of yourself, high and mighty and powerful even though not that much significance is made of it in comparison to the fact youre the next Dragonborn and the loot throughout the majority of these lines only getting you by, with my only complaint there really being the fact that I did not have the freedom to choose where to place what quest line and where, and eventually not even finishing the Dragonborn (DLC) quest line due to boredom. Mechanics are plentiful in Skyrim: stats management is simple and only consists of health, stamina and magicka (which includes powers and dragon shouts, too) and an ability to upgrade a whole host of skills through the in-depth specialised tree for them. If you prefer something other than magic, like me, you can go and be an archer with different types of arrows and bows to fire them with, upgrading and enchanting throughout, or you can wave a sword around like an unbreakable stick. Fast travel is also a thing, which kind of removes some of the immersion from the game but nonetheless getting you throughout the vast world. You can trade and sell your old items as you upgrade, enchant and move on through variant merchants using the same simplistic menu system that gets you lost the more items you carry. Using commands through the console is also a big help, and on computer its rather a present from the heavens due to many of the impractical bugs causing you large annoyance are either fixable or.. well, avoidable - but if you use the commands to cheat, it really ruins the experience. I got bored of the game once I did this, it became less of a challenge to achieve something, gain something or complete something. Concluding, this game was a real blast for the hundred or more hours I poured into it, and it really allows you to get immersed and continue playing. Just one more dungeon, yada yada. You really must avoid cheating, though - curiosity will ruin it for you.
Vimeyer;-;Remove paid mods, greedy Valve!
Tyrim;-;I say not much about it ... You like Fantasy, Dragons, Elder Magic, First Person and where you creating the history with ? Then purchase SKYRIM !
(The Adventurer) Morman Freeman;-;I killed a dragon as a werewolf, attempted to fight a mammoth with my fists, and, most importantly... killed Nazim. 11/10. Would kill Nazim again.
Pug$ter;-;it's the best RPG in the world.  Elder Scrolls Online, Skyrim is better
Bob Barker;-;awsome game
NSRyan;-;It's literally the best game ever.
Panzerjger Tiger Ausf. B;-;When you spend half your playtime rearranging different objects in your house in a virtual world, you know you have a great game!
WannabeWarrior97;-;An amazing role playing game with countless quests and interactive NPCs, the very epitome of gretness. A must-have game.
dark skuLL[!]^ / terraria any1??;-;Really fun game. The only thing that made me quit for a couple of months now was a gamebreaking bug (I accepted the Jagged Crown quest, but never gave the crown to Ulfric. So then, at the time of the Peace Treaty meeting at Hrothgar, noone took their seats when I sat down in my assigned seat. So the game pretty much didnt work beyond that point, so I gave up after that). But I am going to make a new character relatively soon and probably not a dual wield warrior anymore :D.
[HdF] Almut Grete;-;Prize of the DLCs is just halarious ... f* that! The game itself does not live up to the quality of Oblivion or morowind but has its moments (even then guild quests are not that great this time), but the seting and atmosphere are just great. Realy enjoyed this, sad they did not put work into the story and quests.
RomireOnline;-;A great way to lose your life in this world! A great way to lose your social life in this world A great way.....to live in this world! I am the High King of Skyrim! I order you to play this game!
FrankTheFish;-;Good dammit valve. This greed for money is insane, put a damn support modder button in, not turn mods into DLC. Put good use to your time and instead of screwing up one of the best games of all time... Jesus... EDIT: I am keeping my review up only because Valve and Bethesda were being stupid, and you don't reward somone for being stupid. Though i do like them, just, that was a low moment.
ruhrgebietheld;-;I've noticed that the reviews for Morrowind, Oblivion, and Skyrim tend to be about why that game is the best Elder Scrolls game and the others are terrible in comparison. I really enjoy all three of them (sorry, Arena and Daggerfall, you're just not very enjoyable by today's standards), so I figured I'll give reviews for each that focus on what's unique about each of them, and what kind of players that will appeal to. Skyrim is the most mainstream of the three. It's a big, grand production, meant for a big. grand reception. In other words, this was the first TES game specifically designed to be in the headlines a ton. Think of it as the difference between a film with a 30 million dollar production budget and one with a 300 million production budget, meant to be one of the grandest films of the decade. Morrowind and Oblivion are the former, Skyrim is the latter. It's easily the most professional of the three. As such, the game is meant to be most appealing to a wide range of players. Morrowind is pure chaos, Oblivion is pure order, and Skyrim is somewhere between those two extremes. It's safe when it wants to be and wild when it wants to be. It has some of the rugged freedom of Morrowind, while being polished like Oblivion and therefore avoiding any of the major negatives that Morrowind also has. For the positives of the game, let's go ahead and start with the graphics and scenery. Morrowind had rugged scenery, but the graphics weren't good enough to really be stunned by it. Oblivion had soft graphics and scenery, which left you feeling perfectly content but not awed. Skyrim has both the graphics and scenery to take your breath away. It's rugged, majestic, powerful, and all sorts of other things. It's easily the most immersive of any of the three games. No matter how many thousands of hours you've spent playing it, there will always be views that strike awe in you. Whenever a game can get you to willingly just stop and stand there and take in everything, it's succeeded. Skyrim does that all the time. The skill and perk systems are also the best of any TES game. It allows you to really forge your own path and adapt your character however you want as the game progresses. Morrowind and Oblivion basically make you decide at the beginning exactly what type of character you want, and keeps you confined to that choice. Skyrim is much more fluid, and each playthrough is much more customizable, which also allows you to add much more depth to the story you come up with for your character. Want to be a high elf who is disgusted by the actions of the Aldmeri dominion and decides to shun magic and adopt the rugged combat and lifestyle of the local Nords? Want to be an Orc who feels no connection to the brute stregth emphasized in your culture and instead explore the arcane and master the ways of the mage? Want to be a Redguard who shuns the sword and shield and instead masters the bow and slips silently through the shadows? Well, in Skyrim you can be any of those things, and pretty much anything else you could possibly imagine. Another big positive is the crafting systems found in the game. The smithing skill replaces the armorer skill, and is a gigantic improvement. You don't have to worry about maintaining your armor and weapons, but instead you will be able to smith powerful weapons and armor the more time you devote to it. If you want to have daedric weapons before you even hit level 20, you can, but remember that it means you spent so much time smithing that your combat skills might not be up to par. The same goes for brewing powerful potions or creating powerful enchantments. It's determined less by getting lucky and finding good stuff, and more by deciding what to pursue. For the negatives, we have to go back to the earlier analogy about the Hollywood films. The 300 million dollar budget film has a ton of things that you could possibly want, but it also cant take the risks or be as quirky as the 30 million dollar budget film. So everything in Skyrim is polished and streamlined, and sometimes you find yourself wishing that it would be less powerful and more quirky or nuanced. The magic is a good example. There are fewer schools of magic, and fewer varieties of spells. No levitation, no damage weapon or damage armor spells, no school of mysticism, etc. Destruction spells basically come in three varieties (frost, fire, and shock). There is a good variety of types of those spells (cloak, rune, constant cast, etc), but sometimes you want to be able to hit someone with something other than frost, fire, or shock damage as a mage, and in Skyrim you can't. The DLC's do add some good variety (restoration school spells that do direct damge to undead or do posion damage, conjuration spells that allow you to bring forth powerful creatures made of ash, etc.), but it's still less options than Oblivion or Morrowind gave you. And that's really what a lot of the negatives of this game boil down to: things you loved about Oblivion and Morrowind that weren't included in Skyrim. It has so many improvements over those two, but it also gets rid of some of the things people loved about them. The soundtrack, for example, is a powerful soundtrack, but it feels like it's always in "adrenaline-pumping" mode, whereas Morrowind and Oblivion had music that would really draw you in emotionally. It's not that Skyrim's soundtrack is bad, it's just that Morrowind's and Oblivion's were better overall. Overall, this is the crown jewel of the TES series so far, but that doesn't mean it was perfect. You'll love it, and yet you will still sometimes prefer to play Oblivion or Morrowind instead.
icaroferracini;-;Our hero, our hero, claims a warrior's heart. I tell you, I tell you, the dragonborn comes. With a voice wielding power of the ancient nord art. Believe, believe, the dragonborn comes. It's an end to the evil, of all Skyrim's foes. Beware, beware, the dragonborn comes. For the darkness has passed, and the legend yet grows. You'll know, you'll know the dragonborn's come. Dovahkiin, dovahkiin, naal ok zin los vahriin, Wah dein vokul mahfaeraak ahst vaal! Ahrk fin norok paal graan fod nust hon zindro zaan, Dovahkiin, fah hin kogaan mu draal! --The Dragonborn Comes
Woofy;-;With the exception of the other Elder Scrolls games, and a few games from Bioware, I feel that Skyrim is the definitive singleplayer RPG experience gaming has to offer this far. What is most remarkable about Skyrim and other Elder Scrolls games, is that it is completely unliniar. You never have to complete the "main quest" and will most likely never finish all the "side" content either. You are free to do as you wish, and Bethesda has created an enjoyable and believable world for you do enjoy yourself in, completely.
R3D;-;My favorite game of all time, the adventuring, the exploring, it's just fantastic. If you're in an adventurin' mood then don't even hesitate to get this game!
FabulousSideofheForce;-;really fun game
Leppie;-;There is no reason for you to not own this game.
Trixie | On Vacation;-;You can launch goats off a mountain, even though the elders tell you to use your powers wisely. 11/10
Optimo Joe;-;They want you to pay for features made by amateurs that should have been in the game to begin with.
xXx_TheRareSpyCrab_xXx;-;BEST GAME EVER YOU HAVE TO BUY IT NOW!!!!!!!!!!
Intergalactic Terrorist;-;This is the best game ever.You just turn your brain off for a couple hundreds of hours and enjoy literally UNLIMITED content (I have played the ps3 version for almost 200 hours and left a lot of quests untouched ).Now that it gets frequently on sale there is no reason not to have this game.If you are still thinking about it just go for it!
Bluesparks;-;Skyrim is a good RPG, but not a great one. I have been an avid fan of the Elder Scrolls series since Morrowind back when I was a wee lad playing that lovely dirt-colored game on my brother's original Xbox back in 2003-2005. Anyways, I was expecting this game to be a more refined version of Oblivion, which has a special place in this Cuban's heart, but Skyrim was different. It felt targeted for a broader audience, not one the typical Bethsesda RPG fan like me and many others. Forgive the word, but Skyrim is the epitome of a casual RPG. If my brother, the same brother who bought Morrowind for me and my other brother back in 2003 but hated it, can sink hours into this game like it was Call of Duty, then it definitely is a casual RPG. Does that make it bad? God no! Skyrim is an extremely pretty game that I would love to indulge myself in if I had more time to. I just feel like if anyone can pick, swing a sword, and kill  in an RPG, it is casual. Try doing that in Oblivion against some tougher creatures and your  will become mudcrab food along the shores of that bloom covered and colorful land.
Arcane Overlord;-;One of my favorite games of all time, Skyrim is a wonderfully crafted RPG and edition in Bethesda's Elder Scrolls series. It has a very interesting storyline, and has many different armor sets to defend you, and weapons and spells to slay the vast array of enemies thrown before you. Even though some of the side quests aren't as interesting as the ones in the previous game Oblivion; there is still many fun and entertaining quests to take part in. The world is also very expansive and rewarding to explore. Once you pick it up you won't be putting it down for months. 9/10
Melosaur;-;Skyrim cured my diabeetus. I can now live a long healthy life in my studio apartment with my 30 cats eating white chocolate macadamia nut cookies into my golden years. God bless Skyrim.
Gandalf the Razzmatazz;-;Like Fallout w/ guns without guns.
plaster.;-;I've played this game on all 3 platforms since release, and even after getting all achievements there is a lot more to do in this game. Installing mods just makes the game more stunning than it really is, and in short; it's probably the best game out there in my opinion (Maybe discluding Fallout)
Shit-Biscuit;-;There are games like Dragon age which do a great job of making you feel as if you are in the world but they fall short of totally getting you in the world. But skyrim is something else , you can cook , hunt , explore or just kill bandits all day. You have the totall freedom to do what ever you want really. If you want to be a sneaky assassin who can summon daedric gods to fight along side you thats all cool with skyrim. Its this total freedom that sucks me in comeplety and why it is one of the best games to come out. And this is coming from a person who was not a fan of Oblivion. If you are looking for game that take hours of your life away than this is the game for you my friend. There are of cousre some bad things about the game but they are far overlooked by the fantasticly great things about. I give this game a 9.5/10 on PC. ( and on Xbox an 8/10) HAVE FUN!!!!!!!!
Harmax;-;Game of our generation. Thanks to mods. Free. Free mods.
AdkiN;-;Killed the emperor, got fined 9000 gold. Stole a cabbage, got sent to prison, and wanted all over Skyrim. 10/10, would steal a cabbage again.
Free CS:GO Key's;-;one of the best game i had
Wilfred Owen;-;A phenomenal game. So deep and rich, meaning an immersive and long-lived experience. A game I will keep coming back to.
HERO of HAC;-;Only one thing I can say about this game........ MOD IT TILL IT BREAKS
Rishal;-;This is by all accounts, an AMAZING game. Even though it's story does not match up to what it's predecessor, Oblivion had, it is still very good. The limit on what you can do in the game is virtually non-existent! Also, there are hundreds of side quests you can do, some of them you can repeat. The 3 DLC's that have been released for the game, Hearthfire, Dawnguard and Dragonborn also add a lot more. In Hearthfire, you can build your own home from scratch, in Dawnguard, you choose a side, and it has a lot of cool stuff. In Dragonborn, it adds a whole new world! Even if you don't want to do something in the game, you are not forced to (unless you count the opening quest)! This game is worth the price.
J4wfire?;-;Stabbed someone in the . 10/10
Kim Jong il;-;This game is better than North Korea.
meathorse;-;Sir Frankenberry, Esquire visits the city of Solitude for the first time. It's a business trip, but there's much to see in this relative metropolis. The matter of business is attending a wedding reception, but that will go on all night. Let her live a bit longer. Sir Frankenberry, Esquire has time to be distracted. He comes across a clothing store, something else the warrior has never encountered. Non-protective outer chest coverings? How unusual. How... impractical. The shop's owner, Taarie, is as intrigued by the sight of an orcish customer as Sir Frankenberry, Esquire is by the mere existence of the shop. The owner's curiosity bubbles over. She energetically requests that Sir Frankenberry, Esquire model one of her signature garments for Solitude's mayor. The unspoken but understood reason being that if her clothes can make this monster look appealing... Sir Frankenberry, Esquire sees several steps beyond this thinly veiled insult and into the payoff. He would be honored. Taarie passes a formal hip-length tunic to Sir Frankenberry, Esquire and wishes him a good evening. Once out of sight of the shop, Sir Frankenberry, Esquire forces the shirt on over the top of his full plate armor. It stretches, but in credit to its craftsmanship, does not burst. Refusing to smile, Sir Frankenberry, Esquire heads off towards the reception. Solitude's mayor has already arrived, of course. She has predictably positioned herself adjacent to the bride, where the evening's attention will be perpetually centered. A fully armed and armored 7 foot high orc approaches. His face is hidden by an enclosed helmet. The warhammer strapped to his back runs nearly the full length of his massive frame. A strained and battered wrap of cotton fabric clings about his chest. The mayor maintains composure. "DO YOU LIKE MY SHIRT?" "I'm sorry. Hello... your shirt?" "YES. DO YOU LIKE IT?" "Oh. My. It's positively astounding. I do." "TAARIE MADE IT FOR ME. SHE OWNS A CLOTHING STORE IN TOWN." "Taarie did? That's... great. I should visit her later on..." "SHE MADE IT FOR ME TO WEAR FOR YOU TONIGHT." The mayor was on the brink of betraying an emotion of discomfort. But before an eyebrow could be raised, Sir Frankenberry, Esquire's warhammer was lifted overhead, then brought down through the body of the nearby bride. The weapon's weight was more than that of the target. The swiftness of the action combined with the unrecognizable result meant that several seconds passed before anyone knew exactly what had occurred. Anyone except the orc, of course, who was already sprinting towards the city gates. "TAARIE MADE IT FOR ME! SHE MADE IT FOR ME TO WEAR FOR YOU TONIGHT!" Sir Frankenberry, Esquire permitted himself a smile.
Spaxey The Sultan of Swing;-;If you like a long main quest of killing, magic voices, dragons, slashing, killing, and even MORE KILLING!? GET THIS GAME!! If you want this, get it during a sale... it's really expensive. But... GET. THIS. GAME.
BobsBigBeconbutt graese;-;this games like midevil gta.......but you cant lose to cops(gurads) you have to kill and slauter every one
SmokeyBars;-;cant wait for skyrim 2
The Cafinator;-;I loved the game, and the release but the prototyping of mods for sale is just an extension of DLCs that happens to poison the intelectual property of a great game. Dispite the obvious legal issues, and community backlash Bethesda and Valve have decided to go with the option that nets the most money in the short term by spending their community trust.
Sgt. Alfred J.;-;I have this game in my old steam account, just have to buy it again because it's awesome! Fell off the cliff once more!
FluffyBelly-away for 2 days;-;im still new to this game and i cant stop playin it so much fun alot of things that u can do :D u also dont need a beastly pc to run it my PC specs are gtx 760 and an i5 i play on ultra and full reso i get 100/60+ fps !!!
[3eVolt] King Wojcik;-;By the Gods.... this game is holy.
Bab00n1sm;-;The elder scrolls Fallout IV is the new addition to the Fallout of scrolls elder games. Fallout IV scrolls is an immersive RPG game made by Bethesda Fallout 4 and it's Fallout 4, Where you play the main protagonist The dragonborn Benny, you start off being assaulted by Benny in Fallout 4. Dragons... WHO CARES ABOUT DRAGONS FALLOUT 4 HYPE FALLOUT 4 HYPE!!!! #RingADingDingBaby #ReturnBennyInFallout4Plz #NcrAllTheWay #FALLOUT4HYPE #Mr.HouseIsAHoax #DEATHCLAWZ
AllMATTO;-;I find it hard to imagine it when a person tells me they havent played skyrim. I find it even harder to imagine someone who played skyrim and didnt like it.
Doc Deau;-;The game where memes are more dangerous than dragons.
Jordan;-;very good game i like the elder scrolls games since each one brings it up a notch
Luna licrire;-;This is a great game. Good graphics, good gameplay. I love the combat system, it's a huge improvement from the other Elder Scrolls games.
Penguin236;-;This game is amazing! 'Nuff said.
forbiess;-;DLC Simulator 2015. I can pay $35 for a new set of armour.. or $100 for Improved and HD Horse genitalia. 45/10 would recom--- To read the rest of this review you have to pay for the Improved reviewer for Steam Reviews DLC for $24.99 $21.99 !
powerman123;-;kill a chicken, get an arrow in the knee ~riverwood townsfolk
[TG] Thranx;-;Do I really need to explain why this is amazing?
Wrath;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Mod it Until it Crashes. This is Skyrim. You already know what this is - a less glitchy Oblivion with better graphics and a Norse theme...boy that armor is dopey (It's also useless, and you may never actually wear it). Main thoughts:  As far as RPGs go, it's ace. Open world, lots to explore, nearly infinite side quests.  Obviously newer than Oblivion with correspondingly better graphics, but the overall feel of the game was more immersive. Great attention was put into the environment, voice acting, etc.  Main quest is absolute , and I don't think even Bethesda is willing to refute that. This is why an open world with a hundred minor quests is a saving grace. Without an almost Minecraftesque "set your own personal objective" freedom, it wouldn't be much. Unfortunately, the big picture is a bit more sour. The game has no trees or vegetation of any kind. In fact, it has no color whatsoever, the game is practically in black and white. In general, more attention to detail and improvement in the items and interface is needed. Frankly, this nearly ruins a game that otherwise had a great deal of potential. For this reason, I do not recommend Skyrim on the Xbox. However, we are blessed to have the Steam Workshop for Skyrim on the PC. Thanks to a furry of highly competent modders, the game is playable again and the only reason I recommend this game here. I, therefore, recommend the following mods, for your convenience, listed in no other order than how I have written them down just now (I'm not responsible for your load order): Better Embers Staves of Skyrim Towns and Villages Enhanced: (Markath+) Towns and Villages Enhanced: Whiterun Towns and Villages Enhanced: Riften Towns and Villages Enhanced: Whiterun Exterior Towns and Villages Enhanced: Falkreath Towns and Villages Enhanced: Morthal Towns and Villages Enhanced: Dawnstar Towns and Villages Enhanced: Inns Towns and Villages Enhanced: Markarth Exterior Towns and Villages Enhanced: Villages Redux Towns and Villages Enhanced: Solitude Towns and Villages Enhanced: Riverwood Towns and Villages Enhanced: Winterhold Midas Magic Evolved Shadow Striping Fix (Indoor/Outdoor) Immersive Fallen Trees V1.4 Horse Armors Whistle Shooting Stars Beast Skeletons HD Plants + Herbs Realistic Water Two Reduced Distance NPC Greetings Sounds of Skyrim - Civilization Sounds of Skyrim - The Wilds Sounds of Skyrim - Dungeons Immersive Saturation Boost Complete Skyforge Truly Balanced Destruction Magic Rainbows Also, grab some hairstyle and other mods from Nexus.
Kcizsckiee;-;1,000,000/10 - Murdered chicken, got arrested - Killed a dragon, crowned a hero - No one cared afterwards and proceeded with their daily lives - Became the #1 most wanted person for stealing a potato 10/10 - Console commands. killallkillallkillallkillall - Consume 10 cheese wheels, 6 baked potatoes, and 2 sweet rolls in a matter of 4 seconds - Join Dark Brotherhood - Suddenly, you're an assassin - No, don't go jumping of buildings - I used to be an adventurer - Until I took an arrow to the knee - Wow, I'm surprised you managed to read up till here. Congratulations *slow clap* No really, though. Get this game. Great soundtrack, lots of awesome exploring, and a  ton of gameplay.
Kirito the Black Swordsman;-;this game is a open world role-playing game that you can either do quests or just explore the scenery of skyrim
Stormbird 1104;-;An amazing Medieval adventure/RPG. I have never played an Elder Scrolls game before this one but I had played Fallout so I made assumptions they were similar. To an extent they are but there are some major differences (Other than the technology difference). I loved fallout and I love this game too. It involves adventure over a massive world exploring towns, killing dragons, stealling from people, assassinating people - It's got everything! The game is similar to fallout in the way they are both Published by Bethesda and are both RPGs. Skyrim is pretty much your typical RPG with one extremely important difference (IMO), The level system. Enemies don't have levels, nor do quests so you don't have to grind for 8 hours trying to reach level 16 so you can do this quest which gives you a reward that is for level 14s and useless to you. Skyrim and fallout both have a system in which levels give you better perks but don't matter in terms of progression, which IMO is what makes these games the best RPGs. I could go on for ages but if you're too lazy to read that at least read this... TL;DR - Good game, great RPG/Adventure, you can kill a dragon... 9/10
Seananman;-;This is probably the game that i have played most...EVER It has a great story good gameplay (in my opinion) lots of content HOURS AND HOURS worth of stuff to do All in all its a great game and any gamer should at least have tried this game.
Futil1ty;-;I don't know what words to use to describe this game.
Mr. Momo Guy;-;You can make yourself a cat and name it Citrus 10/10
Dragoon;-;Going through my game list I just saw that I have over 400 hours on this game. I don't understand, how this is possible. I haven't even finished the main quest yet. Barley began the quest line of the first expansion, and not even finished the starter quest of the second expansion. I have yet to fully explore Skyrim. Of the 8 holds (Skyrim districts) I only explored 5 of them. I don't know how many more hours It will take me until I finished the main quest and the two expansions. How many more to see everything, but thank I godI took breaks playing this game. Because if you play straight from start to finish, having maybe over 1000 hours of play behind you, you will be fluid in the ancient dragon tongue, recite the theme song from your memory and likely need a guidance consular to help you take your first steps back in the real world. So immersive is this game experience. In the years to come it won't be possible to take people serious that haven't played this game.
InsaneBroccoli;-;Played it for HOURS theres just so much to do and to get and dont forget the EPIC graphics :)
(90th) Viktor;-;Damn this game has a chunk of my life, perhaps not as much as Mount&Blade but still a chunk. 10/10 Would spend hours watching Lydia kill thousands of wolves again.
Ziminum;-;My oh my... I can't even start to put into words this game and how it has (drastically) changed my gaming life. I remember getting it for christmas of 2012, and when I got in the game, it just felt... right. The Elder Scrolls series was amazing. I thought all of them (don't forget fallout !) had a great supported plot. I mean, 3 years later and I still have caves to find. I would say, that some rendering bugs (mostly cosmetic) had changed my overall gameplay roaming around Skyrim, but on PC I easily fixed that with mods. It's probably my favorite game to come, and I hope that TES VI will be good as well. This game has led me to buy other TES games, as well as the fallout series. Even among my friends, I am the TES geek of the group. 10/10 As of 10:47 AM, 6/12/14 I have logged 713 hours on this game.
[BAD] Flemcore;-;I haven't played that much on PC but Xbox 360TM is a whole other story. i've enjoyed this game from 2012 to the year 2014. just a beyond common adventure game.
dovahrii;-;fights a dragon. slays it. fights a giant. slain by it. 11/10 giants>legendary dragons.
Sportsfreak;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
Krakenous;-;It's Skyrim...nuff said!
Pirate Captain Paws;-;I love the lore of Skyrim and how you can choose your own path in the game! The mods on the Steam Workshop really make Skyrim so much better. Khajiits 4 Lyfe!
Prilosec;-;It's like Fallout, but with swords.
MegaShadower;-;you get to fight, like, dragons vampires n , would recommend.
James-3000;-;I really love this game PROS +the world and story are rich +many many hours of gameplay time +immersive +nice exploration with hundreds of locations to discover +great skill tree +decent character customization (but kinda lacking in hair) +difficult choices and decisions CONS -kinda linear on armor progression -lack voice acting variety -a bit repetitive combat on melee fighter -bugs and sometimes sudden crash The best thing is most of the cons can be fixed by mods,so you can really make this game almost perfect 8.5/10 but with mods I give it a 9.5/10
Mrfaron;-;Skyrim is one of the best video games ever made. Mods = infinite replayability.
The Executive Producer;-;Literally lost my will to live
Hovercat;-;Best game I've ever played!
MikooOoOoo;-;For just a moment, imagine yourself dressed in armor and fur, your muscular frame toughened against the cold blowing wind and snow that swirls about you. Now let the camera in your mind's eye pull back a bit to show the heavy forest you're trodding through with sword and shield in hand, your senses kept ever sharp against stalking predators. Pull back even more and discover that your frozen woodland is on the slope of a mountain, one of many in a range surrounding a sprawling city. Pull back one last time, to a satellite view: The city you see is joined by two, three, then dozens more, spread out over a vast landmass crisscrossed by a seemingly infinite number of rivers, lakes and mountains. You are in Skyrim.
Bogaard/Yoda;-;Realy awesome game :D and at the steam workshop there is a mod installer
powerman123;-;kill a chicken, get an arrow in the knee ~riverwood townsfolk
[TG] Thranx;-;Do I really need to explain why this is amazing?
Kirito the Black Swordsman;-;this game is a open world role-playing game that you can either do quests or just explore the scenery of skyrim
iBonk!;-;One of the best games you could ever play in your life. Ever. Like, anytime, ever.
HanKer>GTA=NFS+PAYDAY;-;Spent more time to install mod, will find this game is the best single player game in the world
Pudding;-;This game is horrible. Mods make it better, for a price. They also make it crash a lot.
Starboy;-;You will have to spend dozens of hours to fully explore Skyrim. Like any other Bethesda game, it has its share of imperfections and broken promises, but it's exciting and fascinating nevertheless. Wait for a couple of patches to come out, download the best mods, tighten the screws in the SkyrimPrefs.ini file, and you're good to go for a virtual Christmas vacation ;)
Orangemm;-;Skyrim. SKYRIM! Play as whoever you want! Except an Asian. Roleplay as whoever you want. YOU CAN DO ANYTHING! EXCEPT TALK. YOU CAN BE A CRAZY KLEPTOMANIAC LESBIAN WEREWOLF WHO SPECIALIZES IN CLAYMORES OR A BISEXUAL SWORD-SPELL WEILDING MANIAC ON A QUEST FOR VENGEANCE AFTER HIS DOG IS KILLED AND HES A LOOSE RENEGADE COP WHO DONT FOLLOW NO RULES UNTIL HES ASSIGNED A HIGH ELF PARTNER AND THEN HE LEARNS A LOT ABOUT LIFE WHILE ALSO GAINING VENGEANCE THURSDAYS AT NIIIIIIINE. Erm, oh oh sorry. FIGHT DRAGONS! USUALLY WHILE TRYING TO DO SOMETHING THAT IS TEDIOUS AND ANNOYING. Die to the same bandit chief over and over again BECAUSE HE KEEPS USING THAT GOD DAMN SCRIPTED EXECUTION MOVE GOD DAMN YOU ING ORC  NOBWAFFLE. FIGHT DRAGONS! OR DON'T DO THAT BECAUSE YOU'RE A . PUNCH AN ORC SO HARD HE EXPLODES! PUMP YOUR GAME FULL OF SEX MODS BECAUSE YOU ONLY THOUGHT ABOUT IF YOU COULD, AND YOU DIDN'T STOP TO THINK IF YOU SHOULD. YOU MONSTER. EXPLOSIONS*! SKYRIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIM! *Explosions are limited and not as explodey as normal explosions. Side effects may include being on fire, shrapnel lodged into your face, discomfort, loss of hearing, or loss of vision. Do not take EXPLOSIONS if you are pregnant, were recently pregnant. Ask your doctor if EXPLOSIONS are right for you.
Dutcher;-;It is one of my favorite games since I started playin it. I have no doubt that this game is the best of the series of the elder scrolls so far.
(DLG)CybeR;-;Theres so much to do, I haven't even started modding yet.
Capt Facepalm Picard;-;Bought a horsey. Rode a horsey to nearest bandito outpost. Unmount horsey. Stabby them banditos. Run back to dead horsey by bandito arrow. Long walk of Q_Q to town.
Gracmistrz;-;I've been killing a dragons for almost 600 hours. It was f.....g amazing 10/10
Jack D. Chicken;-;I've never been into RPG's. but this game turned that around. The expansive world of this game just seems to keep on going, and with all of the mods out there, you can't finish it. It's almost impossible to 100% this game, and there are so many classes you can become, and you can change your class down the line, not like most games that gives you the options to become the base classes as mage, warrior, archer or thief. The replay value in this game is absolutely amazing!! Go pick up this game, it's worth it!!
I Know,Huh;-;love this game 9/10
Doctor Marinus;-;Say goodbye to your loved ones. You won't be seeing them for a while.
Steven Patrick Morrissey;-;Well, What can I say :)! I love The Elder Scrolls Series and I love Skyrim as one of the series! I love Oblivion and Morrowind! The Elder Scrolls series portrays a very realistic view on the fantasy world many years ago, It does this by: Stunning Graphics - You do not need an amazing graphics card to run this game, people will recommend the GTX 670, but, I have a 7770 and the game looks stunning (on ultra), and you can also download the HD Texture mods, this will show a much better graphical content! But, with the HD Texture Mod, somethings have not been worked on as much as somethings else, i.e. the rocks in caves compared to the sky. I believe this is because the Sky is viewed more than the rocks inside of caves. Good Physics - I know this game has good physics. I can tell because I have played all the other Elder Scrolls, and on Morrowind the physics were as good as they can be in 2001, Oblivion, Again, The physics were as good as they can be in 2009! And, possibly we could think the same about Skyrim in a few years time, nevertheless, the physics are very good and this contributes to the brilliant graphics that this game provides. The Story - Although this game can be played (after the first 5 quests I believe) very different, you can choose to do quests, or you can explore and hunt and explore caves. Then, once you have explored the places that the map will let you, you can then do quests in different parts of Skyrim i.e. Dawnstar, Markarth, Morthal,Riften,Solitude,Whiterun,Windhelm,Winterhold and Falkreath. But, withing these constituencies there are towns that the quests are allocated. The Whole Game - With all of the brilliant physics and the stunning graphics (even without the HD Texture Mod) this game you can play for hours on end and just forget about the real world and create and play your own fantasy and take risks and use logic! Overall - The game is brilliant! As I have explained above, the graphics and the physics make the game much more enjoyable (just like any other game) :) 10/10
Snugglefresh;-;Skyrim is simply the most amazing world editor game you can play. It's exactly what a hard core game wants. The game isn't about fantasy or slaying dragons at all forget that , it's about spending hundreds of hours configuring and reconfiguring .ini files and debugging why boobs don't bounce right or why physix mods cause horses to fly during the opening credits. I wanted to create the most beautiful, perfect, real world experience, before starting out my quest. 155 hours in and 100 mods deep I created my perfect experience then I got all the expansions and broke the mods and look forward to going thru it all again! I'm serious when I say I get more satisfaction tweaking a game then actually playing it. Skyrim is aging like a fine wine.
BenReks;-;Ah yes, the wonderful world of Skyrim. I know I am very late to the party, but oh boy what an amazing afterparty this is. The entire game comes near perfection, the game has so much to offer, and I have yet to play it much (Blame it on my school exams, and if my grades are bad, blame it on Skyrim.), but I am more then thrilled to get lost in this amazing masterpiece. The graphics are amazing for it's time, but that's not the essential part, graphics never should be. It's the story, it's the gameplay, it's the feeling you get when playing it and missing it when you have to quit. I am a noob to the RPG genre, but I've been playing a good few of 'em. And I must say, Skyrim tops them all. The community adds so many amazing features to the game, the community is so clean and friendly, something you rarely see these days. Now, let's get to the pro's and cons, and my ratings. Pro's: -Amazing Storyline -Giant world, with the DLCs to enlarge it even more -Great modding community, so active -Gorgeous views and landscapes -Decent to good graphics, especially with some mods -A ton of great and amusing sidequests Cons: -Combat system a bit rusty (easily fixed with mods) -Some minor bugs, but such a large game can't be expected to be clean -I wish that I could think of more, but I just simply cannot... Ratings: Story: 9.5/10 Quests: 9/10 World: 10/10 Graphics: 8/10 Sounds: 8.5/10 Creativity: 9.5/10 Community: 10/10 This is my first real review, and my main language isn't English, so please bare with me. :D
gazwel;-;One of the best.
CaptainAFA;-;"And this thing I have thought of, I have named it, and I call it freedom." ~ Al-Esh who-is-also Aleshut-Esha-Alessia, the highest and Paravant-Paraval-Pevesh-Perrethu, first of her kind, worthy of the majesty of killing-questing-healing; El-Estia Queen of ancienttimes; Aless sweet wife of Shor and of Auri-el and the Sacred Bull and of Hrol-from-the-lands-beyond-Twil, mother of Reman; Slave-Queen, High Priestess; Symbol of Covenant, Queen-ut-Cyrod.
Presto;-;The Main story line was kinda disapointing. But Sidequests Were AMAZING!
nynex;-;One of the all-time best!
Proxy;-;The sense of freedom in Skyrim is dizzying. The vast mountains in every direction make the landscape seem limitless, and even after exploring it for days, this world feels huge and unknown on a scale neither of the previous two games did. If you have not been fortunate enough to have experienced a title of this caliber than I feel sorry for you. It has truly left its mark amongst the greatest of games I'v ever played along with its blockbuster predecessors. The content Bethesda delivered with this game is remarkable, but the potential is limitless with steam workshop. If you want to truly experience a AAA masterpiece, get this now! 98/100
Gaffar;-;So many things to do, endless activities and endless amount of mods to install and play around with, very well optimized and is one of the best games of all time, my play history doesn't show it all but I played a bunch of it on the PS3 before I switched to PC master race, 10/10 IGN :3
9th Unknown;-;Super awesome game, best i have played on pc yet!!!!
LtCol R.J. MacReady;-;With the mods like Frostfall and the various vampire tweaks this is the corner stone of RPG single player games. My only regret is that it is not a multiplayer experience. Cheers Bethesda
[RG] Tjthelegokid [NZLBPUCG];-;I'd highly recommend this game to anybody who's a fan of fantasy-themed games and RPG. This game has made it's mark as probably one of my favourite games. Every second of this game is zmazingly fun, right from the 'tutorial' to the defeat of the antagonist. The game has hours of gameplay from the main story, as well as countless more with the addition of doing whatever you want. The true beauty of this game though is you can play it how you want. Whether you prefer earning your wealth from acts of kindness or stealing it from the shadows, you can without breaking the game. Whether you prefer playing as the people's hero, the assassin of the shadows, or the greatest mage in all of Tamriel, you can do so. This game truely takes the 'Open World' genre and breaks it WIDE open. (pun intended) The story of the game is relatively simple really (I say, staring down into my encyclopedia of Skyrim lore) Dragons have returned to Skyrim through the arrival of Alduin "The World Eater" who is resurecting dragons all across Skyrim. On top of that, the Empire is now locked in a Civil War with the Stormcloak Rebellion, who believe that their Nodic way of life is at stake due to the Empire's outlaw on worshiping one of their Gods, and thatEmpire is crippling to the will of the Elves. (who in turn, beat the Empire in a previous war and now control them through the use of a "peace treaty") Fortunately, The Last Dragonborn has arrived, a man (or woman... or lizard) born with the soul of a dragon, who is capable of speaking the dragon's language, and therefore learning Dragon Shouts (or Thu'ums) a form of magic that mortals have to spend their entire lives mastering. Unfortunately, you're on your way to your own execution, and nearly take the axe to the face too. Fortunately, Alduin turns up and intervenes. To summarise, he basically destroys everything and you (somehow) manage to escape unharmed. TL;DR: You're the Dragonborn, a mortal with the soul of a dragon, who's freed by a dragon (unintentionaly) from your own execution, into a world where giant fire-breathing lizards are coming back to life to kill of man (and elf) kind, and the land is torn in half having to deal with a civil war. Got all that? Moving on... The DLC is pretty decent aswell. The Dawnguard DLC sees you fighting against a growing vampire menace with the Dawnguard, essentially Paladin-esque vampire slayers, or fight with the vampires, with Lord Harkon and becoming a Vampire Lord, a pure-blooded vampire capable of (a rather horrifying) transformation to severly increase your magical capabilities. Eventually, you find out the Harkon is unwilling to deviate from his plan; use a legendary bow, tipped with the blood of a pure-blooded vampire to black out the sun, FOREVER. Not as threatening as a dragon attenpting to kill off or enslave all mortals, but hey, at least Harkon is trying. TL;DR: You get to kill vampires, or become a more powerful version of the vanilla game's vampire, including a whole new transformation. The Dragonborn DLC sees you travelling back to Morrowind upon being attacked by cultists in Skyrim. Turns out there's another Dragonborn on Solstiem (an island off the coast of Morrowind), but he's not looking to make friends and has enslaved most of the islands population through the manipulation of dragons. What's even better is you can learn the same shout. That's right, who needs a horse when you can fly a f*ckin' dragon into battle! TL;DR: You get to go back to Morrowind and fight another Dragonborn who's using shouts to control dragons. Then we have The Hearthfire DLC... it's not as exiting as it sounds. All it does is allow you to buy a plot of land and build a house on it, instead of buying a pre-made house. The house you build can be expanded upon with a main hall and up to three seperate wings, wether they be a mage tower, an armory, a storage room, a kitchen, a trophy room, and the list goes on. THe interiors re also fully customisable, allowing you to place your own furniture, display cases, weapon racks, even armour mannequins. Nice DLC really, but not as good as the previous two. TL;DR: You're not just a murderer of men/dragons/whatever, but an interior designer aswell. And if there is something that doesn't quite suit you tastes, there's likely a mod for it. Don't like giant spiders? Turn them all into bears. Don't like bears? Turn them all into giant spiders! There's lots of mods that can be found on the Skyrim Nexus, with countless others available on other sites. Although this game does have Steam Workshop compatibility, I'd recommend against it if you wish for long term, reliable modding. These mods vary from simple weapon additions or re-skins, to complete overhauls of the game's systems. If you can name it, there's probably a mod for it. However, of course, no game is competely perfect. Unfortunately, this game is riddled with various bugs that may (emphasis on may) not break your game, but some just might, like removing essential characters, somehow loosing much-needed quest items by simpling having them in your inventory, or something else awful. This may seem unusual, but there are some bugs in the game that are actually beneficial to use, like glitching a quest to recieve both rewards from it, or leveling skills too damn high for your level through bug exploitation. Ever casted Soul Trap on a corpse over and over again? Go try it... I'll wait... ... You done? Good. Now delete that save and stop cheating. Thankfully, most if not all of these bugs are fixed with mods, most notably the Unofficial Skyrim Patches. (fun fact: it's the most downloaded/endorsed mod on the Skyrim Nexus) I'd highly recommend you get this patch mod, as well as the patches for the DLCs aswell (yep, even when doing something as simple as placing furniture in a house, Bethesda still can't keep it bug-free) Overall, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is an extremely well crafted game that deserves to be part of the Elder Scrolls family, along side Oblivion, Morrowind, and those other two no-one really cares about.
TripleThreat;-;Hours and hours of fun play with many quests and a world to explore. You have the freedom to choose your own path and focus on the skills you want to master. I am a fan of the sneaking and stealth attacks possilbe in this game.
SpookySkeleton;-;The safe version of heroin. Addictive 12/10.
ToastedKarma;-;Skyrim is one of the best open world games you will find. There is almost endless possibilities... From becoming harbinger of a guild, to saving the world... Multiple times. If there is something you dislike... Well you can always get mods. 10/10
BoC | Pixrl;-;It's the best Fantasy-RPG ever made!!!
[3eVolt] King Wojcik;-;By the Gods.... this game is holy.
Mr_Halsall;-;Chased by a giant and its mamoths for about 10 minutes 10/10
[BISON]humm.us;-;too many mods. not enough time.
Chill Moop;-;i saw a dragoon, kinda hot. banged it sexde it and fukged it ggnore
GiulianoZanolin;-;A great open world game that many people will enjoy even without mods. But this is not a game for everyone and there will be a group that doesnt like it. But, i have put in over 200 hours (with another account) and encourage you to give it a try.
MrGoodSmith;-;Todd Howard (director of this game) once said in a keynote that their philosophy in building a game is the final experience a player will have with the game. I think Bethesda hit the sweet spot with Skyrim. No other game will make you feel yourself a hero as Skyrim does. No other game will make you live a whole new life as you would in Skyrim. No other game will give you the level of freedom you can have in Skyrim. No other game looks as rich and vibrant graphically as Skyrim. And no other game bugs are as fun as they are in Skyrim! Some might debate whether Skyrim is indeed the greatest chapter of the Elder Scrolls saga, but I know one thing: I truly love this game and I enjoy playing it, if I had to choose one game only to play for the rest of my life it would be Skyrim, because there is so much you can do in this neverending adventure.
Tsirk;-;I recommend Skyrim for those who want an RPG with endless possibilities. Why because Modders never stops developing new mods everyday, every week. You can find mods that gives you new land and adventures, skin and other important aspect to improve your SKyrim from vanilla to actually new game, I can see this reason why Bethesda drops any updates for this game because, modders already got it better than what they had been created. So Finally, all I can say is this is a must-have game and you will never ever ever regret owning Skyrim.
KMG623;-;Before you read anymore of this, know that I am in no way a role-playing person. I can never get into it enough to enjoy it like some people can. However, this game is one of the most fun RPGs I have ever played. I was my first Elder Scrolls game so it was a new experience for me. I had played Dragon Age: Origins and that was the only other RPG I had ever played. Dragon Age: Origins pales in comparison to this game. I tend to find the least productive use of my time in games like this and it was not only the least conducive to the main story line but also the most fun goof off time. I can't think of any other games in which you can ride around in circles on a horse and hit enemies with a war hammer while laughing hysterically at the fact that even though you are less than four feet from them, they still have a hard time hitting you. Unless it's a giant. Giants will slaughter you early on. DON'T TOUCH THE GIANTS!! But overall, I would give this game a 9/10. And my only reason for not giving it a perfect 10 is some of the features and graphics that wouldn't be a problem for the industry today are a bit off putting for me though some people more than likely won't care.
F U J  S H I XP;-;What I like about Skyrim is it's high modability and wonderful supportive community. What I don't like is that that community is being turned upside down and against itself through the prospect of "paid for" mods. It wasn't needed before, and it won't be needed now nor in the future.
Escort Evan;-;I really shouldn't have to explain to you why Skyrim is a good game... and I wont.
Knickers97;-;This game is so incredibly diverse and complex, there are so many things to do and so much content that it is amazing, you can literally spend thousands of hours playing this game and still be interested. Unfortunately, this is also its only downside. The game is so incredibly complex that you may quit because of the amount of effort and time you have to put in this game. Imagine being reborn in a new world that you know nothing about. That is Skyrim.
Satus;-;The fifth installment in my very favourite video game franchise. Video games in general I feel could stand to learn alot from the Elder Scrolls series. No game has an even remotely similar experience, such a richly detailed world. Go anywhere do whatever you want, that`s what makes the Elder Scrolls series the top franchise in gaming in mind. Granted there are lots of sandbox games out there but no one does it like Bethesda. Tons to do and all of it is optional. As far as Skyrim itself goes I feel it`s gameplay wise the finest achievment in Bethesda`s history. Personally The Elder Scrolls III: Morrowind will probably always be my personal favourite I felt the story was just more engaging and the world more interesting. That said Skyrim is a beautiful place and the story is more engaging then The Elder Scrolls IV: Oblivion was. Combat has never been better the dragon shouts are exciting and useful, weapons are varied and the crafting system is deep and satisfying. One of my only gripes with Skyrim is I feel the magic got downplayed in this one, can`t create your own spells any more and many spells from previous games are just gone. Luckily Skyrim is heavily supported by the modding community and there is an abundance of great mods out there that add interesting new content to the game. If youhaven`t played it yet. Do yourself a favor and pick this game up.
PixelPacker;-;This is an epic game if you like open world games this is your game.
Ruby Rhod;-;Saw a giant Save game Got catapulted 1000 ft in the air by the giant Reload Repeat 10x
StormMaster;-;We're going to remove the payment feature from the Skyrim workshop. For anyone who spent money on a mod, we'll be refunding you the complete amount. We talked to the team at Bethesda and they agree. We've done this because it's clear we didn't understand exactly what we were doing. We've been shipping many features over the years aimed at allowing community creators to receive a share of the rewards, and in the past, they've been received well. It's obvious now that this case is different. To help you understand why we thought this was a good idea, our main goals were to allow mod makers the opportunity to work on their mods full time if they wanted to, and to encourage developers to provide better support to their mod communities. We thought this would result in better mods for everyone, both free & paid. We wanted more great mods becoming great products, like Dota, Counter-strike, DayZ, and Killing Floor, and we wanted that to happen organically for any mod maker who wanted to take a shot at it. But we underestimated the differences between our previously successful revenue sharing models, and the addition of paid mods to Skyrim's workshop. We understand our own game's communities pretty well, but stepping into an established, years old modding community in Skyrim was probably not the right place to start iterating. We think this made us miss the mark pretty badly, even though we believe there's a useful feature somewhere here. Now that you've backed a dump truck of feedback onto our inboxes, we'll be chewing through that, but if you have any further thoughts let us know. THE PEOPLE'S VOICES HAVE BEEN HEARD, NOW WE JUST NEED A DONATION OPTION FOR MODDERS TO GET 100% OF OUR SUPPORT TAKE MY UPVOTE AGAIN, SKYRIM U BEAUTIFUL MODDED TIME
Dlich;-;Skyrim belongs to the Nords. Its contents belong to the Khajiit. 11/10 would steal everyone's  again
Professor Chaos;-;really really good game :D
kipperuni;-;11/10 would play again would rek alduin again would no scope bunnies again would accidentally kill lydia again would intentionally kill lydia again would shoot arrows in knees again words of wisdom: avoid arrows to knees
Hypocrite;-;Download the game. Get yourself some mods. Kill all tha children. Reload. Best game of tha Year.
One-Eyed Owl;-;Ruined my Life 10/10
Wardical;-;Enabled godmode. Equiped worst robes. Used worst spell. Killed a whole town. 10/10 would do again.
Savex;-;This game is addictive and very immersive, aslo the modding community is great nd i have lots of fun playing and exploring mods. 10/10
Poon's Dah;-;This game is so great. It just has a great sense of freedom and player choices. I think its a great game for anyone who wants to play. Its action-packed and ready to go. And for all of you disgusting perverts, there are even mods for those kinds of things. This game suits anyones needs and is so fun you'll find yourself attached to the screen for hours on end! Oh yeah and if you dont like this game you obviously dont have a good sense of adventure and I bet you took an arrow in the knee right after someone stole your sweet roll.
DABACONTANK;-;no matter how bored i get of it, i will get back on it. I get bored of it because i have played over 1000 hours of this freaking game. I would say that this is definately my favorite game of all time, and i recommend this game to all. You dont really even have to know the backstory, and it still will be fun! I think that everyone should play this game!
yoavkedem1;-;this game is the most fun game ever i own buy this game
Burn The Homeless For Fuel;-;It's like Skyrim with dragons.
Reality Check;-;Amazing game 10/10, best RPG out there, highly recommend if you love free roam RPG's.
Mr Mattio;-;I beat up a child, got a bounty put on me. I killed a beggar, got a bounty put on me. I killed a woman, got a bounty put on me. I killed a man, got a bounty put on me. I killed a chicken, got a bounty put on me. I stole a cabbage, got a bounty put on me. Got arrested; escaped. Got arrested again. Escaped, modded the game until it crashed. 100/10
Radikate;-;I have no life now.
9teeneightyfiver;-;This has to be my favourite game of all time! I'd never played RPGs before this, so I didn't really know what to expect. All I knew is it was big, and that attracted me to it. I played this through to 100% on vanilla settings and I thought the graphics and scenery were awesome. Then I discovered the modding community. The amount of available mods is mind blowing, to the point you can create a world so beautiful youll never want to leave. 630+ hours on multiple play throughs and modding and I dont regret a minute of it. Buy this game. 11/10
no;-;10/10 > Killed a Dragon with my bare fists while Naked
Waltz;-;It's an Elder Scrolls game. Moddable, with a great modding community that spans several organizations of modders and developers. Seriously it's almost like the world's next da vinchi is hiding somewhere in the TES modding community, silently crafting armor sets that look more natural in a museum than in Tamriel. Buy it, Mod it, Play it.
FishStick;-;Awsome just buy it and don't ask any questions.
Baha';-;The only thing you can't do in this game is killing children. Hopefully, mods are here to help you to kill them. God I hate children ! But I love this game ! 10/10
Kinuski kissa;-;This game is wonderful! It has awesome soundtrack, great story, and these graphics. These finishing hits and dragons are so epic. This game have hundreds of choices. You can be big hero or alchemy mage or maybe sneaky thief. Dragonborn and Dawnguard DLC make this an even better and I totally recommend Hearthfire DLC too. I have played this about 170h and I can see myself playing this hundreds of hours more. 10/10
data30001;-;My Life Begin in Skyrim Mod and DLC make Life better 10/10
Magnets;-;Skyrim is cool.
Illu;-;Like Skyrim except it actually is Skyrim
Cstiltzkin;-;Amazing I think everyone should own this game pure awsome
Spawn of Totoro;-;Awesome game! I've had it since launch and still play it for hours on end! Over 1k hours over all. For some reason using SKSE seems to interfere with my hours played, so only about 540 are recorded at the time of this review. I started off with vanilla for the first 400-450 hours. The rest were with mods. First the workshop mods, then lately nexus mods. This game was well worth paying $60 + cost of the DLC on released. I don't regret it at all! Get the Legendary Edition if you don't own Skyrim already. Well worth it!
DrDRA1337;-;Finally bought game in Steam, 10\10 guys, the game is really awesome
The_Northy |trade.tf;-;This game i can say is one of the best games i've ever played, it isn't perfect, but it is a lot of fun for boring times
Cyroden;-;This game is purely amazing, all of it. Its just like GTA, but in the medieval times! If you want a modding game, this should be your choice. This game is amazing to mod and is great even in Vanilla! Receiving this game for 5$, and also being my 2nd game, it is fun! I have at least more than 20 mods on it. From more followers to rebuilding Helgen, this game has a whole bunch of mods, both Steam Workshop and Skyrim Nexus. 10/10
Chocobreeder;-;One of the best open-world experiences out there. Skyrim is perfect for any player who prefers to create their own character and then to customize how they level up, the levelling system is near flawless giving you options between the more melee based heavier type of character, the warlock mage or the sneaky theif archer. Needless to say you can mix it up so for example a battle mage could be created who would be great at swordmanship and armour aswell as spell casting ability. The story is probably not as intriguing as Skyrims predecessor and sometimes can seem to be a questline you want to progress through just to get it of your quest journal. This been said the amount of side and miscellaneous quests which will either be pretty serious or great fun with humour more than make up for the lacking main story, to add upon this the amount of these quests are insane and will keep yo treking in efforts to find more. Graphically the game looks fabulous and if you are the player that likes to add some game enhancing graphic mods then this game is most definetley for you, mods are released constantly and really do make your game look better (not that it looked bad in the first place) The GUI works the same as all the other Elder Scrolls games and will come to no surpise for most players, the inventory and skill system has been managed amazingly making it easy to access things in battle. The AI has become slightly more evolved but still what you would expect from this sort of game. Overall I would rate this game 8.5/10 and would say that it definitely is one of the best RPG's I have ever played.
MaxBlur;-;Bethesda        , ,   .       .     ,    .
Ambicatus;-;Skyrim - A open world RPG So many dungeons --> Even until now i didnt visit all of them Endless quests Mods Many mods Loverslab. 11/10 would play again
JOEdog;-;Great Game
Kumail;-;Only played a very little, but it was fun. Update: April 2015: No No No No No No No No Valve what the heck are you doing? Paid Mods are you kidding me?!?!!?!??! STOP THIS.
Reaper2707;-;Best game ever !!! If you like RPG Adventure games this is a game for you. Really good story line and endless amout of quests and things to do, Hours of fun.
Dominant Chris;-;"Its like fallout with swords" wait wut?
Navin;-;Skyrim is the rpg you have allways wanted. No class systom, just make your own play style. Fun and awesome quest. Be a badass Dovakin dragon slayer.
VTG | Dark Boy;-;Simply A Very Good Game.
Widowmaker;-;MICRO-TRANSACTIONS & YOU Valve and Bethesda are now "servicing" PAID mods to gamers. The mod creators themselves only take 25% from it. These modders are "self-employed". Bethesda and Valve are not legally bound to these people. Valve and Bethesda reinvented Micro-transactions, the most unethical business practice of the decade, and it is now an INDIRECT source of revenue, exploiting modders for their hard work. Now it's a business. It involves money, trademarks and possible litigation over ownership of intellectual property. Bethesda can now rely on modders to work for a pittance while cashing in the profits, at the same time avoiding legal issues if there are problems with said mods. No support from Bethesda, either. They clearly state they do not support modified games. But they sure like the money from these mods. Bethesda is taking pretty much half the profit, and modders (who are not employees, thus Bethesda doesn't owe them anything) are left to dry in the sand. No rights, no protection. And if you think 25% is bad, you're not taking taxes into account. It's worse than bad.
Barnacle Man;-;I was made into a midget and was impaled by a spear thrown by other midgets that were blue. 10/10
Wacky Flip8;-;This game is great in itself, but the real magic here is in the mods. Buy this game just for the mods. Graphic enhancements, immersive mods, gameplay-improving mods, and turning dragons into thomas the train is what this game is all about. The vanilla Skyrim is great too. Besides the wonky combat. Mods can fix that.
Xx_MLG_FaZe_Ender_Slaya_xX;-;Like Skyrim with mods.
nukesix;-;1.Killed Chicken 2.old lady attacked me 3.killed her 4. guards came at me 5.died 6.did it again 10000000000/10
Aedensin;-;Insane detail, great story with hundreds of choices.. and best of all, DRAGONS.
frostreaver;-;Skyrim isn't a very good game without mods. The fact that we might have to pay for mods to make Bugthesda's game playable is rubbish.
msk;-;I frickin' love this game , this adrenaline , the story is amazing , so are the details and I like that the game works on Low-End PCs ;3
Rhonda;-;One of the most beautiful worlds to explore in a RPG.
demonjanitor;-;dat lore tho
Beastwarrior753;-;A great game by itself with hundreds of hours of content while looking beautiful. However, mods add hundreds more hours of content, new amazing looking armor, and dozens of new locations and activities with engaging quests. All of these mods can be found in the steam workshop and are free!! This game is a must own for all gamers.
Cierra;-;If you have money and life, and you want to lose both, Skyrim is just for you!
NCR Ranger;-;so many sweet rolls <3
Smarkham;-;Listens to people. Awesome game in of itself.
theS4RG;-;Just shut your mouth and buy one of the best games ever made. 10/10
Caligula's Prodigy;-;>Got about 14 mods to increase Dragon Spawn rate >Got mod for more monsters and new creatures >Left Whiterun to go to Giant Camp >SpiderZilla is killing all the giants >Dragon comes in and kills SpiderZilla >Dragon Family comes in and kills first Dragon >I kill dragon babies then parents >Game Crashes >Get to do it all over again 10/10
milkkore;-;Your friends will miss you and your caffeine tolerance will get a big boost. No matter if you fight Giants, Dragons, Vampires, Werewolves & Zombies, mix potions, smith weapons or just take a walk in the breathtakingly beautiful (and huge!) world of Skyrim. You don't just play in that world, you live in it.
Xeparate;-;Best ing game ever thanks bethesda :D
Dovahkitten;-;The most amazing game I have ever played. If anything, the lihting is a bit off- I suggest modding it, from the Skyrim Nexus. I would recommend this game any day of the week, and week of the month, any month of the year.
Reach;-;Great game, Great graphics, Great Quest line
NCR Ranger;-;so many sweet rolls <3
[SIN7]\m/ Dean \m/;-;Gameplay: It's classic TES Gameplay, search, explore, kill with swords, magic and bows or a mixture. Character builds are gone; just use the skill to level it up. Dragons are powerful and epic and combat is, again not the best but classic TES. There must be close to 1000 or in Todd's words infinity quests for the player to do, he right you know too :) Story: Predictable but gripping and fun all the way. The main story has gotten rid of tedious missions and left only the raw and great missions. That said though it still look me 26 hours to complete the main storyline over 3 days and im not even close to the surface of the game. Graphics: TES has not boasted about the graphics but on Ultra High i was admiring the detail in every nook and cranny of the game, characters look realistic, everything just look's amazing!. Easily in the top 5 best looking games ever. The game does suffer from a few bugs but a small price to pay. Almost picture perfect 9.8/10 :D - Dean "Buy this game, GOTY"
Tarbikus;-;The BEST GAMEEEEE!!!!! EVER!! GOOD SOUNDTRACKS, QUESTS,.... JUST it is AWESOME!!! :3
belowzero;-;This is just amazing the vastness of the world is is fantastic, i'm a big elder scrolls fan and this is the best!
zKySe;-;BEST. GAME. EVER. (Bugs excluded)
Dovahkitten;-;The most amazing game I have ever played. If anything, the lihting is a bit off- I suggest modding it, from the Skyrim Nexus. I would recommend this game any day of the week, and week of the month, any month of the year.
theS4RG;-;Just shut your mouth and buy one of the best games ever made. 10/10
Caligula's Prodigy;-;>Got about 14 mods to increase Dragon Spawn rate >Got mod for more monsters and new creatures >Left Whiterun to go to Giant Camp >SpiderZilla is killing all the giants >Dragon comes in and kills SpiderZilla >Dragon Family comes in and kills first Dragon >I kill dragon babies then parents >Game Crashes >Get to do it all over again 10/10
belowzero;-;This is just amazing the vastness of the world is is fantastic, i'm a big elder scrolls fan and this is the best!
Tarbikus;-;The BEST GAMEEEEE!!!!! EVER!! GOOD SOUNDTRACKS, QUESTS,.... JUST it is AWESOME!!! :3
zKySe;-;BEST. GAME. EVER. (Bugs excluded)
Kommander Shodan;-;When you think "waht is vidya gaem?". You think of skyrim. This is the essence of gaming as a whole in a tight  sexy body 20 gigabyte package. If you could suck a games , you'd stroke skyrims balls first, then skip the fellatio and then shove the shaft in your  and squeeze down. They get everything right in this masta piece: they got es, memes, guns, modern warfare, zombies, cremes, guns, open world, feeding, spicy stories, being afk. They have it ALL. If there was a complaint to be had it could only be that it triggered an era of gaming that copied this godlike formula and gave birth to games like Pacman, Half-Life, Last of Us, and even the renown Call of Counter-Strike. So next time you ask yourself to describe the best of gaming, just  on your keyboard, boot Skyrim, and install a bestiality mod. - 6/10
ntgocfp7;-;The first character i made for this game was the most effort i have ever put in any avatar of myself in a game. Draniros was the mightiest warrior in all of Tamriel. Legate of the Imperial Legion, slayer of Ulfric, thane of Whiterun and Solitude, Archmage of the College of Winterhold, Master and Nightingale of the Thieves Guild and Herald of the Companions. He was a vanquisher of Draug and Deadra, devourer of Dragon's souls and werewolf seducer of Serana. This character was the direct effort of 200 hours worth of effort and roleplaying. And then i decided to take a break and let my brother play the game and make his own character... I thought he would remember to use a separate save. I believed he would not forget such a simple thing. I was wrong. Draniros is no more. 200 hours of playtime, effort, dragon-slaying and dungeon clearing down the drain. I was devastaded. Heartbroken! It felt like i had lost a friend... *Lets out sorrowful sigh and creates new character* Best bereavement simulator on PC 10/10 would sink 200 hours in making a char and then lose it all over again!
XXshot1400;-;wonderful game with great mods
rnfesig;-;Greatest game ever made. 2900+ hours into it, wish I had a time machine so I could start over and experience it from the beginning. Mods are fantastic, main quest is meh but side quests are incredible. More content than seems possible. I've become a true Elder Scrolls junky.
nukexlr8;-;Greatest game ever.
Hellsknight;-;Been playing this game since it came out, before i was even on steam. Still playing it 2015. Still want to play it some more. Still have those experiences where you start doing something in game and then look out the window to realize the sun is rising. Do not get this game if you don't want to mod it. Do not get this game if you don't want to be sucked into awesomeness and you require both sunlight and sleep. NOTE - If you are visually impared you can play this. There are alot of mods out there that will make playing this game really awesome, but it depends on what you are looking for. Have not actually checked out all the mods out there cos there are like thousands, but if you want to swap notes on vision impared friendly mods leave a comment.
Jay Cee Denton;-;You'll spend so much damn time modding it, and it will be glorious.
pikselKat;-;The next chapter in the highly anticipated Elder Scrolls saga arrives from the makers of the 2006 and 2008 Games of the Year, Bethesda Game Studios. Skyrim reimagines and revolutionizes the open-world fantasy epic, bringing to life a complete virtual world open for you to explore any way you choose. Play any type of character you can imagine, and do whatever you want; the legendary freedom of choice, storytelling, and adventure of The Elder Scrolls is realized like never before. Skyrims new game engine brings to life a complete virtual world with rolling clouds, rugged mountains, bustling cities, lush fields, and ancient dungeons. Choose from hundreds of weapons, spells, and abilities. The new character system allows you to play any way you want and define yourself through your actions. Battle ancient dragons like youve never seen. As Dragonborn, learn their secrets and harness their power for yourself.
Mr. late;-;It's a pretty solid game
Syntax Terror;-;do you like wizards 'n ? fancy yourself a master of wandering around everywhere? like to listen to idiots prattle on and on about some  or another? Then this is the game for you! Also: it has dragons... muthaing dragons, son!
ExtrovertedIntrovert;-;Like Oblivion with Textures
Delta Orionis;-;I hate writing a review for this because it's hard to put all the sweet lovin into words. Also I wonder if writing a review for Skyrim has any sense - I get the feeling the only people who read these are fans already. So if you lived under a rock and have now found out about it and for some reason you're still unsure about playing this, then you're thinking too much and trust me, you'll love it. It's absolutely gorgeous. There's adventure behind every corner. There's a pack of wolves behind every third corner. You can eat cheese AND fight a dragon at the same time. You can do whatever the hell you want. Soundtrack is amazing and sentimental and draws you in even more. The obligatory "would play again": 10/10 Would go rafting on the White River again
Lorseck;-;Pancakes can't play this game, and he never will.
Old Mate Mainbrah;-;Like Fallout with Swords
Slug;-;Everyone knows this game is amazing, just jumping on the review bandwagon! If depth is what your looking for, in my current play through I have just hit level 39, whilst only completing 2 or 3 quests from the main story
[H] Gazerbeam;-;This my friends, is definitely the must-play game on steam. Even now, nearly four years after the release I wish to go back to the 11.11.11 and just replay the game and experience it without knowing anything about it. You usually have reviews that give you facts and numbers to tell how good a game is, but what I want to express with my review is how the game touched me back then and how it formed my play-behaviour. The Elder Scrolls V : Skyrim made me go insane about the entire franchise and its lore, because it was and still is such an immersive game. I cant stress it enough but only the fact that there is such an epic mod community makes me re-play the game over and over, and I cant wait for the two full conversions "Skywind" and "Enderal". Thank you Bethesda for making this piece of art, it truely changed the Game history, and Im looking forward for the next time I can dive into an Elder Scrolls game.
jefflwerner;-;This is the kind of game where I will say: "Oh, I'll just play for a few minutes." and then stop when I realized that I should have gone to bed four hours ago. Magnificent game.
Th3 Mans1ay3r;-;Definitely one of my favorite games that I've easily drained over 500+ hours into it combined over the 360 and then eventually the PC. It is easily modded to be one of the most graphically stunning and immersive games you can play without really needing to destroy your system and modding it is easily learned as well, especially if a friend helps. TL;DR buy this game's Legendary Edition. Overall the story is rather run of the mill for an Elder Scrolls game that treks you around the Nordic land of Skyrim. From the marshes of Morthol to the warmer forests of Falkreath and even to the top of a mountain, home to those that will be your teachers in the ways of the voice. As you go along you can acquire new dragon shouts of varying effectiveness and usefulness. Combat is also pretty run of the mill for an Elder Scrolls game but with a few good upgrades and a little simplifying unmodded. When modded it can be one of the best styles of gameplay. The way skills are handled are quite well done as well, though the attribute system has been removed to favor on the fly building rather than setting it at the beginning and no mind changing allowed. The DLC's are ok in my opinion, nothing of the same tier as Shivering Isles but well worth the slight extra cash for the experiences given and the more freedom to mod as many mods use assets from the DLC's. Even in 2015 the game can hold its own to more modern games and even that of the Witcher 3. Then again I am an Elder Scrolls fanboy. Hope to see many more people adventuring in this new land be it for the first time or a switch to the PC like me. Be sure to check the Nexus for mods and such.
Lord Mousenberg;-;-download explosive chickens mod -spawn one chicken in -accidently spawn a hundred chickens in -chickens collide and explode -realise headphones are on maximum volume 10/10 would destroy my ears again
John Turtle-Butts(RoadToUnusual);-;its a very fun game that has a great story line and free rome capeabillitys. u can choose ur own path and do what u want (steal, muder, ect...). its supported by the workshop so u can get mods to help u or make the game more challangeing. this game is a fun rpg.
Rose;-;''Do you get to the Cloud District very often? What I am saying, of course you don't'' -- Nazeem I killed him. Was very therapeutic. 10/10 would therapy again
Teli;-;Kajit has wares if you have coin
Falwinshair;-;After months of waiting to save up for a new computer, the time came. I was able to play whatever I wanted, with no concerns, especially with graphics, I was ready to sink my teeth into Skyrim. The first major game I played on here was The Elder Scrolls: Oblivion, which instantly became my go to favourite game. I can't compare the two, as Oblivion was released many years ago, but their similarities are very close. The nature and landmarks of Skyrim are absolutely breathtaking, and being able to see it clearly is spectacular. The music is fantastic as usual, as I really feel like I am there. I love that there is a lot more wild animals in Skyrim, as well as mythical creatures. In terms of combat, it feels a lot more smoother than Oblivion. Of course I was excited to join The Dark Brotherhood, because I was able to reunite with Shadowmere again, yesssss. The only thing I would of liked to have remained the same, although the conversations with people are a lot better, I would of hoped to have had the subtitles at the bottom, so I could memorize what they are saying a lot more. Edit: Just found out that you can. I haven't encountered many bugs, I believe my first one was last night, when my prey ended up floating into the sky. I had a brief moment of amusement until it was fixed. I haven't added any mods, I don't think I will do, but when I play Skyrim from the beginning again, I most likely will. If you enjoyed Oblivion, or even Morrowind, you will definitely enjoy Skyrim.
HitGod47;-;It's not just a game...
Itegami;-;Words can't explain how expansive and time-consuming this game is. With all kinds of side quests, you'll probably end up finishing the main quest last. Don't hesitate. Just buy it already.
Bobsanitizer;-;Killed a chicken Entirety of Skyrim attacked me 11/10 would kill again
insane'ennnnnz;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is an amazing game! I usually don't play single player games, but this is an outstanding game. Buy it, you won't regret it.
br410bury;-;Escapist fantasy at its best. If you want a strong story or linear gameplay go elsewhere. However, if you want a game where you can do just about anything (and with the robust modding community you can remove the about) this is it.
|Cy4G|DeePCoveR;-;Its Skyrim dammit. Of course its good.
Axios;-;Brilliant game, fun, challenging and has lots of hours of gameplay to keep you entertained. I definitely suggest you pick up this game.
Spitfire (T-AM) [MM] [BW];-;Any game that allows you to go around as spiderman with Majora's mask and a keyblade is a must buy in my book, as is this for that exact reason. DO YOU GET MY MEANING YET?!
Beezare;-;I used to be an adventurer like you. Then I took an arrow in the knee... So here I am, sit tight and play Skyrim
Lauren Aster;-;After reaching 100% on PS3, I couldn't help but re-replay this game on PC. Even more beautiful and immersive. Will always be one of my favourites. <3
WafflePotatoPancake;-;This is the game the never, ever ends. I picked this game up thinking I wouldn't like it having never played a previous TES game before. Sat in my Library untouched for about a month or two, and finally took the plunge. I was wrong. I was so very, very wrong. This is probably the best purchase I've ever made on steam. Add in the unlimited potential of modding, and it's an adventure that continues forever. I've probably restarted over a hundred times by now with a new character, and still only have beaten Alduin once. ONCE. There's still so much more do to and explore that I'm still discovering quests and areas and little hidden things. I still can't believe how much there is to do and I'm still finding more. At it stands I'll probably wake up one day having lost all touch with reality and actually start seeing the world as Skyrim with how much I've played. And I'm totally ok with that.
Robn;-;Ruined my life. Five stars.
Dovah;-;I was stacking books on a shelf in my house in Whiterun, one of Skyrim's major cities, when I noticed a weapon rack right beside it. I set a sacrificial dagger in one slot, an Orcish mace in the other. They were on display for nobody but me and my computer-controlled housecarl, Lydia, who sat at a table patiently waiting for me to ask her to go questing. The chest upstairs was reserved for excess weapons and armor, the bedside table for smithing ingots and ores, the one next to the Alchemy table for ingredients. I'd meticulously organized my owned virtual property not because I had to, but because tending to the minutia of domestic life is a comforting break from dealing with screaming frost trolls, dragons, a civil war, and job assignments that never seem to go as planned. It's even a sensible thing to do; a seemingly natural component of every day existence in Skyrim, one of the most fully-realized, easily enjoyable, and utterly engrossing role-playing games ever made. Part of what makes it so enjoyable has to do with how legacy Elder Scrolls clutter has been condensed and in some cases eliminated. In Skyrim, there's no more moon-hopping between hilltops with a maxed out Acrobatics skill. That's gone, so is Athletics. The Elder Scrolls V pares down the amount of skills and cuts out attributes like Endurance and Intelligence altogether. There's no time wasted on the character creation screen agonizing over which skills to assign as major. You don't assign major and minor skills at all, but instead pick one of ten races, each with a specific bonus. High Elves can once a day regenerate magicka quickly, Orcs can enter a berserk rage for more effective close-range combat. These abilities are best paired with certain character builds  the High Elf regeneration is useful for a magic user  but don't represent a rigid class choice. Major decisions don't need to be made until you're already out in the world and can try out magic, sneaking and weapon combat, emphasizing first-hand experience over instruction manual study, letting you specialize only when you're ready. It contributes to the thrilling sense of freedom associated with life in Skyrim. Do a quest, kill a dragon, snatch torchbugs from the air, munch on butterfly wings or simply wander while listening to one of the best game soundtracks in recent memory. Despite the enormity of the world and the colossal amount of content contained within, little feels random and useless. Even chewing on a butterfly wing has purpose, as it reveals one of several alchemical parameters later useful in potion making at an alchemy table. Mined ore and scraps of metal from Dwemer ruins can be smelted into ingots and fashioned into armor sets, pelts lifted from slain wildlife can be turned into leather armor sets, and random books plucked from ancient ruins can trigger hidden quest lines that lead to valuable rewards. Skyrim's land mass is absolutely stuffed with content and curiosities, making every step you take, even if it's through what seems like total wilderness, an exciting one, as something unexpected often lies just over the next ridge. Many times the unexpected takes the form of a dragon. Sometimes they're purposefully placed to guard relics, sometimes they swoop over cities and attack at seemingly random times. In the middle of a fight against a camp of bandits a dragon might strike, screaming through the sky and searing foe and friendly alike with frost or flame. Momentarily all on the battlefield unite, directing arrows and magic blasts upward to knock down the creature, creating impromptu moments of camaraderie -- a surprising change from what may have been yet another by-the-numbers bandit camp sweep. Dragons show up often, their presence announced by an ominous flap of broad wings or an otherworldly scream from high above. The scale and startling detail built into each creature's appearance and animations as it circles, stops to attack, circles again and slams to the ground makes encounters thrilling, though their predictable attack patterns lessen the excitement after a few battles. In the long run they're far less irritating than the Oblivion gate equivalent from The Elder Scrolls IV, can be completed in a few minutes, and always offer a useful reward. Killing a dragon yields a soul, which powers Skyrim's new Shout system. These are magical abilities any character can use, you don't have to specialize in spell casting to slow time, throw your voice, change the weather, call in allies, blast out ice and fire, or knock back enemies with a rolling wave of pure force. Even if you favor sword, shield and heavy armor and ignore magic entirely, you'll still be able to take full advantage of these abilities provided you find the proper words  each Shout has three  hidden on Skyrim's high snowy peaks and in the depths of forgotten dungeons, serving as another reason to continue exploring long after you've exhausted the main quest story, joined with the Thieves Guild, fought alongside the Dark Brotherhood, or thrown your support behind one of the factions vying for control of Skyrim. Not only is this land under assault by dragons, long thought to be dead, it's also ripped in two by civil war. You can choose one side or the other, but so much of the allure of Skyrim is how, even outside of the confines of quest lines, the embattled state of the world is evident, and steeped in a rich fictional legacy. Lord of the Rings this is not, but with the release of every Elder Scrolls game, the fiction becomes denser, and the cross-referencing for long-time fans all the more rewarding. Skyrim's residents are all aware of current events. They'll comment on the civil war, some sympathizing with the rebels, others thinking the establishment sold its soul. The peasants complain about the Jarls who control each settlement, the Jarls complain about the rebels or foreign policy, the overprotective College librarian complains when I drop dragon scales all over his floor; many characters feel like whole, distinct personalities instead of vacuous nothings that hand out quests like a downtown greeter hands out flyers for discount jeans. Characters stereotype based on race, they double-cross at even the slightest hint it might be profitable, and they react to your evolving stature within the world. It makes a ridiculous realm, filled with computer-controlled cat people and humanoid reptiles, demon gods and dragons, feel authentic, like a world that existed long before you showed up and will continue to exist long after you leave.
Vesper;-;THE ELDER SCROLLS V: SKYRIM Sit through a cutscene! Get bored! Pick your race! Pick your face! Pick your nose! Be a lizard! Lizards are cool! Almost get executed! Be scared of a dragon! Get some armor! Get some weapons! Run in circles! Climb a mountain! Learn how to yell at people from some old dudes! Yell at things! Do a bunch of quests! Gather more quests you'll never do! Accidentally become leader of a guild of thieves! Go to college! Inherit the college! Get some spells! Do magic! Run out of magic juice! Run around some more! Run out of stamina! Fight dragons! Take their souls! Use the souls to get more ways to yell at people! Level up! Improve your skills! Make some cool armor! Make some cool weapons! Enchant that cool armor and weapons! Run out of enchanting juice! Yell at stuff some more! Steal a plate! Run from the law! Steal a horse! Fail to protect that horse! Go on foot because your horse is dead! Get caught! Run out of health! Die! Respawn where you were twenty minutes ago because you forgot to save! Rage quit! Come back! Decide to actually do the main quest line! Consume copious amounts of food mid-battle! Climb a mountain by yelling at clouds like the old dudes taught you to! Meet a good dragon! Learn how to yell at things from him! Go through a bunch of stuff to get a scroll! Read that scroll! Go back in time! Learn to yell at things from people in the past! Fight a bad dragon! Realize it isn't the final boss and that you didn't kill him! Stop doing quests! Buy a house! Buy stuff for your house! Run around avoiding the main quest line! Gather boatloads of gold! Not use any of it! Mod the game to oblivion! Realize that you've somehow already sank 50+ hours into it! Realize you're addicted! Keep playing anyway! 10/10
Rgeers;-;Best game I ever bought. In this game, you'll be sent back to the times where people fought with swords and bows. A brilliant setting, if you ask me. The game lets you do whatever you want. You can customize your character to your own style, own personal favorite race, and you'll be able to fight any style you want. Do you want to play the sneaky Elf archer, with the bow? No problem. Do you want to play the sneaky Kahjiit thief, with the daggers? No problem! Do you dislike weapons and love to use magic? No problem, there's even lots of different spells, either Destruction or Illusion, maybe Necromancy is more your style? Being a healer is no problem either! You can make your own weapons by Smithing, you can make your own potions by gathering ingredients and mixing them into a potion with Alchemy, you can upgrade your weapons by using Enchanting, there's so much to do! Want to settle down after some adventures? Get to a town and drink mead at the inn, or purchase a house or a piece of land to build a house, with self-found materials, or maybe bought materials? Whatever you want. There are so many different playtroughs, so much quests to play, heck, I've played this over 275 hours and I still haven't completed all the quests! I completely recommend this game. I bought it at the releasedate, 11-11-11 and I'm still not done with it. Did I mention the Steam Workshop? Millions of mods to download, without any fee! Enjoy!
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;Playing Skyrim is like masturbating. Feels good doing it but later you regret it. And then you keep on doing it. 10/10
CinemaFromage;-;Day 1: This game sure looks nice, there's just....so much to do. I mean, the map's all over, they expect me to actually walk to each place, there's barely any quest markers, I don't know where the hell...Screw it, I'm going to walk in that direction and see what I find. Day 5: Hey, this game's starting to flow a bit now. The quest system is starting to make sense. It's kind of fun to wander about and explore these random caves and what not. Plus, my toon looks pretty cool with this helmet with the big horns sticking out. Day 10: I'm uh...I'm not sure, but I think my wife may be angry with me. I told her I was going to go play some more Skyrim, she said 'fine, whatever I'm going to be." Hope I'm not spending too much time with the game! I can't help it though, now that I figure out how the quests and exploration works, it all feels pretty good. I think I'm going to play with some graphics mods, that realism mod sounded kind of cool. Day 15: How in the hell do I have 110 hours played in this game already? That can't be right! I didn't think I was playing THAT much. Then again...I haven't seen my wife and kid for a few days now that I think about it. I uh...maybe I should go check on that, make sure they're okay. I'll go just as soon as I'm done forging these iron daggers. Day 20: My new wife Lydia becons me back to to Breezehome, I've been gone so long. The Dragon of North Summit is no longer, so it is time to return. I feel sorrow for leaving her and the children alone as the war with the Stormcloaks rages on around us, but I am Dragon Born and I have a duty to keep Tamriel safe from the scaled death that soars high in our snowy skies! Day 50: I was once an adventurer like you, then I took an arrow to the knee.
Westguard;-;At first you are like this games fun, then you are like woah there are mods and then you don't stop the mods and then the next thing you know you are playing as a giant with a strap-on fighting thomas the tank engine
[KoD] Colonel Sanders;-;If I could, I would take this game out, buy it dinner, have sex with it and call it the next day. Then we would start going out regularly, we would fall in love eventually. We would become the couple that has their own inside jokes and are always teasing each other and everyone else would be jealous of us. We would get married and have a child (Fallout New Vegas, the second best game ever). We would grow old together, on my death bed as I lie there about to draw my last breath, TES: Skyrim looks at me with tears in it's eyes "Thank you for everything, you were always so good to me" and I would take TES: Skyrims hand, look it in the eye and say "No, thank YOU" then pass away.
Let my people go;-;It's like Skyrim without guns.
SlyMeerkat;-;It is a great game!..... I love it and one that every RPG fan should go and own immediately.
SlaveDeMorto;-;It does not feel as good as Morrowind back in the day, but surely takes place as one of the most amazing single player rpgs with open world.
Maxzloch;-;I put a bag on someone's head and stole everything.
Thrasher [SRB];-;Skyrim is not a game, Skyrim is another life
walkerman_97;-;byoutiful
~Excalibur~;-;One of the BEST games I have ever played, very addicting
Sushi Cat;-;LET ME GUESS, SOMEONE STOLE YOUR SWEETROLL?
Kiseijuu;-;What the
Philosophy;-;would bang
Brockasaurus;-;This game is awesome.
jvgocavs_2000;-;RPG of the Decade, tons to do, smooth gameplay, lots of character building options, easy to get swept away in Skyrim for 100's of hrs.
Axios;-;Brilliant game, fun, challenging and has lots of hours of gameplay to keep you entertained. I definitely suggest you pick up this game.
insane'ennnnnz;-;The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim is an amazing game! I usually don't play single player games, but this is an outstanding game. Buy it, you won't regret it.
Spitfire (T-AM) [MM] [BW];-;Any game that allows you to go around as spiderman with Majora's mask and a keyblade is a must buy in my book, as is this for that exact reason. DO YOU GET MY MEANING YET?!
|Cy4G|DeePCoveR;-;Its Skyrim dammit. Of course its good.
Sammich;-;I have spent over 100 hours collecting flowers in skyrim. There are many different kinds of flowers, like red flowers and also blue flowers. You can also pick things that aren't flowers, but are sort of like flowers, like mushrooms.
Defense Against The Dank Memes;-;I've played 20 hours and haven't even scratched the surface of what I can do. I beat the main quest line and the College of Winterborn quest line and there is still so much to do. Even on medium-high settings this game looks stunning (unless you look at the textures too closely). The gameplay is great and I can't wait to keep playing, finish more quest lines. This game is virtually never ending and it's definitely worth the $29.99 asking price. I got it during the summer sale for $14.99 and if you wait for the next sale, it will be $7.49 and it is an absolute steal at that price. Strongly recommended.
Lord L Cook;-;Absolutely amazing i have never found any other game with such detail and depth. i sometimes feel the size of the game is a little overwelming but as if thats a bad thing. slaughter everything!!!!!!! 10/10
Beezare;-;I used to be an adventurer like you. Then I took an arrow in the knee... So here I am, sit tight and play Skyrim
French Ambassador of NJ;-;*VERY LONG READ* This is the best fantasy, action, open-world rpg anyone could ask for. Btw I probably have over 400 hours because I used to play it a lot on my ps3. So many different mechanics to it- smithing, (crafting) alchemy, lockpicking, enchanting. Not to mention that it has playstyles for any player. Agressive players can use heavy armor and two-handed weapons. Players who want to be quick and agile can use light armor, one-handed weapons and a shield. Or if they want to be sneaky they can use light armor and a bow and arrow. It also has magic for people who prefer not to use man-made weapons. For attacking a person can use destruction magic, (magic that involves frost, fire, or shock) or they can summon helpers with conjuration, and boost health or upgrade armor rating by using the other three areas of magic the game offers: restoration, illusion, and alteration. If you prefer to be somewhere in the middle of how you play, (magic and combat) you can easily become a spellsword. Combine forces with a bow and arrow and conjuration- or just become a warrior that can restore health by magic means with restoration. The combinations of playstyles are literally endless. And, like a perfect open-world game should, there is not just one storyline. Sure, you have the main storyline- every game needs that. But there are various storylines beyond that- ones that have you assisting the people of skyrim- other storylines do the opposite. You can even get married, adopt children, and buy multiple homes. The graphics are amazing already, so no one has to worry about bad graphics. But even if you don't like the graphics, there are MODS to make it better. Just go look at some of the damn screenshots in the community and you'll see that the graphics are amazing. Skyrim is completely moddable. Mods found on the steam workshop and nexus are easily installed. There are endless possibilities as to how you want to mod your game. If you want an extra storyline, install a mod! (The most famous mod of that category being Falskaar.) If you want weapon packs, install a mod! If you want new NPCs, install a mod! If you want new buildings, install a mod! And if you want to make your own mod, go right ahead and do it! On top of the already great game, the view is spectacular. Sometimes you just have to sit back, relax, and enjoy the scenery the Elder Scrolls V: Skryim has to offer. The player can also commit crimes and go to jail! Possible crimes include pickpocketing, breaking into a house and stealing the stuff in the house, forging business ledgers, assault, murder, tresspassing, and running up to the execution block when the player first enters the city of Solitude will also get them arrested. And don't think that the crimes are pointless because you would just end up in jail for them- the player can do it so it is not seen, and also get perks to get away with crimes more easily. And if they don't want to go to jail... they can slaughter an entire town. Every person you kill can be looted, along with every creature. And they stay there dead in the same spot forever. They don't disappear. Small immersive actions are available in the game as well. For example, any chair can be sat in, you can sit at bars and drink, rent out a room from an inn for a day, eat food, and sleep. There is even a quest that allows the player to get drunk- and also mods that allow the player to get drunk from any drinking instance. (Well what about if I finish the game?) Finsihed all the storylines? There are countless side quests and other objectives you can do. Finish all those? Oh wait you can't do that- the miscellaneous objectives are LITERALLY ENDLESS. I'm serious. The game will keep giving you objectives as long as you keep doing them. To justify the last paragraph, a while ago I started a third playthrough of the game, and found two entire questlines that I didn't know existed and had never encountered before. I looked the both up on a wiki and they were both there, just to confirm that they weren't mods. And to go over skill tree there is: Two-Handed: The player learns how to use two-handed weapons (which can be either a greatsword, battleaxe, or warhammer) more effectively. That includes the ability to do more damage, break blocks easier, and unlock effects of the power attacks. One-Handed: The player learns how to use one-handed weapons (which can be either a sword, waraxe, or mace) more effectively. Increase damage of one handed weapons, learn the art of dual-wielding one-handed weapons, and unlock different kinds of power attacks. Heavy Armor: The player learns how to use heavy armor more effectively. Take less damage from physical attacks, (which means attacks other than magical attacks) make it so heavy armor does not weigh as much, heavy armor depletes less stamina while sprinting, make less noise with heavy armor, and learn the way of punching oppenents to death. <---- Yes, I'm serious about that one. Light Armor: The player learns how to use light armor more effectively. Take less damage from physical attacks, make it so light armor does not weigh as much, and pretty much every other kind of thing you can learn from heavy armor. Except you can't learn how to punch oppenents to death with light armor. Block: A self-explanatory skill tree- block more effectively with shields. As an added bonus, the player can cause their opponents to bleed if they use the shield bash. Archery: Use the bow more effectively in combat. Do more damage, slow down time when you draw an arrow, cause paralysis with your arrows occasionally, get critical hits from arrows more often, and make critical hits even more effective than they already are. Smithing: Smithing is one branch of three skill trees that involve crafting. Smithing focuses on being able to craft all sorts of armor and weapons, and being able to improve them better. Enchanting: Also a branch of crafting. Enchanting allows the player to enchant weapons and armor more effectively, and once the player is advanced enough at enchanting, they can put two effects on one item instead of only one effect. Alchemy: The final branch of crafting. Alchemy allows the player to create very effective potions or poisons available for use in combat. Sneak: The player can get out of any npc's sight easier, do more damage with sneak attacks, learn to execute silent forward rolls while sneaking, and if the player gets amazingly good at sneaking, they are then able to start sneaking in the middle of battle, but instead of it being pointless the enemies would actually lose sight of the player. Lockpicking: The player learns to pick locks easier and do it without being seen. Nothing else to say here. Pickpocketing: The player learns to pick pockets and get away with it more frequently, and also becomes able to pick a greater variety of items from the unsuspecting npc's pockets. *I know, this already seems like a lot of skill trees, but there are still all the magic skill trees.* LOL ILLusion: The player learns to be able to alter how an npc is thinking. For example, in the middle of battle, the player can learn to cast spells that calms enemies down temporarily, stopping combat and enabling the player to run away before the enemies go back to normal. The opposite can also be done, as in the player can use illusion magic to make their enemies angry at EVERYBODY. For example, if the player casted a spell of that kind on a bandit, that bandit will start attacking their fellow bandits, thus leaving the player with less enemies to fight. Restoration: The player learns to be able to heal or support themselves better via magic. There is really not anything else to say about this skill tree. I would go on about destruction, alteration, and conjuration, but I literally ran out of characters LOL so just believe me, and buy the god damn game! :D Perfect 10/10.
Legendnmaking;-;i love this game. Days of fun.
Handsome Jack;-;Have you guys ever heard of this game? It's called Skyrim and it's pretty underground.
BOT Runescape;-;Play it now!
wrobles;-;great game 9/10
Nesu;-;What are you doing in the comments? All you have to do is press "Purchase"
Nesu;-;What are you doing in the comments? All you have to do is press "Purchase"
Proto Platinum;-;Best game? Best game. nonumberishighenoughforthisgame/potato
Chaz;-;This RPG adventure takes place many many seasons after the Oblivion crisis. As in Oblivion youll start off finding yourself captured as prisoner for crimes you know not. Since its initial release Skyrim was upgraded with DLC to expand the adventure. Youll play as legendary Dragonborn. A unique character with the power to take Dragons Souls and use the Powers of Shouts. Youll venture thru hunting down an Ancient dragon hell-bent on destroying all Tamriel, Alduin. Here youll join a faction called the Stormcloaks or the Imperials for the pending battle over Skyrim liberation or control. Along the way youll meet and or join up with The Dark Brotherhood, The Thieves or Mages Guild. Depending on what faction youll join determines storyline and character development. A very large range of weapons, spells and potions as well as animals, creatures and characters. Skyrim explodes in a vast amount of content that will keep you entertained for a long long time.
andrei_sniper3;-;This is one of the greatest games in the world! This game is a masterpiece
J2theT;-;This is by far one of the best games I have ever played. 10/10
Kitty;-;Very Good Game :)
elektrick;-;Most amazing game ever. Total immersion.
[JCST] Cap;-;The plot is dragons. The graphics are okay. The quests are mostly bad but there's some good moments. Dragons try to roast you but if you kill them, you get their souls to give you magic. It's basically a dragon serial killer simulator. Also, everyone who plays it wants their character to be a naked woman, unless they're a lady, then they want their character to be a naked man, I guess. Again, dragon serial killer simulator. You hunt these guys down, avoid getting turned into a Dovahkiin sandwich, and steal their souls. Their freaking souls. That's more badass than the Grim Reaper riding a motorcycle made of dead people into the sun while being chased by bears riding fighter jets. The quests may not be good, but there's a lot of them, and most give you gold and weapons. Gold and weapons = fun. I greatly enjoy smashing bandit faces in with a warhammer, battleaxe, greatsword, sword, mace, waraxe, dagger, or bow. Not sure how you smash faces with a bow. Do it anyway. You're a dragon serial killer. You can do whatever you want. Heck, get a weapons mod and smash their faces in with even more stuff. The maul and halberd are particularly pleasing. It's even better if you get the DLCs, Vampire Simulator DLC and Mushroom Land DLC. They add stuff (weapons) that's fun (good for smashing faces), and let you steal more souls (murder more innocent dragons). Dragon serial killer, remember? Hell, Mushroom Land DLC adds ANOTHER Dovahkiin, for more soul stealing badassery. Imagine the Grim Reaper sun-motorcycle thing, times two! There's also another DLC, Family Life Fun Time Simulator, which adds children and house building, but no stuff that's fun like giant death hammers for crushing the faces of your enemies. Buy this. It's good. 8/10
MetalMatter;-;This and the other Elder Scrolls games are my most favorite RPG games Skyrim has more thing to do and more things discover fighting Dragons is also a lot of fun this game is even more fun when you get the DLC's for it Hearthfire isn't that bad if you like to settle down and have a nice home that you built from scratch you can put all kinds of your own things in it the Dawnguard DLC has a pretty good story line with a good amount of new content such as crossbows and fighting while riding horse back you can also be a wicked Vampire lord but don't forget about playing as a Dawnguard cause thay have some pretty awesome things of there own the Dragonborn DLC i have just started playing and so far there is a LOT more stuff in it than Dawnguard you can tame Dragons go to a island that is a part of Marrowind fight all kinds of new things and find all kinds of new treasures the story line in it is pretty interesting but over all this whole game is a masterful creation!
Sketchy;-;Like Skyrim with Skyrim
JUMPER5621;-;Great game
Bowser;-;This is the undisputed king of single player RPGs. Its insane how much content the developers packed in this game ad how much fun it is to play and explore the huge world. If you are in search of a game where you can spend hundreds of hours and still run into stuff you havent seen or done look no further. If you enjoy fantasy RPGs this is a no brainer. Go get it, its worth every penny.
Kocca;-;One of the best game that I've ever seen!
JSRD;-;Like FarCry 3 with swords.
hellwalker;-;Worthy addition to the series. Oblivion was a letdown and Skyrim returns to Morrowinds unique feel and personality, though it can not fully match it. Skyrim is still a must play for Elder Scrolls fan and any player who enjoys adventure and exploration. The game becomes phenomenal with mods, you can feel and live through every moment, every battle and encounter. Best way to play skyrim is to roleplay your character, commit to its personality and view the world through its eyes. You can really fire up your imagination, break free of scripted dialogues and storyline and live through your own story and adventures. This will open up whole new way for you to play and enjoy games, no longer a mindless consumer addicted to snippets of pre-writen script pieces, you can forge your own story with every step you make. Better yet, start a journal or video series describing and documenting your adventures, get off your read only stasis and start being creative. Open world, Sandbox, Free adventuring are endless fun and possibilities. Stop being silly puppet unable to think something fun up without explicit designer instructions, would you kindly? For mods you can check this great thread. http://gameover.ge/index.php?showtopic=2220
Rock Soap;-;It's like Far Cry with swords.
Voleur | Gone;-;It's like Fallout with swords.
Ka0s;-;Just bought and enjoy this Game ing awsome
Mems;-;I love Bethesda. Skyrim was amazing. So much to do. Does get a little boring if your already use to the mechanics of the game. If it's your first time playing a game made by Bethesda, this will no doubt be a wise use of your limited funds to add to your library. I highly reccomend this game to anybody. 10/10
br410bury;-;Escapist fantasy at its best. If you want a strong story or linear gameplay go elsewhere. However, if you want a game where you can do just about anything (and with the robust modding community you can remove the about) this is it.
Polis Ranger-FNAF;-;Is a fun rp game. it has some bugs but don't let that down. you can make your owne player and have fun at the same time. go and get it.
Jarsse;-;Skyrim. One of the best game that i ever played. Also so beuatiful and very epic in every way. There is so much to do, so much to find and so much possibilitys. I can't to do more than recommended. Just buy and play!
Comex;-;This Game is Probaly the best game EVER! Its filled with possibiletys and fun! you should buy it
gimme back my curry;-;the best game ever!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Spleenzy;-;One of the games with the most potential, but falls short unless you mod it up to its teeth. The original game is pretty basic, terrible combat system, weird plot, boring dungeon design but then has this amazingly crafted world. Thankfull you can mod this game, and the mods make it one of the best RPGS on the market.
Nosferatizm;-;Seriously.... Get this game right Now! ~10/10
mafefe;-;You have to save magical Norway from dragons! Be sure to be on the look out for: fantasy racism! only one ultimate version of every weapon and armor type! morally gray! the token beast race of every quest betraying you! nobody caring that you killed the evil dragon, saved the sun from the vampire king, and killed the first dragonborn before he could take over some small island nobody cares about! taking over all of the guilds despite your related skills being low! 9 holds, each more morally gray than the last! nazi elves! ancient machines that still work and look freshly polished! lit torches in tombs undisturbed for thousands of years! the space core from portal 2! flying mammoths! Also dont forget: bethesda messed up the marriage system so everyone in skyrim is bisexual, even though they refer to you as if you are the opposite gender.
sl0th;-;Does this even need a review? Get it!
xDCUx Batman;-;this is game is great
bluz74 - Dishonored 2!;-;This game is like Bioshock with choices, with swords instead of guns and that takes place in midevil fantasy world. Take it from someone who doesn't play RPG's, this game is amazing. I know that isn't anything new. This game is well known to be great but my point is, I avoided it for years because of the RPG element and I regret that decision now. I don't blame myself though, I blame anyone who didn't describe the game to properly. That's right, you know who you are. The atmosphere is amazing. The combat is amazing. Graphically stellar. Challenging, fun, and exciting at times. You can play it at your own speed. Look, I'm not saying anything new here, but if you enjoy FPS's like Dishonored, Far Cry games, Bioshock, Half Life 2, hell even Doom and Quake, like me, then it's time to get this game. Don't let the "RPG" scare you away any longer like it did for me.
Walmart Wallcoating #no-mousepad;-;more than your average dragon porn simulator, needs more  though.
BandarFHD;-;Such an awesome game. The mods are awesome. Can't stop playing it
Vladdie;-;Bethesda/Valve have spelled the beginning of the end of the real modding community. The magic of mods are dead if they become paid DLC micro-transactions. Say goodbye to free modding in future Bethesda games, not that I'll be buying them anyway now. And yes of course there are still free mods but this is the turning point no one wants to see except money grabbing publishers and a few modders who can't see the forest for the trees.
iaos;-;Paid mods... Edit: The above review went up shortly after Bethesda decided it was a good idea to dehumanize everyone in the modding community. I have elected to still not recommend this game to set a reminder for what I (and many others) are against. If I were to really review Skyrim, it would go something like the following. Vanilla: 6/10. The game is entertaining for ~60 hours, but seriously lacking in many departments. The questlines are boring, tedious, and short. The main storyline is particularly awful. The world itself is not very interesting. The UI is absolutely broken. The RPG elements are shallow. The combat and gameplay is generally fun, but not noteworthy. The previous titles (except for Oblivion) are much more engaging, deep, interesting, fun, and worthwhile. I recommend Morrowind in particular. With mods: 8.5/10. Many of the above issues can be fixed with mods. Paid mods: 0/10 and a further loss of respect for Bethesda/Valve.
Pizza;-;An amazing game that has a lot of potential
Uncle Phil #OnHoliday;-;I found a sweetroll, until I got an arrow to the knee.
Mungo;-;Playing Skyrim is like eating brownies or beating children... You can't stop.
Internal_Inferno;-;shouted a goat off of a mountain 10/10 would shout at goats again
ColonelAdmiralGeneralDr.Carson;-;Wonderful Game. After I paid $30 for the game,I only had to pay $80 for mods DLC. Only half of them worked,and most of them were fake or stolen to get a quick buck,but I'm glad to be supporting steam the modders who spent hard time contributing to the community,even though they only get 25% of profits.
Sheppard;-;With the addition of paid mods I can not support this game anymore. It's sad.
rikame;-;A lot of Steam users are flooding Skyrim, which is genuinely an incredible - albeit imperfect - game with negative reviews because they understand a new policy allowing mod creators to charge for their content. My doctor told me that my diet was insufficient in salt. Premium mods cannot possibly detriment the hours of enjoyment, on both the PC and the PS3 edition, that I have recieved from this game. Any bleating otherwise is for petulant children who hate video games. I look forward to Bethesda's next installment of the TES franchise.
spectreSD;-;True to all Elder Scrolls games, Skyrim takes you from muddled and shady beginnings to become a mighty hero of legend by completing tasks both epic and tirvial alike. Slay dragons, vampires, werevolves, legions of soldiers and bandits, delve into deep dungeons and climb the highest mountains. Collect stuff, store it in random barrels and boxes. Collect more stuff, build a huge rustic mansion with it, then spend a week in game moving all yourt stuff from random barrels and boxes into barrels and boxes in your new house. Find a cook/piggy bank to live with you (they call it marriage for some reason), adopt a dirty kid, and proceed to neglect them both as you go out an slay more dragons and punch a mudcrab. I honestly cringe to think of how much time I waste in this game not even really playing it and just dealing with my collection of...stuff. Most of which I never use. I'm a digital hoarder for no apparent reason considering in the real world I have zero inclination to collect anything whatsoever. So there's that: this game develops latent psychological disorders, but only when you are playing the game. Anyway, this is your typical TES game fare. Combat and levelling is much improved over previous titles, but is still nothing amazing. The leveled loot and creatures system is arguably better than Oblivion's, but still manages to reduce the fun factor in my opinion. Honestly, if everything is roughly the same proportionate strength relative to me throughout the entire process, I never get the sense of making any real progress. Plus, leveled loot just sucks in general. I go through the process of attaining a legendary artifact of the gods at a relatively low level, and so I'm punished for such a feat in that the item is in a diminished state that never improves. Boo to that. There is always plenty of stuff to do, though. The main quest and side "civil war" quests are lacking in the epic department (mostly out of presentation), so the real fun comes from making your own story. As always, characters suffer from what I like to call "Bethesda Face," wherein the emotions conveyed visually hardly match the voice acting, usually to a comical effect because it's like witnessing wax museum characters acting. They try, but it always falls short. Voice acting is decent, but lacks variety (in number of voices, that is). Graphics are equally decent, but can easily be made great by mods. Speaking of, just about anything wrong with the game can be remedied by mods. A lot can be said about Bethesda (mostly negative, in my mind), but if anything they do a great job supporting the modding community. As such, every time they release an unpolished and usually unfinished game, you can be sure eventually the userbase will turn it into something pretty awesome. So, as always, you do a vanilla run just to see what it's all about, then use the community to play a game that is worthwhile and never look back to the retail version. I have a bit of a love/hate (mostly hate) relationship with Bethesda, but TES always keeps me coming back for hundreds of hours of my life because at the very least the lore is fantastic, and the sandbox type approach to the world lets me make my own fun. If that's not an endorsement, I don't know what is. tl;dr: Boo Bethesda. Yay Elder Scrolls with dragons. Huzzah mods. Punch a mudcrab.
northwind;-;Seeing as Valve has been totally unreponsive in this issue and even going so far as to block dissent, this seems to be the only useful way to express opinion on this whole paid mod issue. The issue here for me is that monetizing mods means that developers are going to be able to skimp on game features and expect them to added later by mods, which they will make money from without work. Betheda games are notorious for being buggy and their UI are terrible. Mods like SkyUI fix this, but if mods are monetized, SkyUI has confirmed that they will go to paid mod status, we will have to pay extra for the same utility in a game. Not a good move for the health of PC gaming or the modding community. In his reddit post, Gabe Newell expressed that this move was not about making money. If that's the case, why not back off and work through this slower, address community concerns, and then make a decision. Maybe its about not showing weakness, but ignoring community concerns, or giving non-answers like Gabe's reddit post, are not helping the issue.
DR. Willy;-;As much as I like skyrim due to recent events I am giving it a bad review in hope of changing something in this crooked industry
Sachen Doren;-;The Game is fine but having to pay for mods is out right outragous. Valve Hid their microtransactions behind "supporting the mod developers" The gaming community isnt stupid. taking 75% of their costs is one way to make it obvious that this was for valve and not for the mod developers. if it wasnt so why not just add a donation button?
CustomReality;-;This game's time is over, and thus no longer worth playing. After the initial 12 or so hours it takes to beat the main quest line, you'll find yourself bored with this sparsely populated "sandbox". The real 'magic' comes from the mods (free) which extend and enhance the experience to well over 500 hours (no exaggeration). In fact, mods even fix the bugs the Developer/Publisher either cannot or care not to fix. However, with paid mods, the modding community that has kept this game worth playing after all these years has been washed away. I would not purchase this old and buggy game without access to the mods. Without the (free) mods it is only a weekend before you're bored - not worth the price.
CustomReality;-;This game's time is over, and thus no longer worth playing. After the initial 12 or so hours it takes to beat the main quest line, you'll find yourself bored with this sparsely populated "sandbox". The real 'magic' comes from the mods (free) which extend and enhance the experience to well over 500 hours (no exaggeration). In fact, mods even fix the bugs the Developer/Publisher either cannot or care not to fix. However, with paid mods, the modding community that has kept this game worth playing after all these years has been washed away. I would not purchase this old and buggy game without access to the mods. Without the (free) mods it is only a weekend before you're bored - not worth the price.
Lando System;-;I bought this game under the assumption that I'd be able to install and use the bug-fixing mods that the community has developed for free. I did not buy this bug-riddled game to have to pay more money for fixes.
Cpt James32;-;This game use to be great! Now it hides all the mods behind a paywall. Why not use a donate button instead of this obvious cash grab?
spaghetti?;-;Gameplay is repetitive. Any enjoyment to be found from mods now behind a paywall. gg volvo
Dammit_Jeff;-;Can't recomend this game when Valve and Bethesda are making bad desicions with mods.
veodi;-;I would love to put a possitive review for this game as it is one of the best games on the market but unfortauntly I have to agree with Bob on this one.. paid mods sucks donkey $$$
ghost13;-;Paid mods are a terrible, terrible decision that ruin this game.
WANNA BUILD A SNOWMANNNN;-;The introduction of paid mods as a way to supplement Bethesda is absolutely outrageous. I used to love following Gamespot's featurette on "Weekly Skyrim Mods", but with the introduction of this nonsense, I just feel sick. No longer can I be "IMMA GET THAT!" Instead, it's "geez, I wonder how much THAT costs?" Absolutely ridiculous. This game was released nearly 4 years ago. The continued revenue seen by Bethesda from the mod community was already significant, but this cash grab is absolutely shameful. 25% to the modder, 75% to Valve/Bethesda? Absolutely insane.
mdX;-;Introduced the concept of paid mods "to support modders" while charging a 75% fee on sales.
Siege;-;The way that this game has been warped; the way the modding community - the community that has kept this game alive for 5 years - has been forced to turn on itself has ruined this game. There can no longer exist an innocent modding community; a community built solely on mutual respect and love of a game and a hobby. I cannot, in good faith, recommend this game to anyone in its current state. There is nothing so positive that can supersede the massive negative implemented by Valve.
Sir Scrubs-A-Lot;-;The recent additon of paying for mods is deplorable. Sad really. Changing my review from positive to negative.
Bolexle;-;Only a great game because of mods. If they become locked behind a paywall, not worth the time.
Dy;-;I have never been more disappointed with a beloved Elder Scrolls title. Never mind, ESO is at the bottom of the tier list.
inothernews1;-;This paid mod  is bull.
Carl Brutananadilewski;-;Paying for mods? lol
Magic  \_()_/;-;paid mods should not be a thing...
DehBadger;-;This is the most in-depth game i've ever played for 2 hours straight. So many workshop mods, in game items, quests and dungeons; it's almost impossible to put down!
DehBadger;-;This is the most in-depth game i've ever played for 2 hours straight. So many workshop mods, in game items, quests and dungeons; it's almost impossible to put down!
Arthur V;-;the best RPG game I have ever played.
RenegadeCop;-;Can't wait to pay money for a bug-fix mod because Bethesda can't program a game to save their life. I don't even buy off-brand soda, why would I buy off-brand, unofficial, unlicensed, unregulated, overly-expensive DLC?
(faze) greenskule 9901;-;no cause i bout it and it got deleated when i restarted my computer an it seid to restat agin
kingofengland22;-;This is the best game I've ever played in my entire life.
Resi;-;Draugrs: The Game
Butch DeLoria;-;Don't get me wrong the game is amazing. I am just  about paid mods. When they go down my review goes up.
Swiss;-;Valve is not giving content creators a fair share of the revenue for mods.
TableSpoob;-;Due to recent events I wouold no longer reccomend this game.
Tizen;-;The new monetized modding update is nothing more than a greedy cash grab. Bethesda and Valve both each take more than the mod creator does in profits from mod sales. This is deplorable business.
Napoleon Blownapart;-;Was a great game, then they tried to turn it into Candy Crush with dragons
Spooooonnnn!;-;anything that has paid mods is bad. and bad for the rest of video games.
Mr. Peanut Butter;-;you brought this on yourselves, the paid mods go, or we go
Asukafag Detected;-;Paid mods are a cancer on this game and the community it is a part of. Avoid at all costs until the shillling is removed.
KingPUSH;-;I had this game it was great. I had loads of mods installed and everything worked together fantastically. I formated my pc and tried to set it up the same today, but paying for mods is something that I cannot agree with and so will not be bothering to install the game again. I will also not be spending money on steam after this.
LoL LTU;-;The game is great! I like it. DEM DRAGONS U MAD BRO ?
dustyjo;-;Hope you like paying for mods. Developer is nothing but a greedy . Do not buy.
-SNiGS- Kaori1;-;Pay for mods?  you Bethesda.
an actual gun;-;Skyrim is fun game... I put in a lot of hours, I did everything , I had a great time. But listen, we need to talk. There's an alarming amount of bad and bittersweet in this game. The world is larger and more realized than in previous games, and obviously the graphics are a lot more detailed, but the stat game is a watered down wreck where making and leveling a character lacks depth and decision and all of that great stuff we saw in Oblivion and Morrowind. Even the questlines are simplified, with less choices in dialog, and with boring and samesy objectives compared to previous games where the different guilds really stood apart both in gameplay and flavor. If this iteration is setting a trend for a possible VI, Skyrim could be the last TES game I play.
skaskanker;-;Amazing game. I have 250+ hours in it and I still haven't gotten bored.
MeowMeowKitty;-;Walked into Whiterun shanked a kid then ran away 10/10
AKA VINNY;-;This game is simply the best!
venom. #OLevels;-;An amazing game, stunning graphics, 9/10 would play.
Jason Vorhees;-;This game is one of th ebest games I have ever played but there is always something bad for this game its that you cant kill everyone some people just drop down and get back up like the Jarls . 9.55/10
Elnacho1698;-;I love this game! Action packed with a great story line filled with lots of unexpected parts! I give it a 9/10
chrispy;-;the best game i have ever spent money on, and its seemingly never ending!!!!
Emperor James I;-;Why are you reading this ? Buy the game!
$pace57;-;Best RPG game ever! This is one of the best games! I love this game so much!
Mark;-;The best game I've played in awhile. Just alot of fighting and in your own way, either with swords and bows, or magic and swords! How cool is that?!?
Rehna Rama Rnet;-;And the Scrolls have foretold, of amazing games in the cold, That when consoles and pc wage war come to Steam! Skyrim, Bane of TIme, ancient game unbound, With a hunger to swallow all time! Procrastinationborn, by his honor is sworn, To keep work forever at bay!
ThePwner;-;Amazing!!! Just Buy It You Wont Regret It!
Origin388;-;Awesome storyline, awesome progression, endless replay-ability because of mods. Buy this, literally no reason not to.
Levitate;-;Adopted a child, then I lost her by playing hide and seek. 10/10
Shifty (in spain for 3weeks);-;Really cool sick game
Quan (SERVER UP);-;I played Skyrim 2 years late, and you know what I say? 2 years of wasted time. This game is the epitome of an RPG/Action-Adventure game. Presentation: 9.5/10 - Everything just comes together. It just works. Graphics: 10/10 - Some of the best graphics you've likely ever seen. Especially with the right mods and ENB's. Sound: 10/10 - The soundtrack is the most beautiful I have heard in a video game. It really gives you that sense of exploration, or whatever it is you may be doing. The music during dragon fights is just mind blowing. Gameplay: 9.5/10 - The combat is fantastic, there isn't much that could be done better here in my opinion. It isn't "perfect" but it comes close enough that you can forgive the very tiny things that you may, (or may not,) notice after playing for many, many hours. Lasting Appeal: 10/10 - This game will always be one that will draw me back, with it's infinite possibilites and storyline that will be different every time you play through it. Get this game, you may think you don't like it, but you do. Trust me, you do.
FoxHound7-2;-;freedom
McCoco;-;I love this game, it is my life.
Skitter Salali;-;Brilliant game. I am still enjoying it immensely. There is so much to this game and if you want to complete it you are going to need hundreds of hours. Would definitely recommend.
Michael;-;Skyrim has me walking around and telling my buddies - sorry i cant hangout today i took an arrow to the knee 10/10
akeN;-;A Great game 9/10 this game changed the face of RPG for good , it set new standards in its genre,,, Dragon Age sucks dragon  compared to this!! Should you buy it? Hell yeah if you want a game that you can play for hours on end.
T-Z-UnKnown-;-;Much good    Many cool    Such awesome!    Wow.
[I.O.T] snurri_;-;this game is way over my top 10 it would be the first on my top -100000000000000000000000000000000000 i would realy recomend this game
`Hout.;-;"Like Skyrim with guns!" 10/10 IGN.
[t];-;you can kill dragons and get high on sugar
WWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWW;-;Enjoy hundreds upon hundreds of copy-pasted dungeons, boring enemies, uninteresting skills, basic spells, fetch quests, glitches and bugs. Take in the breath takingly small Skyrim (If this is a country then how big is the planet.) as you click on draugrs, click on bandits, click on falmers, click on spiders, click on wizards, and click on dragons. Watch as your hero cinematically kills the easiest enemies in any game ever, and when you turn up the difficulty, the game lazily only increases the enemy health and damage. Feel like you haven't gotten any stronger due to the amazing scaling enemies. But people keep telling me that this is the best game ever so I guess they're right. I give this game a 10/10.
Sergo;-;You get to  dragons in the  unprotected then you absorb their  essences and shout at giant elephants that somehow dont give a flying  but then out of nowhere a giant fat black guy bangs ur head with his floppy  so hard nasa gets jealous of how high you go, wiz khalifa be like "damn he high"
gg living skills;-;although the follower limit is 1, I somehow have 3 and I know how to get a 4th. gg also bakestabes do 30x damage and one-shot everything. would buy again 11/10
